" doublequotes just for editor
"" only matches ""
", blockCommentEnd: "
".example.com"
"A Writable Stream that represents the child process's stdin.
"A request-path path-matches a given cookie-path if at least one of the following conditions holds:"
"Complex" syntax
"Convert the cookie-domain to lower case."
"Development" is defined as working from source - not packaged code.
"Either: The cookie's host-only-flag is true and the canonicalized request-host is identical to the cookie's domain.
"Fat queries" represent a predetermined set of fields that may change as a result of a mutation, and which should therefore be queried in order to get a consistent view of the data after performing a mutation.
"Hidden" options and subcmds are ones with the `hidden: true` attribute to exclude them from default help output.
"If the attribute-name case-insensitively matches the string "Secure", the user agent MUST append an attribute to the cookie-attribute-list with an attribute-name of Secure and an empty attribute-value."
"If the attribute-value failed to parse as a cookie date, ignore the cookie-av."
"If the cookie's http-only-flag is true, then exclude the cookie if the cookie-string is being generated for a "non-HTTP" API"
"If the cookie's secure-only-flag is true, then the request-uri's scheme must denote a "secure" protocol"
"If the unparsed-attributes string is empty, skip the rest of these steps."
"Private" methods
"Proprietary" Interface.
"Reference Counting"
"The domain string and the string are identical.
"The request-uri's path path-matches the cookie's path."
"all" is not a device-specific media type.
"child" events are for any and all children at all levels.
"constants"
"default" command/ctrl key for platform, Command on Mac, Ctrl on other platforms
"entry" events are for direct entries in a specific dir.
"eslint-disable" disables rules after it.
"expand 32-byte k"
"foo":"http://blah" and "foo":"latest" are always presumed valid
"name": intentionally not styling
"negative" y so we can replace sub with am later
"nolint" is to suppress ArcanistPrivateKeyLinter errors
"o  The cookie-path and the request-path are identical."
"path" is a really common name, so "pathModule" is the collision escape hatch.
"push" and all the other navigation operations expect routes to be like this:
"resourcesPath" only exists in Atom.
"style" attribute might have changed.
"toggle" behavior
' above to get type checking for the functions to be tested.
'--nodates' avoids appending dates to the file path line.
'--noprefix' omits the a/ and b/ prefixes from filenames.
'--others' means untracked files, and '--exclude-standard' excludes ignored files.
'/' is the top level itself
'0b', '0B' - binary number
'No one's home right now, come back later'
'Untracked' files are files that haven't been added to the repo, but haven't been explicitly git-ignored.
'Untracked' files are files that haven't been added to the repo, but haven't been explicitly hg-ignored.
'a' is enqueued twice
'assets_awesomemodule_icon'
'chunk' is an input chunk.
'configure'
'fbide' matches 'FaceBookIntegratedDevelopmentEnvironment' and 'faceBookIntegratedDevelopmentEnvironment'.
'file:///sdcard/AwesomeModule/drawable-mdpi/icon.png'
'foo/bla/foo.js' does not match 'bba', but `bar.js` and `baz.js` do.
'init written successfully'
'json-parse-helpfulerror'
'listening' listener
'msTransform' is correct, but the other prefixes should be capitalized
'no' - The view is not important for accessibility.
'no-hide-descendants' - The view is not important for accessibility, nor are any of its descendant views.
'nobody' typically doesn't have permission to write to /tmp even if it's never used, sh freaks out.
'python' should be set by now
'readme-demo',
'return' followed by a space and an identifier is very common.
'row' is a 3 element array of 3 component vectors
'shift-version': 'no-shift-version'
'split' removes the colon, but we want to underline the colon too.
'stretch': Scale width and height independently, This may change the aspect ratio of the src.
'touch' is the least permissive invalidation strategy: It will invalidate for changes that touch the marked region in any way.
'y' is "sticky" option in Mozilla
'y4vwv8m33hed9ety83jmv52f', Fallback api_key
'yes' - The view is important for accessibility.
, ...iterables
, additional arguments
, cb, thisArg, compareFn
, code, ext
, endPosition
, fromIndex
, mapFn, thisArg
, msg1, msg2, msg3
, precision
, start, end
, thisArg, compareFn
-  NODE_DELETE provides configuration for deleting a node and the corresponding edge from a range.
-  RANGE_ADD provides configuration for adding a new edge to a range.
-  RANGE_DELETE provides configuration for deleting an edge from a range but doesn't delete the node.
- "indexArray" is an array of indexes in the "dominatedNodes" with the same positions as in the _nodeIndex.
- 'auto': The View can be the target of touch events.
- 'box-none': The View is never the target of touch events but it's subviews can be.
- 'none': The View is never the target of touch events.
- 'on-drag', the keyboard is dismissed when a drag begins.
- A configurable cache manager for persisting data between sessions.
- A configurable network layer for resolving queries/mutations.
- A configurable task scheduler to control when internal tasks are executed.
- A file or directory path that's a deep child of the root path.
- All previous 'project' scope messages are invalidated whenever projectMessages is populated.
- An in-memory cache of fetched data.
- Android 4-4.3 - Chrome 26-34 - Firefox 14-29 - Internet Explorer 11 - iPad Safari 6-7.1 - iPhone Safari 7-7.1 - Safari 6-7
- Attach handlers to the instrumented function.
- Automatically subscribe to data changes.
- Avoid unnecessary updates if data is unchanged.
- Called whenever the results of the fragment change.
- Closed - No longer connected.
- Conditionals when the field is present.
- Consider caching this for the lifetime of the component, or possibly being able to share this cache between any `ScrollMap` view.
- DOM properties: `className`, `name`, `title`, etc.
- Deactivating events while rearranging the DOM, preventing blurs/focuses, while guaranteeing that afterwards, the event system is reactivated.
- Empty WorkingSet is essentially an empty filter - it accepts everything.
- Event listeners: `onClick`, `onMouseDown`, etc.
- Firefox 3-13 - Internet Explorer 6-9 - iPad Safari 4.3 - Lynx 2.8.7
- Fires after user input.
- Fires for collapsed selection.
- Flushing a queue of collected DOM mutations to the main UI thread after a reconciliation takes place in a worker thread.
- If aPath is a URL or a data URI, aPath is returned, unless aPath is a scheme-relative URL: Then the scheme of aRoot, if any, is prepended first.
- If aPath is absolute, the result is aPath.
- If all items are equal, returns previous array - If any items differ, returns new array
- Implement the handlers on your component class in order to provide feedback to the user.
- Implement/integrate with customized constraint based layout system and keep track of which dimensions must be remeasured.
- Invoking any collected `componentDidUpdate` callbacks after rendering new content.
- It also allows to send the style only once through the bridge.
- Joining for example 'http://' and 'www.example.com' is also supported.
- Jumping to outline item locations works for new, unsaved files.
- Manipulate variables via methods on `this.props.relay`.
- May end in a trailing slash if it's a directory path.
- Naming the styles is a good way to add meaning to the low level components in the render function.
- Non-empty WorkingSet contains every file specified by the contained URIs or below.
- Other C0/C1 control characters and DEL will lead to a return value of -1.
- Otherwise aPath is a path.
- Otherwise the two paths are joined with a slash.
- Previous 'file' scope messages are invalidated if and only if filePathToMessages contains their key as a path.
- Remember which deferred fragment/data pairs have been fetched.
- Removes unnecessary '.' parts.
- Restores selection range.
- Return outside functions is allowed
- Run the code which triggers the handlers.
- Stop a scroll mid-bounce at the top, continue pulling to have the outer view dismiss.
- Stop a scroll on the left edge, then turn that into an outer view's backswipe.
- TTY_OUTPUT set if the command should be run as if it were attached to a tty.
- Text nodes cannot be assigned a React root ID.
- The `EventPluginHub` then dispatches the events.
- The `EventPluginHub` will then process each event by annotating them with "dispatches", a sequence of listeners and IDs that care about that event.
- The callback to be called on a text event.
- The earlier we find the match, the more likely it is to be what you're looking for.
- The exact `rootPath` in an exact or symlinked form.
- The more cases of the characters that match, the more likely it is to be what you want.
- The query should request "clientMutationId" as a subselection.
- The remote URIs are port-insensitive and the port part is stripped from when internal structures are built.
- The shallow dependencies each file on the dependency list has - Inverse shallow dependencies map
- The shorter the result, the closer the length is to what you searched for, so it's more likely.
- There may be a gap between a query response being processed and rendering the component that initiated the fetch.
- We normalize and de-duplicate events to account for browser quirks.
- Without `renderFailure`, an error will render to null.
- Without `renderLoading`, the existing view will continue to render.
- WorkingSet aims to support queries for the hierarchical structures, such as TreeView.
- `DUMMY` -  Dummy data connection.
- `ETHERNET` - The Ethernet data connection.
- `MOBILE_DUN` - A DUN-specific Mobile data connection.
- `MOBILE_HIPRI` - A High Priority Mobile data connection.
- `MOBILE_MMS` - An MMS-specific Mobile data connection.
- `MOBILE_SUPL` -  A SUPL-specific Mobile data connection.
- `MOBILE` - The Mobile data connection.
- `NONE` - device is offline - `BLUETOOTH` - The Bluetooth data connection.
- `UNKNOWN` - Unknown data connection.
- `VPN` -  A virtual network using one or more native bearers.
- `WIMAX` -  The WiMAX data connection.
- `alertAction` : The "action" displayed beneath an actionable notification.
- `alertBody` : The message displayed in the notification alert.
- `black`, scroll indicator is black.
- `callCount`: number of times the method was called.
- `clobber`: The left `Array` is ignored.
- `diffCalls`: an array of calls describing the difference between the given `calls` and already fetched data.
- `indexByIndex`: The result is achieved by recursively deep merging at each index.
- `localNotification` : Fired when a local notification is received.
- `measurements`: an object mapping names of profiled functions to profiling data including: - `aggregateTime`: total time spent in the method.
- `register`: Fired when the user registers for remote notifications.
- `title`: `string` - Title to display in the side-bar's dropdown that enables toggling between registered views - `toggleCommand`: `string` - Atom command name for which the side bar will listen on the `atom-workspace` element.
- `totalTime`: the total time spent inside profiled Relay functions.
- `unrecognized`: one other process is running on the port ew expect the packager to be running.
- `userInfo`  : An optional object containing additional notification data.
- `userInfo` : An optional object containing additional notification data.
- `viewId`: `string` - A unique identifier for the view that can be used to later destroy the view.
- `which` is the pressed key code, but a command combination is being used.
- `which` is the pressed key code, but no char is available.
- `white`, scroll indicator is white.
- add tag v0.21.0-rc
- and a `close` method that accepts the precomputation.
- argsOrName: project name or full list of custom arguments to pass to the generator.
- argument size specifiers.
- bias: Either 'SourceMapConsumer.GREATEST_LOWER_BOUND' or 'SourceMapConsumer.LEAST_UPPER_BOUND'.
- callbackOrButtons -- This optional argument should be either a single-argument function or an array of buttons.
- change React.podspec
- change ReactAndroid/gradle.properties
- check that argument version matches branch e.g. 0.33.1 or 0.33.0-rc4
- check we are in release branch, e.g. 0.33-stable
- column: Optional.
- column: The column number in the generated source, or null.
- column: The column number in the generated source.
- column: The column number in the original source, or null.
- column: The column number in the original source.
- currentTarget: Identifies the current target for the event, as the event traverses the navigation context tree.
- data is passed down via `scope`, which flows from a parent field down through intermediary fragments to the nearest child field.
- defaultValue: string -- the default value for the text field.
- disposable: A Disposable which should be disposed when this function is no longer needed by the caller.
- dx/dy: Cumulative touch distance - not the same thing as sum of each touch distance.
- file: Optional.
- file: The generated file this source map is associated with.
- line: The line number in the original source, or null.
- line: The line number in the original source.
- locked-closed, meaning that the drawer will stay closed and not respond to gestures.
- locked-open, meaning that the drawer will stay opened and not respond to gestures.
- map: A source map definition.
- mappings: A string of base64 VLQs which contain the actual mappings.
- message: string -- An optional message that appears above the text input.
- name: An optional original token name for this mapping.
- name: The original identifier, or null.
- names: An array of identifiers which can be referenced by individual mappings.
- names: An array of identifiers which can be referrenced by individual mappings.
- original: An object with the original line and column positions.
- sections: A list of section definitions.
- sourceRoot: A root for all relative URLs in this source map.
- sourceRoot: An optional root for all URLs in this source map.
- sourceRoot: Optional.
- sources: An array of URLs to the original source files.
- sourcesContent: Optional.
- title: string -- The dialog's title.
- type: string -- This configures the text input.
- vx/vy: Velocity.
--- "babel.js" is the wrapper around Babel used by Atom.
--- Exported API
--- Exports
--- Globals
--- Helpers
--- Ignores other things.
--- Internal
--- Specific Errors
--- Welcome to debugging React --- This error was thrown as a convenience so that you can use this stack to find the callsite that caused this warning to fire.
---- Bash completion
---- Option types
----- FromFlowToTypechecks -----
----- Tracking which TypeVariables are in scope -----
-------- Generating Android Artifacts with JavaDoc Java -version outputs to stderr 0_o
----------------- Abstract functions that must be implemented by concrete resolvers
----------------- Abstract functions that should be implemented by concrete git resolvers
----------------- Override the checkout function to work with the local copy
----------------- Plugin Resolver is always considered potentially cacheable The "resolve" method decides whether to use cached or fetch new version.
--nodedir was specified.
...and a last edge
...and finally use the default registry
...and increases...
...but is invisible to the component
...but, if used, it needs a line break
...iterables
...or the next service...
...or the previous service...
...or when it's already visible and we hear a REFRESH_TASKS action.
...or wrap around to the very bottom
...or wrap around to the very top
...until we go too far.
...when the toolbar becomes visible
...which we take until the process exits.
...with a first edge
.gitignore:
/-/all is special.
// FIXME: make SuggestBox work for multiple documents.
/Global_Objects/Math/imul
/blob/master/tests/tests.js
/deps/npm same test as above but make sure additional directory entries don't cause an issue
/lib/node_modules/npm or .../node_modules/npm depending on the patform
/tests/tests.js
0 - 25: ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
0 is dummy port for v0.6
0 results yields missing 'property' member
0.8 http streams have a bug, where if they're paused with data in their buffers when the socket closes, they call `end` before emptying those buffers, which results in the entire pipeline ending and thus the point that applied backpressure never being able to trigger a `resume`.
0.x.y-pre versions are not published yet and cannot be installed.
0035d18e2dcf9aad669b1c7c07319e17abfe3762  ./node-v0.11.4.tar.gz
01.01.1975 00:00
1 - First mock all functions imported by the module under test
1 css pixel for splitter border.
1 for splitter
1 minute CPU average.
1-3,5-8, and D-F: 1:16 odds over 30 digits
1-based entry in the history stack.
1-character punctuators.
1.0.0 "pre" would become 1.0.0-0 which is the wrong direction.
1.0.0-5 bumps to 1.0.0 1.1.0 bumps to 2.0.0
1.2.0-5 bumps to 1.2.0 1.2.1 bumps to 1.3.0
1.2.0-5 patches to 1.2.0 1.2.0 patches to 1.2.1
1.2.0-beta.1 bumps to 1.2.0-beta.2, 1.2.0-beta.fooblz or 1.2.0-beta bumps to 1.2.0-beta.0
1/viewScale is 1:1 in terms of pixels, so allow zooming to 10x of native size
10MB is a very reasonable upper bound.
13 Statements
150ms is empirically long enough to let the stack clear from this blur event and for the click event to trigger.
2 - Transform data
2 for the banner borders
2 is the directory in which to run `apm test --one`.
2 lines were added in the middle and one at the end.
2 lines were removed in the middle and last new-line replaced.
2 to 4 digits
2-character punctuators.
2009  All rights reserved.
2011-11-18 11:36:01.388-08:00
21 isn't widely supported and 22 does the same thing
21.1.5.1 CreateStringIterator Abstract Operation
22.1.5.1 CreateArrayIterator Abstract Operation
23.1.3.1 Clears the map from all keys and values.
23.1.3.11 Returns an iterator over the values pairs in the collection.
23.1.3.3 Delete a key/value from the collection.
23.1.3.6 Gets a value associated with a key in the collection.
23.1.3.7 Check if a key exists in the collection.
23.1.3.8 Returns an iterator over the keys in the collection.
23.1.3.9 Adds a key/value pair to the collection.
23.1.5.1 Create a `MapIterator` for a given `map`.
23.1.5.2.1 Get the next iteration.
23.2.3.1  If it doesn't already exist in the collection a `value` is added.
23.2.3.2  Clears the set.
23.2.3.4  Deletes a `value` from the collection if it exists.
23.2.3.7  Returns an iterator over the colleciton of values.
257 and 003030 or 202000 at position 262
26 - 51: abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
26 Feb 16:19:34
2D Value for driving 2D animations, such as pan gestures.
2D value class for driving 2D animations, such as pan gestures.
3 - Perform your test
3 The ArrayBuffer Type
3 digits are only allowed when string starts with 0, 1, 2, 3
3-character punctuators.
31-bit min RFC6265 S5.1.1 date parser:
360 is expressed as 0
4 - Reset the require cache so your mocks don't get used for other tests.
4 The ArrayBufferView Type
4 followers
4-character punctuator.
404 responses aren't currently JSON.
4: 1:1 odds on 1 digit, plus 1:16 odds on 30 digits
4xx Client Errors
5 The Typed Array View Types
5 seconds is enough for the restart.
52 - 61: 0123456789
5xx Server Errors
6 The DataView View Type
7.8.4 of ES262 spec
8 hours: heuristic for "current work day".
8-B: 1:4 odds on 1 digit, plus 1:16 odds on 30 digits
A "measurement" is a set of metrics recorded for each flush.
A "null" reducer
A "session" for the purpose of analytics.
A .leading comment comes before the node, whereas a .trailing comment comes after it.
A BasicSourceMapConsumer instance represents a parsed source map which we can query for information about the original file positions by giving it a file position in the generated source.
A Boolean value that indicates whether the navigation bar is hidden
A Boolean value that indicates whether the navigation bar is hidden by default
A Boolean value that indicates whether the navigation bar is translucent
A Boolean value that indicates whether the navigation bar is translucent by default
A Boolean value that indicates whether the tab bar is translucent
A Boolean value that indicates whether to hide the 1px hairline shadow
A Boolean value that indicates whether to hide the 1px hairline shadow by default
A Combo Box.
A Def type can only match an object value.
A DiagnosticProvider will typically subscribe to only one, depending on whether it wants to be notified whenever a file changes or only when it is saved.
A FixedDataTable must specify its own width.
A JavaScript tokenizer / parser / beautifier / compressor.
A LineView may correspond to multiple logical lines, if those are connected by collapsed ranges.
A Progressbar for showing deterministic progress.
A Promise utility that runs a maximum of limit async operations at a time iterating over an array and returning the result of executions.
A Queue which will process elements at intervals, only if the queue contains any elements.
A React component for displaying different types of images, including network images, static resources, temporary local images, and images from local disk, such as the camera roll.
A React component for displaying text which supports nesting, styling, and touch handling.
A RefreshControl component, used to provide pull-to-refresh functionality for the ScrollView.
A RemoteConnection represents a directory which has been opened in Nuclide on a remote machine.
A ServerConnection keeps a list of RemoteConnections - one for each open directory on the remote machine.
A SourceMapConsumer instance represents a parsed source map which we can query for information about the original file positions by giving it a file position in the generated source.
A TextEventDispatcher will be subscribed to text events if and only if it has subscribers of its own.
A TextMarker is a handle that can be used to clear or find a marked position in the document.
A URI is needed by this point, emit error if we haven't been able to get one
A better solution would be to have fs.symlink be supported on windows in some nice fashion.
A bit simpler than readable streams.
A bit too dangerous to mutate `next`.
A boolean indicating whether or not the tests are running headless.
A break doesn't have to happen here but whenever we choose to break at a scopeBreak we must also break at all other scopeBreaks within the same scope.
A bug in IE8 can cause this value to be negative, so guard it.
A cached object to use.
A callback when the Snapshot view is ready to be compared
A catch clause establishes a new scope but the only variable bound in that scope is the catch parameter.
A checkbox component with an input checkbox and a label.
A class to hold information about the Codewalk Viewer.
A comma-separated list of Atom grammars understood by the provider, e.g. 'source.js.jsx'
A common use case is to set the backgroundColor for every page
A common way to use this API is to call `LayoutAnimation.configureNext` before calling `setState`.
A completely generic pooler is easy to implement, but would require accessing the `arguments` object.
A component used to select a single value from a range of values.
A consistent shared value representing "not set" which equals nothing other than itself, and nothing that could be provided externally.
A consumer of a diagnostics provider will subscribe to these events.
A container for centralizing the logic for making panels scrollable, resizeable, dockable, etc.
A controlled navigation view that renders a stack of cards.
A convenient way to reason about plugins, without having to package every one of them.
A custom icon for the tab.
A custom icon when the tab is selected.
A custom version of node-inspector's Session that ignores commands that we don't support.
A data structure to provide a sorted view of accumulated mappings in a performance conscious manner.
A data structure which is a combination of an array and a set.
A date has been selected.
A decorator for adding Atom-style observation methods to a React component class whose whose subscribers are invoked whenever the component updates.
A deep dependency of yeoman spams console.log with giant json objects.
A default connection profile is a combination of the user's last inputs to the connection dialog and the default settings, plus the update logic we use to change the remote server command.
A default import and an ImportNamespaceSpecifier can only occur when a ImportDefaultSpecifier is followed by a ImportNamespaceSpecifier:
A destructive slice always unlocks indentation.
A directory is revertable if it contains changed files.
A dismissible heartbeat notification with this code is already active.
A distinct key value may only occur in one key/value pair within the Map's collection.
A double-colon is used to distinguish between client ids and static ids that happen to hash to `:client`.
A dumb traversal method.
A failed call can result from an async thrown exception, or invalid result.
A fallback for creating "custom" events.
A few possibilities:  - `which` is `0`.
A file in the file cache.
A file is added that meets the criteria under .hgignore.
A file is revertable if it's changed.
A file path will not appear in the returned Map if it is not in the repo, if it has no changes, or if there is a pending `hg diff` call for it already.
A file that was previously ignored, has been deleted.
A file watch event can also be considered a directry change for the parent directory if a file was created or deleted.
A floating-point number that determines how quickly the scroll view decelerates after the user lifts their finger.
A form that is used to create a new connection profile.
A formatter which may shorten hostnames.
A foundational component for inputting text into the app via a keyboard.
A function called when the "Cancel" button is clicked.
A function called when the "Save" button is clicked.
A function declaration creates a symbol in the current scope
A function following one of those tokens is an expression.
A function that can be optionally passed to ProcessOutputView to override ProcessOutputView's default behavior for handling new data from the process.
A function that gets called with the new selected index on change.
A function that kicks off a process.
A function that returns the scrollable component in which the list rows are rendered.
A function that takes a single image as a parameter and renders it.
A function which returns a value representing an "owner" for transient writes to tries.
A generic component that displays selectable list items, and offers the ability to add and remove items.
A good blog post to understand how it works: http://gafferongames.com/game-physics/integration-basics/
A good rule of thumb is to multiply the size of the image you display by the pixel ratio.
A good tap interaction isn't as simple as you might think.
A guarded error in mounting might prevent initialization of resolvers.
A hack around the fact that files with "php" extension might be either standalone or html embedded php scripts.
A helper function for this class that lets us quickly determine if the view is currently animating.
A helper function that checks if an object is an Observable.
A helper function that let's us 'apply' an array of arguments to a constructor.
A helper function to scroll to a specific page in the ViewPager.
A helper function to scroll to a specific point  in the scrollview.
A helper function to zoom to a specific rect in the scrollview.
A helper method for the store, to deal with navigating the tree.
A heuristic for named variables in Hack.
A hierarchical equivalent of forEach.
A higher order component that wraps the provided gadget to adapt it to Atom's expectations for pane items.
A hint tree to display.
A home-made flex function so that we can read the message column width easily.
A linearization of the inheritance hierarchy.
A linked list to keep track of recently-used-ness
A list of all gestures that are enabled on this scene
A list of offsets in the buffer where we need to insert sequence tag/len pairs.
A little extra validation when the old range spans only one line.
A location which can be navigated to.
A lock file is a more reliable signal, so defer to it.
A lot of modules rely on these two functions.
A lower number means `needle` is more relevant to `haystack`.
A lower number yields better accuracy for code that is tracking the scroll position, but can lead to scroll performance problems due to the volume of information being send over the bridge.
A managed radio group component.
A map from each diagnostic provider to the array of project messages from it.
A map from each diagnostic provider to: a map from each file it has messages for to the array of messages for that file.
A map from each file that has messages from any diagnostic provider to the set of diagnostic providers that have messages for it.
A map of NuclideUri to the number of listeners registered for changes to messages for that file.
A mapping can have one of the three levels of data:  1.
A more correct, but more complex, solution would be to symlink the deeper thing into the new location.
A name to identify the individual instance to the SnapshotView
A named function: "function f...".
A nasty hack since Atom doesn't export this module.
A network is classified as metered when the user is sensitive to heavy data usage on that connection due to monetary costs, data limitations or battery/performance issues.
A new event is started when the previous origin does not match the current, or the origins don't allow matching.
A new force index can be used to overwrite previous ranges.
A new header 2.
A new line literal is okay.
A new one is created every time the selection changes.
A no-operation function that returns `undefined` regardless of the arguments it receives.
A node ID is only generated if the node does not have an id and there is no existing edge.
A node is "valid" if it is contained by a currently mounted container.
A non-nullable buffer property.
A normalized type used internally to represent all possible kinds of messages.
A notification stream to communicate events to atom's notification system.
A nullable string property.
A part of a file/extended header 3.
A path URI is either a local path, such as: /aaa/bb/ccc or remote nuclide://sandbox.com/aaa/bb/ccc - The URIs can point either to files or to directories.
A path is defined as 'relevant' if it is within the project directory opened within the repo.
A path relative to the folder that contains `service-config.json`.
A performance optimization for improving scroll perf of large lists, used in conjunction with overflow: 'hidden' on the row containers.
A pool that executes Promise executors in parallel given the poolSize, in order.
A possible fix would be to trim the dependencies in MessageQueue to its minimal features and embed that in the native runtime.
A previous serialized cache has the most recent items first
A previously `stale` scene is now part of the nextState, so we revive it by removing it from the stale scene map.
A primary use-case for this is Objective-C methods.
A proper, supported way to preload images will be provided as a separate API.
A reasonable heuristic that prevents us from having to measure.
A recursive descent parser operates by defining functions for all syntactic elements, and recursively calling those, each function advancing the input stream and returning an AST node.
A recursive walk is one where your functions override the default walkers.
A region of untyped code.
A regular message, emitted by output providers.
A reload basically indicates that an external program saved the file, so it should trigger a refresh.
A reload changes the text in the buffer, so it should trigger a refresh.
A request timeout is considered a network away event.
A restart is also required when compilation flags have changed.
A route is an object that the navigator will use to identify each scene to render.
A second optional argument can be given to further configure the parser process.
A sequence of European terminators adjacent to European numbers changes to all European numbers.
A sequence of neutrals takes the direction of the surrounding strong text if the text on both sides has the same direction.
A server message stream to communicate events to the debugger UI.
A server socket close will trigger a client disconnect and a scheduled reconnect.
A set of functions for modifying `__status__` on records inside of RelayStore.
A simple array of data blobs that are passed to the renderRow function in order.
A simple class for collecting bug report data.
A simple elastic interaction, similar to a spring.
A simple gt/lt/eq thing, or just "" to indicate "any version"
A simple heuristic for identifier names in JavaScript.
A simple use would be
A simple view that will render a scene for the currently focused sub-state.
A simple walk is one where you simply specify callbacks to be called on specific nodes.
A single 4MB write could cause the system to run out of memory.
A single European separator between two European numbers changes to a European number.
A single `Animated.Value` can drive any number of properties, and each property can be run through an interpolation first.
A single base 64 digit can contain 6 bits of data.
A single benchmark has been passed in from the command line or shell.
A single common separator between two numbers of the same type changes to that type.
A single delegate which handles events from the object.
A singleton cache for search providers and results.
A singleton that listens to grammar changes in all text editors.
A small set of propagation patterns, each of which will accept a small amount of information, and generate a set of "dispatch ready event objects" - which are sets of events that have already been annotated with a set of dispatched listener functions/ids.
A socket operation failed because the network was down.
A special path that just echoes back the request headers.
A specialized pseudo-event module to help keep track of components waiting to be notified when their DOM representations are available for use.
A specialized version of `_.forEach` for arrays without support for iteratee shorthands.
A specialized version of `_.includes` for arrays without support for specifying an index to search from.
A specialized version of `_.map` for arrays without support for iteratee shorthands.
A specialized version of `_.reduce` for arrays without support for iteratee shorthands.
A specialized version of `baseCallback` which only supports `this` binding and specifying the number of arguments to provide to `func`.
A static HTML page to display in the WebView.
A static image to display while loading the image source.
A static method that takes a Counter object as an argument.
A stream of PIDs to debug, obtained by connecting to the packager via the DebuggerProxyClient.
A stream of all of the fragments.
A stretchable image to display as the progress bar.
A stretchable image to display behind the progress bar.
A string that a package can publish to the main part of the home panel.
A tag for `c` exists, but the file has been deliberately removed.
A target of 100-200ms of total work per event loop on old/slow devices might be a reasonable place to start.
A task object implements `call`, just like a function.
A task queue that can be configured with an optional scheduler function.
A time has been selected.
A title for the tab of the newly opened pane.
A top level function.
A trace object is very similar to an error object.
A transition completed, but there is already another gesture happening.
A type alias.
A type hint string to display.
A type is an object with a .check method that takes a value and returns true or false according to whether the value matches the type.
A unique identifier for this element to be used in UI Automation testing scripts.
A unique name
A unique name for the provider to be used for analytics.
A unique name, used internally by quick-open to store cached results.
A utility for tracking stalls in the JS event loop that prevent timers and other events from being processed in a timely manner.
A utility for writing packages that tail log sources.
A value is considered array-like if it's not a function and has a `value.length` that's an integer greater than or equal to `0` and less than or equal to `Number.MAX_SAFE_INTEGER`.
A value is object-like if it's not `null` and has a `typeof` result of "object".
A value of `null` means we have not received any confirmation, ever.
A version of processStream that never completes...
A visibility: hidden element used to find the size of things.
A visual line is a line as drawn on the screen.
A word is a sequence of any symbols except space and backslash or any symbols escaped with a backslash, that does not start with file:.
A workaround before Atom 2.0: Atom's Project::setPaths currently uses ::repositoryForDirectorySync, so we need the repo information to already be available when the new path is added.
A workaround before Atom 2.0: see ::getHgRepoInfo of main.js.
A workaround before Atom 2.0: see ::getHgRepoInfo.
A wrapper for making views respond properly to touches.
A writable stream.
ALSO fails for local deps specified with relative URLs outside of the top level.
AMD / RequireJS
AND ITS CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
AND ITS CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
API UTILITIES Indent the given line.
API to setup an object or constructor to be able to emit data events.
APIs listed in this file are ones that should be built into Flow and need to be upstreamed.
ART on the web allows for multiple font-families to be specified.
ASAP was originally a nextTick shim included in Q.
ASN.1 Integer
AST walker module for Mozilla Parser API compatible trees A simple walk is one where you simply specify callbacks to be called on specific nodes.
Abandon the binary search at this level.
Abort if no name specified
Abort measurement, if in progress
Abort mouse wheel delta measurement, when scrolling explicitly
Abort traversal if result is false
Absolute path
Absolute path that ends with a / See: https://github.com/bower/bower/issues/898
Absolute path to file
Absolute path to folder
Absolute path to folder with .git file
Absolute path.
Absolute paths to tests to run.
Abstract class that defines the common interface of PanResponder that handles the gesture actions.
Abstract functions that can be re-implemented by concrete resolvers as necessary
Abstract supertype of all syntactic entities that are allowed to have a .loc field.
Abstracts away all functionality of the reconciler that requires knowledge of the browser context.
Accent color of the control.
Accept flags from any source file in the target.
Accepts CSS color codes for use with ANSI escape codes.
Accepts a mapping from field names to data IDs.
Accepts a printf-style message.
Accepts arbitrary React elements as labels.
Accessing Active Themes
Accessing Bindings
Accessing Loaded Themes
Accessing active packages
Accessing available packages
Accessing loaded packages
Accessing the git repository
According to the spec for indexed source maps, they have the following attributes:  - version: Which version of the source map spec this map is following.
According to the spec, if the line length is 1, it may be omitted.
According to the spec, source maps have the following attributes:  - version: Which version of the source map spec this map is following.
Account for deferred require load times.
Account for out-of-bounds indices:
Accounts for touch moves that are clustered together in time, moving the same direction.
Accumulate the nanosecond component.
Accumulate the seconds component.
Accumulated changes, for firing change events
Accumulates dispatches on an `SyntheticEvent`, but only for the `dispatchMarker`.
Accumulates items that must not be null or undefined into the first one.
Accumulates without regard to direction, does not look for phased registration names.
Accuracy determines how many tokens we look for to guess the position.
Acorn is a tiny, fast JavaScript parser written in JavaScript.
Acorn is organized as a tokenizer and a recursive-descent parser.
Acorn was written by Marijn Haverbeke, Ingvar Stepanyan, and various contributors and released under an MIT license.
Acorn: Loose parser
Action side-effects
Action types.
Activate all of the loaded features.
Activate all packages.
Activate atom packages.
Activate nuclide packages.
Activate packages for this iteration.
Activates all nuclide and fb atom packages that do not defer their own activation until a certain command or hook is executed.
Activating and deactivating packages
Actual scrollable element.
Actual super call.
Actually it is array that maps node ordinal number to dominator node ordinal number.
Actually pull the requested chunks out of the buffer and return.
Actually spawn the process and compile the module.
Adapt the sometimes-Async api of tough.CookieJar to our requirements
Adapted from String.prototype.endsWith polyfill.
Add --one option to `apm test` to ensure no deprecated APIs are used: http://blog.atom.io/2015/05/01/removing-deprecated-apis.html.
Add Atom commands idempotently...
Add a .def to the core to export symbols
Add a chunk of generated JS to the beginning of this source node.
Add a chunk of generated JS to this source node.
Add a dependency on another extension, so that the dependencies are built before extname
Add a handler to AppState changes by listening to the `change` event type and providing the handler
Add a list of args to tree's top level dependencies
Add a loading spinner while we fetch the blame.
Add a new file, 'bar.baz', for which the store will not get a notification because the subscription failed.
Add a new option type.
Add a persistent warning message to make sure the user sees it before dismissing.
Add a remote project to nuclide.
Add a separate exclamation mark IMG element with a tooltip.
Add a single mapping from original source line and column to the generated source's line and column for this source map being created.
Add a span to a line.
Add a static edges
Add a task to the queue.
Add a tracked file, ignored file, and untracked file.
Add a trailing offset block at the end of the shorter file.
Add a user to replTestAuth.
Add a user to standaloneTestAuth.
Add a user to the database.
Add additional proxy information to the error if necessary
Add all builtin types
Add all elements to measure into this._tabsElement
Add all nodes that have only weak retainers to traverse their subgraphs.
Add an empty error handler to avoid the "Unhandled Error" message.
Add an event listener an return a disposable for removing it.
Add an extra line break if the previous object property had a multi-line value.
Add an extra timestamp used to calculate the last sample duration.
Add an observation method for each item in the map.
Add attribute-related actions.
Add click listeners into line number gutter for setting breakpoints.
Add command `name`.
Add compiler and link flags if PGO options are selected
Add customization and verify it works.
Add debbuging-related actions
Add decomposed endpoints as targets
Add dependencies to the queue
Add edges into the range based on the query calls.
Add edges' data into the static queries map for the query calls, overwriting any previously existing data for these calls.
Add empty first edges
Add empty last edges
Add event listeners.
Add extra plugins
Add extraneous as dependencies
Add file and project messages from a second provider.
Add file and project messages from one provider.
Add free-form node-related actions.
Add functions to the `MapCache`.
Add functions to the `SetCache`.
Add functions to the `Set` cache.
Add functions to the `Stack` cache.
Add help strings.
Add initial edges
Add internal properties to preview.
Add it to make this package's modals styleable the same as Atom's tree-view.
Add it to the in memory cache and sort the versions afterwards
Add items into the correct segment with the cursor.
Add items twice
Add leading zero when needed to not care about the next character.
Add listener for local notifications
Add listener for push notifications
Add mappings one character at a time for maximum resolution.
Add message for each line ending in a new line.
Add message for the last string which does not end in a new line.
Add methods that should not appear in the components documentation.
Add missing JSX requires.
Add more to the ReactClass base class.
Add new markers for breakpoints without corresponding markers.
Add new messages from ProviderA.
Add new ones.
Add new sub-event
Add observe methods for title and icon by default.
Add on and off methods to a constructor's prototype, to make registering events on such objects more convenient.
Add other categories.
Add packages whose names are specified to be updated
Add resource-related actions.
Add rules in reverse order to match the cascade order.
Add script tag.
Add some extra space past the right boundary as the rightmost divider label text may be partially shown rather than just pop up when a new rightmost divider gets into the view.
Add spaces and `truncationChar` between words of `str` which are longer than `max`.
Add specific method handlers.
Add the "Nuclide" menu, if it's not there already.
Add the DOM element as the "element" property of the instance.
Add the element as a property of the mounted component.
Add the factory function to a cache.
Add the given source mapping.
Add the given string to this set.
Add the hyperclick markers if there's a new suggestion and it's under the mouse.
Add the listener to keydown.
Add the missing requires.
Add the new project repositories, if any.
Add the ones that don't.
Add the panel.
Add the record to the store with a concrete type
Add the source content to the _sourcesContents map.
Add the specified value to the counter's count.
Add these paths to the arcConfigDirectoryMap as a roundabout way to mock findArcConfigDirectory.
Add this counter to global list.
Add this directory as a new project in atom.
Add this directory as an atom project.
Add to _fileToMessages
Add to the failed list
Add to the resolved list If there's an exact equal endpoint, replace instead of adding This can happen because the name might not be known from the start
Add trackTiming decorator to instance method that returns a promise.
Add tracker constructors to the top level log object
Add two hrtime readings A and B, overwriting A with the result of the addition.
Add two hrtime readings A and B, returning the result as a new hrtime array.
Add use-strict TODO: implement this, make it configurable Requires
Add verbose displayName to the function, which helps when looking at profiling tools.
Added breakpoints are given a unique id and are added to all available connections.
Added by nuclide-atom-script.
Adding Notifications
Adding and Removing Bindings
Adding the other cases is misleading and incorrect since it's actually delegating to `fsPromise` here.
Adding the second element, need to change to array.
Adding this assertion here ensures that all of the values are valid ServerStatus options, while yielding better Flow behavior at use sites.
Addiotionally, since this is a function it will not show up in `JSON.stringify` which is what we want.
Additional HTTP headers to send with the request.
Additional `0.4` so the 5th row can peek into view.
Additional example is the .containsSelection property - having it allows efficient selection removal from the entire tree or one of its branches.
Additional methods outside the PendingTransaction interface.
Additionally calculates the properties derived from children and assigns them to this instance
Additionally, an EPERM or EACCES can happen on win32 if it's trying to make a link to a directory.
Additionally, on Windows ampersand needs to be escaped when passed to "start"
Addressed by retained node index.
Adds "Select all" to context menu in FF
Adds ANSI color escape codes if enabled.
Adds `value` to `set`.
Adds `value` to the cache.
Adds `value` to the set cache.
Adds a component by ref to an owner component.
Adds a default Date header, returning its value.
Adds a deprecation warning when the prop is used.
Adds a header to be signed, with its value, into this signer.
Adds a listener to be invoked when events of the specified type are emitted.
Adds a self-disposing Atom's tooltip to a react element.
Adds a subscription keyed by an event type.
Adds an 'Authorization' header to an http.ClientRequest object.
Adds an Atom notification for the detected heartbeat network status The function makes sure not to add many notifications for the same event and prioritize new events.
Adds an additional builder for Expression subtypes that wraps the built Expression in an ExpressionStatements.
Adds an asynchronous listener to the value so you can observe updates from animations.
Adds an end-of-line character to `text` and appends the resulting string to this controller's text buffer.
Adds an option 'styleSelectedText' which, when enabled, gives selected text the CSS class given as option value, or "CodeMirror-selectedtext" when the value is not a string.
Adds an update to the store and commits it immediately.
Adds an update to the store without committing it.
Adds newly fetched edges to a range.
Adds or removes paths from the pathSet based on the files in the update.
Adds parenthesis and the appropriate markers to a set of lines.
Adds selected class to newly selected comment, removes selected style from previously selected comment, changes drop down options so that the correct file is selected, and updates the code popout link.
Adds the edge to the end of the range.
Adds the edge to the front of the range.
Adds the key-value `pair` to `map`.
Adds the request target line to be signed.
Adds the specified item to this contenxt menu.
Adds the specified submenu to this contenxt menu.
Adjust a position to refer to the post-change position of the same text, or the end of the change if the change covers it.
Adjust column if needed.
Adjust frontier, schedule worker
Adjust the line structure
Admittedly, this is a little gross, but it seems better than setting style.width on every item that we create and having to give it a special flexbox layout.
Advance the heartbeat interval.
Advance the index before calling the task.
After DOM is flushed, invoke all registered `onDOMReady` callbacks.
After a Nav move, any non-nav moves or scroll changes update the current nav location.
After a span has been chosen make grid lines at multiples of the span.
After a suitable version has been elected for every package
After adding the existing files to git, add an ignored file to prove we're using git to populate the list.
After adding the existing files to hg, add an ignored file to prove we're using hg to populate the list.
After batch of packages has been fetched, the results are stored in _resolved hash.
After editing is committed updateTitle will be called.
After file: prefix: any symbol except space and backslash or any symbol escaped with a backslash.
After initialization all newly added DataIDs will be registered in the created garbage collector.
After loading a test Buck project, this tests:  1.
After node 0.12.0 this function serves to allocate Debug Context like a persistent value, that saves all our changes.
After printing the AST parts and all appropriate markers this will join the parts based on options and the markers that are available.
After setting up the mocks, you must invalidate the require cache and then re-require the module under test so that it picks up the mocked dependencies.
After starting this script, run start-hhvm-client.sh to launch hhvm with xdebug enabled.
After the directory specified by fixtureName is copied, its .hg-rename folder will be renamed to .hg, so that it can act as a mercurial repository.
After the initial mount, we control selected-ness manually so don't pass the context value down
After the remote connection is reestablished, nuclide-remote-projects will convert the TextBuffer to NuclideTextBuffer.
After the variable name there may appear array or object operator.
After these have been cleaned up, we'll let them throw.
Again, just skip it.
Aggregate those arrays.
Aggregates on the first column, averaging the other columns.
Aggregates the buffered stats up by suffixing avg, min, max to their names.
Alias a module definition.
Alias lookup
Aliases may be return types, or non-return types.
Align arrow.
Align gridSliceTime to a nearest round value.
All Arcanist services take a file.
All Buck commands for a project should be done through an instance of this class.
All Parser API node types can be used to identify node types, as well as Expression, Statement, and ScopeBody, which denote categories of nodes.
All Rights Reserved.
All ScrollView-like components should implement this method so that they can be composed while providing access to the underlying scroll responder's methods.
All `gestureState` accounts for timeStamps up until:
All alternates must be unique.
All are flag-free, unless they were created above with a flag.
All calls relating to the keyboard should be funneled through here
All children that haven't already been validated are required to have a "key" property assigned to it.
All components are capable of //being// referenced by owner components, but only ReactOwner components are capable of //referencing// owned components.
All fields present, nothing to diff.
All functionality available through `AlertIOS.alert` is also available in the cross-platform `Alert.alert`, which we recommend you use if you don't need iOS-specific functionality.
All handlers of that particular type will be notified.
All in the name of speed.
All lines map 1-to-1
All messages from ProviderB should be removed.
All nodes except the root have dominators.
All nodes have parent links.
All non-blocking requests should instantly fail.
All of the PEM file types start with a sequence tag, so chop it off here
All of the above are perceived as null.
All of the other arguments are multiplied together.
All of these matrix transforms are not general purpose utilities, and are only suitable for being inlined for the use of building up interpolators.
All of these methods may return the original node in order to leave it intact.
All options are optional
All other modules go into a 'js-modules' folder that in the same parent directory as the startup file.
All paths are presumed to be within the repo.
All previous navigation items are in the left stage.
All properties except for `generatedLine` and `generatedColumn` can be `null`.
All properties in `expected` should be in `actual`.
All property derivation and links set-up is done with one traversal only over the children.
All remotable objects have some set of named functions, and they also have a dispose method.
All rights reserved.
All rows but the first one should be indented at least 2 extra levels.
All scenes after it will be unmounted.
All spies expect spy_fileA should be called immediately because there is relevant data in the store.
All spies should be called immediately because there is relevant data in the store.
All state for the file tree will be kept in FileTreeStore and the only way to update the store is through methods on FileTreeActions.
All subsequent arguments will be forwarded to the function exported by the JavaScript file to run.
All the elements that respond to press should have a visual feedback when touched.
All the scenes of the containing view's.
All this logic will automatically be available in application.js.
All token type variables start with an underscore, to make them easy to recognize.
All transactions in the collision queue, including this one, have been failed as well.
All transform components needed to recompose matrix
All upcoming navigation items are in the right stage.
All values are 'true'.
All view changes should be pushed from the model/store through subscriptions.
All we need is an object that represents the packager server.
All you have to do is push changes to remote and CI will make a new build.
Allocate `nextResults` if and only if results have changed.
Allow "beforeChange" event handlers to influence a change
Allow Untracked
Allow all language-specific providers to take priority.
Allow code injection via the URL OR load code from localStorage OR prime the playground with some default 'hello world' code
Allow for MSIE11 msCrypto
Allow for deprecating things in the process of starting up.
Allow for good error messages
Allow jasmine to interact with the DOM.
Allow mock data to pass through without modification.
Allow other node type for tolerant parsing.
Allow running the command as root
Allow runtime properties query for objects accessible from Window objects via regular properties, and for DOM wrappers.
Allow scrolling to proceed as usual.
Allow sidebar to be less than preferred by explicit user action.
Allow the panel to show itself when handling the event.
Allow the user to override this setting.
Allow touchable or props.onResponderTerminationRequest to deny the request
Allow unknown options on the command line.
Allow us to introduce you to the four elements.
Allowed attribute value characters
Allows a caller to ensure that the results it receives from consecutive promise resolutions are never outdated.
Allows avoiding binding callbacks.
Allows completions to immediately appear when we are completing off of object properties.
Allows custom handling of any webview requests by a JS handler.
Allows extraction of a minified key.
Allows for debugging when the hook is injected on the page.
Allows registered plugins an opportunity to extract events from top-level native browser events.
Allows tests to use the non-fake setTimeout and clearTimeout functions.
Almost always Script scope will be empty, so just filter out that noise.
Almost identical API to normal `Animated.Value`, but multiplexed.
Alow for failure for coverage report
Alphabetic keys
Already drawn
Already enabled.
Already has this active route.
Already have more edges than the input.
Already in the tree, we just got an extra update.
Already in the view
Already removed by the for-loop above.
Also adjust the label size for subsequent logs
Also builds up a 'line map', which points at the DOM nodes that represent specific stretches of text, and is used by the measuring code.
Also check for hosts that have been checked in a previous request and have been found to support shallow cloning.
Also consider perusing the already-written tests in the top-level `spec/` directory.
Also drop empty Block scopes, should we get any.
Also figure out max cell width for each column
Also filter out any prototype objects using the circular check.
Also jump by 10 for page up and down, or by 100 if shift is held with a page key.
Also note that this expects the qw value to be last, not first.
Also remember the case of the header name because lots of broken servers expect Host instead of host and we want the caller to be able to specify this.
Also reset progress, toIndex, and fromIndex as they might not end in the correct states for a two possible reasons: Progress isn't always 0 or 1 at the end, the system rounds If the Navigator is offscreen these values won't be updated TOOD: Revisit this decision when no longer relying on native navigator.
Also sets opts.argv.
Also, any write operation will update them.
Also, dev/ino values differ across machines, so that's not included.
Also, if we have no data yet, we can stand some more bytes.
Also, invoking // `executeTask` more than once is an error.
Also, it deelegates the language feature request to the correct HackLanguage instance.
Also, it provides a relatively simple matcher so that if it thinks that you likely mistyped the event name it will suggest what you might have meant to type in the error message.
Also, need to copy if we've already done some copying, since buffers can't be joined like cons strings.
Also, once in a bundle, everything is installed as-is To prevent infinite cycles in the case of cyclic deps that are linked with npm link, even in a bundle, deps are only bundled if they're not already present at a higher level.
Also, since we're automatically retrying, displaying it would mean users would get an inexplicable old entry.
Also, sometimes we want to have a fallback Pass in a callback to wait for the fallback on failures After the first lookup, always returns the same thing.
Also, the length of `resultList` and `markupList` should be the same.
Alternately, set max digit bits to 28 since some browsers slow down when dealing with 32-bit numbers.
Alternatively, this method can be used to lookup IDs, returned by StyleSheet.register.
Alternatively, we can disallow componentWillMount during server-side rendering.
Although Node is single-threaded, there could be multiple Node processes running simultaneously that are using the cache.
Although `baz` is enqueued before `bar`, `bar` should execute first.
Although message channels yield to any queued rendering and IO tasks, they would be better than imposing the 4ms delay of timers.
Although resultList was populated out of order, it should now be a dense array.
Although setImmediate yields to the browser's renderer, it would be preferrable to falling back to setTimeout since it does not have the minimum 4ms penalty.
Although these are declared like instance properties in the specification when defining classes using `React.createClass`, they are actually static and are accessible on the constructor instead of the prototype.
Although we could make up a name or generate an anonymous source map, instead we assume that any consumer who does not provide a name does not actually want a source map.
Always append ourselves to the end of the arguments, to make sure we match the number of arguments the user expects
Always ensure that absolute sources are internally stored relative to the source root, if the source root is absolute.
Always have one single local connection.
Always include top-level record for a visible nested record.
Always ini 2.
Always render it, even if removed, so that we can get the height right away and don't waste time creating/ destroying it.
Always rendered at the bottom of all the rows.
Always set children to the same thing.
Always tab to the next field.
Always test the cmd itself first.
Always use first control as a time converter.
Always use the current scope.
Always use this or `setState` to mutate state.
Always use this to mutate state.
Always write to ensure data is stored in the correct recordStore.
Amend code changes to the latest commit.
Amend the revisions state with the latest selected valid compare commit id.
Amount to sum when the label exceeds
Amplitude of release velocity that is considered still
An Array of Calls to be used with rangeBehavior config functions.
An ElementRange identifies a range of child elements of a data value.
An IndexedSourceMapConsumer instance represents a parsed source map which we can query for information.
An Rx Observable representing the results of a fragment in the local cache.
An absolute path.
An added property, remove the last property in the style.
An additional 4 px is needed to make it look the same way it does when it shows up below.
An additional grant of patent rights can be found in the PATENTS file in the same directory.
An alias for `getAlert` to get the notification's main message string
An alternative interface for `track` that accepts a single event object.
An alternative is to implement `equals` and `hashCode`.
An arg and interspersed args are not allowed, so done options.
An array of Mixin objects to include when defining your component.
An array of buffers.
An array of child indices determining which children get docked to the top of the screen when scrolling.
An array of contents of the original source files.
An array of ranges is built, where indexes 0-1, 2-3, 4-5, etc.
An array of strings which are snippets of generated JS, or other SourceNodes.
An asynchronous traversal that knows how to read roots and nodes from a `CacheManager`.
An empty string is returned for `null` and `undefined` values.
An error should be thrown only if the specified targets are invalid.
An error thrown from an event will not interrupt, nor even substantially slow down the processing of other events, but will be rather postponed to a lower priority event.
An error will return non-JSON.
An event cycle that was previously created hasn't finished yet.
An example of constructing a new type with arbitrary constraints from an existing type.
An exception thrown by a task will permanently interrupt the processing of subsequent tasks.
An exit signal from SIGUSR1 doesn't actually exit the process, so skip that.
An experimental ListView implementation designed for efficient memory usage when rendering huge/infinite lists.
An exported function that can be directly called by a client.
An exported type alias.
An extra second should be enough for this test not to be flakey.
An iOS-specific component used to select a single value from a range of values.
An implementation of ProcessOutputHandler that parses and applies the behavior of ANSI escape characters that Buck uses.
An incoming prop transition may cause a state change, but the opposite is not true.
An incrementing ID assigned to each component when it is mounted.
An indent/prefix to use for each option line.
An index past all the properties adds a new property to the style.
An initial attempt to mock the clock was unsuccessful, probably because of problems clearing the require cache thoroughly enough that the debounce function picks up the mocked clock.
An initial notification will be available if the app was cold-launched from a notification.
An injected scheduler using `setImmediate` can alter this behavior.
An instance of the SourceMapGenerator represents a source map which is being built incrementally.
An interface class.
An interpolation maps input ranges to output ranges, typically using a linear interpolation but also supports easing functions.
An interspersed arg
An invalid URI might cause an exception to be thrown
An object specifying methods that will be called with output from a process.
An optimization is to attach the new elements and THEN detach the old ones instead of detaching and THEN attaching.
An optional ProcessOutputHandler that is appropriate for the expected output.
An optional React component that will be placed at the top of the process output view.
An optional `thisArg` can be passed to set the context when `callback` is called.
An optional calling context may be provided.
An optional collision key allows a mutation to identify itself with other mutations that affect the same fields.
An optional number property.
An optional path to a log file to which test output should be logged.
An optional second argument can be supplied to override the component's default variables.
An output window stream to communicate events to the client's output window.
An update here will schedule an update but immediately set _pendingStateQueue which will ensure that any state updates gets immediately reconciled instead of waiting for the next batch.
Analyse the project
And any existing localAddress is part of the connection name.
And failing that, we error out
And if you have more than a few hundred you probably have bigger problems.
And none of the connections is enabled.
And test that completion status filters up
And the keywords
And the offline flag is passed, error out
And then calculate the module map.
And there needn't be a 1:1 relationship between RemoteConnections and hg repos.
Android Chrome doesn't give us keycodes, so we need to blacklist it.
Android Connectivity Types.
Android Material Design
Android Types
Android-Specific styles
Animate the touchable to a new opacity.
Animated toValue's are tracked
Animated value passed in.
Animated works by building a directed acyclic graph of dependencies transparently when you render your Animated components.
Animates a value along a timed easing curve.
Animates a value from an initial velocity to zero based on a decay coefficient.
Animating out of the center stage, to the left
Animation interpolators for horizontal transitioning:
Animations are an important part of modern UX, and the `Animated` library is designed to make them fluid, powerful, and easy to build and maintain.
Animations are heavily configurable.
Annotate the "checkFile" error.
Annotate the "stat" error with what we were doing.
Annotation title/subtile.
Anonymous divs do not seem to expose properties, triggering a "Permission denied error" if any of its properties are accessed.
Another DebuggerInstnace is alive.
Another common pattern for atom.commands.add.
Another way to think of the stages is in terms of transitions.
Answer with defaults
Any "resolved precise dependency" things that aren't already on this object get added, and then that's passed to the next generation of installation.
Any JSX elements will get transpiled to use React.
Any JavaScript/Coffee file within this directory, lib/assets/javascripts, vendor/assets/javascripts, or any plugin's vendor/assets/javascripts directory can be referenced here using a relative path.
Any arguments to pass to the function must be specified via the `args` property as an Array.
Any attribute removal or modification can affect the styles of "related" nodes.
Any data fetched for these children is not written to the client store, but you can add code to process it in the `onSuccess` callback passed to the `RelayEnvironment` `applyUpdate` method.
Any data that previously satisfied the queries will be overwritten.
Any declarations that occur inside the catch body that do not have the same name as the catch parameter should count as bindings in the outer scope.
Any error other than ENOTDIR means it's not readable, or doesn't exist.
Any is required here as otherwise we get a flow error in core.js
Any lines that weren't in the new blameForEditor are outdated.
Any non-remote NuclideUri will do.
Any null children will not be included in the resulting object.
Any other declarations create bindings in the outer scope.
Any other events can be tracked normally using the interfaces provided by nuclide-analytics.
Any other headers in the options.headers array MUST be present, or this will throw.
Any other literal is not.
Any other non-undefined value returned from the visitor method is interpreted as a replacement value.
Any other properties and methods in the class specification will be available on the prototype.
Any partial character found at the end of the buffer is buffered up, and will be returned when calling write again with the remaining bytes.
Any prior content inside `container` is destroyed in the process.
Any problems will surface later.
Any remaining neutrals take the embedding direction.
Any time npm installs itself globally, it puts its builtin config file there
Anything else beginning with a digit is an integer, octal number, or float.
Anything else is a record.
Anything goes, except ..
Anything included at this point will be checked again later once we know what it is.
App root components should register themselves with `AppRegistry.registerComponent`, then the native system can load the bundle for the app and then actually run the app when it's ready by invoking `AppRegistry.runApplication`.
AppState is frequently used to determine the intent and proper behavior when handling push notifications.
AppStateIOS is frequently used to determine the intent and proper behavior when handling push notifications.
Apparently it can sometimes include a `code` property.
Apparently sometimes Atom supplies an invalid directory, or a directory with an invalid paths.
Appease flow
Append a "px" unit if the user input was just a number.
Append a PASS/FAIL message depending on whether the class has test failures.
Append a break element instead of setting textContent to make sure the selection is inside the prompt.
Append a space to prevent the anchor text from being glued to the console message when the user selects and copies the console messages.
Append an empty space before.
Append args on the end of our commands.
Append editor.
Append its entirety to the console.
Append on new range
Append on new segment
Append on range that already has an edge
Append on segment that already has item
Append the interval itself.
Append the processed text to a new line.
Appends and prepends new edges
Appends the elements of `values` to `array`.
AppleScript brush by David Chambers http://davidchambersdesign.com/
Application time
Applies the mappings of a sub-source-map for a specific source file to the source map being generated.
Applies to all files except .hgignore files.
Applies to both standard pins and custom pin images.
Apply 'meta' style to '.' connected identifiers when appropriate.
Apply a change to a document, and add it to the document's history, and propagating it to all linked documents.
Apply an update to the state.
Apply and save package meta
Apply default values.
Apply options to a copy of the defaults
Apply options to defaults except for the listed keys which are shallow copied from option without merging
Apply server configuration options, if available
Apply unix properties to request
Applying the SourceMap can add and remove items from the sources and the names array.
Approximations of internal ECMAScript conversion functions
Apps unregistered through this method can always re-register.
Arc lint outputs multiple JSON objects on mutliple lines.
Are we in a legit ES5 environment.
Argument `name` is missing.
Array and Object children may be paged.
Array below contains pseudo id names for corresponding enum indexes.
Array comparator for ReactComponents by mount ordering.
Array index check according to the ES5-15.4.
Array might not be iterable in this environment, so we need a fallback to our wrapped type.
Array order matters
Array-as-queue is good enough here, since we are just dealing with exceptions.
Array.mergeOrdered coalesces objects if comparator returns 0.
Arrays of change events and selections.
Arrow function bodies are allowed to be expressions.
Arrow keys, Esc key, etc.
As "clean" as that solution is, watchers require setting up, and are a departure from how the Atom development ecosystem works.
As ImportDefaultSpecifier nodes, or as ImportSpecifier nodes with a "default" imported name:
As a convenience we allow the whole radial gradient to cover the bounding box.
As a result of this call, you can call `Reader.length`, until the next thing called that does a readLength.
As a result, `touchableHandlePress` will be called when lifting up, even if `touchableHandleLongPress` has also been called.
As a shorthand, "text/plain" can be omitted but the charset parameter supplied.
As all we actually test ARE directories, this is a bit of a problem.
As an optimization, line widget aligning is skipped when this is false.
As data becomes ready, the component will be updated.
As defined in com.facebook.buck.cli.Command, some of Buck's subcommands are read-only.
As efficiently as possible, decorate the comment object with .precedingNode, .enclosingNode, and/or .followingNode properties, at least one of which is guaranteed to be defined.
As it is, the package has already been normalized and thus some errors are suppressed.
As it works out, escaping an even number of slashes can be done by simply repeating it exactly after itself.
As last check, we compare both commit hashes
As last resort, we try the registry
As long as we have it in a tracked query.
As of v27, Firefox may fire keypress events even when no character will be inserted.
As only the latest one it was assigned to is considered its parent from the node's perspective.
As opposed to the ios version, here it render `null` when no source or source.uri...
As such, any tests for it that need to use Atom's built-in test runner need to live elsewhere, which is why they are in the top-level spec/ directory.
As such, only keys that correspond to printable characters produce a valid `charCode`, the only exception to this is Enter.
As such, this class serves as an adapter between the numeric priority model and ContextMenuManager's model.
As such, we default this to false and encourage your users to override it via config if appropriate.
As such, we employ a hack inspired by http://stackoverflow.com/a/20888342/396304.
As such, we have to perform a second check to make sure that the specified directory belongs to a Hack project.
As you can imagine, the way that we are getting this path is not documented and is therefore unstable.
Ask for 32-bit.
Ask frontend to add a new log into console window.
Ask watchman to watch the directory.
Aspirational for now.
Assert the length of the array.
Asserts that following token is given contextual keyword.
Assign `value` only when needed so a null/undefined value will show an indeterminate progress bar.
Assign a trasparent color if the flow is small enough or if the previous color was a transparent color.
Assign an unique key to element so that react treats it as a new element.
Assign local variables to preserve Flow type refinement.
Assigning to a non-nullable value after checking placates flow in this regard.
AssignmentExpression 2.
AssignmentPattern nodes may appear wherever a Pattern is allowed, and the right-hand side represents a default value to be destructured against the left-hand side, if no value is otherwise provided.
AssignmentTargets
Assigns `value` to the property of `state.data` identified by `key`.
Assigns a maximum track image.
Assigns a minimum track image.
Assigns a new global property, replacing the existing one if there is one.
Assigns a single image for the track.
Associate first line with "lastMapping"
Associate full lines with "lastMapping"
Associate the code between "lastGeneratedColumn" and "mapping.generatedColumn" with "lastMapping"
Associate the remaining code in the current line with "lastMapping"
Associate the remaining code in the current line with "lastMapping" and add the remaining lines without any mapping
Association is done by ways of keeping a non-enumerable property on the object.
Assume identity mapping if no targetLoc specified.
Assume inputs without method will throw during the slice call and skip straight to the fallback.
Assume it's a directory.
Assume it's a file.
Assume new contents if the request failed Note that we do not retry the request using the "request-replay" module because it would take too long
Assume optimal parallelization.
Assume that all non-ASCII characters are letters and thus can be used as part of identifier.
Assume that all spreads exist via template substitution.
Assume that if `forceFetch` requests exist, they were last.
Assume that variables named like substitutions are substitutions.
Assume the hearbeat didn't happen.
Assuming our invariants hold, if this case fires, that means that there is more than one status bar provider, which is weird.
Assuming that it is a US keyboard layout provides a surprisingly accurate mapping for US and European users.
Async handle parsing websocket address from the stdout of the child.
Async tests use this one to report failures.
Async tests use this one to report that they are completed.
AsyncStorage is a simple, asynchronous, persistent, key-value storage system that is global to the app.
Asynchronous change emitter for nodes stored in the Relay cache.
Asynchronous mapping from preload query IDs to results.
Asynchronously fetch a boolean to determine internet connectivity.
Asynchronously returns the owner hierarchy as an array of strings.
Asynchronously run the extensions.
Asynchronously write the result to the cache.
At first step we merge all plugins in one protocol.
At least for now.
At least, one hex digit is required.
At second step we merge plugins with main protocol.
At the moment it only supports having a single View instance as a child node, as it's implemented by replacing that View with another instance of RCTView node with some additional properties set.
At the moment, "well-formed" means that the query does not contain duplicate aliases.
At this point insertionIndex is always an index before button or between nodes.
At this point the parent folder should be deleted To test against the in-memory cache, we create a folder manually and request the versions
At this point the user needs to make a decision
At this point we couldn't get the IE `uniqueID` to use as a hash and we couldn't use a non-enumerable property to exploit the dontEnum bug so we simply add the `UID_HASH_KEY` on the node itself.
At this point we couldn't get the IE `uniqueID` to use as a hash and we couldn't use a non-enumerable property to exploit the dontEnum bug so we simply add the `hashProperty` on the node itself.
At this point, figure out what dependencies we NEED to get met
At this point, if shasum is set, it's something that we've already read and checked.
At this point, if they have a credentials object, it doesn't have a token or auth in it.
At this point, no pattern may contain "/" in it so we're going to return a 2d array, where each entry is the full pattern, split on '/', and then turned into a regular expression.
At this point, the range is completely trimmed and ready to be split into comparators.
At this point, there should be ProviderA project messages, and ProviderB file and project messages.
At this point, there should be no ProviderA messages, and ProviderB file and project messages.
At this point, there's a conflict
At this point, we can discard any views that are beyond the `requestedTopOfStack`.
At this point, we're already done writing whatever we've gotta write, adding files to the dir, etc.
Atom Details
Atom UI notification.
Atom ViewProvider compatible model object.
Atom builtins
Atom can't handle files of this scale anyway.
Atom doesn't accept in-command modification of the text editor contents.
Atom ensures that each pane only has one item per unique URI.
Atom is smart about only displaying a separator when there are items to separate, so there will never be a dangling separator at the end.
Atom issue: https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/6695
Atom prevents in-command modification to text editor content.
Atom takes the first button in the list as default option.
Atom tries to diff contents even for extremely large files, which can easily cause the editor to lock.
Atom watcher behavior compatability.
Atom's babel-core may already be in the require cache if a module before us needed "use babel" transpilation.
Atom's implementation will fail at this test case.
Attach a document to an editor.
Attach and bind all the other handlers only the first time a touch actually happens.
Attach heavy component lazily
Attach the events object.
Attach the pathSetUpdater to the pathSet.
Attach the workspace to the DOM so focus can be determined in tests below.
Attach to DOM.
Attach to the new worker set.
Attaches a WebSocket based connection to the Packager to expose Hot Module Replacement updates to the simulator.
Attaches a handler to all methods instrumented with the supplied name.
Attaches a handler to profiles with the supplied name.
Attaches a listener to remote or local notification events while the app is running in the foreground or the background.
Attempt to delete branch, ignoring the error
Attempt to delete tag, ignoring the error
Attempt to install the package from the archive
Attempt to reload previously open projects.
Attempt to resolve the package referenced by the URL to ensure everything is ok before registering
Attempting to add edges 1 2 3 1.
Attempting to read large files just crashes node, so just fail.
Attempting to unload an active package is considered an exception.
Attempts to apply the patch to the given file.
Attempts to get a list of files relative to `localDirectory`, hopefully from a fast source control index.
Audio formats
Auth must happen last in case signing is dependent on other headers
Authors: Guy K.
Auto enable upon the very first show.
Auto-require transform.
Automatically animates views to their new positions when the next layout happens.
Automatically invalidates cached information and tries to re-estimate the line's height.
Automatically replay the last step.
Automatically track and cleanup files at exit.
Available as NativeModules.MyCustomModule.processString
Available only in __DEV__.
Availble launch/attach providers for current selected connection.
Avoid OOM crashes from getting all own property names of a large TypedArray.
Avoid a V8 JIT bug in Chrome 19-20.
Avoid adding functionality this component that you'd want to be available in both dev and prod modes.
Avoid creating a datatip if the evaluation fails
Avoid direct writing.
Avoid doing this on valid arguments, walking the prototype chain can be quite slow.
Avoid duplicate anchor links If we are at an h3, go through the previous element siblings of this node, and find its h2 parent and append it to the href text.
Avoid duplicate updates and avoid moving the status away from FAILED, to let any existing work die out when the server fails.
Avoid expensive re-renders and use setNativeProps
Avoid gzip so we can actually show progress
Avoid having longhands under an invalid shorthand.
Avoid inheriting from `Object.prototype` when possible.
Avoid killing block comments completely outside the selection.
Avoid memory leaks caused in workers.
Avoid problems when linking to release libraries that use the release version of the libc
Avoid reading the package meta if already given
Avoid recursion with connector's onClose event.
Avoid reprinting a fragment that is identical to another fragment.
Avoid security warnings on getResponseHeader when not allowed by CORS
Avoid walking fragments if we have printed the same one before.
Avoids Array.slice arguments leak, allowing for V8 optimizations
Avoids a function call
Avoids settings null message
BIDI HELPERS
BLACK RIGHT-POINTING TRIANGLE
BROWSER SNIFFING Kludges for bugs and behavior differences that can't be feature detected are enabled based on userAgent etc sniffing.
BUG72018: Do not show suggest box if caret is followed by a non-stop character.
Babel Definitions TODO: Move these to external-interfaces package.
Babel block comment.
Babel does a constructor.name check for 'Plugin'.
Babel extension.
Babel line comment.
Backend connection is closed.
Backfill param so that a call variable is created for it.
Background color for the switch round button.
Background color of the tab bar
Background color when the switch is turned off.
Background color when the switch is turned on.
Background drawable of native feedback touchable can be customized with `background` property.
Backlog -- the maximum length of the queue of pending connections.
Backpedal if it does not belong in this list.
Backwards compatibility for request.debug
Backwards compatibility with graceful-fs.
Backwards compatibility.
Backwards-compat with node 0.10.x
Bad file should be silently hidden.
Bail out early since most nodes won't have directives
Bail out if the visible area is already rendered and nothing changed.
Barrett modular reduction
Base class helpers for the updating state of a component.
Base class of all launch/attach providers.
Base constructor for all React elements.
Base constructor for all composite component.
Base-64 stores 3 bytes in 4 chars, and pads the remainder.
Based on code in the Node.js 'path' core module.
Based on: http://tog.acm.org/resources/GraphicsGems/gemsii/unmatrix.c
Based on: http://www.euclideanspace.com/maths/geometry/rotations/conversions/quaternionToEuler/ and: http://quat.zachbennett.com/  Note that this rounds degrees to the thousandth of a degree, due to floating point errors in the creation of the quaternion.
Based on: https://code.google.com/p/webgl-mjs/source/browse/mjs.js
Based on: https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/JavaScript/Reference/Global_Objects/Math/round
Bash completion-related exports
Basic JavaScript BN library - subset useful for RSA encryption.
Basic Primitives.
Basic description of algorithm:  - If it is the first node, no extra new line - If it has a leading comment prefix it with extra new line - If it is a for/while/if/etc prefix it with extra new line - If previous node is a for/while/if/etc prefix it with extra new line
Basic implementation: look at files in the same directory for paths with matching file names.
Basic types.
Basically like safeSpawn, but runs the command with the `script` command.
Basically like spawn, except it handles and logs errors instead of crashing the process.
Basically the same as CC, but: 1.
Basically, a Trace does not need a filePath property, but a LinterTrace does.
Batch calls are handled separately
Batched mount.
Be a good stream and emit end when the response is finished.
Be lazy and just get the string..
Be optimistic and let this.checkAllFields make the final decision.
Be sure to remove the subscription on the DiagnosticStore once the editor is closed.
Because JavaScript number are imprecise, we should guarantee the extremes are right.
Because Nuclide is not invoked by Mercurial, Nuclide must mimic the same stripping.
Because `this.state.presentedIndex` does not update until the transition starts, we can't reliably use `this.state.presentedIndex` to know whether we can safely keep popping the routes or not at this moment.
Because behavior goes wacky when you set `__proto__` on objects, we have to prefix all the strings in our set with an arbitrary character.
Because directory names are required to be md5 of _source
Because each offset is encoded relative to the previous one, many segments often have the same encoding.
Because the `provider` is usually OmniSearch, also track the original provider.
Because the buffer is of capacty 1, inserting one more element effectively overwrites the entire contents.
Because the container is flex, prevent this header from shrinking smaller than its contents.
Because the mappings are sorted, we can use binary search to find the best mapping.
Because the pending fetch is always canceled, we need to build a new set of queries that includes the updated variables and initiate a new fetch.
Because the value for the Initial Directory that the user supplied may have been a symlink that was resolved by the server, overwrite the original `cwd` value with the resolved value.
Because this gesture takes no action, we can stop here
Because this value will not change during run time, memoize the value to ensure the IPC call is performed only once.
Because we will never consider this node or any nodes after it again, this node must be the closest following node we have encountered so far.
Because we will never consider this node or any nodes before it again, this node must be the closest preceding node we have encountered so far.
Become the parent node
Before Symbol spec.
Before ending the request, we had to compute the length of the whole form, asyncly
Before multiplication, some bit operations are applied to the private key to ensure it is a valid Curve25519 secret key.
Before we jump to the location, we want to close the popup.
Begin and end banners must match key type
Behavior of elts with overflow: auto and padding is inconsistent across browsers.
Being the "responder" means that the very next touch move/end event will result in an action/movement.
Below we try a series of async tests to guess the type of resolver to use If a step was unable to guess the resolver, it returns undefined If a step can guess the resolver, it returns with constructor of resolver
Between diff view and test runner
Beware, screenPositionForMouseEvent is not a public api and may change in future versions.
Bewit not empty
Binary number in ES6 starts with '0b'.
Bind Request
Bind event to NodeList items
Bind main events to this object.
BindingElements 3.
Binds a method to the component.
Binds all auto-bound methods in a component.
Bits per digit
Bits to bytes
Blank space to show between pages.
Blindly use line numbers, if they're given.
Block Lexer
Block swipe gesture.
Block the effects from any dirstate change, which is a fuzzier signal.
Block-Level Grammar
Body contains a JSON encoded array of objects with file: and stats: entries.
Boolean indicating whether this line can be reindented.
Boolean to enable/disable measurement.
Boolean value of the switch.
Bootstrap the process
Borrows from Modernizr.
Both are not empty.
Both arguments are elements.
Both below are called in parallel
Both calls return a command function.
Both clientHeight and scrollHeight are rounded to integer values, so we tolerate one pixel error.
Both close and finish should trigger unpipe, but only once.
Both flavors of default imports need an interop.
Both methods take two arguments: - An Iterable of grammars for which the DiagnosticProvider can provide diagnostics.
Both modes get to parse all of the text, but when both assign a non-null style to a piece of code, the overlay wins, unless the combine argument was true and not overridden, or state.overlay.combineTokens was true, in which case the styles are combined.
Both result in an extra syscall when you guess wrong.
Both should be removed.
Both the iframe and the host element for the React component are children of the root element that serves as the item for the panel.
Bottom Up Profiling shows the entire callstack backwards: The root node is a representation of each individual function called, and each child of that node represents a reverse-callstack showing how many of those calls came from it.
Bottom overlap
Bound Functions for use as callbacks.
Bound function never has inner scope and doesn't need corresponding UI node.
Break out of the loop.
Break relevant lines.
Break-disabled state has at least one connection in break state.
Break-enabled state has a single connection which is in break-enabled state.
Breaking changes will probably happen a lot and will not be reliably announced.
Breakpoint element has it's own click handler.
BreakpointDisplayController is created for side-effects /:
Breakpoints may be added before any connections.
Bridged modules.
Briefly turn off draggability, to allow widgets to do normal dragging things.
Broadcast an event.
Broadcast that this counter was created.
Broswe mode shows all changes from all repositories.
Browser built ins.
Browser does not implement `key`, polyfill as much of it as we can.
Browser-compatible WebSockets implementation.
Browsers seem to always treat the boundaries of block elements as being L.
Bubble the change up.
BuckToolbarActions and BuckToolbarStore implement an older version of the Flux pattern which puts a lot of the async work into the store.
Buffer Operations
Buffer Range Details
Buffer class to use
Buffer incoming lines.
Buffer output, reporting progress
Buffers are fast, but strings work too.
Build a line's DOM representation from scratch
Build all the nodes we want to insert, then add them
Build the "config" object.
Build the error instance
Build the signingString
Build the websocket url
Build up JSONPath.
Build up a portrait of your data universe using the object type.
Build up a set of ranges to kill first, merging overlapping ranges.
Build up the DOM representation for a single token, and add it to the line map.
Builds a temporary folder tree structure.
Builds the app and runs it on a connected emulator / device.
Builds the bundle starting to look for dependencies at the given entry path.
Builds the edited working set from the partially-child-derived .checkedStatus property
Built-in method references for those with the same name as other `lodash` methods.
Built-in method references that are verified to be native.
Built-in method references without a dependency on `root`.
Built-in properties that belong on the element
Built-in value references.
Bump up to the next highest power of 2, to prevent increasing it excessively in tiny amounts.
Bundle was loaded from file
Bundle was loaded from network
Bundled propTypes.
But I could remove them if desired.
But allow more writes to happen in this tick.
But as it needs  the VS environment, checking the arch of cl.exe is correct.
But currently the fileSearch is never torn down.
But either has no long handler
But first, we have to clean up this callback hell.
But for now we'll just add this hack and set the `readable` member to false.
But in the case of object literals, it might be called at a position where there is in fact a short hand identifier pattern or a data property.
But it flew in the service of the rebels, so for the purposes of this demo it's a rebel ship.
But it's good enough for how it is used in the parser.
But maintain backwards compat.
But not "className" or "style" because React has special rules for those.
But note that we at least distinguish different object types.
But such is life.
But that's okay because it's kinda icky boilerplate anyway.
But the PathSet expects paths relative to the localDirectory.
But the payload contains an `id` so the writer will attempt to store a `__typename`.
But the store should still remember the breakpoint
But this should be fine, because the client of LocalHgService should be reacting to the 'onHgRepoStateDidChange' event that follows the Mercurial event.
But until then, YAGNI.
But we increment the length without the trimming since the next time we view the length any trailing whitespace will have been important.
But when it comes time for `ls` to show its output, it excludes the thing we just installed because that flag.
But, since usually those tests will fail on Windows and other systems with less capable filesystems anyway, at least this way we don't cause inconveniences by merely cloning the repo or installing the package.
But, the rules regarding arguments with spaces, and escaping them with quotes, can get really arcane.
But, without this, `.
By contrast `npm install --production foo` installs `foo` and the `production` option is ignored.
By convention, each of the callback methods returns the visited node.
By default EventEmitters will print a warning if more than 10 listeners are added to it.
By default concat defers subscription until after the LHS completes.
By default hidden options and subcmds are "excluded".
By default it is the empty string.
By default scroll views will unfocus a textField if another touch occurs outside of it
By default the command will toggle the view's visibility.
By default the data is exactly what was put into the data source, but it's also possible to provide custom extractors.
By default this is determined automatically.
By default will center the opened text editor.
By default, ProcessOutputView simply appends the `newText` to its `buffer`.
By default, `PanResponder` holds an `InteractionManager handle to block long-running JS events from interrupting active gestures.
By default, a gray oval highlights the text on press down.
By default, all the touchable elements are accessible.
By default, assume that GraphQL is served at `/graphql` on the same domain.
By default, don't measure anything, but we'll override this if we inject a measure function.
By default, if one of the animations is stopped, they will all be stopped.
By default, it will extrapolate the curve beyond the ranges given, but you can also have it clamp the output value.
By default, it will request all notification permissions, but a subset of these can be requested by passing a map of requested permissions.
By default, logs stall events to the console when installed.
By default, no context menu item will be displayed if the tree is empty.
By default, npm includes some proprietary attributes in the package tarball.
By default, queued tasks are executed together in a loop in one `setImmediate` batch.
By default, reserved words are not enforced.
By default, the date picker will use the device's timezone.
By default, the label is constructed by traversing all the children and accumulating all the Text nodes separated by space.
By default, the listener is simply invoked.
By default, the only button will be an 'OK' button.
By default, the warning box is enabled in `__DEV__`.
By default, this can scroll with negative offset, pulling the content down so that the target component's bottom meets the keyboard's top.
By default, this implements React's rendering and reconciliation algorithm.
By handling mixins before any other properties, we ensure the same chaining order is applied to methods with DEFINE_MANY policy, whether mixins are listed before or after these methods in the spec.
By providing a specific response we can compute a non recursive one which is the least we need and improve performance.
By setting needle.originalColumn to 0, we thus find the last mapping for the given line, provided such a mapping exists.
By the time the function associated with the command is called, the state with which the menu item was created is lost.
By this point, it would be profoundly surprising if /tmp didn't already exist, since every other test makes things in there.
Bypass any cache
Bypass cache for local dependencies
Bytes to bits
CDATA becomes an array containing a string, or just a string.
CESU-8 is handled as part of the UTF-8 encoding.
CESU-8 represents each of Surrogate Pair by 3-bytes
CFLAGS for building the PHP dll
CHILDREN HANDLING In order for the tree traversal and modifications to be efficient one often needs to find the parent of a node.
CI environment can be quite slow and we can't guarantee that it can consistently motice a file change so we change the file every few seconds just in case
CJK Compatibility Forms
CJK Compatibility Ideographs
CPU PROFILER API
CSS properties which accept numbers but are not in units of "px".
CUSTOM RULES the second argument of warning/invariant should be a literal string
Cache a maximum of 20 nesting level indents.
Cache aliases for a project because invoking buck just to list aliases that are highly unlikely to change is wasteful.
Cache definitions by the resolved file path they were loaded from.
Cache for definitions.
Cache for remote proxies.
Cache is stored/retrieved statically to ensure singularity among instances
Cache of previously indexed folders for later use.
Cache proxy factory functions by the resolved definition file path.
Cache results of executing component-specific route query builders.
Cache results of executing fragment query builders.
Cache should have been updated
Cache the flags-fetching promise so we don't end up invoking Buck twice.
Cache this host
Cached in the queue when disconnected.
Calculate MAC
Calculate a new scroll position needed to scroll the given rectangle into view.
Calculate opacity with logarithmic falloff based on recency of the timestamp.
Calculate payload hash
Calculate selection offset relative to the current element.
Calculate signature
Calculate the amount of indentation the line should end up with.
Calculate the offset of the cursor from the beginning of the file.
Calculate the position of the end of the last range to be edited.
Calculate the request MAC
Calculate the value for the Authorization header on this request asynchronously.
Calculate the visible area.
Calculated lazily.
Calculates a module map from the settings.
Calculates the blacklist from the settings.
Calculates the current options according to the Nuclide configuration object.
Calculating quad plane normal
Call String.prototype.replace on the very right-most source snippet.
Call `callback` on every node in the subtree, including `rootNode`.
Call `dispose` to disable the feature.
Call `willFocus` when `diff` is small enough.
Call a function while guarding against errors that happens within it.
Call a method of a remote object, through the service framework.
Call a remote constructor, returning an id that eventually resolves to a unique identifier for the object.
Call a remote function, through the service framework.
Call a static method that returns Counter instances.
Call a static method with a counter as an argument.
Call an async function repeatedly with a maximum number of trials limit, until a valid result that's defined by a validation function.
Call callback
Call didSearchPaths with the number of unique files we have seen matches in.
Call f for all linked documents.
Call getHackEnvironmentDetails instead.
Call in the context of a npmconf object
Call out to hack to get highlighting ranges.
Call recursively for each dependency but ordered by dependency names
Call render method for this log entry or the generic one
Call searchCanceled since it will reset everything we need before doing a new search.
Call the HgService and update our cache with the results.
Call the callback accordingly.
Call the callback on each line.
Call the callback when any messages change.
Call the callback when project-scope messages change.
Call the callback when the filePath's messages have changed.
Call the component's `render` method and update the DOM accordingly.
Call the function again
Call the function again to keep it DRY
Call the line method
Call the object's local dispose function.
Call the provided function in a context within which calls to `setState` and friends are batched such that components aren't updated unnecessarily.
Call the returned function to fetch the next token.
Call this function to define a new method to be shared by all AST nodes.
Call this to optimistically apply an update to the store.
Call this to send the mutation to the server.
Call to `evaluate` from user-land creates a new script with undefined URL.
Call updateSiblings since their value might be based on the value that just changed.
Callback called when the icon is selected.
Callback continuously called while the user is dragging the slider.
Callback for when an item is selected.
Callback that is called continuously when the user is dragging the map.
Callback that is called once, when the user is done moving the map.
Callback that is called when a key is pressed.
Callback that is called when an action is selected.
Callback that is called when text input ends.
Callback that is called when the text input is blurred
Callback that is called when the text input is focused
Callback that is called when the text input selection is changed
Callback that is called when the text input's submit button is pressed.
Callback that is called when the text input's text changes.
Callback that is called when the user toggles the switch.
Callback to navigation with an action.
Callback was subscribed after this particular broadcast.
Callbacks don't fire for optimistic updates.
Called after the response is received
Called at the end of every token.
Called at the start of the parse and after every token.
Called immediately after the underlay is hidden
Called immediately after the underlay is shown
Called when a scrolling animation ends.
Called when all rows have been rendered and the list has been scrolled to within onEndReachedThreshold of the bottom.
Called when all the decendents have finished rendering and mounting recursively.
Called when rows will be mounted/unmounted.
Called when scrollable content view of the ScrollView changes.
Called when the `gyp` child process exits.
Called when the editor is attached to the DOM.
Called when the editor is detached from the DOM.
Called when the left header button is pressed
Called when the right header button is pressed
Called when the rows that are visible in the viewport change.
Called when the view starts refreshing.
Called when the viewability of rows changes, as defined by the `viewablePercentThreshold` prop.
Called when the window resizes
Called with the same arguments as .visit.
Caller does the diffing so we don't have to.
Caller is responsible for disposing the results.
Caller is responsible for handling the actual error.
Caller must resolve named types.
Callers can extract the individual errors contained in this object, but may also just treat it as a normal single error, in which case a summary message will be printed.
Calling 'hg status' with a path has two side-effects: 1.
Calling Def.prototype.build multiple times has the effect of merely redefining this property.
Calling atom.project.repositoryForDirectory gets the real path of the directory, which is another round-trip and calls the repository providers to get an existing repository.
Calling atom.project.repositoryForDirectory gets the real path of the directory, which requires a round-trip to the server for remote paths.
Calling dispose multiple times should not throw.
Calling ls-remote includes a call to the git-upload-pack service, which returns the content type in the response.
Calling this means that it's something we can't create.
Calling this method lets us exit that state and retry.
Calling this.checkAllFields for any other type of node is both bad for performance and way too forgiving.
Callout views.
Calls `callback` with either an Array of entries or an Error if there was a problem fetching those entries.
Calls `fn` when the mouse moves onto another text editor screen position, not pixel position.
Calls a function for each key-value pair found in object Optionally takes compareFn to iterate object in specific order
Calls a registered service with a name and arguments.
Calls a task as soon as possible after returning, in its own event, with priority over IO events.
Calls a task as soon as possible after returning, in its own event, with priority over other events like animation, reflow, and repaint.
Calls cb with list of cached pkgs matching show.
Calls delayed callbacks and cursorActivity handlers until no new ones appear
Calls out to asyncExecute using the 'hg' command.
Calls the callback associated with the ID.
Calls the callback when the saved connection profiles change.
Calls the given functions and returns the first non-null return value.
Can also be queried with `getStats`.
Can be a local or remote file.
Can be a string or an integer.
Can be called to simulate
Can be either a file system object of some sort, or a pax/ustar metadata entry.
Can be in one of the following states: - Connected - everything healthy - Disconnected - Was connected, but connection died.
Can be null for stateless components.
Can be removed once we no longer want to support Flow versions under v0.20.0
Can be used to submit forms and file uploads to other web applications.
Can inherit from another Conf object, using it as the base.
Can not be merged, start a new event.
Can only be used in a Jasmine context.
Can only copy one entry at a time.
Can only rename one entry at a time.
Can tell TextInput to automatically capitalize certain characters.
Can't be in mountWrapper or else server rendering leaks.
Can't handle this type of require yet.
Can't have same cursor twice
Can't have same id twice
Can't just do startsWith here.
Can't put extra new lines in here like BlockStatement since it may be used in a ClassExpression.
Can't use nuclide-logging here to not cause cycle dependency.
Can't use regexp literal here, MinJS chokes on it.
Can't validate at construction time because we haven't resolved props yet, and the config may depend on those.
Cancel any outstanding evaluation requests to the Bridge
Cancel drag.
Cancel fail fast timeout
Cancel local notifications.
Cancel pending update.
Cancel the busy signal with this identifier.
Cancel the event with the given identifier.
Cancel the subscription, which should also kill the grep process.
Cancels all scheduled localNotifications
Cannot "use strict" because we must use eval in this file.
Cannot be resurected.
Cannot have negative delay
Cannot just convert the textual html into an element without a parent node.
Canvas contains grid and rulers.
Capture an image of the screen, window or an individual view.
Capture just text in quotes
Capture phase
Capture phase of bubbling to append separator before any of the bubbling happens.
Capture the local commit id and bookmark name from the `hg bookmarks` output.
Capture the view state before the update starts.
Captures all stdout and stderr
Care is taken to ensure that operations are atomic in the face of async turns.
Caret ranges.
Case 1 is covered by the response to WATCHMAN_SUBSCRIPTION_NAME_HGIGNORE firing.
Cases 2 and 3 are covered by the response to WATCHMAN_SUBSCRIPTION_NAME_PRIMARY firing.
Cases 2 and 3.
Cast `navigationState` as `RouteNode`.
Cast `value` to a string to ensure the value is set correctly.
Cast from HTMLElement down to WebviewElement without instanceof checking, as WebviewElement constructor is not exposed.
Cast through `any` because `map.get` can return null/undefined.
Cast to Object for use of code field below...
Cast to a string so we can do equality checks.
Catching errors makes debugging more difficult, so we start with errorThrown set to true before setting it to false after calling close -- if it's still set to true in the finally block, it means one of these calls threw.
Catching errors makes debugging more difficult, so we start with errorThrown set to true before setting it to false after calling close -- if it's still set to true in the finally block, it means wrapper.close threw.
Catching errors makes debugging more difficult, so we start with the OBSERVED_ERROR state before overwriting it with the real return value of initialize -- if it's still set to OBSERVED_ERROR in the finally block, it means wrapper.initialize threw.
Causes the cache to forget about one React-specific ID.
Caution: if `circular` is false and `parent` contains circular references, your program may enter an infinite loop and crash.
Caution: setting it to nothing causes the page to jump to the top, hence /.
Caveat: Cache all stats and readdirs results to minimize syscall.
Change after
Change all ALs to R.
Change before
Change dir if -C/--directory was passed.
Change error listener so it cleans up writeStream before exiting
Change set base data source only if main data source is already set.
Change svn to http
Change tempSource dir to 0777
Change the path to be relative to the root dir that was added to the tarball.
Change the props after the native props are set in case the props change removes the component
Change the query data that is stored by the container to `updatedQueryData`
Change the title as the active file changes.
Change this when you want to make sure the WindowedListView will re-render, for example when the result of `renderScrollComponent` might change.
Changed text is passed as an argument to the callback handler.
Changes are produced by `RelayStoreData` after writing query and mutation payloads into the store and consumed by `GraphQLStoreQueryResolver`, which subscribes to all records that are part of an active query result set.
Changes are recorded for deferred fragments to ensure that parent components re-render with the new data.
Changes the color of all the non-transparent pixels to the tintColor.
Changes the side of the window on which the code is shown and saves the setting in a cookie.
Character to pad with.
Character types for codepoints 0 to 0xff
Character types for codepoints 0x600 to 0x6ff
Check a GK but silently return false on error.
Check against accurate responseReceivedTime.
Check against the constraints
Check an object for unexpected properties.
Check archive file size
Check autocomplete box renders.
Check expiration
Check for HTTP or HTTPS Proxy in environment Else default to null
Check for URL in inflight URLs.
Check for a coordinate system flip.
Check for absence of explicitly max-age or expiry date instead.
Check for circular references and return its corresponding clone.
Check for cursor collision.
Check for deprecated and missing properties.
Check for duplicated __proto__
Check for duplicates
Check for existence for IE8
Check for id collision.
Check for listener leak
Check for most common single-character punctuators.
Check for new versions
Check for new versions for each node
Check for newer version of Bower
Check for protocol - the remote check for hosts supporting shallow cloning is only required for HTTP or HTTPS, not for Git or SSH.
Check for the fast path on GC events.
Check for the noBreak.
Check for transposed characters.
Check for unexpected properties.
Check if PGO is enabled for given module.
Check if `arg` matches the short or long flag.
Check if `scribe_cat` exists in PATH.
Check if a compatible one is already resolved If there's one, we don't need to resolve it twice
Check if a compatible one is being fetched If there's one, we wait and reuse it to avoid resolving it twice
Check if a specific template exists for the command
Check if additional details were provided
Check if already compiled
Check if an object can be extended.
Check if an object is Promise by testing if it has a `then` function property.
Check if bezier matches a preset
Check if destination directory exists to prevent issuing lock at all times
Check if entry exists first so array access doesn't throw for holes in the parent iteration.
Check if file is 0777
Check if git is installed
Check if git status is empty
Check if in IME.
Check if is a shorthand and expand it
Check if it can be mapped by the source map, then update the mapping.
Check if it can fit into an existing row
Check if it is not installed
Check if it quacks like an element
Check if it resolver to the same array
Check if it's public
Check if module is defined at `path`.
Check if module is in cache
Check if name defined in the json is different If so and if the name was "guessed", assume the json name
Check if name or source match the entry
Check if property name clashes with already added.
Check if resolution types are different
Check if something is an object.
Check if source changed, marking as different if it did We only do this for direct root dependencies that are compatible
Check if source exists
Check if svn is installed
Check if targets are equal
Check if the ImageStore contains image data for the specified URI.
Check if the container itself is a React root node.
Check if the dependency is not installed
Check if the entry entirely fits into an already drawn pixel, we can just skip drawing it.
Check if the last comment ends exactly where the first node starts.
Check if the node being unmounted was rendered by React, but isn't a root node.
Check if the original branch is still the master one
Check if the release already exists
Check if the remote buffer has already been initialized in editor.
Check if the source object has this key.
Check if the there is a style prop
Check if the type reference is a known internal type.
Check if the value is not already transparent to avoid an extra render.
Check if the whole file was downloaded In some unstable connections the ACK/FIN packet might be sent in the middle of the download See: https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/6143
Check if the whole process started to fail fast
Check if there are incompatibilities for this package name If there are, we need to fetch them
Check if there's a resolution that resolves the conflict Note that if one of them is marked as unresolvable, the resolution has no effect
Check if there's an exact branch/tag with this name as last resort
Check if this a "possible result".
Check if this depdendency should be skipped.
Check if we got a Content-Disposition header
Check if we should add a comma and space.
Check if we should close.
Check if we should open.
Check if we're actually ready to finish, but don't emit yet
Check if we're at the bottom of a multi-line method.
Check if we're still in the same recording session.
Check in their general extra libs path
Check in their standard lib path
Check is required for testing.
Check key is null in case iterator isn't exhausted and done resolved synchronously.
Check nonce
Check out `Touchable.js`, `ScrollResponder.js` and `ResponderEventPlugin.js` for more discussion.
Check payload hash
Check randomness for v4 UUIDs
Check stderr for content-type, ignore stdout
Check that `component` is still the current ref because we do not want to detach the ref if another component stole it.
Check that at least all the expected scripts are present.
Check that context menu has 'toggle blame'
Check that the fake client has been cached.
Check that value is an object with an inspect function on it
Check that we didn't get one last unshift.
Check the algorithm against the official list
Check the cache.
Check this is a real CSSRule, not a bogus object coming from WebInspector.BlankStylePropertiesSection.
Check timestamp staleness
Check to see if `processNext` should be called.
Check to see whether the popup is within the bounds of the TextEditor.
Check type annotations exist and are correct.
Check valid attribute names
Check whether a given record has received data for a deferred fragment.
Check whether the `error` argument passed to `callback` is `null` to determine if there was an error.
Check whether the node has any children that should be displayed.
Checking Out
Checkmark Unicode symbol
Checkout `Animated.Value.addListener` as a way to work around some of these limitations, but use it sparingly since it might have performance implications in the future.
Checkout based on master
Checkout master
Checkout test package version 0.2.0
Checkout test package version 0.2.1
Checkout test package version 0.2.1 which has a bower.json with ignores
Checks `localStorage` for boolean values for the given `name`.
Checks a certain path for existence and returns 'true'/'false' accordingly
Checks for deprecatedPropType function and add deprecation info.
Checks if `needle` matches exactly the first character followed by all uppercase letters in `haystack`.
Checks if `value` is a buffer.
Checks if `value` is a flattenable `arguments` object or array.
Checks if `value` is a global object.
Checks if `value` is a native function.
Checks if `value` is a valid array-like index.
Checks if `value` is a valid array-like length.
Checks if `value` is array-like.
Checks if `value` is classified as a `Function` object.
Checks if `value` is classified as a `String` primitive or object.
Checks if `value` is classified as a `Symbol` primitive or object.
Checks if `value` is classified as an `Array` object.
Checks if `value` is in `cache` mimicking the return signature of `_.indexOf` by returning `0` if the value is found, else `-1`.
Checks if `value` is in `cache`.
Checks if `value` is likely a prototype object.
Checks if `value` is likely an `arguments` object.
Checks if `value` is object-like.
Checks if `value` is suitable for use as unique object key.
Checks if a character in the supplied ID is a separator or the end.
Checks if a given DOM node contains or is another DOM node.
Checks if a given filename is "valid" for this installation.
Checks if a hash value for `key` exists.
Checks if a map value for `key` exists.
Checks if a stack value for `key` exists.
Checks if an associative array value for `key` exists.
Checks if an event is supported in the current execution environment.
Checks if an object has a property.
Checks if data for a deferred fragment is ready.
Checks if listening for connections.
Checks if some endpoint is compatible with already resolved target.
Checks if the contents of two sets are identical
Checks if the first ID is an ancestor of or equal to the second ID.
Checks if the given id represents an object only known on the client side or not.
Checks if the supplied string is a valid React DOM ID.
Checks if the two objects have equal properties.
Checks if this event should be released back into the pool.
Checks if two sets of calls have equal names and values.
Checks that `lib/` is up-to-date with `src/`.
Checks that `parent` either has range calls on it or does not contain either `page_info` or `edges` fields.
Checks that `warning` was invoked with a falsey condition with expected arguments the supplied number of times.
Checks that a merge was not given a circular object or an object that had too great of depth.
Checks that all expected scripts are present in the scripts list in the Scripts panel.
Checks that the supplied merge strategy is valid.
Checks whether a call exists strictly to encode which parts of a connection to fetch.
Checks whether a path is relevant to this HgRepositoryClient.
Checks whether a point is on the curve.
Checks whether a property name is a custom attribute.
Checks whether or not this composite component is mounted.
Checks whether the given ID was created on the client, as opposed to an ID that's understood by the server as well.
Child class should override this function to perform custom logic.
Children can be more than one argument, and those are transferred onto the newly allocated props object.
Children of the same category.
Children should load but the subscription should fail.
Chop off the first and last lines
Chrome console user messages.
Chrome expects `sourceURL` when eval'ing code
Chrome may call 'evaluate' for other purposes like auto-completion etc..
Chrome server messages.
Clang adds file-wide errors on line -1, so we put it on line 0 instead.
Clang emits one diagnostic saying "matching invocation of function f not found" with one or more child diagnostics listing the reasons.
Class that contains the info and methods for app navigation.
Clean out non-shared uninstalled dependencies
Clean up -- kill nuclide server and deactivate packages.
Clean up any state changed after constructor.
Clean up when pane items are destroyed.
Clean up when that happens.
Cleanup layers that don't exist anymore from tree.
Cleanup the old pane item on successful opening or when no connection could be established.
Cleanup unstaged files
Cleanup watch resources.
Clear all selected nodes under the node being collapsed and dispose their subscriptions
Clear all timeouts on unmount
Clear any subscriptions since there is no data.
Clear breakpoints whenever they are saved to localStorage.
Clear cached bundles in case user reloads
Clear current profile to avoid stopping backend.
Clear intercepted tracking data.
Clear old list.
Clear previous threads.
Clear root cache
Clear screen.
Clear the buffer.
Clear the marker.
Clear the messages from the given provider, according to the options.
Clear the metadata
Clear the repository
Clear the suggestion if the mouse moved out of the range.
Clear the text and trigger the `onSubmit` callback
Clear the text field.
Clear the view.
Clear timer at the end
Clear timers are set first because it's more likely to uncover bugs.
Clears all pending events.
Clears all pending query tracking.
Clears any enqueued updates.
Clears the node's .isLoading property once the fetch is complete.
Clears the value of a field by setting it to null/undefined.
Click "Pause" button to pause it and wait for the result.
Click, not drag.
Clicking a collapsed crumb will expose the hidden crumbs.
Clicking on a 'profile' in the NuclideListSelector auto-fills the form with the information associated with that profile.
Client has an optimistic update applied if the mutation defined one.
Clients can call these methods to publish messages
Clients should delegate to these
Clip forced viewport to actual scrollable area.
Clip the change to the size of this doc
Clipboard Operations
Clone an object except for the listed keys which are shallow copied
Clone because the root node will differ, but that's okay.
Clone before returning to avoid caller mutating the stack
Clone object or array
Clone passed in options so this function doesn't modify an object it doesn't own.
Clone path module, then override all functions with the Windows version
Clone the ordering so it cannot be dynamically mutated.
Clones this `ListViewDataSource` with the specified `dataBlob` and `rowIdentities`.
Close on failure to allow node to exit
Close the client socket and start a reconnect trial, send a message in between.
Close the dialog.
Close the inserted function.
Closes the drawer.
Closing an Atom window calls `deactivate` on loaded packages.
Closing brace
Closing tag spotted
Codes below are used to collect UMA histograms in the Chromium port.
CodexVarDef: modifiers, type, name, default, docblock
Coerce `val`.
Coerce numbers to strings for backwards compatibility.
CoffeeScript
Collapse ancestor crumbs, or from both sides if focused.
Collapse child crumbs.
Collapse template arguments for long types.
Collapse the node and clear its loading state on error so the user can retry expanding it.
Collapse the selected crumb as a last resort.
Collapses all selected directory nodes.
Collapsing and re-expanding a directory should forcibly fetch its children regardless of whether a subscription is possible.
Collect all the original child paths before invoking the callback.
Collect cache headers
Collect some analytics about gadget actions.
Collection of methods that allow declaration and validation of props that are supplied to React components.
Collects all the necessary information from the docblock and inline comments that may be useful to a transform.
Collects any un-referenced records in the store.
Collects any un-referenced records reachable from the given record via graph traversal of fields.
Collects timing information from key Relay subsystems.
Colliding keys: only first transaction runs.
Collisions are highly unlikely, but this module is in the business of making guarantees rather than safe bets.
Color hex values are never negative, so clamp to 0.
Color of text on unselected tabs
Color of the currently selected tab icon
Color of the foreground switch grip.
Color of the progress bar.
Color of this item's text.
Color stderr output red in the console to distinguish it as error.
Colorize log arguments if enabled.
Combinator utils
Combinators
Combine each of the sourcemaps multiple modules have into a single big one.
Combine the results.
Combined Gx and Gy
Combines 2 asynch calls.
Come a time when root fields support more than just identifying arguments, write a test to ensure that non-identifying args don't get stripped out.
Command key on Mac, Win key on other platforms.
Command keys insert or clear IME input.
Command to use to start server
Commands with these prefixes will be whitelisted.
Comment out the calls from their original positions
Comments are invalidated based on their starting position.
Comments can't have .comments, so it doesn't matter whether we print with comments or without.
Commit changes
Commit code to version control.
Commit mode only shows the changes of the active repository.
Common IE-specific property prefix.
Common dev flag.
Common implementation for a simple stubbed view.
Common transpositions of license identifier acronyms
Communicate our context to the combinators.
Compact ancestor crumbs, or from both sides if focused.
Compact child crumbs.
Compact the selected crumb.
Compaction loop to remove array holes.
Compacts new children and compares them to the previous children.
Comparator between two mappings where the generated positions are compared.
Comparator between two mappings where the original positions are compared.
Comparator between two mappings with deflated source and name indices where the generated positions are compared.
Comparator between two mappings with inflated source and name strings where the generated positions are compared.
Comparator used to sort menu items by priority: lower priorities appear earlier.
Compare function for sort
Compare name if both set Fallback to compare sources
Compare new headers with the old ones
Compare props and variables and reset the internal query variables if outside query variables change the component.
Compare targets if name/sources are equal
Compare two positions, return 0 if they are the same, a negative number when a is less, and a positive number otherwise.
Compare with the current highest version
Compares `objectA` and `objectB` using the provided `isEqual` function.
Compares a query path with another path.
Compile Link
Compile to actual regexp objects.
Complete animation.
Complete fully to folder if there is exactly one match and it is a folder containing a package.json file.
Completely flattens an array of arrays.
Completely locally implemented - no native hooks.
Completely removes the record identified by `dataID` from the store.
Completely unreasonable invalid garbage throws an error
Complex printers -- meaning they require context.
Complex types can end up being super long.
Component doesn't want to update, RelayContainer does.
Component doesn't want to update, RelayContainer doesn't either.
Component that displays UI to create a new file.
Component that manages the state transitions as the user connects to a server.
Component that wraps platform ScrollView while providing integration with touch locking "responder" system.
Component to control the app status bar.
Component to entertain the user while he is waiting to hear back from the server.
Component to prompt the user for authentication information.
Component to prompt the user for connection details.
Component wants to update, RelayContainer does too.
Component wants to update, RelayContainer doesn't.
Components can add sources that will be queried when a bug report is created via `collectExtraData`.
Components can pass what node to use by defining a `getScrollableNode` function otherwise `this` is used.
Composite components are higher-level components that compose other composite or native components.
Compress multiple dash
Compute X scale factor and normalize first row.
Compute XY shear factor and make 2nd row orthogonal to 1st.
Compute XZ and YZ shears, orthogonalize 3rd row
Compute `linePrefix` so that ocamlmerlin gets more context.
Compute `replacementPrefix` to make sure that the existing dot doesn't get clobbered when autocompleting.
Compute a value for each scope.
Compute sign, exponent, fraction
Compute the base array of styles
Compute the character position closest to the given coordinates.
Compute the default character width.
Compute the default text height.
Compute the depth of each scope.
Compute the last column for each generated mapping.
Compute the space at the start so any indents that don't cause a reset will not mess things up.
Compute the time elapsed between hrtime readings A and B, where A is later than B.
Compute whether a line is hidden.
Computes a key through scalar multiplication of a point on the curve 25519.
Computes an EdDSA signature of a message.
Computes the EdDSA public key.
Computes the public key to a private key on the curve 25519.
Computes the scalar product of a point on the curve 25519.
Concatenate each main entry with the canonical dir
Concatenating empty segment
Concatenating from an empty segment
ConcreteCallVariable should flow into mixed
Conditions for stopping the spring animation
Config Subscription
Config information is extracted from data exported from the UIManager module.
Configuration
Configure and run animation
Configure some jasmine specific things for integration testing.
Configure the gutter.
Configure the manager and kick in the resolve process
Configure things so we can do a final run to update UI and reset state.
Configures the root queries and initial variables that define the context in which the top-level component's fragments are requested.
Confirm autocomplete.
Confirm if the user really wants to register
Confirm that partial data was read into the cache:
Confirm the json with the user
Confirm their initial value.
Conflicts trample with a warning.
Connect or disconnect spans from a line.
Connect to requested dbgp debuggee on given port.
Connection arguments can be stripped out.
Connection states
Connections from the Chrome UI.
Connects the executor to the debugger.
Consider cleaning up these unused modules in a separate diff.
Consider enabling multi-line regions.
Consider style recalculation as a reason for layout invalidation, but only if we had no earlier layout invalidation records.
Consider supporting multiple cursors in the future.
Consider these as being member methods, but with an implied ordering while being isolated from each other.
Consider using this as a supplementary measure with `NavigationTypeDefinition`.
Consider warning here and deprecating this convenience.
Consistent way to clean up the final source before returning.
Console warnings that appear too far before this exception are probably not related to GraphQL.
Constant for empty modifiers set.
Constants describing the size of trie nodes.
Constants for encoding modifier key set as a bit mask.
Constants here represent enums with the same values got from hh_client and the Hack web worker.
Constrain the dragpoint to be within the containing div of the datagrid.
Constrain the dragpoint to be within the space made up by the column directly to the left and the column directly to the right.
Construct NTP message
Construct URL without bewit
Construct a loggingEvent following log4js event format.
Construct artifacts container
Construct authorization
Construct built in types.
Construct header
Construct the aliases.
Construct the built ins.
Construct the label
Construct this object to enable Hyperclick in a text editor.
Construct this object to enable Hyperclick in the Atom workspace.
Construction
Construction and Destruction
Constructs a React ID by joining a root ID with a name.
Constructs an enumeration with keys equal to their value.
Consume a semicolon, or, failing that, see if we are allowed to pretend that there is a semicolon at this position.
Consume the key.
Consumes contextual keyword if possible.
Container Types.
Container that allows to flip left and right between child views.
Container types.
Containers break the layout chain as they may be empty.
Containers may be subscribed to "new" records in the case where they were previously garbage collected or where the link was incrementally loaded from cache prior to the linked record.
Contains a list of the names of parameters.
Contains a range of UTF-8 character offsets that identify the region of the source from which the AST derived.
Contains constants that are used in constructing both `StyleSheet`s and inline styles during transitions.
Contains services that let us test marshalling of Errors.
Contains the `commandDisposable` Objects for all currently-registered views.
Contains two regular `Animated.Value`s under the hood.
Content editable or old IE textarea.
Contents of process.argv: 0 is "node" 1 is the path to this script.
Context Menu Items.
Context management
Context may be "window", "page", "div", or "local"/null.
Context menu is handled in onMouseDown for these browsers.
Contexts are never paged - even with large numbers of variables.
Continually call clean until there is no more extraneous dependencies to remove
Continuation commands get a response, but that response is a status message which occurs after execution stops.
Continue drag.
Continue fill actions dropdown for new provider.
Continue fill debugging types dropdown for new connection.
Continuing lines, if any
Contrary to `setAttribute`, object properties are properly `toString`ed by IE8/9.
Contributed audit categories should go into this namespace.
Contributed audit rules should go into this namespace.
Contributed by Andres Almiray http://jroller.com/aalmiray/entry/nice_source_code_syntax_highlighter
Contributed by David Simmons-Duffin and Marty Kube
Contributed by Erik Peterson.
Contributed by Gheorghe Milas and Ahmad Sherif
Contributed by Jen http://www.jensbits.com/2009/05/14/coldfusion-brush-for-syntaxhighlighter-plus
Contributed by Patrick Webster http://patrickwebster.blogspot.com/2009/04/javafx-brush-for-syntaxhighlighter.html
Contributed by Yegor Jbanov and David Bernard.
Contributes additional methods to a constructor
Controls how view is important for accessibility which is if it fires accessibility events and if it is reported to accessibility services that query the screen.
Controls whether iOS should automatically adjust the content inset for scroll views that are placed behind a navigation bar or tab bar/ toolbar.
Controls whether the View can be the target of touch events.
Convenience method for turning `node` into a properly formed ref query.
Convenience wrapper around `RelayTestUtils.writePayload`.
Convenience wrapper around `readRelayQueryData`.
Convenience wrapper around validateConnection that gracefully attempts to extract the connection identified by `connectionName` from the `parentField`.
Conveniently, IE8 doesn't support SVG and so we can simply use the attribute in browsers that support SVG and the property in browsers that don't, regardless of whether the element is HTML or SVG.
Conveniently, `setImmediate` was introduced in the same version `process.nextTick` started throwing recursion errors.
Convert TemplateLiteral into a single template string with substitution names, a matching array of substituted values, and a set of substituted variable names.
Convert `ListType` and `NonNullType` into `NamedType`.
Convert a Date to a timestamp.
Convert a stream of actions into a stream of application states.
Convert a structured logcat entry into the format that nuclide-console wants.
Convert a value into the proper css writable value.
Convert all of the arguments into marshaled form.
Convert all of the elements through the correct marshaller.
Convert all of the elements through the correct unmarshaller.
Convert array into object
Convert array messages to Error Objects with Traces.
Convert array-like objects to arrays.
Convert contents to JSON if they are not a string
Convert each cell to a string.
Convert endpoints to decomposed endpoints
Convert existing expression atom to assignable pattern if possible.
Convert extraneous
Convert flattened
Convert from Buffer to string.
Convert list of expression atoms to binding list.
Convert node Http request object to a request configuration object
Convert node's  to request configuration object
Convert relative paths to absolute ones.
Convert samples from usec to msec
Convert the JSON string to an object.
Convert the `Immutable.Set` to a native `Array` for simpler use w/ Jasmine.
Convert the pattern into a regexp
Convert to an Observable for ease of manipulation
Convert to ms.
Convert tree
Convert visible area to visible indexes.
Convert wildcard targets to semver range targets if they are newly Note that this can only be made if they can be targetable If they are not, the resolver is incapable of handling targets
Convert wrapped lines into rows with padded values.
Convert xml to JS.
Converts 0xrrggbbaa into 0xaarrggbb
Converts `map` to an array.
Converts `set` to an array.
Converts `string` to an array.
Converts `value` to a number.
Converts `value` to a string if it's not one.
Converts `value` to an integer.
Converts a DbgpProperty to a Chrome PropertyDescriptor.
Converts a byte string representation to an array of unsigned 8-bit integers.
Converts a dbgp value to a Chrome RemoteObject.
Converts an unsigned 8-bit integer array representation to a byte string.
Converts from a two-complement value to a value where the sign bit is is placed in the least significant bit.
Converts from a two-complement value to a value where the sign bit is placed in the least significant bit.
Converts local paths to file: URI's.
Converts null/undefined values into empty object.
Converts the old, object-based module structure to the new array-based structure.
Converts the template string into a valid GraphQL document string.
Converts this array class into a real JavaScript Array.
Converts to a two-complement value from a value where the sign bit is is placed in the least significant bit.
Converts to a two-complement value from a value where the sign bit is placed in the least significant bit.
CookieJar configuration:
Coordinates for the center of the map.
Copied from `node/src/node.js`.
Copied from lib/utils/git, because we need to use it before calling npm.load and lib/utils/git uses npm.js which doesn't allow that.
Copies a file to a new path.
Copies a specified subdirectory of integration-test-helpers/spec/fixtures to a temporary location.
Copies over content of the input segment and add to the current segment.
Copies own symbol properties of `source` to `object`.
Copies properties of `source` to `object`.
Copies the ViewManager constants and commands into UIManager.
Copies the node.lib file for the current target architecture into the current proper dev dir location.
Copies the values of `source` to `array`.
Copy .git folder to the tempDir
Copy bower.json to .bower.json and add some props
Copy bytes to buffer, if provided
Copy constructor
Copy default methods.
Copy files to the temporary directory first
Copy flow project to a temporary location.
Copy its contents to the temporary dir
Copy mapping
Copy mercurial project to temp directory.
Copy mercurial project to temporary directory.
Copy metadata that is necessary to dirty records when recycling objects.
Copy of the npm package: blocked, but without the unref, because that doesn't work in apm tests.
Copy options and fill in default values.
Copy sourcesContent into SourceNode
Copy sourcesContents of applied map.
Copy statics.
Copy temp package to temp package  2
Copy the contents of 'fixtures' into a temp directory ...
Copy the metadata about the container from the placeholder.
Copy the props, except the mouse listeners
Copying and editing the code allowed me to make invasive changes and simplifications without creating a complicated tangle.
Copyright 2004-present Facebook.
Copyright 2006 Shin, YoungJin
Copyright 2009-2011 Mozilla Foundation and contributors Licensed under the New BSD license.
Copyright 2011 Mozilla Foundation and contributors Licensed under the New BSD license.
Copyright 2013-2014 Facebook, Inc.
Copyright 2013-2015 Facebook, Inc.
Copyright 2013-2015, Facebook, Inc.
Copyright 2013-present, Facebook, Inc.
Copyright 2014 Mozilla Foundation and contributors Licensed under the New BSD license.
Copyright 2014 The Chromium Authors.
Copyright 2014-2015, Facebook, Inc.
Copyright 2015 Joyent, Inc.
Copyright 2015 The Chromium Authors.
Copyright 2015, Facebook, Inc.
Copyright Joyent, Inc.
Correct for dirPath, which is essentially a random string.
Could be paths to files or directories.
Could be publishing a URL or tarball, however, that means that we will not have automatically run the prepublish script, since that gets run when adding a folder to the cache.
Count digits for our randomness check
Count how many comments we need to transfer, treat negative counts as 0.
Count how many of each break we have.
Count leading zero bits on a buffer
Count of children found in the current subtree.
Count the brackets.
Count the invisible nodes beyond the bottom bound of the viewport.
Count the number of children that are typically specified as `props.children`.
Count the number of dominated nodes for each node.
Counts how many scopes deep each type variable is
Counts the column offset in a string, taking tabs into account.
Cover grammar support.
Covers bottom of gutter when coverGutterNextToScrollbar is on and h scrollbar is present.
Covers bottom-right square when both scrollbars are present.
Covers: 'use babel' and "use babel"
Coverts a box from "div" coords to another coordinate system.
CpuProfile is a virtual event created on frontend to support serialization of CPU Profiles within tracing timeline data.
Create ENOENT error because Node.js v0.8 will not emit an `error` event if the command could not be found.
Create HTTP server
Create UDP socket
Create a "subclass".
Create a BasicSourceMapConsumer from a SourceMapGenerator.
Create a HomePaneItem component class that's bound to the provided stream of home fragments.
Create a SourceMapConsumer from a SourceMapGenerator.
Create a base64 sha1 HMAC for `options`.
Create a component for the extra UI in the Buck version of the toolbar.
Create a connection by reusing the configuration of last successful connection associated with given host.
Create a debugger with the given `namespace`.
Create a factory that creates HTML tag elements.
Create a fake editor
Create a file of the target size.
Create a file that is ignored.
Create a file that is tracked.
Create a file that is untracked.
Create a fresh copy of the test package into temp
Create a full Content-Type header given a MIME type or extension.
Create a git repo in a temporary folder.
Create a higher-order component that automatically computes the `pointerEvents` property for a component whenever navigation position changes.
Create a history change event from an updateDoc-style change object.
Create a local copy of items to defend against the caller modifying the array before this Promise is resolved.
Create a marker, wire it up to the right lines, and
Create a mock file watcher.
Create a new _sourcesContents map if the property is null.
Create a new counter with the given initial count.
Create a new logger that pipes everything to ours that will be used to fetch
Create a new object and put it in the registry.
Create a new object so we don't mutate the original one.
Create a range of LineView objects for the given lines.
Create a second query that requests a different selection on the empty plural field.
Create a second query that requests a different selection on the null connection.
Create a second query that requests a different selection on the null linked field.
Create a second query that requests a different selection on the null plural field.
Create a separator menu item that displays if either the file or directory item displays.
Create a stream of tracking events from a stream of actions.
Create a subject that we can use to track search completion.
Create a temp directory with given prefix.
Create a temporary Git repository.
Create a temporary Hg repository.
Create a temporary directory and some test files.
Create a text buffer that's bound to the process.
Create a wrapper that calls to structuredStackTraceHook first, then return the result of prepareStackTrace.
Create an archive containing the main package
Create an empty record at `dataID` if a record does not already exist.
Create an initial response.
Create an invalid package meta
Create an iteration object.
Create an object suitable for use as an Atom pane item from a React element.
Create common nodes for printing.
Create context menu.
Create default container for tests
Create directory
Create dummy file
Create empty package.json to indicate project root
Create fake file contents.
Create files
Create gap elements
Create gpu tasks containers.
Create grid in the records main area.
Create groups of requires from each config
Create helper data structures.
Create invalid versions
Create it based on the metadata
Create lurking files
Create makefile build targets and dependencies.
Create missing directory and copy files there
Create model.
Create new row
Create or get a cached service.
Create readable "multipart/form-data" streams.
Create records list in the records sidebar.
Create scripts navigator
Create some more
Create some versions
Create some versions for different sources
Create stub UISourceCode for the time source mapping is being loaded.
Create subscriptions for addedRepos.
Create symlink
Create target subdirs if any and produce the compiler calls, /mp is respected if enabled.
Create temporary Hg repository.
Create temporary dir
Create the SourceNode.
Create the first query with a selection on a connection.
Create the first query with a selection on a linked field.
Create the first query with a selection on a plural field
Create the first query with a selection on a plural field.
Create the wrapper root query.
Create top level properties splitter.
Create top overview component.
Create two roots.
Create two services.
Create uses `verbatim` and `n` answer buffer and that implies that untracked files will be ignored.
Create valid version
Create vertical box with stack.
Created lazily.
Creates a Cursor instance based off the given `writable stream` instance.
Creates a DOM ID prefix to use when mounting React components.
Creates a RelayQuery.Mutation for the given config.
Creates a RelayQuery.Mutation used to fetch the given optimistic response.
Creates a SourceNode from generated code and a SourceMapConsumer.
Creates a StyleSheet style reference from the given object.
Creates a `Set` cache object to optimize linear searches of large arrays.
Creates a base function for methods like `_.forIn`.
Creates a cache object to store unique values.
Creates a child component.
Creates a clone of  `buffer`.
Creates a clone of `arrayBuffer`.
Creates a clone of `map`.
Creates a clone of `regexp`.
Creates a clone of `set`.
Creates a clone of `typedArray`.
Creates a clone of the `symbol` object.
Creates a composite component class given a class specification.
Creates a copy of the argument if it is already an array.
Creates a descriptor that overwrites itself on first access with a method for observing changes of a specific property.
Creates a fragment used to fetch data necessary to insert a new edge into an existing connection.
Creates a fragment used to fetch the given optimistic response.
Creates a fragment used to update any data as a result of a mutation that deletes an edge from a connection.
Creates a function that invokes `func` with the `this` binding of the created function and arguments from `start` and beyond provided as an array.
Creates a function that invokes two functions and ignores their return vales.
Creates a function that invokes two functions and merges their return values.
Creates a function that returns `value`.
Creates a garbage collector for this instance.
Creates a highly specialized animation function that may be evaluated every frame.
Creates a lazy Relay container.
Creates a map cache object to store key-value pairs.
Creates a mapping from supported HTML tags to `ReactDOMComponent` classes.
Creates a new Animated value composed from two Animated values added together.
Creates a new Animated value composed from two Animated values multiplied together.
Creates a new React class that is idempotent and capable of containing other React components.
Creates a new VM in node, or an iframe in a browser in order to run the script
Creates a new directory with the given path.
Creates a new native library with the given name
Creates a new pane item for the specified gadget.
Creates a number encoding keyCode in the lower 8 bits and modifiers mask in the higher 8 bits.
Creates a per-global singleton value.
Creates a popup to alert the user.
Creates a query for each of the component's fragments using the given variables, and fragment pointers that can be used to resolve the results of those queries.
Creates a range at `dataID` with an optional `forceIndex`.
Creates a set cache object to store unique values.
Creates a set of `values`.
Creates a stack cache object to store key-value pairs.
Creates a string representation of a member expression.
Creates a temporary directory with the given name.
Creates an array containing the nodes rendered from the supplied markup.
Creates an array from array like objects.
Creates an array of index keys for `object` values of arrays, `arguments` objects, and strings, otherwise `null` is returned.
Creates an array of the own enumerable property names of `object`.
Creates an array of the own symbol properties of `object`.
Creates an asymmetric matcher that passes for values that are container props with an optionally constrained data ID and/or fragment.
Creates an event and returns an identifier that can be used to cancel it, or null if the manager cannot accept events.
Creates an hash object.
Creates an input element under the parentElement with the given id and defaultText.
Creates an observable with the following properties:  1.
Creates an opaque serialization of calls.
Creates markup for a custom property.
Creates markup for a property.
Creates markup for the ID property.
Creates markup for the content between the tags.
Creates markup for the open tag and all attributes.
Creates the `atom` global object.
Creates the markup for this text node.
Creates the padding for `string` based on `length`.
Creates the template for a React Native project given the provided parameters: - projectDir: templates will be copied here.
Creates/updates a link between two records via the given field.
Creates/updates a one-to-many link between records via the given field.
Creating a new Session is actually side-effecty.
Creating the mutation does not send it.
Creating this function here, allows us to not have to bind or create functions for each event.
Credentials lookup function
Crop the image specified by the URI param.
Cross browser find the element that had the event
Cross reference
Cross-platform
Crumbs are shrunk in order of descending distance from the signifcant crumb, with a tie going to child crumbs.
Crypto is kind of old and crusty.
Curiously, list-style works too without any special prodding.
Current available Nuclide connections.
Current props are accessed via `this.props`.
Current request.
Current serialization doesn't support internal properties refs Will be fixed after injecting InjectedScript.js
Current window bounds.
Current word might go beyond the cursor, so we cut it.
Currently a no-op.
Currently a noop.
Currently disabled due to false positives.
Currently it manages 3 streams: 1.
Currently it provides four callback channels: 1.
Currently may not span multiple lines.
Currently named "doGet" because "get" was created first.
Currently provides two methods, onFileChange and onFileSave.
Currently we have two different ways to config a service in service-config.json: 1.
Currently we rely on UIViews and style to figure that out.
Currently, `flow check-contents` returns all of the errors in the project.
Currently, a diagnostic from Flow is an object with a "message" property.
Currently, a diagnostic from Hack is an object with a "message" property.
Currently, all major browsers except Chrome seems to support Lock-keys.
Currently, if `aliasOrTarget` contains a flavor, this will fail.
Currently, the BuckToolbarStore's progress reporting is pretty useless so we omit `observeProgress` and just use the indeterminate progress bar.
Currently, the DiagnosticsPanel is designed to work with only one DiagnosticUpdater.
Currently, use cases only require a simple fire-and-forget interaction
Currently, we always inline scalar types.
Currently, we always send Enum and Object types as variables.
Currently, we only do anything useful with the first error.
Currently: - The order that these are listed in the transaction is critical: - Suppresses events.
Cursor Position Details Moving the Cursor Local Positions and Ranges
Cursor position was documented in a test and is retained here after changes to how text is set in the text editor.
Cursor-blinking
Curve sequence
Custom Matchers from nuclide-atom-test-helpers
Custom Matchers from nuclide-test-helpers
Custom and pre-defined easing functions, delays, durations, decay factors, spring constants, and more can all be tweaked depending on the type of animation.
Custom pin image.
Custom pin view.
CustomComponents:
Customize the element containing the modal.
Cycle through the specified endpoints
DEPRECATED this is an invalid URL but we normalize it anyway.
DEPRECATED: Warning for users of the old Unix Sockets URL Scheme
DISPLAY CONSTRUCTOR The display handles the DOM integration, both for input reading and content drawing.
DISPLAY DRAWING
DO NOT REMOVE
DOCUMENT DATA STRUCTURE By default, updates that start and end at the beginning of a line are treated specially, in order to make the association of line widgets and marker elements with the text behave more intuitive.
DOM UTILITIES
DOMAttributeNames: object mapping React attribute name to the DOM attribute name.
DOMAttributeNamespaces: object mapping React attribute name to the DOM attribute namespace URL.
DOMMutationMethods: Properties that require special mutation methods.
Darwin is a real dick sometimes.
Dash special characters
Data is stored as a map from IDs to Records.
Data structure design inspired by Traceur's Map implementation.
Datatips are pinnable by default, unless explicitly specified otherwise.
Date change handler.
Date when set
Dates have no keys, so we consider these equal.
Dbgp connections which do not match the scriptRegex will be ignored.
Dbgp documentation can be found at http://xdebug.org/docs-dbgp.php
Dbgp protocol does not seem to support uncaught exception handling so we only support 'all' and treat all other states as 'none'.
Deactivate nuclide packages.
Deactivating must come before unloading.
Deals with base64 correctly by aligning chunks
Debounce manually rather than using editor.onDidStopChanging so that the debounce time is configurable.
Debounce tab change events to limit unneeded scrolling when changing or closing tabs in quick succession.
Debounce this call to reduce churn at startup, and when new providers get activated or a new directory gets mounted.
Debugger domain types.
Debugger finished initializing and entered debug mode.
DebuggerInstance has been disposed.
Debugging React Native consists of the following:  1.
Debugging the node process.
Decide if we can use the one from the resolve cache
Decide if we retrieve from the cache or not Also decide if we validate the cached entry or not
Decide which links to delete
Decimal literals may be "imaginary"
Declarative fill type objects - API design not finalized
Declare a query that requires a lookup in the root call map.
Declare internals
Declare namespace
Declare remoteModule as empty object.
Declare variables used by callback
Declares, validates and defaults options.
Declaring, describing, and grouping tests
Decode a single base 64 character code digit to an integer.
Decode a single base 64 digit to an integer.
Decode payload in the given data URI, return the result as a Buffer.
Decodes a base32 encoded string to an array of unsigned 8-bit integers.
Decodes a base32 representation of a key to an internally compatible array representation.
Decodes a canonical hex representation of a key to an internally compatible array representation.
Decodes a hex representation of a key to an internally compatible array representation.
Decodes a hex string to an array of unsigned 8-bit integers.
Decodes the next base 64 VLQ value from the given string and returns the value and the rest of the string via the out parameter.
Decodes the next base 64 VLQ value from the given string and returns the value and the rest of the string.
Decorations
Decrease the indentation after this line.
Decrypts the clientKey of a SerializableServerConnectionConfiguration.
Deep copy the rest
Deep object or array comparison
Default adding after with no cursor to -1 So the first element in the segment is stored at index 0
Default adding before with no cursor to 1 So the first element in the segment is stored at index 0
Default amount "active" region protrudes beyond box
Default bezier
Default bounciness is 1, which overshoots a little bit once.
Default configuration for the CLI.
Default false.
Default flags should work.
Default getters for style and pan responders.
Default header targets should be ignored.
Default imports come in two flavors.
Default is 0.
Default is 2, as appropriate for `process.argv`.
Default is false.
Default options
Default timeout.
Default to a 4-space indent.
Default to the first line, if it's not actually in the file any more.
Default value for options of this type, if no default is specified in the option type usage.
Default value is 0.
Default value is 1.
Default value is `false`.
Default value is `true`.
Default value is false.
Default value is true.
Default value-returning functions that may optionally be passed as a third argument to Def.prototype.field.
Default: 200ms.
Default: false.
Defaults to 'SourceMapConsumer.GREATEST_LOWER_BOUND'.
Defaults to 'before' when unspecified.
Defaults to 'binarySearch.GREATEST_LOWER_BOUND'.
Defaults to 'fade'.
Defaults to 'head' when unspecified.
Defaults to 'png'.
Defaults to 0.
Defaults to 0.2.
Defaults to 1.
Defaults to 60 seconds.
Defaults to GET if not specified.
Defaults to MEDIUM.
Defaults to Number.POSITIVE_INFINITY.
Defaults to `SourceMapConsumer.GENERATED_ORDER`.
Defaults to `process.argv`.
Defaults to `process.env`.
Defaults to false.
Defaults to pool.ntp.org
Defaults to returning a ScrollView with the given props.
Defaults to true
Defeat the older Safari bug: http://www.quirksmode.org/js/events_properties.html
Defer compiling this method until we really need it.
Defer selecting default target since we need all clients to get their targetAdded notifications first.
Define a module along with a payload.
Define argument syntax for the top-level command.
Define catalyst test apps used in integration tests
Define custom matchers to test our custom matchers...
Define lazy getters for each module.
Define option with `flags`, `description` and optional coercion `fn`.
Define row and header height, should be in sync with styles for timeline graphs.
Define your own error by extending this class.
Definitely want to avoid this.
Definition of context types for this component.
Definition of context types this component sets for its children.
Definition of prop types for this component.
Delay closing the underlying socket connection until registered subscriptions have closed.
Delay hiding the combobox long enough for a click inside the combobox to trigger on it in case the blur was caused by a click inside the combobox.
Delay in ms, from onPressIn, before onLongPress is called.
Delay in ms, from the release of the touch, before onPressOut is called.
Delay in ms, from the start of the touch, before onPressIn is called.
Delay to give the new requests time to start.
Delegate callback from BreakpointDisplayController.
Delegate focus to the FileTree component if this component gains focus because the FileTree matches the selectors targeted by themes to show the containing panel has focus.
Delegate marshalling to the type registry.
Delegate method `name`.
Delegate to the passed in HgRepositoryClient.
Delegate to the registered connect error handler.
Delegate to these DiagnosticsProviderBase methods to satisfy the DiagnosticProvider interface.
Delegator accessor `name`.
Delegator getter `name`.
Delegator setter `name`.
Delete 0.0.1 and create 0.0.2
Delete all the ignored files
Delete all the keys in the `keys` array.
Delete an image from the ImageStore.
Delete and create folder
Delete cache folder
Delete destination folder if any
Delete directory
Delete dummy .master file that is present on the master branch
Delete first to force a new insertion.
Delete headers with value undefined since they break ClientRequest.OutgoingMessage.setHeader in node 0.12
Delete leading comments along with any trailing whitespace they might have.
Delete previous link if any
Delete temp folder
Delete the node from any ranges it may be a part of
Delete the record at `dataID`, setting its value to `null`.
Delete the reference from the instance to this internal representation which allow the internals to be properly cleaned up even if the user leaks a reference to the public instance.
Delete the root record ID associated with the mutation.
Delete trailing comments along with any leading whitespace they might have.
Deletermine if that's a rebase or merge operation.
Deletes a listener from the registration bank.
Deletes all listeners for the DOM element with the supplied ID.
Deletes the value for a property on a node.
Deliberately skip previous process.
Deliberately suppress any flow errors in this method.
Demote these to 'error' level.
Denormalize remainder
Denormalized
Dependencies further down the graph are either not affected or informed by `dependencyQueryID`.
Depending on the location of .arcconfig, we may get a key that is different from what `arc lint` actually returns, and end up without any lints for this path.
Deplorable hack to make the submit method do the right thing.
Deprecated - 'format' argument, as supported in v1.2
Deprecated APIs.
Deprecated transform props used on Android only
Deprecated, do not use.
Deprecated.
Derive timestamps from profile start and stop times.
Derived fields
Derived from children
DescriptorArrays are fixed arrays used to hold instance descriptors.
Deserializes a url with query parameters: args, argTypes to an array of the original arguments of the same types the client called the function with.
Despite being static, they must be defined outside of the "statics" key under which all other static methods are defined.
Destroy markers that no longer correspond to breakpoints.
Destroy old highlighted sections and highlight new ones
Destroy side-bar-view, the active view.
Destroys all event registrations for this instance.
Detach a line from the document tree and its markers.
Detach heavy component on hide
Detaches a handler attached via `attachAggregateHandler`.
Detaches a handler attached via `attachProfileHandler`.
Detaches a reference name.
Detect `this` as the global object.
Detect free variable `exports`.
Detect free variable `global` from Node.js.
Detect free variable `module`.
Detect free variable `self`.
Detect free variable `window`.
Detect hardware back button presses, and programmatically invoke the default back button functionality to exit the app if there are no listeners or if none of the listeners return true.
Detect if the current active connection is metered or not.
Detect invalid regular expressions.
Detect the popular CommonJS extension `module.exports`.
Detect the request to connect same origin server, reuse the connection.
Detect when flags have changed so we can alert the client.
Detect whether the selection is backward.
Determine effective options based on given values and defaults.
Determine if `minField` is a subset of the range specified by `subField` such that they can be subtracted.
Determine if `this` and `that` are deeply equal.
Determine if a `...
Determine if a given value is an object that implements the `RelayEnvironment` interface.
Determine if a module requirement is already met by the tree at or above our current location in the tree.
Determine if the record was created by this write operation.
Determine if the record was created.
Determine if the supplied record might be missing data.
Determine if the supplied record reflects an optimistic update.
Determine if the two queries have the same root field and identifying arg.
Determine if there are Node.js pipe-like data listeners.
Determine if version is greater than all the versions possible in the range.
Determine if version is less than all the versions possible in the range
Determine target for build flags
Determine the differing substring between the initially stored text content and the current content.
Determine what benchmarks are to be run, and with which packages installed.
Determine what the applicable shortcut for a given action is within this component's context.
Determine where to move to before making changes
Determine whether a file is signed.
Determine whether item is loose or not.
Determine whether mappingB is after mappingA with respect to generated position.
Determine whether or not an installed app can handle a given URL.
Determine whether the next list item belongs here.
Determine whether this.node needs to be wrapped in parentheses in order for a parser to reproduce the same local AST structure.
Determine which node dev files version we are installing
Determines how the return key should look.
Determines how to resize the image when the frame doesn't match the raw image dimensions.
Determines if two Ranges are equal.
Determines the color of the keyboard.
Determines the scaling of `value`.
Determines the type of background drawable that's going to be used to display feedback.
Determines what the opacity of the wrapped view should be when touch is active.
Determines whether HTML5 videos play inline or use the native full-screen controller.
Determines whether a component should have a link to a runnable example
Determines whether an event happened in the gutter, and fires the handlers for the corresponding event.
Determines whether the keyboard gets dismissed in response to a drag.
Determines which keyboard to open, e.g.`numeric`.
DevTools protocol defines urlRegex parameter, but the parameter is not used by the front-end.
DevTools sidebar is a vertical split of panels tabbed pane and a drawer.
Developer can compare the keys of two routes then know which route is added to the stack earlier.
Developers should not use a number, but we are using the prop type both for user provided colors and for transformed ones.
Development Header File management commands
Device pixel ratio.
Diagnostic information, returned from findDiagnostics.
Diagnostics often have children.
Diagnostics will be removed once the file is closed.
Diff Helpers
Diff a scalar field such as `name` or `id`.
Diff the current dataID
Diff the file after setting the view mode to compare against the right thing.
Diff uses child nodes and keeps requisite fields
Differences for other resize methods
Different lines, draw top part
Different repo types emit different events at individual and refresh updates.
Different types of routes.
Differs from JSON.stringify in that undefined becauses undefined and that inf and nan don't become null
Diffs a non-connection plural field against each of the fetched items.
Diffs the field conditionally based on the `scope` from the nearest ancestor field.
Digit conversions
Dimensions.
Dir may be -1 or 1.
Direct cause.
Direct lookup
Directly set the value.
Directories have to be read as IgnoreReaders otherwise fstream.Reader will create a DirReader instead.
Directories have to be read as Packers otherwise fstream.Reader will create a DirReader instead.
Directories should sort first, then files, and case should be ignored
Directory Metadata
Disable Atom's bundled 'tree-view' package.
Disable YellowBox so we do not have to mock its dependencies
Disable `allowReserved` to enforce them.
Disable any kind of automatic timeout behavior for incoming requests in case it takes the packager more than the default timeout of 120 seconds to respond to a request.
Disable autolink inside example code blocks of guides.
Disable brace matching in long lines, since it'll cause hugely slow updates
Disable debug output.
Disable file watch subscriptions, not needed here.
Disable it when appending to prevent doing unneeded bookkeeping.
Disable the file-watcher package from showing the promot, if installed.
Disabling a package during the traversal has no effect if this is a startup load because `PackageManager` does not re-load the list of packages to activate after each iteration.
Disabling and unloading Atom's bundled 'tree-view' must happen after activation because this package's `activate` is called during an traversal of all initial packages to activate.
Disallow defining methods more than once unless explicitly allowed.
Disallow overriding of base class methods unless explicitly allowed.
Disambiguating between a `for` and a `for`/`in` or `for`/`of` loop is non-trivial.
Discard pending command.
Dismissable panel that displays the diagnostics from nuclide-diagnostics-store.
Dispatch a command to show the `ProjectFindView`.
Dispatch the event to the listener.
Dispatch the run action to the selected build system and collect the results.
Dispatch two linter requests.
Dispatches all synthetic events on the event queue.
Dispatches an event and releases it back into the pool, unless persistent.
Display an iOS action sheet.
Display friendly names for all class-like types.
Display new customized element UI from input provider and action.
Display the iOS share sheet.
Display types for which margin is ignored.
Display types for which padding is ignored.
Displays a loading notification while waiting for a promise.
Displays the message until the returned disposable is disposed
Dispose a remote object.
Dispose any resource held by this provider.
Dispose function that removes this counter from the global list.
Dispose of the previous commands.
Dispose removed projects repositories, if any.
Dispose the Emitter to release memory and to inform future callers that they're attempting to listen to events that will never fire again.
Dispose the counters, ensuring that they are removed from the global list.
Dispose the event.
Disposes all object in the registry
Distance between the minimum and the maximum latitude/longitude to be displayed.
Distinguish between a props update versus a simple state update
Distinguish between singular/plural queries.
Distributed under an MIT license: http://codemirror.net/LICENSE
Distributed under an MIT license: http://codemirror.net/LICENSE TODO actually recognize syntax of TypeScript constructs
Distributed under an MIT license: http://codemirror.net/LICENSE Utility function that allows modes to be combined.
Dividing a function by anything makes little sense, but we have to check for that.
Do NOT call this directly.
Do NOT call this from outside this class.
Do NOT use this to enforce a certain condition on any user input.
Do a binary search between these bounds.
Do a bulk-read of the DOM positions and sizes needed to draw the view, so that we don't interleave reading and writing to the DOM.
Do a full toggle, hide and then show, so focus logic is guaranteed to happen.
Do a line by line diff of two strings.
Do a recursive diff of two JSON objects.
Do all the async work we'll need to do in order to tell if this is a safe operation
Do it manually.
Do not attempt to diff files larger than this limit.
Do not attempt to use offsetes if we're not attached to the document tree yet.
Do not bother to sort the diagnostics until a render is happening.
Do not call this directly -- call _runLintWithBusyMessage
Do not cement exact scores or match indices in this test, since they are determined by Fuzzy-native.
Do not change the values below, additional actions are needed on the Chromium side in order to add more codes.
Do not check if node's target is not a valid semver one
Do not disturb either the source or target location's node_modules folders.
Do not follow redirects
Do not insert them into the grid, but count their total height.
Do not interfere with text editing.
Do not keep in-memory cache if it's completely empty
Do not live-edit "content" property of pseudo elements.
Do not pass these events downstream to ScrollView since they will be registered in ListView's own ScrollResponder.Mixin
Do not pick non-inherited properties from inherited styles.
Do not proceed if there are any missing fields.
Do not process corner column.
Do not re-add overlay mode if regex did not change for better performance.
Do not reinitialize a mongobridge
Do not reitinialize a replica set
Do not reitinialize a sharded cluster
Do not reitinialize a standalone server
Do not reject, as this is normal in the hosted mode.
Do not rely on this attribute.
Do not remove old categories if not handling a user gesture, as there's chance categories will be added later during start-up.
Do not require this unless we are actually rendering.
Do not restore if the node is missing
Do not return a suggestion, so we can fall through to provider2.
Do not return the cached value if we are executing under the test runner.
Do not send messages on lines that did not change
Do not set `select.value` as exact behavior isn't consistent across all browsers for all cases.
Do not show a single suggestion if it is the same as user-entered prefix, even if allowed to show single-item suggest boxes.
Do not store staled hits
Do not test cached resources.
Do not tie up the Buck server continuously retrying for flags.
Do not touch the styles if they are being edited.
Do not use popToRoute here, because race conditions could prevent the route from existing at this time.
Do not use unless you have a very good reason.
Do not wait for Watchman to sync.
Do not wrap help description, but indent newlines appropriately.
Do nothing for invisible controls.
Do nothing here, it will be added in updateVisibleNodes.
Do nothing if populated nodes still fit the viewport.
Do nothing if the source did not change at all.
Do nothing unless cached resource tree is processed - it will overwrite everything.
Do nothing, because either: 1.
Do nothing, it's expected.
Do nothing.
Do search preprocessing for all existing and future root directories.
Do the same for the dev dependencies
Do the same for the incompatible local package
Do the same thing, but for a remote project by starting the nuclide server using the remote-utils library in nuclide-integration-test-helpers.
Do this first, to support `npm update npm -g`
Do this in `componentWillUnmount` to prevent memory leaks
Do top level deps first, this stops the sorting by required order from unsorting these deps.
Do use require.resolve so the paths can be codemoded in the future.
Do version check.
Document formats
Document resource goes last.
Document's children have changed, perform total update.
DocumentSelectionState is responsible for maintaining selection information for a document.
Documentation says nothing about file name of bundled script.
Documentation says what source maps can contain absolute paths, but DevTools strictly expects relative paths.
Documented in http://selenic.com/hg/help/status.
Does a build/install.
Does not animate, immediately replaces and rerenders navigation bar and stack items.
Does not cancel the queries themselves.
Does not clone if nothing changed.
Does not ensure that the current cursor position is visible.
Does not fail if the directory doesn't exist.
Does not fail if the file doesn't exist.
Does not modify either input argument.
Does not mutate the original.
Does not remove from the DOM.
Does not require going to the debuggee.
Does not support the only defined option, "defer".
Does not take into account specific nature of platform.
Does not use object.assign as objectId may have fields which we must not copy.
Does not warn that data cannot be refetched sine no data is missing.
Does so such that this setup method may be used on an instance that is already initialized, in a way that does not consume additional memory upon reuse.
Does the actual updating of the line display.
Doesn't have  `__range__` loaded
Doesn't matter what the args are here.
Doesn't yet support other contained responders from blocking this scroll view from becoming the responder.
Doing something adds an event to done and clears undo.
Doing the normalization here.
Don't "declare class exports" directly, otherwise in error messages our show up as "exports" instead of "Map" or "MapPolyfill".
Don't "declare class exports" directly, otherwise in error messages our show up as "exports" instead of "Set" or "SetPolyfill".
Don't accept line comments that are separated
Don't add to the buffer if we've decoded to an empty string chunk and we're not in object mode
Don't aggregate the key column.
Don't append a newline to the last line.
Don't attempt to store insecure connections.
Don't be shy with it.
Don't bother checking the file - this can be very expensive.
Don't bother instantiating parent iterator if taking 0.
Don't bother keeping 'clean' files in the cache.
Don't bring in undefined values
Don't cache debugger module
Don't calculate the next value unless somebody's listening.
Don't call this directly from outside this package.
Don't change the UI after 'edit' events.
Don't check for mime-types in 304-resources.
Don't connect empty markers unless clearWhenEmpty is false
Don't create a real PathSearchUpdater that relies on watchman.
Don't delete the watcher if there are other users for it.
Don't do another update for this path if we are in the middle of running an update.
Don't do anything here.
Don't do anything if add isn't an object
Don't even try it unless root.
Don't exceed max to render
Don't fetch if array is null or empty, but still track the fragment
Don't fetch if connection is null, but continue to track the fragment if appropriate.
Don't fetch suggestions if the mouse is still in the same 'word', where 'word' is a whitespace-delimited group of characters.
Don't fire the event while the user is dragging.
Don't forget to everything listed here to `package.json` modulePathIgnorePatterns.
Don't get confused, there are 3 "internal" streams for each keyval pair so it basically checks if there is any value added to the form
Don't ignore main files
Don't import built ins.
Don't include empty buffers.
Don't include the default connection profile.
Don't know yet what type to create, so we wrap in a proxy.
Don't leave long text in the textarea, since it makes further polling slow
Don't log errors if the command returns a nonzero exit code, because status returns nonzero if it is reporting any issues, even when it succeeds.
Don't need the extra array object.
Don't override when accessed via prototype.
Don't overwrite existing Cookie header
Don't pass a reference to `runTests` directly because the callback receives a mouse event as its argument.
Don't pass the 100 chars limit
Don't prevent the normal copy if the user has a selection.
Don't re-render if the props haven't changed.
Don't reduce numRendered when scrolling back up
Don't render more than 1 additional row
Don't render past the end
Don't render past the top
Don't rethrow so that we can run every other timer.
Don't save object properties source code that is longer than this
Don't send premature or duplicate updates
Don't serialize the marker when the buffer is serialized.
Don't show a testing option if there are no test runners.
Don't start the filewatcher or the cache.
Don't store user's password.
Don't toggle provider2 -- so it starts open.
Don't track `__type__` fields
Don't transform node_modules, except react-tools which includes the untransformed copy of React
Don't trust a default "yes" answer for a non-core module in a snapshot build
Don't trust location.hash not to have been unencoded by the browser
Don't try to fetch information for this path if it's not in the repo.
Don't update yet for smooth transition.
Don't use 'blue' not visible on cmd.exe
Don't use `actions.expandNode` because it causes a re-render, which queues a real fetch and might populate the children of `dir1`.
Don't use e.target.value to avoid conversion of the value to string.
Don't warn for native components.
Done in one shot to minimize update/measure roundtrips.
Done with all the node children
Double clicking a non-directory will keep the created tab open.
Double-check the result.
Download tarball
Download the file
Draw a contour for the total frame time.
Draw contents size.
Draw frame perforation.
Draw horizontal ruler.
Draw lines one pixel above they need to be, so 60pfs line does not cross most of the frames tops.
Draw vertical ruler.
Draws a cursor for the given range
Draws canvas of the specified css size in DevTools page space.
Draws the given range as a highlighted selection
Drop the event parameter when invoking userCallback.
Duck typing Error.
Due to a bug in the Gutter API, destroying a Gutter after the editor has been destroyed results in an exception.
Due to a previous bug in the sshPort type, we may need to do this cast to correct bad state that was persisted in users' configs.
Due to this, it is left to the user to implement at this time.
Dummy container used to detect which wraps are necessary.
Dummy container used to render all markup.
Duplicate selection so we can move range without breaking user selection.
During componentWillMount and render this will still be null but after that will always render to something.
During execution of guarded functions we will capture the first error which we will rethrow to be handled by the top level error handler.
During execution the body wrapper will be passed the correct values whereas during the annotator the arguments don't exist yet.
During the server rendering we don't want to schedule any updates.
E.g.: node tool.js arg1 arg2 -v '-v' is after some args here.
E2e test that verifies that init app can be installed, compiled, started and Hot Module reloading and Chrome debugging work.
ECMA-262 11.2 White Space
ECMA-262 11.3 Line Terminators
ECMA-262 11.3.1, 11.3.2
ECMA-262 11.4 Comments
ECMA-262 11.4.4, 11.4.5
ECMA-262 11.6 Identifier Names and Identifiers
ECMA-262 11.6.2.1 Keywords
ECMA-262 11.6.2.2 Future Reserved Words
ECMA-262 11.7 Punctuators
ECMA-262 11.8.3 Numeric Literals
ECMA-262 11.8.4 String Literals
ECMA-262 11.8.5 Regular Expression Literals
ECMA-262 11.8.6 Template Literal Lexical Components
ECMA-262 12.1.1
ECMA-262 12.12 Labelled Statements
ECMA-262 12.13 Conditional Operator
ECMA-262 12.14 Assignment Operators
ECMA-262 12.14.1
ECMA-262 12.15 Comma Operator
ECMA-262 12.2 Primary Expressions
ECMA-262 12.2.1
ECMA-262 12.2.10 The Grouping Operator
ECMA-262 12.2.5 Array Initializer
ECMA-262 12.2.6 Object Initializer
ECMA-262 12.2.9 Template Literals
ECMA-262 12.3 Left-Hand-Side Expressions
ECMA-262 12.3.3 The new Operator
ECMA-262 12.3.4 Function Calls
ECMA-262 12.4 Expression Statement
ECMA-262 12.4 Postfix Expressions
ECMA-262 12.5 Unary Operators
ECMA-262 12.6 Multiplicative Operators ECMA-262 12.7 Additive Operators ECMA-262 12.8 Bitwise Shift Operators ECMA-262 12.9 Relational Operators ECMA-262 12.10 Equality Operators ECMA-262 12.11 Binary Bitwise Operators ECMA-262 12.12 Binary Logical Operators
ECMA-262 13.10 The return statement
ECMA-262 13.11 The with statement
ECMA-262 13.12 The switch statement
ECMA-262 13.14 The throw statement
ECMA-262 13.15 The try statement
ECMA-262 13.16 The debugger statement
ECMA-262 13.2 Block
ECMA-262 13.3.1 Let and Const Declarations
ECMA-262 13.3.2 Variable Statement
ECMA-262 13.3.3 Destructuring Binding Patterns
ECMA-262 13.4 Empty Statement
ECMA-262 13.6 If statement
ECMA-262 13.7 Iteration Statements
ECMA-262 13.8 The continue statement
ECMA-262 13.9 The break statement
ECMA-262 14.1 Function Definition
ECMA-262 14.2 Arrow Function Definitions
ECMA-262 14.4 Yield expression
ECMA-262 14.5 Class Definitions
ECMA-262 15.1 Scripts
ECMA-262 15.2 Modules
ECMA-262 15.2.2 Imports
ECMA-262 15.2.3 Exports
ECMA-262 7.8.5
ECMAScript 5.1/Unicode v6.3.0 NonAsciiIdentifierPart:
ECMAScript 6/Unicode v7.0.0 NonAsciiIdentifierPart:
ECMAScript 6/Unicode v7.0.0 NonAsciiIdentifierStart:
ECParameters
ECParameters sequence
ED25519 is not supported by OpenSSL, use a javascript impl.
EDITOR CONSTRUCTOR A CodeMirror instance represents an editor.
EDITOR METHODS The publicly visible API.
END of automatically generated file
ENOSYS means that the fs doesn't support the op.
ENOTDIR isn't used on Windows, but npm expects it.
ES5: lock down object properties
ESTree/Acorn/ESpree use .local for all three node types.
EVENT HANDLERS Attach the necessary event handlers when initializing the editor
EVENT HANDLING Lightweight event framework.
EVENT UTILITIES Due to the fact that we still support jurassic IE versions, some compatibility wrappers are needed.
Each Hit object has a reference to its Yallist.Node.
Each TypedArray type requires a distinct constructor instance with identical logic, which this produces.
Each async task pushes it's own queue onto the queue stack.
Each button can optionally specify a style, which is one of 'default', 'cancel' or 'destructive'.
Each child view of the `ViewPagerAndroid` will be treated as a separate page and will be stretched to fill the `ViewPagerAndroid`.
Each error or warning can consist of any number of different messages from Flow to help explain the problem and point to different locations that may be of interest.
Each file in the update is expected to contain fields for `name`, `new`, and `exists`.
Each iframe is represented by two distinct objects in the DOM:  an iframe object and a window object.
Each instance provides an isolated environment with: - Methods for fetching and updating data.
Each key represents a tag.
Each line is added as separate string.
Each mapping to the supplied source file is rewritten using the supplied source map.
Each message consists of several different components, each with its own text and path.
Each method returns a `Promise` object.
Each mutation corresponds to a field on the server which is used by clients to communicate the type of mutation to be executed.
Each node should have a key that uniquely identifies it among the LazyTreeNodes that make up the tree.
Each object has a `type` property that is in `ReactMultiChildUpdateTypes`.
Each object in the arrays is of the form:
Each pair is a key/value pair that will be used to instantiate the map.
Each path is presumed to be in the repo.
Each plugin that is injected into `EventsPluginHub` is immediately operable.
Each request is sent with a unique ID that the server should send back to signal that the message has been written to the appropriate stream.
Each run of four backslashes ends up as just one backslash.
Each test then writes their own ignore file rules for their purposes, and is responsible for removing them afterwards.
Each time this watchman update fires, we will make the LocalHgService ignore events for a certain grace period.
Each value under the "sections" field has two fields: - offset: The offset into the original specified at which this section begins to apply, defined as an object with a "line" and "column" field.
Easier to completely branch on self closing to handle slightly different styles involved with scope breaks.
Eating the stack.
Echo a NuclideUri.
Echo a RemotableObject.
Echo value types.
Echos the value of a value.
Edges must be added in reverse order since the segment must be continuous at all times.
Editor Options
Editors are often open before providers load, so update existing ones too.
Either adds or removes the computed parent directories depending on the operation passed in.
Either callFrameId or functionObjectId must be specified.
Either fix it or disallow doing so completely in favor of getInitialState.
Either identical, or both NaN
Either way, return on the first hit.
Element has no renderer.
Element that was hidden earlier, but hasn't been removed yet.
Elements are added to these to represent selection and cursors.
Elements panel
Eligibility is determined online, based on registered EvaluationExpression providers.
Eliminates unnessary unique query ids in RelayQueryPath
Else it's a file
Else return the default blank, "".
Emit a pane change event first, so that clients can do something while waiting for a provider to give a result.
Emit change events only after the cache has been fully updated.
Emit core modules array.
Emits a destroy event that's used to unmount the attached React component and invalidate the cached view instance of the Diff View.
Emits an event of the given type with the given data, and holds that event in order to be able to dispatch it to a later subscriber when they say they want to handle held events.
Emits an event of the given type with the given data.
Emits file change events for the underlying flags file.
Emits rule to generate version info for a SAPI or extension.
Emits the held events of the specified type to the given listener.
EmitterSubscription represents a subscription with listener and context data.
Empirically the minimum width needed to fit 'nuclide-file-tree' buttons without causing overflow.
Empirically, doing an initial search speeds up the next search much more than simply doing the setup kicked off by 'fileSearchForDirectory'.
Empty out this.bindings, just in cases.
Empty result means to re-use existing resolution
Empty set actually contains everything
Empty string is a valid value, null means error.
Emptying firstChildren/findComponentRootReusableArray is not necessary for correctness, but it helps the GC reclaim any nodes that were left at the end of the search.
Emulate "data" attribute from DOM 3 TextInput event.
Enable Verbose build
Enable debugging in the process.
Enable deletion.
Enable experiments for testing.
Enable faster hint.
Enable namespaces listed in `localStorage.debug` initially.
Enable namespaces listed in `process.env.DEBUG` initially.
Enable reportErrorsAsExceptions
Enable shallow clones for GitHub repos
Enable text copy from the symbol reference view
Enable the scene and set the spring to catch up with the new gesture
Enables a debug mode by namespaces.
Enables the tests to await loading children.
Enabling and disabling packages
Encapsulates all of the state information we need about a specific Flow root
Encode an integer in the range of 0 to 63 to a single base 64 digit.
Encode folder structure in file name
Encodes an array of unsigned 8-bit integers to a hex string.
Encodes an array of unsigned 8-bit integers using base32 encoding.
Encodes the internal representation of a key into a hexadecimal representation.
Encodes the internal representation of a key to a base32 representation.
Encodes the internal representation of a key to a canonical hex representation.
Encodes the structure of messages that can be sent from the client to the server.
Encodes the structure of messages that can be sent from the server to the client.
Encountered an unsupported format character, treat as a string.
Encountered nothing but spaces.
Encrypts the clientKey of a ConnectionConfig.
End immediately.
End of options marker.
End of range is exclusive, so subtract 1 from the end offset.
End of the third-party code
End the socket client to watchman to trigger restore subscriptions.
Ends dragging the pane sizer.
Enforce immutability.
Enough space for minimum.
Enough space for preferred.
Enough space to store all bytes of a single character.
Enqueue a callback that will be executed after all the pending updates have processed.
Enqueue a callback to be run at the end of the current batching cycle.
Enqueue the base names of this type.
Enqueues a callback to be invoked when `notifyAll` is invoked.
Enqueues a synthetic event that should be dispatched when `processEventQueue` is invoked.
Enqueues markup to be rendered and inserted at a supplied index.
Enqueues moving an existing element to another index.
Enqueues removing an element at an index.
Enqueues setting the markup of a node.
Enqueues setting the text content.
Ensure 3rd-party packages are not installed via the 'atom-package-deps' package when the 'nuclide' package is activated.
Ensure DOM element for console message.
Ensure IDs are generated in the order that queries are created
Ensure `b` is at least as long as `a`, swapping if necessary.
Ensure a given position is not inside an atomic range.
Ensure a valid alternate
Ensure absolute path
Ensure alternates match
Ensure ancestors of this element don't attempt to run tests as well.
Ensure at least a single node is present, for measuring.
Ensure at least one space between the label and the id
Ensure callback is only called once
Ensure consistency between cache and reality.
Ensure dir is created
Ensure dirs are readable
Ensure element is created.
Ensure exactly only one "/"
Ensure fallback to Date.now in tests.
Ensure files are readable
Ensure flushing is not bound to any domain.
Ensure logging is configured.
Ensure mock was called
Ensure newlines are properly escaped.
Ensure no duplicates
Ensure no extra fields are accidentally marshalled.
Ensure no lingering debounced renders are waiting and will muck with the state of the package between test runs.
Ensure no setters are called for the indexes
Ensure no setters are called for the indexes Ensure no setters are called for the indexes
Ensure no tmp dir is left on disk.
Ensure nodes with children are expanded so their subtrees render.
Ensure other process didn't start copying files before lock was created
Ensure package is created
Ensure package meta version is the same as the resolution
Ensure positioning of the Datatip at the end of the current line.
Ensure previous input has been read, so that the handler sees a consistent view of the document
Ensure that a `__typename` field is generated
Ensure that a gadget of the specified gadgetId is visible, creating one if necessary.
Ensure that both the template and remotes directories have the correct permissions.
Ensure that every element either is passed in a static location, in an array with an explicit keys property defined, or in an object literal with valid key property.
Ensure that everything is cleaned, even invalid packages in the cache
Ensure that the argument is an array by wrapping it in an array if it is not.
Ensure that the return value is a promise.
Ensure that the return value is an observable.
Ensure that we end up with a round value
Ensure that we have exactly `nextLength` resolvers.
Ensure that, if the cursor was in the whitespace at the start of the line, it is moved to the end of that space.
Ensure the condition is true, otherwise throw an error.
Ensure the editor is re-focused
Ensure the editor is valid and there is a view to attach the keypress timing to.
Ensure the file tree is visible before trying to reveal a file in it.
Ensure the immutability of the node.
Ensure the integrity of the ActivationState created from state.
Ensure the lineView.wrapping.heights array is populated.
Ensure the response listener is set up before the request is sent.
Ensure the result length is the same as the original hex value.
Ensure the side bar is hidden to start
Ensure there's a token end at the current position, and that i points at it
Ensure trailing for all protocols
Ensure we are in an operation.
Ensure we are not trying to load data from an earlier version of this package.
Ensure we pop a, c, b
Ensure we've removed from the connection's map before awaiting.
Ensure you pass in a constant to reduce memory allocations.
Ensures essential globals are available and are patched correctly.
Ensures that a file is a symlink that points to a valid file
Ensures that the representation invariants hold.
Ensures the result is actually a Promise.
Enter distraction-free mode
Enter function body.
Enter is however both printable and non-printable.
Entity body for PATCH, POST and PUT requests.
Entries are ordered by start time within a level, so find the last visible entry.
Entry for enabling/disabling the feature
Entry iterators provide implicit keys.
Entry point into reprint.
Enumerates all the possible types of update configurations.
Equality is symmetrical, so the same result should be returned if this and the argument are flipped.
Equivalent of `typeof` but with special handling for array and regexp.
Equivalent to Promise.all, but avoids wrappers if nothing is actually a promise.
Equivalent to push, but avoids a function call.
Erases line2.
Erases line3 and line1.
Error 'unexpected predicate "symbol"'
Error - bail out early.
Error and End are not dbgp status codes, they relate to socket states.
Error is OK.
Error messages should be identical to V8.
Error occurred reading the link
Error out if some of the specified names are not installed
Error out if the json file does not exist, unless force create is true
ErrorUtils is originally defined in a file named error-guard.js.
Errors from V8 are actually just messages, so we need to fill them out a bit.
Escape a component key so that it is safe to use in a reactid.
Escape any double quote in the expression.
Escape attribute value for use in HTTP header
Escape characters that have special regex meanings.
Escape quotes and slash
Escape string for Regex construction
Escapes attribute value to prevent scripting attacks.
Escapes non-RegExp-safe characters such as slashes in the query string.
Escapes text to prevent scripting attacks.
Esprima block comment.
Esprima deviation.
Esprima doesn't bother with this field, presumably because it's always true for unary operators.
Esprima line comment.
Esprima strips out the starting and ending tokens, so add them back
Esprima used to use the .name field to refer to the local binding identifier for ImportSpecifier nodes, but .id for ImportNamespaceSpecifier and ImportDefaultSpecifier nodes.
Essential Classes
Estimate quotient digit
European and Arabic numbers act as if they were R in terms of their influence on neutrals.
Eval scripts as fast as possible.
Evaluate the expression in the debugger's current context.
Evaluates the code in the console as if user typed it manually and invokes the callback when the result message is received and added to the console.
Even executed within an environment setup with vcvars32.bat, clang-cl doesn't recognize the arch toolset.
Even if the "Show Differential Revision" preference is enabled, only show the column if there is at least one row with a Differential revision.
Even if the currently active pane is not an ordinary editor, we still at least want to show the tree.
Even if we can't get flags, try to watch the build file in case they get added.
Even if we find the node we're looking for, we finish looping through its siblings to ensure they're cached so that we don't have to revisit this node again.
Even if we were, there is another bug in Internet Explorer 10.
Even though any user could have easily listened to keyboard events themselves, using these `props` callbacks ensures that ordering of events is consistent - and not dependent on the order that the keyboard events are subscribed to.
Even though the tests use the mocked clock, it still seems to occasionally flake out.
Even though this is just a placeholder for a gadget, there's a chance it'll need to be serialized before we replace it.
Even though we're ignoring the cache, we will still invoke the callback immediately with `ready: true` if `querySet` can be resolved by the cache.
Event Subscription
Event Subscription Reading Style Elements
Event listeners need to be added _after_ we attach to the document, so that owner document is properly update.
Event listeners registered for this phase are called at this time.
Event listeners registered for this phase are triggered during this process.
Event object passed to the `onopen`, `onclose`, `onmessage`, `onerror` callbacks of `WebSocket`.
Event phase constants.
Event queue being processed in the same cycle allows `preventDefault`.
Event target isn't necessarily an HTMLElement, but that's guaranteed in the usages here.
Event that fires when another annotation or the mapview itself was tapped and a previously shown annotation will be closed.
Event that fires when the annotation drag state changes.
Event that fires when the annotation gets was tapped by the user and the callout view was displayed.
EventSubscription represents a subscription to a particular event.
EventSubscriptionVendor stores a set of EventSubscriptions that are subscribed to a particular event type.
EventTarget automatically initializes these to `null`.
EventValidator is designed to validate event types to make it easier to catch common mistakes.
Events and their corresponding property names.
Events are not possible without cancelling IME.
Eventually this will happen on the hack side, but for now, this will do.
Every PathVisitor has a different this.Context constructor and this.Context.prototype object, but those prototypes can all use the same reset, invokeVisitorMethod, and traverse function objects.
Every buildable type will have its "type" field filled in automatically.
Every commit that breaks the backward compatibility shall bump the version in package.json.
Every evaluation we perform with xdebug's eval command is saved in a unique variable for later lookup.
Every matching commmand should have a corresponding entry somewhere.
Every parent which is not a split view, must be of the same size as this view.
Every record stored in a file has an iteration column at the start for aggregation purposes.
Every time a StatusBar component is mounted, we push it's prop to a stack and always update the native status bar with the props from the top of then stack.
Every time we get a new subscriber, we need to push results to them.
Every written chunk gets output as-is.
Everything can be diffed out
Everything can be diffed out, connection is null.
Everything can be diffed out, linked field is null.
Everything can be diffed out, plural field is empty.
Everything can be diffed out, plural field is null
Everything else in the universe uses 'utf8', though.
Everything else is currently unsupported, most notably precision, unsigned numbers, non-decimal numbers, and characters.
Everything is a marker...
Everything's fine as long as it does not contain any error description.
Ex: on OS X, this will let you see rich output in the Safari Web Inspector console.
Example case: With a story unliked, quickly like and unlike it.
Example of using the `TouchableMixin` to play well with other responder locking views including `ScrollView`.
Example usage:  // Successful fetch.
Example use cases: - In-flight queries may have been diffed against cached records that are unreferenced and eligible for GC.
Example: A browser system caches DOM nodes based on component ID and must remove that cache entry when this instance is unmounted.
Example: see multiGet for example
Except as noted, this content is licensed under Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 Listen to the load event for the document.
Except for the parent and the sibling links no properties are to be updated after the creation.
Except loglevel.
ExceptionsManager transitively requires Promise so we install it after
Exclude blacklisted senders.
Exclude dicts that don't have any message property.
Exclude leading and trailing slash.
Exclude the BASE revision.
Execute Flow with the given arguments
Execute a sub-command executable.
Execute all promises.
Execute only once.
Execute the command
Execute the module function
Execute the provided code using the current executor.
Execute the task, which should not return anything.
Executed within the scope of the `Transaction` instance.
Executes a shell command, buffering the stdout and stderr If an error occurs, a meaningful error is generated Returns a promise that gets fulfilled if the command succeeds or rejected if it fails
Executes hh_client with proper arguments returning the result string or json object.
Executes the commands needed to get a list of devices from ADB
Executes the function within a safety window.
Executes the next task in the queue.
Executes the provided `callback` once for each enumerable own property in the object and constructs a new object from the results.
Executes visitor on the object and its children, but only traverses into children which can be statically analyzed and don't depend on runtime information.
Execution of a "direct" dispatch - there must be at most one dispatch accumulated on the event or it is considered an error.
Existing properties are preserved as `originalPropertyName`.
Exit early for strings to avoid a performance hit in some environments.
Exited in distraction-free mode -- it had hidden both providers
Exiting the domain would prevent the domain from catching the error.
Exits here.
Expand all ancestors.
Expand all new non-content layers to expose content layers better.
Expand and collapse.
Expand path to include general dirs
Expand start/end lines with context.
Expand the Program node's .loc to include all comments, since typically its .loc.start and .loc.end will coincide with those of the first and last statements, respectively, excluding any comments that fall outside that region.
Expand until at least a certain number of matches is expanded.
Expands all selected directory nodes.
Expect IME keyCode on each keydown.
Expect a token of a given type.
Expect all spies except spy_fileB to have been called.
Expect arc lint to be called once
Expect arc lint to be called twice.
Expect spy_fileA and spy_allMessages to have been called from the invalidation message.
Expect spy_project and spy_allMessages to have been called from the invalidation message.
Expect that getProxy added files to the cache.
Expect the getter methods on DiagnosticStore to return correct data.
Expect the getter methods on DiagnosticStore to return correct info.
Expect the getter methods on DiagnosticStore to return the correct info.
Expect the next token to match the specified keyword.
Expect the next token to match the specified punctuator.
Explain why the delete button is disabled if the current selection, or lack thereof, is undeletable.
Explicit config always wins
Explicit key
Explicit to preserve empty strings
Explicitly copying object properties appeases Flow's "maybe" type handling.
Exploits the ID naming scheme to perform the search quickly.
Exponential reconnect time trials.
Export React, plus some native additions.
Export `opener` for programmatic access.
Export a semver like object but with our custom functions
Export as...
Export caches for testing.
Export constants
Export declarations are responsible for printing any decorators that logically apply to node.declaration.
Export if used as a module
Export private functions for unit-testing.
Export public API
Export the contents of the package.json.
Export the parseFoo parsers because they might be useful as primitives for custom option types.
Export these buil-in interaction modules.
Exported "config" object
Exported because nested modes need to do this for their inner modes.
Exported for testing
Exported for testing only.
Exported for testing.
Exports for the API.
Exports some data, e.g. for perf investigations or analytics.
Expose Block Rules
Expose Inline Rules
Expose `Command`.
Expose `Delegator`.
Expose `Option`.
Expose a GraphQL endpoint
Expose an observable rather than the raw subject.
Expose some functions to the outside through this name space.
Expose the Barrett function
Expose the default network layer to allow convenient re-configuration.
Expose the fake timer utils to global to be used by npm spec tests.
Expose the partially-built object to the default function as its `this` object.
Expose the root command.
Expose the type on the factory and the prototype so that it can be easily accessed on elements.
Exposed for debugging purposes
Exposed for instanceof checks.
Exposed for profiling reasons.
Exposed for testing
Exposed for testing.
Exposed for unit testing.
Extend the 'normal' keywords with the TypeScript language extensions
Extend the base object
Extend the primary selection range, discard the rest.
Extended Classes
Extended JavaScript BN functions, required for RSA private ops.
Extending unicode characters.
Extension: Allows a provider to include a display name that will be shown with its messages.
Extension: Intended for developers who want to provide both interfaces to cater towards people who use only the `linter` package.
Extension: Overrides `grammarScopes` and triggers the linter on changes to any file, rather than just files with specific grammar scopes.
Extensions API
External users might find this function useful, but it is not necessary for the typical use of this module.
Externalize the source map.
Extra Bash code content to add to the end of the "spec".
Extra assertion because `toEqual` matcher skips over properties with undefined values...
Extra options to show the user.
Extract a SyntheticInputEvent for `beforeInput`, based on either native `textInput` or fallback behavior.
Extract archive
Extract bewit
Extract data from Apple's `aps` dict as defined: https://developer.apple.com/library/ios/documentation/NetworkingInternet/Conceptual/RemoteNotificationsPG/Chapters/ApplePushService.html
Extract file
Extract markdown metadata header
Extract the expression from the row text.
Extract the filename, line number, and line text from grep output.
Extract the id of the node with the connection that we are adding to.
Extract the id of the node with the connection that we are deleting from.
Extract the matching piece of the normalized path to compare with the root path.
Extract to a temporary directory in case of file name clashes
Extracts description from contents of a readme file in markdown format
Extracts just the shared parts from an ObjectId.
Extracts the `nodeName` from a string of markup.
Extracts the `nodeName` of the first element in a string of markup.
Extracts the new edge from the payload
Extrapolate
FB-only: override the symbols-view "Go To Declaration" context menu item with the Hyperclick "confirm-cursor" command.
FBIDE indexes each filepath by important characters it contains.
FEATURE DETECTION Detect drag-and-drop
FF does not set `charCode` for the Enter-key, check against `keyCode`.
FIFO queue that executes Promise executors one at a time, in order.
FIXME Hack to have stream not keep the event loop alive.
FIXME Should probably have an option in net.Socket to create a stream from an existing fd which is writable only.
FIXME recursively check contents
FIXME: Add a createCallback which is different from editCallback and has different behavior when creating a new node.
FIXME: Add title once it is used by search controller.
FIXME: Consider returning null for loaded traces.
FIXME: Decide the color.
FIXME: Delete Button semantics are not yet defined.
FIXME: For Chrome, put creationTime and updateTime somewhere.
FIXME: Implement this.
FIXME: Improve the Tree Element / Outline Abstraction to prevent crawling the DOM For an expanded element, it will be the last element with class "close" in the child element list.
FIXME: Investigate if we can remove StyleInvalidator invalidations entirely.
FIXME: It will be moved to separate ExecutionContext.
FIXME: Make sure windows does what we want here
FIXME: Move this to TimelineUIUtils.js.
FIXME: Needs better tooltip.
FIXME: Only pass runtime wrappers here.
FIXME: Remove once ES6 is supported natively by JS compiler.
FIXME: Some fields are not yet supported due to back-end limitations.
FIXME: Status bar items don't work well enough yet, so they are being hidden.
FIXME: Technically at least one of these is required.
FIXME: TextInput doesn't honor `fontWeight` or `fontStyle` https://github.com/facebook/react-native/issues/2140
FIXME: This dependency should be removed from here once we do not need URL to create a UISourceCode.
FIXME: This file has a strange header because it needs to be ignored by the transpiler, but work with 'import type'".
FIXME: This file is included into both apps, since the devtools_app needs the InspectorFrontendHostAPI only, so the host instance should not initialized there.
FIXME: This is a stopgap.
FIXME: This is a workaround for the selection machinery bug.
FIXME: This is a workaround to force Closure compiler provide the standard ES6 runtime for all modules.
FIXME: This is bad and I should feel bad.
FIXME: This is duplicated in inflate-shrinkwrap and should be factoed into a shared function
FIXME: This is needed by CodeSchool extension.
FIXME: This performance optimization should be moved to blink so that all developers could enjoy it.
FIXME: This should be removed once transpilation is not required for closure compiler ES6
FIXME: This should use fileSystemMapping to determine url.
FIXME: Transition timing updates currently not supported
FIXME: Unnecessary as long as we have to have the tarball to resolve all deps, which is progressively seeming to be likely for the indefinite future.
FIXME: We wrap actions like three ways to sunday here.
FIXME: We'd like to stop profiling on the target and retrieve a profile but it's too late.
FIXME: WebSocket MUST have initiator info.
FIXME: adapt this to multiple targets.
FIXME: add support for negative start delay
FIXME: add support for step functions
FIXME: allow to choose snapshot if there are several options.
FIXME: also add steps once we support event nesting in the FlameChart.
FIXME: avoid updates of a collapsed pane.
FIXME: bring back Animation events as we figure out a way to show them while not cluttering the UI.
FIXME: cache the shrinkwrap directly
FIXME: call reject for null strings.
FIXME: change field naming style to use trailing underscore.
FIXME: correctly specify target
FIXME: crbug.com/425984
FIXME: crbug.com/447523, use selection.isCollapsed when it is fixed for shadow dom.
FIXME: declare this property in protocol and in JavaScript.
FIXME: do it in the caller.
FIXME: find a way of generating this mapping or getting it from combination of LayoutStyleConstants and CSSSelector.cpp at runtime.
FIXME: handle resourceState also
FIXME: https://github.com/facebook/react-native/issues/1501
FIXME: ideally, we shouldn't do this, but this makes the logic of converting async console events to sync ones much simpler.
FIXME: it is possible to optimize this loop out.
FIXME: make utility method in Dialog, so clients use it instead of this getter.
FIXME: move this check to the backend.
FIXME: move to the SourceFrame.
FIXME: need tighter checking on this, but is a breaking change
FIXME: phantomChildren doesn't actually belong in the package.json
FIXME: promise chain below does not compile with JSON.parse.
FIXME: remove everything below.
FIXME: remove resourceTreeModel and others from worker targets
FIXME: replace this instance by a normal WebInspector.StylePropertiesSection.
FIXME: reverse SplitView.isVertical meaning.
FIXME: shrink default list once external list is good enough.
FIXME: sort this out, it should not happen.
FIXME: support debugData.stack_update_needs_step_in flag by calling WebInspector.debugger_model.callStackModified
FIXME: there should be a way to fetch UISourceCode for its uri.
FIXME: there should be no "progress events"
FIXME: there shouldn't be such a case.
FIXME: there used to be registry completion here, but it stopped making sense somewhere around 50,000 packages on the registry
FIXME: this could use findTreeElement to reuse a tree element if it already exists
FIXME: this does not handle trailing comments.
FIXME: this should be replaced with common Save/Discard/Cancel dialog.
FIXME: totalCount gets updated optimistically, but this edge does not get added until the server responds
FIXME: uncomment following once inspector stops being drop targer in major ports.
FIXME: use WebInspector.Linkifier
FIXME: use context menu provider
FIXME: we don't allow editing of longhand properties under a shorthand right now.
FIXME: when we replace read-package-json with something less magic, this should done elsewhere.
FOCUS/BLUR EVENTS
FOR_BACKEND is used by the eval'd code
FROMTEXTAREA
Facebook reserves all rights not expressly granted to you in this license agreement.
Facebook reserves all rights not expressly granted.
Facebook, Inc.
Facilitate reuse when creating custom network layers.
Factory function to create a suitable BigInteger.
Fade back in.
Fail all pending requests.
Fail gracefully if it does not work.
Failed in one of the catch blocks above - most generic error.
Failed to generate response - return generic error.
Failing that, try finding the most recent version that matches our spec
Fake the run from loader bp
Fall back for XPath, etc.
Fall back to "prev" when the mode doesn't have an indentation method.
Fall back to Buck if it's not in the compilation DB.
Fall back to copying key by key.
Fall back to other methods after the timeout expires.
Fall back to the writable, configurable property.
Fall through
Fall through with adjusted payload.
Fall through.
Fall-through intended.
Fallback `Matcher` class compatible with the fuzzy-native implementation.
Fallback for IE 11 providing `toStringTag` values for maps, sets, and weakmaps.
Fallback is to only notice when we hit the arrow, and not declare the arguments as locals for the arrow body.
Fallback to comparing cache headers
Fallback to global require
Fallback to itself.
Fallback to regular semver max satisfies
Fallback to standard git clone if download failed
Fallback to standard git clone if extraction failed
Falls back to comparing ids when the spans cover exactly the same range.
Fast path for a common property of AST nodes.
Faster version of `mergeInto` that doesn't check its arguments and also copies over prototype inherited properties.
Faster version of `merge` that doesn't check its arguments and also merges prototype inherited properties.
Fat interface fields can have differing arguments.
Fat queries can be written like normal GraphQL queries with one main exception: fat queries use childless non-scalar fields to indicate that anything under that field may change.
Favor tags in the nearest directory by sorting by common prefix length.
Feature config is handled by the UP loader, not individual features
Feature-detect IE's crummy client rect reporting for bidi text
Feed 30 lines to editor
Feed the cache
Feed the in-memory cache
Feed up the cache
Feel free to add to or remove from this list of extension modules to configure the precise type hierarchy that you need.
Fetch Hawk credentials
Fetch any uncached statuses.
Fetch file previews and expand line ranges with context.
Fetch it from the repository Note that the promise is stored in the decomposed endpoint because it might be reused if a similar endpoint needs to be resolved
Fetch revisions history if revisions state have changed.
Fetch the parser token for a given character.
Fetch the revision details between the current head and the the common ancestor of head and master in the repository.
Fetches `key` and passes the result to `callback`, along with an `Error` if there is any.
Fetches a consistent object map from absolute file paths to their corresponding `StatusCodeNumber` for easy representation with the file tree.
Fetches data required to resolve a set of queries.
Fetches information for a declaration and all its parents.
Fetches more images from the camera roll.
Fetches the statuses for the given file paths, and updates the cache and sends out change events as appropriate.
Fetching and parsing of dependencies continues until all dependencies are fetched.
Fictitious mutation that does multiple things
Field names with no calls can be used as aliases without encoding
FieldID sequence
Fields can have children, or they can be leaf nodes.
Fields in all alternates must have same type.
Fields that only differ by connection call values should have the same identity.
Figure out if it's a module code.
Figure out if one of the last i bytes of our buffer announces an incomplete char.
Figure out least recently used queries, and pop them off of the `_queryLruQueue` Map.
Figure out the max length per column
Figure out what the state of things will be after we do a read from the buffer.
Figure out what we want to break.
Figures out the row and column coordinates of a raw position within a source string.
File Details
File Metadata
File Operations
File System API
File contents are too large and clutter up the logs, so exclude them.
File did not exist in the cache, and its status is modified.
File existed in the cache, and its status changed.
File messages from ProviderA should be gone, but no other changes.
File paths are used as event names for the _fileChangeEmitter, so a second emitter is used for other events to prevent event name collisions.
File watcher should be destroyed on dispose.
Filed as https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/7954.
Filed: https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/10506
Files are related if they have the same filename but different extension, or if the filename is appended with `Internal` or `-inl`.
Fill gap with whole-line-spans
Fill in a browser-detected starting value on browsers where we know one.
Fill in defaults
Fill in gap
Fill in the packages to be uninstalled
Fill the gap with whitespace characters.
Fill up the dominatedNodes array with indexes of dominated nodes.
Filled in during validation -- this is the flattened object type containing all of the relevant fields.
Filter already resolved
Filter being resolved
Filter empty values
Filter entries according to the specified packages
Filter non-semver ones
Filter only packages that need to be installed
Filter only the specified options because nopt parses every -- Also make them camel case
Filter only those that are valid links
Filter out any touch moves past the first one - we would have already processed multi-touch geometry during the first event.
Filter out clicks to other line number gutter elements, e.g. the folding chevron.
Filter out embedder injected content scripts.
Filter out files out of repo results, e.g. hh internal files.
Filter out non-js files.
Filter out non-matching items quickly.
Filter out non-semver ones
Filter out properties that are functions and are reserved.
Filter out properties that are not reserved.
Filter out property keys that aren't string literals, such as computed properties.
Filter out results from PHP files when the Hack service is available.
Filter out the completions that do not contain the prefix as a token in the match text case insentively.
Filter out the empty lines that are between NewLine markers.
Filter out the events to determine if they are relevant to you.
Filter out the util module, it's inspect function is special
Filter out those that have no dependants
Filter out whitespace chunks.
Filter platform-specific examples
Filter symlink files
Filter the non-requisite children from those siblings.
Filter the stack to our external API
Filter to see if a node is a valid first node.
Filters out unique endpoints, comparing by name and then source.
Filters the context object to only contain keys specified in `contextTypes`, and asserts that they are valid.
Final reduce to clean-up the stack.
Finally, consider the alphabetical order, but not higher than any other score.
Finally, sort by file name.
Finally, we map the events through the appropriate marshaller.
Find a line view that corresponds to the given line number.
Find a suitable version for each package name
Find a version that satisfies 3.
Find all of the gutter markers for the same row and combine them into one marker/popup.
Find all subfields that may overlap with the range rooted at `node`.
Find deepest node by coordinates.
Find definition  `kind` is one of 'ml' or 'mli'  Note: ocamlmerlin line numbers are 1-based.
Find if there's one with the exact same target
Find language
Find mappings for the "aSourceFile"
Find mappings for the "sourceFile"
Find one that is compatible
Find out if any of the individual longhand properties of the shorthand are used, if none are then the shorthand is overloaded too.
Find out whether a line ends or starts in a collapsed span.
Find the appropriate location, and return `null` if both fail unexpectedly.
Find the arg
Find the basename of the path by looking for the last non-empty segment
Find the common unique items in two arrays
Find the first element which doesn't have any previous
Find the focused crumb index.
Find the height above the given line.
Find the highest level in the tree that we can install this module in.
Find the highest resizable container that doesn't contain a text editor.
Find the innermost node of a given type that contains the given position.
Find the line at the given vertical position, using the height information in the document tree.
Find the line by pattern, in other cases.
Find the longest line in the document.
Find the mapping that best matches the hypothetical "needle" mapping that we are searching for in the given "haystack" of mappings.
Find the outermost matching node after a given position.
Find the outermost matching node before a given position.
Find the pane specified by the given string to which we can add an item.
Find the parent, if it exists.
Find the part of the input that is actually new
Find the part that overlaps with the start of this text
Find the position of the marker in the document.
Find the run that has the previous position in it.
Find the section containing the generated position we're trying to map to an original position.
Find the selected crumb and index.
Find the the most recent version less than or equal to latestVersion that satisfies our spec
Find the top change event in the history.
Find the view element corresponding to a given line.
Find unmet deps in parent directories, searching as node does up as far as the left-most node_modules folder.
FindReferencesReturn
Finding t from the equation
Finds a node with the supplied `targetID` inside of the supplied `ancestorNode`.
Finds all direct and indirect child fields of `node` with the given field name.
Finds an element rendered by React with the supplied ID.
Finds module.exports / exports.X statements inside an assignment expression.
Finds related files, to be used in `JumpToRelatedFile`.
Finds the container DOM element that contains React component to which the supplied DOM `id` belongs.
Finds the first item that matches the predicate in the workspace and its parent.
Finds the index of the first character that's not common between the two given strings.
Finds the line to start with when starting a parse.
Finds the most near ancestor starting at `currentFullPath` that has a file named `filename`
Finds the next node in the tree in the natural order - from top to to bottom as is displayed in the file-tree panel, minus the indentation.
Finds the node with the supplied React-generated DOM ID.
Finds the node with the supplied public React instance.
Finds the parent React component of `node`.
Finds the previous node in the tree in the natural order - from top to to bottom as is displayed in the file-tree panel, minus the indentation.
Finish an AST node, adding `type` and `end` properties.
Finish an operation, updating the display and signalling delayed events
Finish node at given position
Fire and forget.
Fire change events, and delayed event handlers
Fire events for markers that are hidden/unidden by editing or undoing
Fire the first view's toggle again
FireBug's array detection.
FireFox creates a keypress event for function keys too.
Firefox creates a click event on right mouse clicks.
Firefox doesn't support selectionchange, so check selection status after each key entry.
Firefox had gotten a few implementation details wrong across different versions so we guard against that.
Firefox needs to capture a different mouse scroll event.
Fires at most once per frame during scrolling.
Fires before onChange callbacks.
First Paint is actually a DrawFrame that happened after first CompositeLayers following last CommitLoadEvent.
First character of the reprinted node.
First check if devtools is not installed
First cut the query params.
First fill the boxes.
First item is empty due to its artificial NOPSEUDO nature in the enum.
First line has column headings.
First look for typehints in the docblock.
First make sure we have the build command in the PATH
First move into "page" coordinate system
First negate out previous match count by calling the search finished callback with a negative number of matches.
First see if we want to eat taps while the keyboard is up
First source control relative.
First time we get here we're checking to reestablish connection using cached credentials.
First try creating regex if user knows the / / hint.
First two are insecure and generally shouldn't be used any more, but they are still supported.
First view should be gone.
First view should be visible again.
First we need to exclude the opening ` from the .loc of the first quasi element, in case the parser accidentally decided to include it.
First we read the outer fragment, which populates the GraphQLStoreRangeUtils rangeData cache.
First, detect invalid regular expressions.
First, determine what the defined styles are for scenes in this navigator
First, extract the file name.
First, let's check if we're in an unusual parsing mode...
First, make sure we have the shasum, if we don't already.
First, no commit shall break the protocol in that client and server from the same master shall always work with each other.
First, search the line map for the text node corresponding to, or closest to, the target character.
First, the name and value of each parameter are encoded
Fit to window.
Fix https://github.com/facebook/nuclide/issues/292 When navigating Atom workspace with `CMD/CTRL` down, it triggers TextEditorElement's `mousemove` with invalid screen position.
Fix it by giving the node a postorder index anyway.
Fix the module path to use '/' on Windows.
Fix the sign.
Fix up .to properties of first
Flag indicating that query data changed since previous render.
Flag indicating whether empty section headers should be rendered.
Flag that indicates that lines might need to be redrawn
Flag the module as loaded
Flags to track whether we are in a function, a generator.
Flash the background of a dom node to a different color and then fade back to a base color.
Flatten array
Flatten the resulting array
Flatten uiComponentLists from list of lists of components to a list of components.
Flattens an array of style objects, into one aggregated style object.
Flattens children that are typically specified as `props.children`.
Flattens the nested structure returned by `splitDeferredRelayQueries`.
Flip backward selections, so we can set with a single range.
Flip if necessary
Float literals may be "imaginary"
Flow cannot understand the type refinement provided by the isTextEditor function, so we have to cast.
Flow complains that a spy is not callable.
Flow considers atom config items to be mixed.
Flow didn't like it when I tried import type here.
Flow doesn't like getters
Flow doesn't track non-null when assigning into nullable directly.
Flow naively thinks that since we are in a closure, fileToMessages could have been reassigned to something null by the time this executes.
Flow not yet tracking assignments to instance fields.
Flow rejects `undefined` here
Flow returns the empty string instead of null when there is no relevant path.
Flow sometimes reports a row of -1, so this ensures the line is at least one.
Flow treats Object and Array as disjoint types, currently.
Flow types.
Flow uses 1-based indexing, Atom uses 0-based.
Flush any dirty changes in a component.
Flush any pending layout events.
Flushes any pending requests using a single multiget
Flux style Store holding all data used by the debugger plugin.
Flux style action creator for actions that affect the debugger.
Flux style store holding all data related to debugger provider.
Focus the input again because the click will cause the input to blur.
Focused node has been explicitly set while reaching out for the last selected node.
Focusing on another node may detach "this" from tree.
Folding, for example, can cause multiple logical lines to appear on the same visual line.
Follows symlinks to figure out if the real paths of the root and check paths matches.
Fool around closure compiler -- it has its own notion of both KeyboardEvent constructor and initKeyboardEvent methods and overriding these in externs.js does not have effect.
Footer is always at the bottom of the list, and header at the top, on every render pass.
For Algolia search
For HTML, certain tags cannot have children.
For HTML, certain tags should omit their close tag.
For IE shims
For IE11 issue see: https://connect.microsoft.com/IE/feedbackdetail/view/1928508/ ie11-broken-getters-on-dom-objects https://github.com/medikoo/es6-symbol/issues/12
For IE8 and IE9.
For Node.js, simply re-export the core `util.deprecate` function.
For Testing.
For a deep node passed such as 'dir1/dir2/foo.txt' each of the intermediate nodes 'dir1', 'dir1/dir2', 'dir1/dir2' and 'dir1/dir2/foo.txt' entries will be present in the returned map
For a detailed explanation see https://github.com/facebook/flow/issues/908
For a given reconcile, look at which components did not actually render anything to the DOM and return a mapping of their ID to the amount of time it took to render the entire subtree.
For a given script file, find the root directory containing all application source files.
For a new property, when Backspace is pressed at the beginning of new property value, move back to the property name.
For a public type Foo, if internal fields are present, these are on a private FooImpl type, an instance of FooImpl is used in a closure by Foo consutrctor to re-bind publicly exported members to an instance of Foo.
For all escape codes
For all others, drop the lineNumber until we have a mapping above, since providing the lineNumber incorrectly can result in errors or confusing behavior.
For almost every interaction we care about, there will be both a top-level `mouseover` and `mouseout` event that occurs.
For atom UI notifications.
For autofix
For babel 5 compatibility
For backwards compatibility, also try with OLDTOKEN if that doesn't match.
For better performance only parse once, and then cache the result through a new accessor for repeated access.
For better promise errors
For big changes, we hide the enclosing element during the update, since that speeds up the operations on most browsers.
For brevity in specs.
For brevity.
For browsers that do not provide the `textInput` event, extract the appropriate string to use for SyntheticInputEvent.
For chaining.
For compatibility, we extract the first font-family, hoping we'll get a match.
For connections with range calls on them the "store" and "component" ID will be different because the component needs a special client-ID that encodes the range calls.
For correct constant-time operation, bit 255 should always be set to 1 so the following 'while' loop is never entered.
For custom pin images, any tintColor value is supported on all iOS versions.
For discoverability.
For each RevisionInfo, the `bookmarks` field will contain the list of bookmark names applied to that revision.
For each component that rendered, see if a component that triggered a DOM op is in its subtree.
For each connection a map from the Store's Breakpoint Id to the Promise of the Connection's Breakpoint Id.
For each event we're tracking, allow the gadget creator to specify their own custom event too.
For each line in the refs, extract only the heads Organize them in an object where keys are branches and values the commit hashes
For each line in the refs, match only the branches
For each line in the refs, match only the tags
For each section, we use settings-view to get a familiar look for table cells.
For each tag
For example if we were to mount a function at _/admin_, it would be invoked on _/admin_, and _/admin/settings_, however it would not be invoked for _/_, or _/posts_.
For example the arg "-abc" is equivalent to "-a -b -c".
For example the typechecks transform has a mode called static-only that does not add any extra code.
For example when editing a Working set all ancestors of a selected node must have either partial or a complete selection.
For example, 'nuclide-commons/lib/array.js'.
For example, Atom provides Workspace::onDidChangeActivePaneItem, but we may want to know not when the active pane item has changed, buth when it has stopped changing.
For example, a list component might add a source that provides the list of rows that are currently visible on screen.
For example, a more advanced emitter may use an EventHolder and EventFactory.
For example, charset doesn't make sense for binary types like image/png
For example, if the URL is "https://www.facebook.com", the system browser will be opened, or the "choose application" dialog will be shown.
For example, if there is a type incompatibility error, the first item in the message array blames the usage of the wrong type and the second blames the declaration of the type with which the usage disagrees.
For example, imagine a stream where every byte of input is interpreted as an integer from 0-255, and then results in that many bytes of output.
For example, lastAccessed may not be important to some stores and an equality comparison could exclude that field.
For example, null will be returned if src is not under the project root.
For example, the fat query for feedback_like contains the field `like_sentence` with no child fields.
For example, these files would all be related: `Foo.h`, `Foo.m`, `FooInternal.h`, `Foo-inl.h`  For now, we only search in the given path's directory for related files.
For example, this string should be '' if those are the same.
For example, this will return different keybindings on windows vs linux.
For example, you may want to think about your `Animated.Value` as going from 0 to 1, but animate the position from 150px to 0px and the opacity from 0 to 1.
For example: default parameter values.
For first title styles, make sure first title is centered
For function argument completions, strip out everything before the current parameter.
For functions that will be invoked using .call or .apply, we need to define those methods on the function objects themselves, rather than inheriting them from Function.prototype, so that a malicious or clumsy third party cannot interfere with the functionality of this module by redefining Function.prototype.call or .apply.
For future internal pipeline usage
For horizontal scroll views, a distance of 30 from the left of the screen is the standard maximum position to start touch responsiveness.
For inside-directory checking, we want to allow trailing slashes, so normalize.
For instance, `1 / 3` means that moving greater than 1 / 3 of the width of the view will navigate.
For instance, when setting an unrelated property, when an instance is created all of the derived fields are just copied over in the `options` instance even though they don't match the type definition of the options.
For key-specific errors, the Error object will have a key property to indicate which key caused the error.
For less well defined inputs use createArrayFromMixed.
For methods which are defined more than once, call the existing methods before calling the new property, merging if appropriate.
For more complex types, especially collections, implementing `valueOf` may not be performant.
For more details see http://crbug.com/413608
For more examples look at integration tests in the top-level `spec/` directory.
For most nodes, the generic "store" DataID can be used for both reading out of the store and writing into the result object that will be passed back to the component.
For most touch interactions, you'll simply want to wrap your component in `TouchableHighlight` or `TouchableOpacity`.
For most uses this works great, but in some cases this may cause flickering - one common cause is preventing edits by keeping value the same.
For mutations that have errors, maintains a two-directional index of the mutation and node with an error.
For node.js v012.0 and iojs-v1.5.1, host is an object.
For now only "input", "confirm" and "password" are supported
For now only horizontal scrolling is supported.
For now the second argument, 'text', is not used.
For now we will ignore these details.
For now, `RouteStack` internally,  uses an immutable `List` to keep track of routeNodes.
For now, actual hint text is required.
For now, if a user requests the flags for a path outside of a Buck project, such as /Applications/Xcode.app/Contents/Developer/Platforms/..., then return null.
For now, let's leave that to Buck.
For now, locations are pretty limited.
For now, only warn when we have a suggested correction.
For now, rename does not apply to root nodes.
For now, return a dummy resource tree so various initializations in client happens.
For now, this is safe and works.
For now, this is true - might change in the future.
For now, this method only reflects the status of "modified" directories.
For now, we centralize some logic about how particular service calls should be formatted for display in log messages and the Nuclide Service Monitor.
For now, we exclude it from the template to reduce noise in our unit tests.
For now, we just ignore this case for simplicity.
For now, we only expect HgRepository to work.
For other native event types, do nothing.
For output window messages.
For panels docked left or right, the length is the width.
For panels docked top or bottom, it's the height.
For quickly matching children type, to test if can be treated as content.
For regular text input the TextEditor.insertText method should be used.
For relative vertical movement.
For returning void, we track the time for the call to complete.
For safety, create a new copy of the array.
For server messages.
For simplicity, reapply `defaultValue` if `multiple` is toggled.
For snapshot builders, this option will attempt to enable everything and you can then build everything, ignoring fatal errors within a module by running "nmake snap"
For sniffing in tests.
For some reason typeof null is "object", so special case here.
For some reason, the path returned in tests from GitRepository.getWorkingDirectory is prepended with '/private', which makes the Directory::contains method inaccurate in `repositoryContainsPath`.
For static pages, no need to put React ID and checksum.
For style-based properties, generate shorthands with values when possible.
For style-based properties, try generating shorthands.
For supporting legacy API we put the FD here.
For testing
For testing ...
For testing on non-Mac machines.
For testing purpose.
For that we need to get rid of using ::before for disclosure triangle.
For the REPL.
For the base 64 variable length quantities we use in the source map spec, the first bit is the sign, the next four bits are the actual value, and the 6th bit is the continuation bit.
For the current active editor, and any update to the active editor, decide whether the toolbar should be displayed.
For the give platform and entry file, returns a promise with: - The full list of dependencies.
For the given source file, find the type of vcs that is managing it as well as the root directory for the VCS.
For the polyfillDeps
For the purposes of the benchmarker, a TSV file always has a column heading row at the top.
For the rather unlikely chance that the node is already gone from the DOM
For the record here:
For these node types we shouldn't break or add a semicolon.
For this property to be effective, it must be applied to a view that contains many subviews that extend outside its bound.
For tokens that include more information than their type, the value
For transient objects we create a "persistent" copy that contains the same properties.
For use in capture without re-checking null
For user visible output messages.
Forbid to run JavaScript and set unique origin.
Force EEXIST error from rmdir if the directory is non-empty
Force ENOTEMPTY error from rmdir if the directory is non-empty
Force Sources view to hide the editor.
Force a re-render to update _maxScrollableAreaHeight.
Force a redraw so the scrollbars are styled correctly based on the theme
Force a relayout, or Opera won't use our image for some obscure reason
Force an error
Force breakpoint update.
Force editing the 1st column when editing the creation node
Force failure if the error was not thrown.
Force layout even if sidebar size does not change.
Force layout.
Force legal removal
Force original file even if user hasn't changed comments since they may have nagivated away from it within the iframe without us knowing.
Force redraw
Force shared when called after phpize
Force subscription to fail to mimic network failure, etc.
Force the state of the cache.
Force the state of the hgStatusCache.
Force the view to cover a given range, adding empty view element or clipping off existing ones as needed.
Force to use cache even for local resources
Force trigger an update to the revisions to update the UI state with the new commit info.
Force update.
Force-latest
Forces an update.
Forces the potentially scrollable region to redraw so its scrollbars are drawn with styles from the active theme.
Forces the supplied set of queries to be fetched and written to the store.
Foreach bower.json found
Format code on save if settings say so
Format of the result: Children become fields.
Format selections should start at the begining of the line, and include the last selected line end.
Format the error before sending over the web socket.
Format the messages for Nuclide.
Formats an error response from GraphQL server request.
Formats the range specified, and returns the replacement result for that range.
Formula from: http://www.euclideanspace.com/maths/algebra/matrix/functions/inverse/fourD/index.htm
Forward on the actions that we don't handle here.
Forwards the arguments from this script to ./run-jasmine-tests and runs it under a timeout.
Found the `python` exceutable, and from now on we use it explicitly.
Found the element we are looking for.
Fraction of directional move required.
Fragment case, recurse keeping track of parent connection
Fragment fields cannot be spread directly into the root because they may not exist on the `Node` type.
Fragment pointers encapsulate the fetched data for a fragment reference.
Fragment should be plural if data is pluaral.
Fragment should be singular if data is singular.
Fragments can be skipped because these will always be composed into, and therefore tracked by, their nearest non-fragment parent.
Frame mode skews time, don't render aux overviews.
Free for GC.
Freeze it at its current state.
Freezing the object and adding the throw mechanism is expensive and will only be used in DEV.
From 0.4.1 onward, args in a range behavior key must be in alphabetical order.
From and to are in pre-change coordinates.
From here, the methods are part of the public interface.
From https://reviews.facebook.net/diffusion/HHVM/browse/master/hphp/hack/src/utils/exit_status.ml
From now on, variable terms are as if we're in "gtr" mode.
From: http://www.opensource.apple.com/source/WebCore/WebCore-514/platform/graphics/transforms/TransformationMatrix.cpp
From: https://code.google.com/p/webgl-mjs/source/browse/mjs.js
Front-end keeps a history of local modifications based on loaderId.
Frontend is not interested in interstitials.
FrontendClient encapsulates communication with front-end running in browser.
Full overlap
Fullwidth Forms
Fully replace the current line with the properly-indented line.
Function argument completions are a little special.
Function called when the drawer state has changed.
Function called when the page scrolling state has changed.
Function called whenever the navigation view has been closed.
Function called whenever the navigation view has been opened.
Function called whenever there is an interaction with the navigation view.
Function for properly handling a connection error
Function had no arguments.
Function is named so it can be disposed well.
Function is the supertype of FunctionExpression, FunctionDeclaration, ArrowExpression, etc.
Function keys
Function that is called when the "-" button on the list is clicked.
Function that returns a loading indicator.
Function that returns a view to show if there's an error.
Function to assert that the main property of the package meta of a canonical dir is set to the expected value
Function to call when 'cancel' is selected by the user in this view.
Function to call when 'enter'/'confirm' is selected by the user in this view.
Function used for determining how the params will be inlined into the function transform.
FunctionExpression method values should be anonymous, because their .id fields are ignored anyway.
Functions are considered terminals, and arrays are not.
Functions like coordsChar, that need to do a lot of measurements in a row, can thus ensure that the set-up work is only done once.
Functions that are implemented at the connection layer.
Functions to run when options are changed.
Further, it does not need to be updated since no additional data can be read about a deleted node.
Further, this list is mutated heavily, but it is never reassigned.
Furthermore, if "cmd /c" double-quoted the first parameter, then "start" will interpret it as a window title, so we need to add a dummy empty-string window title: http://stackoverflow.com/a/154090/3191
Future getClient calls should fail, if it has a cached ServerConnection instance.
Future: - Restore document/overflow scroll positions that were unintentionally modified via DOM insertions above the top viewport boundary.
GC events do not hold call stack, so make a copy of the current stack.
GC samples have no stack, so we just put GC node on top of the last recorded sample.
GET the data and merge in.
GFM Block Grammar
GFM Inline Grammar
GH usernames cannot start with .
GIT GREP TESTS
Gap in the middle
Gather all folders that are actual packages by looking for the package metadata file
Gather all nodes, ignoring linked nodes
Gather template data.
General CFLAGS for building objects
General DLL link flags
General Purpose Event Plugin System
General constructor for creating RelayGraphQLMutation instances with optional `files`, `callbacks` and `collisionKey` arguments.
General package data
General utilities that are useful in creating custom Event Plugins.
Generally a good practice since future versions can make data import decisions based on known past behavior.
Generally props have a value, if it is a spread property it doesn't.
Generally we prefer to break the lowest depth scope.
Generally, content with new line ending are easier to calculate offsets for.
Generate a Server-Authorization header for a given response
Generate a bewit value for a given URI
Generate a cryptographically strong pseudo-random data
Generate a key string that identifies a component within a set.
Generate a new force index used to write GraphQL data in the store.
Generate a remote proxy for a module-level function.
Generate a remote proxy for an interface.
Generate a remote proxy for each module-level function.
Generate a remote proxy for each remotable interface.
Generate a transform matrix based on the provided transforms, and use that within the style object instead.
Generate a unique identifier.
Generate an Authorization header for a given request
Generate an authorization string for a message
Generate an edge client id for edges on connections based on the range it belongs to and the node it contains.
Generate constructor proxy.
Generate decomposed endpoints and names based on the endpoints
Generate dependants string for each pick
Generate external debug files when --enable-debug-pack is specified
Generate flags file
Generate phpize
Generate proxies for instance methods.
Generate proxies for static methods.
Generate synthetic shorthand we have a value for.
Generate the Makefile
Generate the dispose method.
Generate the full command to be presented in the error message
Generate the object response file and define it to the Makefile.
Generate the proxy by manually setting the prototype of the proxy to be the prototype of the remote proxy constructor.
Generate warnings for stuff that used to be allowed core module names like http, events, util, etc
Generated and original position, original source, as well as a name token.
Generated by `tools/generate-identifier-regex.js`.
Generated column.
Generated response.
Generates `testschema.rfc.json` from `testschema.rfc.graphql`.
Generates a "mount image" for each of the supplied children.
Generates a .proxy file to stdout from a service definition file.
Generates a string from a breakpoint that can be used in hashed containers.
Generates a table of contents: looks for h2 and h3 elements and generates links.
Generates an OpenSSH fingerprint from an ssh public key.
Generates root tag markup then recurses.
Generates the template for the given platform.
Genereted win32/build/phpize.js.in
Generic Button wrapper.
Generic print function that will return an array of strings for the given ast node.
Generic tree component that operates on LazyTreeNodes.
Geolocation is enabled by default when you create a project with `react-native init`.
Get Logger instance which is singleton per logger category.
Get a composite component wrapper class for a specific tag.
Get a list of devices and their states from `xcrun simctl`.
Get a list of the commands registered from the list of calls on an `atom.commands.add` spy.
Get a native internal component class for a specific tag.
Get a regular expression object for this pattern-flag pair, or `null` in case the current environment doesn't support the flags it uses.
Get a text description of the component that can be used to identify it in error messages.
Get all comments that are either leading or trailing, ignoring any comments that occur inside node.loc.
Get all file messages.
Get all project messages.
Get an object which is a unique representation of the current selection.
Get and Put
Get array of prototype user-friendly names.
Get cached connection match the hostname and the path has the prefix of connection.cwd.
Get compiler if the toolset is supported
Get compiler name if the toolset is supported
Get compiler version if the toolset is supported
Get current text of input.
Get defaults from prompt
Get each top-level item.
Get edge data in a format compatibile with `GraphQLRange`.
Get homepage and open it
Get log4js logger instance which is also singleton per category.
Get mongobridge host.
Get notified when the process exits.
Get object describing the nodes which contain characters at offset.
Get parameters needed for the dynamic typehint checks.
Get previously cached mirror if existed
Get processes list from ps utility.
Get references to ES5 object methods.
Get remote connections without duplication.
Get replica set configuration.
Get rid of extensions like, '.js', '.jsx', '.react.js', etc.
Get selected test runner when Flow knows `this._testRunnerPanel` is defined.
Get set of fields which are literal types in al alternates.
Get sharded cluster hosts.
Get standalone host.
Get the "hash" associated with an object.
Get the "package.json" of all the features.
Get the PaneAxis constructor, since Atom doesn't expose it.
Get the actual prop type.
Get the appropriate anchor and focus node/offset pairs for IE.
Get the appropriate resolver
Get the children that are tracked for the given `dataID`, if any.
Get the command that will run the packager server based on the current workspace.
Get the command to execute
Get the condition calls that were used to fetch the given connection.
Get the current line and strip all the indentation.
Get the current value of a counter.
Get the default charset for a MIME type.
Get the default extension for a MIME type.
Get the default word RegExp for this editor.
Get the first code unit
Get the first code unit and code unit value
Get the force index associated with the range at `connectionID`.
Get the host of this source
Get the ids of records that were created/updated.
Get the initial project status, if it's not already there, triggered by another integration, like the file tree.
Get the initial state of the gadgets app.
Get the line number of the start of the next visual line after the given line.
Get the line number of the start of the visual line that the given line number is part of.
Get the lines between from and to, as array of strings.
Get the list of directories
Get the minimatch set 2.
Get the mode to a variable
Get the models that represent the containers being resized:
Get the next highest power of 2
Get the next sibling within a container.
Get the package meta If no name is specified, read the project json If a name is specified, fetch from the package repository
Get the parent
Get the part of a document between two positions, as an array of strings.
Get the process ID.
Get the publicly accessible representation of this component - i.e. what is exposed by refs and returned by render.
Get the record writer for the base data.
Get the referenced fragment if all conditions are met.
Get the remote service that corresponds to each remote directory.
Get the renderer and configure it with the executed command
Get the requisite siblings.
Get the result of this hash
Get the revision changes that's newer than or is the current commit id.
Get the root record ID associated with the muation.
Get the spans that 'stick out' on both sides
Get the user email configured in git
Get the user name configured in git
Get the value of an object property, taking object.type and default functions into account.
Get the value of the field from the first version of the record for which the field is defined, returning `null` if the record has been deleted or `undefined` if the record has not been fetched.
Get the variables to pass to the referenced fragment, accounting for initial values, overrides, and route-specific variables.
Get type of style sheet
Get updates that tell the HgRepositoryClient when to clear its caches.
Get version numbers and DEFINE as a string
Get version of this comparator If it's an array, call recursively
Get versions
Gets a default record representing a connection's `PAGE_INFO`.
Gets a single require, this isn't great for when you want to destructure multiple things in a single statement.
Gets all current diagnostic messages.
Gets highest/lowest version from set of comparators.
Gets the "length" property value of `object`.
Gets the DOM ID of the React component that is the root of the tree that contains the React component with the supplied DOM ID.
Gets the NuclideSavedConnectionDialogConfig representing the user's last connection.
Gets the `toStringTag` of `value`.
Gets the associative array value for `key`.
Gets the badge count number from the `aps` object
Gets the build file for the specified target.
Gets the connectionIDs for all the connections that contain the given record as a `node`, or null if the record does not appear as a `node` in any connection.
Gets the current badge number for the app icon on the home screen
Gets the current diagnostic messages for the file.
Gets the current project-scope diagnostic messages.
Gets the data object on the notif
Gets the data required to render the row.
Gets the data required to render the section header
Gets the docblock for a given node.
Gets the first node that it's safe to insert before on.
Gets the first version of the record from the available caches.
Gets the hash value for `key`.
Gets the index at which the first occurrence of `NaN` is found in `array`.
Gets the index at which the first occurrence of `key` is found in `array` of key-value pairs.
Gets the key used to access text content on a DOM node.
Gets the map value for `key`.
Gets the markup wrap configuration for the supplied `nodeName`.
Gets the native function at `key` of `object`.
Gets the nearest common ancestor ID of two IDs.
Gets the next DOM ID on the tree path from the supplied `ancestorID` to the supplied `destinationID`.
Gets the next related file, which Xcode defines as the one that comes before the current one alphabetically.
Gets the notification's main message from the `aps` object
Gets the number of symbols in `string`.
Gets the parent ID of the supplied React DOM ID, `id`.
Gets the previous related file, which Xcode defines as the one that comes after the current one alphabetically.
Gets the real path of a file path, with home directory expansion.
Gets the real path of a file path.
Gets the rowID at index provided if the dataSource arrays were flattened, or null of out of range indexes.
Gets the schema of a setting for a Nuclide feature key.
Gets the scroll position of the supplied element or window.
Gets the sectionID at index provided if the dataSource arrays were flattened, or null for out of range indexes.
Gets the sound string from the `aps` object
Gets the stack value for `key`.
Gets the stderr at this point in time.
Gets the stdout at this point in time.
Gets the target node from a native browser event by accounting for inconsistencies in browser DOM APIs.
Getter check
Getter for the "length" property.
Getting Notifications
Getting the message that caused the error is the best we can do for now.
Git has a way of replacing them with a copy.
Git repositories for Acorn are available at
Give UI cycles to repaint, then proceed with creating connection.
Give a descendant focus
Give all the columns initial widths now so that during a resize, when the two columns that get resized get a percent value for their widths, all the other columns already have percent values for their widths.
Give beforeSelectionChange handlers a change to influence a selection update.
Give each column some padding so that they don't disappear.
Give preference to filename results in OmniSearch.
Give priority to the one with most dependants
Give some time to execute
Give some time to scribeProcess and wait for it resume.
Give the component that originally created this child.
Give the new window 2 seconds to breathe before testing it.
Give up for anything more complex.
Given a ChangeSet, broadcasts changes for updated DataIDs and registers new DataIDs with the garbage collector.
Given a PagedObjectId, return an array of ObjectIds for its children.
Given a ReactCompositeComponent instance, return a list of its recursive owners, starting at the root and ending with the instance itself.
Given a ReactNode, create an instance that will actually be mounted.
Given a `prevElement` and `nextElement`, determines if the existing instance should be updated as opposed to being destroyed or replaced by a new instance.
Given a change object, compute the new set of marker spans that cover the line in which the change took place.
Given a file path, returns path to the Buck project root i.e. the directory containing '.buckconfig' file.
Given a filename and options, build a Babel config object with the appropriate plugins.
Given a line object, find its line number by walking up through its parent links.
Given a list of names to ignore, compile them into minimatch patterns and update the store with them.
Given a max text length, constrain our selection offsets to ensure that the selection remains strictly within the text range.
Given a mouse event, find the corresponding position.
Given a payload of data and a path of fields, extracts the `id` of the node specified by the path.
Given a query fragment and a data ID, returns a root query that applies the fragment to the object specified by the data ID.
Given a request for an image by path.
Given an AST, this function tries to find the object expression that is the module's exported value.
Given an ObjectId for a multi page object, gets PropertyDescriptors for the object's children.
Given an array of lines this will parse the scopes and return a mapping of line number to unique scope ids.
Given an element, validate that its props follow the propTypes definition, provided by the type.
Given an object `toIterator` will return the itrator for that object.
Given any node return the first leaf node without children.
Given the parsed result of a definition file, generate a remote proxy module that exports the definition's API, but internally calls RPC functions.
Given the source of a file, this returns the data about the module's exported value.
Given the starting source, starting position, and the ending source this function guesses where the cursor should move to.
Global console object.
Global runtime evaluation on dummy connection does not care about which frame it is being evaluated on so choose top frame here.
Global uid is `1` as this point, since this is the second RadioGroup component to be created.
Globally unique ID used as the "name" attribute to group radio inputs.
Globs and regexps are different
Globstar behavior is enabled by default, and can be disabled by setting options.noglobstar.
Glue to edge.
Go ahead and delete the dir
Go back N pages at once.
Go back one page
Go back one page in the webview's history.
Go back to the item for a particular route object
Go back to the top item
Go down to the LCA and close current intervals.
Go forward one page in the webview's history.
Go over properties, wrap object values.
Go up the nodes stack and open new intervals.
Goes backwards first
Going forward, we probably want to special-case some of the paths under /Applications/Xcode.app so that click-to-symbol works in files like Frameworks/UIKit.framework/Headers/UIImage.h.
Google Input Tools provides composition data via a CustomEvent, with the `data` property populated in the `detail` object.
Got to create a deep copy, otherwise atom.config invariants might break
Grab the data of only the expanded portion of the tree.
Grab the dependencies of packages that were uninstalled
Grab the nodes after filtering
Grab the nodes of each specified name
GraphQL requires that a different variable be used for values of different types:
GraphQL should never return undefined for a field
GraphQL validation warnings are followed closely by a thrown exception.
GraphQLRange nodes can also support static queries like surrounds, find, whose contents won't ever change for a given set of arguments.
Green/success if all tests passed without skipping any.
Group all of the root keys by their repository, excluding any that don't belong to a repository.
Group non-placeholders and placeholders into groups of two.
Group references by file.
Group references within each file.
Group the lines into valid plist strings.
Group the parameter names so that all of the trailing optional parameters are together with the last non-optional parameter.
Groups Note: ART has a notion of width and height on Group but AFAIK it's a noop in ReactART.
Guaranteed to return an integer number.
Guard against completing resource transfer before all requests are made.
Guard against deactivate being called twice
Guard against the dispatch of two touch moves when there are two simultaneously changed touches.
Guard against this getting called multiple times
Guard zone is used to ensure there are always some extra items above and below the viewport to support keyboard navigation.
Gutter.destroy seems to fail after text editor is destroyed, and Gutter.onDidDestroy doesn't seem to be called in that case.
HACK: Ctags results typically just duplicate Hack results when they're present.
HACK: Mark that this file has typechecks on the comments object.
HACK: goToLocation is a getter.
HACKS In order to make things efficient the recalculation of the derived fields is being avoided when possible.
HEAP PROFILER API
HG Grep test.
HIGHLIGHT WORKER
HMR Client that receives from the server HMR updates and propagates them runtime to reflects those changes.
HTML Embedded Scripts: ASP, JSP
HTML and BODY from internal iframes should not overwrite top-level ones.
HTMLCollection/NodeList
HTTP and HTTPS:  If you run your application both as HTTP and HTTPS you may wrap them individually, since your Connect "server" is really just a JavaScript `Function`.
HTTP methods whose capitalization should be normalized
Hack alert, an atom.workspace.open of a location in the current editor, we get the location update before the onDidOpen event, and we don't get an activate/onDidStopChangingActivePaneItem pair.
Hack so we can intercept prompring for data
Hack to call super constructor in WebInspector classes.
Hack to emit end on close because of a core bug that never fires end
Hack to have stream not keep the event loop alive.
Hack to set TextEditor to read-only mode, per https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/6880
Hack warning: This is a hack because the www UI explorer used to require render to be called.
Hack: This is converting calls like
Hack: This is easier than replicating the default propType handler.
Handle "." connected identifiers
Handle '.' connected identifiers
Handle Comments
Handle Number Literals
Handle Strings
Handle a deep copy situation
Handle a key from the keydown event.
Handle a key from the keypress event
Handle accentuated characters
Handle all cases to make sure that there's only one slash between baseUrl and uri.
Handle decorators
Handle deletion
Handle ignore property, deleting all files from the temporary directory If no ignores were specified, simply resolve
Handle multi line comments
Handle non-detected items
Handle number literals
Handle numeric value increment/decrement only at this point.
Handle operators and Delimiters
Handle operators and delimiters
Handle overwrite
Handle print of version
Handle push notifications for your app, including permission handling and icon badge number.
Handle regex literals
Handle save and saveDev options
Handle scope changes
Handle scope changes.
Handle server requests, punting them down the middleware stack.
Handle special numbers: NaN, Infinity, -Infinity, -0.
Handle strings
Handle the interaction of a change to a document with the editor that this document is part of.
Handle the stateChar, then proceed with this one.
Handle type imports
Handle uppercase characters
Handler for marker movements due to text being edited.
Handlers: Subclasses of `RelayCacheProcessor` can implement this method to actually perform work after a root/node read completes.
Handles basic objects, arrays and primitive types, but doesn't support "exotic" types like Date etc.
Handles data value tracking between Chrome and Dbgp.
Handles displaying breakpoints and processing events for a single text editor.
Handles dragging the pane sizer.
Handles lifetimes of marshalling wrappers remote objects.
Handles merging the results of the mutation/subscription into the store, updating each top-level field in the data according the fetched fields/fragments.
Handles registering files encountered during debugging with the Chrome debugger
Handles sending and recieving dbgp messages over a net Socket.
Handles the developer-visible aspect of errors and exceptions
Handles the payload for a node deletion mutation, reading the ID of the node to delete from the payload based on the config and then deleting references to the node.
Handles the payload for a range addition.
Handles the payload for a range edge deletion, which removes the edge from a specified range but does not delete the node for that edge.
Handles the state machine that responds to various atom events.
Handshake the server with my client id to manage my re-connect attemp, if it is.
Handy for indexing.
Hangul Jamo init.
Hangul Syllables
Hard break that must exist here.
Hard-coded length from `main`.
Hardlinks in tarballs are relative to the root of the tarball.
Harvey and K.
Has not been replayed yet.
Hash any pending mutation transactions.
Have a look to see what is above us, to try and work out where we are
Have to install the spy before loading this.
Have to re-add this since the re-initialization kills it
Having this regex be not quite right is just a display issue, though -- it only affects the location of the tooltip.
Hawk authentication
Helper Functions.
Helper Methods
Helper for creating a config for `configureNext`.
Helper for stringWithEscapes
Helper function for ::getStatuses.
Helper function for registering the marashaller/unmarshaller for a type alias.
Helper function for subclasses to make sure onEnd is only called once.
Helper function that `.then`s on a promise.
Helper function that counts changes in the output from JsDiff, as well as generates a colored message that shows diff output.
Helper function that extracts the props needed for scene renderer.
Helper function that generates a proxy for an instance method of an interface.
Helper function that generates a remote constructor proxy.
Helper function that generates a transformation statement for an object.
Helper function that generates statments that can be used to marshal all of the arguments to a function.
Helper function that listens for a result for the given requestId.
Helper function that parses a Flow type annotation into our intermediate format.
Helper function that parses an exported function declaration, and returns the function name, along with a FunctionType object that encodes the argument and return types of the function.
Helper function that parses an exported type alias, and returns the name of the alias, along with the type that it refers to.
Helper function that parses an method definition in a class.
Helper function that parses annotations of type 'GenericTypeAnnotation'.
Helper function that runs a command in a given directory, invoking a callback as each line is written to stdout.
Helper function that runs the search command on the given directory `subdir`, relative to `directory`.
Helper function to `addAllParentDirectoriesToCache` and `removeAllParentDirectoriesFromCach`.
Helper function to `fetchRevisionInfoBetweenRevisions`.
Helper function to sort an array of file results - first by their filepath, and then by the number of matches.
Helper function to sort scenes based on their index and view key.
Helper functions.
Helper method that generates the dispose method for a class.
Helper method, returns a clone of `query` that has been marked as deferred.
Helper to build a print function for the given node and context.
Helper to call ReactRef.attachRefs with this composite component, split out to avoid allocations in the transaction mount-ready queue.
Helper to construct a new field with the given attributes and 'empty' route/variables.
Helper to construct a new fragment with the given attributes and 'empty' route/variables.
Helper to construct a new mutation with the given attributes and 'empty' route/variables.
Helper to construct a new root query with the given attributes and 'empty' route/variables.
Helper to construct a plain scope for the given `dataID`.
Helper to construct expected result objects for a global provider.
Helper to create a record and the corresponding notification.
Helper to read in a single mpint
Helper to reduce boilerplate when creating subclasses.
Helper to write the result payload into a store.
Helper used to collapse a small branch into a single leaf.
Helpers used when computing which overlapping collapsed span counts as the larger one.
Helpful for debugging.
Helps avoid circular dependencies and allows code to reason about whether or not they are in a Worker, even if they never include the main `ReactWorker` dependency.
Helps to align the image vertically.
Hence, if a call is already running, it will wait for it to finish, then start the next async execution, but if called again while not finished, it will return the scheduled execution promise.
Hence, it's cached here to avoid service calls when working on a stack of commits.
Hence, it's safe to re-emit changes when stable from changes.
Hence, the latest project paths are fetched here.
Hence, the need to debounce and listen to both change types.
Hence, we here use node's filesystem watchers instead.
Hence, we remove it here, if existing, and add the new path for which we added a workspace opener handler.
Hence, we return early to allow it to go through.
Here and below, all constructors are private to API implementation.
Here are the mapping between the offset line numbers to the original line number.
Here excluded means they won't be offered as a completion, but if used, their argument type will be completed.
Here first argument is not the longest, but we still don't move it.
Here is the initial message.
Here we can inject any modifications into the UI.
Here we copy it to a js variable for faster access.
Here we define a resolver that returns the data defined above.
Here we depart from the documented algorithm, in order to avoid building up an actual levels array.
Here we export a schema that offers one root field named 'greetings', and a method to resolve its data.
Here we intentionally circumvent, to a degree, the logic in the _fetchChildKeys which wouldn't schedule a new fetch if there is already one running.
Here we mock it out so that we get normal behavior in our tests.
Here we need to decide whether the reprinted code for newNode is appropriate for patching into the location of oldNode.
Here we store the last mapping.
Here we use asap to wait until all updates have propagated, which is important when using controlled components within layers: https://github.com/facebook/react/issues/1698
Here's a workaround for that.
Here's how this works:
Here's the main message handler ...
Here, I added an expando property function to allow disposing those listeners on the created instance.
Here, Nuclide reloads the remote project files that have empty text editors open.
Here, it's possible to pass an array of file paths to revert/checkout-head.
Here, we compose your Relay container's 'greetings' fragment into the 'greetings' field at the root of the GraphQL schema.
Here, we define a type of object that has a 'hello' field that is of the string type.
Heuristically choose between single-quoted, double-quoted or plain URL regex.
Hex number starts with '0x'.
Hg appears to modify temporary files that begin with these prefixes, every time a file is saved.
HgRepositoryClient runs on the machine that Nuclide/Atom is running on.
Hidden tab.
Hide a component from the sidebar by making it return false from this function
Hide actual error from user
Hide children item.
Hide first so that caller can toggle it visible.
Hide header items.
Hide inspectorView and force layout to mimic the undocked state.
Hide toolbar.
Hides all scenes that we are not currently on, gesturing to, or transitioning from
Hides it to avoid unnecessary rendering.
Hierarchically the controlling toolbar should be above, and practically this ensures the popover in this build toolbar stacks on top of other UI.
High-level API
High-level API for creating a RelayMutationTransaction from a RelayMutation.
High-level docs for the Sample iOS API can be written here.
Higher than the snippets provider.
Higher values mean it contains more things.
Highlights all touchable targets.
Hijack window.onerror to catch any stray fatals
Hijacking React Native JS execution and performing it in a node process.
Hint may be "start" or "around".
Historically, its default string encoding is 'binary' so we have to make this configurable.
History TextEditor Coordinates
Hit deadline before processing all tasks, so process more later.
Hit escape key.
Hitting enter when this panel has focus should confirm the dialog.
Hitting escape when this panel has focus should cancel the dialog.
Holds a given event for processing later.
Holds info about a single rendered line when it was rendered for measurement, while not in view.
Holds onto the measure function in use.
Honor option terminator
Hook Error.prepareStackTrace by leveraging get/set accessor.
Hook for JSX spread, don't use this for anything else.
Hook point for tests.
Hooks for printing stack traces with source maps.
How early to start rendering rows before they come on screen, in pixels.
How far the swipe must drag to start transitioning
How many rows to render on initial component mount.
How may times can we tolerate failures from the worker.
How to align children in the cross direction https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/CSS/align-items
How to align children in the main direction https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/CSS/justify-content
How to align the element in the cross direction https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/CSS/align-items
However these mixeds are ending up everywhere and are not being inspected
However we need to filter out v8 native scripts.
However, GitRepository uses numbers to represent its statuses, and returns statuses as numbers.
However, Node and Atom builtins are already in the module cache by the time Nuclide loads.
However, `1.2.4-alpha.notready` should NOT be allowed, even though it's within the range set by the comparators.
However, `_resolvedDeferred` is rejected with the earliest encountered error.
However, `currentState` will be null at launch while `AppStateIOS` retrieves it over the bridge.
However, `currentState` will be null at launch while `AppState` retrieves it over the bridge.
However, `flush` does not make any arrangements to be called again if an exception is thrown.
However, a pathological inflate type of transform can cause excessive buffering here.
However, because --keep-going was specified, the build report should have still been written unless any of the target args were invalid.
However, because this test artificially sets some locks to an earlier time to simulate staleness, we use mtime here.
However, don't include blank lines.
However, exposing platform cookie parsing logic would require quite a bit of additional plumbing, and at least some platforms lack support for parsing Cookie, which is in a format slightly different from Set-Cookie and is normally only required on the server side.
However, front-end still asks for resource content.
However, if a process was killed with a signal, don't reject, since this was likely to cancel the search.
However, if all data dependencies can be immediately fulfilled, the `props` property will be present.
However, if at least half frames won't fit at this scale, fall back to using autoscale.
However, if it IS set, then we need to still fail here, but just skip the first level.
However, if it is big enough, then just slice out the part we want, to save unnecessary copying.
However, if we ever elect to use timers in Safari, the prevalent work-around is to add a scroll event listener that calls for a flush.
However, if you are at the top of a class it does seem desirable to highlight it.
However, if you register the `mousemove` on the document object, then it will of course catch all `mousemove`s.
However, in partial mode, we can't say this is necessarily over.
However, it should not force a render if the panel is still supposed to be hidden.
However, moving the mouse into the browser from outside will not fire a `mouseout` event.
However, note that even this simple case requires nuances to operate in a broad spectrum of browsers.
However, setNativeProps can only be implemented on leaf native components.
However, since this timer gets frequently dropped in Firefox workers, we enlist an interval handle that will try to fire an event 20 times per second until it succeeds.
However, the bound on the number of services is the number of remote connections initiated during this Nuclide session, plus the local one.
However, the number is platform-dependent.
However, the user agent SHOULD ignore the cookie-av entirely."
However, the watchman update for the files that have changed due to the Mercurial action may arrive before the update for the wlock file.
However, the wildcard interop is really expensive, so it's only used when necessary.
However, there are likely far more normal files in the world than directories.
However, there is a special case: the spacebar key.
However, there is no guarantee that the DOM node is in the document.
However, there may be more than one such element.
However, they do not work reliably in Internet Explorer or Safari.
However, this doesn't work well with our customization of stacktrace.
However, this is caught earlier with a better error message.
However, those costs aren't great enough to justify a new abstraction for managing it at this time.
However, to avoid slowing down the queue of pending tasks, we rethrow the error in a lower priority turn.
However, using `undefined` is not allowed by all browsers so we must replace it with `null`.
However, we cannot just call `get` and then check it against null because T may be a nullable type, in which case this would break subtly.
However, we currently have no way of obtaining this information.
However, we don't actually ever read the version number, so the second field is always blank.
However, we don't want to show the very top parent since it is redundant.
However, we have to support IE8.
However, we still want to treat ErrorUtils as a module so that other modules that use it aren't just using a global variable, so simply export the global variable here.
However, when there is no key, it's not looked up in cache, but rather by its path.
However, you should not rely on it being a constant size, because on different platforms and screen densities its value may be calculated differently.
Huge texts in the UI reduce rendering performance drastically.
Human key combos should always explicitly state the shift key.
Human-readable name for the grammar.
Humanize the keystroke according to platform conventions.
Hypothetical queries.
I am sorry that you have to see this.
I believe this is necessary due to scopeSpaceBreaks or something.
I chose these semantics over cleverly invoking the callback on new elements because this way is much easier to reason about.
I considered making SpreadElement and SpreadProperty subtypes of UnaryExpression, but they're not really Expression nodes.
I do this because nulls are normally sent as empty strings
I do this because nulls are normally sent as empty strings.
I don't believe we need to lock for a replace since there's no navigation actually happening
I don't fully understand the motivation behind separating it out, but prepending it with 'See also: ' and adding it to the end of the messages is what the Flow team recommended.
I don't know what type error is...
I don't know why.
I don't think this will work at all.
I have no idea why you are even allowed to have optional params in the middle, but I guess we have to deal with it.
I haven't seen this in practice but it's better to be safe.
I think that whenever this happens, it's a bug in Flow.
I think this is a literal within JSXElement's children for certain parsers, but Babylon appears to just use Literal.
I wish flow would let add it in a more elegant way.
I would expect the service framework to send onCompleted when it disconnects, but that seemingly doesn't happen.
I would very much like to know _why_ this is.
I'm an enabler, sorry
I'm leaving the condition here because it used to happen before the switch to JSON and I'd rather log something than have the user experience regress in case I'm wrong.
I'm not sure how to reconcile it with the type that is expected here.
I'm not sure what these are.
I'm pretty sure it's safe to assume they are both Identifiers, but let's be safe just in case.
IE 11 uses modern selection, but doesn't support the extend method.
IE does strange things with escape.
IE has `focusin` and `focusout` events which bubble.
IE has a `uniqueID` property on DOM nodes.
IE has a `uniqueID` set on every DOM node.
IE has a different format for this.
IE ignores toString in object iteration..
IE text differs from modern selection in that it behaves as though block elements end with a new line.
IE will fail on defineProperty
IE's approach to draggable
IE's event fires out of order with respect to key and input events on deletion, so we discard it.
IE-only attribute that controls focus behavior
IE8 can throw "Can't move focus to the control because it is invisible, not enabled, or of a type that does not accept the focus." for all kinds of reasons that are too expensive and fragile to test.
IE8 does not implement `charCode`, but `keyCode` has the correct value.
IE8 does not implement getModifierState so we simply map it to the only modifier keys exposed by the event itself, does not support Lock-keys.
IE8 fails this test.
IE8 fails to fire propertychange on the first input event after setting `value` from a script and fires only keydown, keypress, keyup.
IE8 has no API for event capturing and the `onScroll` event doesn't bubble.
IE8 throws "Invalid argument." if resetting shorthand style properties.
IE8: When updating a just created node with innerHTML only leading whitespace is removed.
IE9 claims to support the input event but fails to trigger it when deleting text, so we ignore its input events
IIFE to avoid creating classes for no reason because of hoisting.
IMPORTANT: This function MUST be called once after the element of the DataGrid is attached to its parent element and every subsequent time the width of the parent element is changed in order to make it possible to resize the columns.
IMPORTANT: reset the regex for the next search
IN NO EVENT SHALL APPLE INC.
IN NO EVENT SHALL FACEBOOK BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
IN NO EVENT SHALL GOOGLE INC.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
INPUT HANDLING Poll for input changes, using the normal rate of polling.
ISO 8601 format
Id max chars
Ideally this API would become more restrictive so that this extra work isn't needed.
Ideally this would be a MessageEvent, but Flow's definition doesn't inherit from Event, so it's 'any' for now.
Ideally this would be a union of Field/Fragment/Mutation/Query/Subscription, but that causes lots of Flow errors.
Ideally this would be the only find in here, but it's not because of a jscodeshift bug, so we have to manually search for a specific kind of GenericTypeAnnotations on class super types
Ideally we should return such id that it remains same as long as the the debugger process has the same content of scripts and that changes when a new content is loaded.
Ideally, if multiple subfolders of an Hg repo are used as project roots in Atom, only one HgRepositoryClient should be created.
Ideally, this would be the inverse relationship.
Ideally, we would declare this in atom-jasmine.js, but we can't extend this global here.
Ideally, we would rely on platform support for parsing a cookie, since this would save us from any potential inconsistency.
Identifier or keyword.
Identifiers never need parentheses.
Identifiers that have an exact alias to use.
Identifiers that have an exact path to use.
Identifiers that might correspond to the default export of a particular absolute path.
Identifiers that might correspond to the default export of a particular literal.
Identifiers that should be ignored when not a type.
Identifiers that should be ignored when they are a type.
Identifiers will be generated based on the file's name.
Identifies whether a given object is a request signer or not.
Identify the new top root node of the subtree of the old root.
Identify the node where selection currently begins, then observe both its text content and its current position in the DOM.
If "Reveal File on Switch" is enabled, ensure the scroll position is synced to where the user expects when the side bar shows the file tree.
If --no-deprecation is set, then it is a no-op.
If 409, then GET and merge, try again.
If Flow, when running in this root, has reported errors for this file, this invalidation is not necessary because the path will be explicitly invalidated.
If HgStatusOption.ALL_STATUSES was passed and a file does not appear in the results, it must mean the file was removed from the filesystem.
If Hot Loading is enabled avoid rebuilding bundles and sending live updates.
If MAX_INDIVIDUAL_CHANGED_PATHS changes, this test needs to be updated.
If RemoteDirectoryProvider is called before this, and it failed to provide a RemoteDirectory for a given URI, Atom will create a generic Directory to wrap that.
If URI points to a remote image, it will be downloaded automatically.
If Watchman reports that many files have changed, it's not really useful to report this.
If _read called its callback synchronously, then `reading` will be false, and we need to re-evaluate how much data we can return to the user.
If _read pushed data synchronously, then `reading` will be false, and we need to re-evaluate how much data we can return to the user.
If `clean` is provided, any existing Clang server for the file is restarted.
If `defaultValue` is provided, any options with the supplied values will be selected.
If `display` is specified in the event details, use it as the `hidden` value rather than toggle.
If `false` compass won't be displayed on the map.
If `false` points of interest won't be displayed on the map.
If `false` the user won't be able to change the map region being displayed.
If `false` the user won't be able to pinch/zoom the map.
If `false`, the picker shows an AM/PM chooser.
If `filterUnterminatedRange` is supplied, it will be invoked with any fields from `subjectNode` that are connections and unterminated in `patternNode`.
If `forceHas` is defined, the return value will be equal to `forceHas`.
If `fromRight` is provided elements of `array` are iterated from right to left.
If `interspersed: false` then '-v' would not be parsed out.
If `method` throws, prefer to show that stack trace over any thrown by invoking `closeAll`.
If `multiple` is false, the prop must be a stringable.
If `multiple` is true, the prop must be an array of stringables.
If `props` and `error` are both present, then sufficient data is ready to render, but an error occurred while fulfilling deferred dependencies.
If `props` is present but `done` is false, then sufficient data is ready to render, but some data dependencies have not yet been fulfilled.
If `rootNode.form` was non-null, then we could try `form.elements`, but that sometimes behaves strangely in IE8.
If `str` is longer than `max`, padCenter will return `str` unaltered.
If `str` is longer than `max`, padRight will return `str` unaltered.
If `target.path` file cannot be found or read, Promise resolves to null.
If `touchableHandleLongPress` is provided, by default any `touchableHandlePress` callback will not be invoked.
If `true` the app will ask for the user's location and display it on the map.
If `true` the map will follow the user's location whenever it changes.
If `true`, this component can't be interacted with.
If `value` is undefined, the mutation method should unset the property.
If a .babelrc file doesn't exist in the project, use the Babel config provided with react-native.
If a `change` event should be fired, returns the target's ID.
If a `filter` object is provided, only its keys will be checked during comparison.
If a `render` callback is not supplied, the default behavior is to render the container if data is available, the existing view if one exists, or nothing.
If a callback is passed, run this as a controll flow
If a callback was provided, invoke it with the newest update.
If a component is unmounted before pending changes apply, it will still be here, but we assume that it has cleared its _pendingCallbacks and that performUpdateIfNecessary is a noop.
If a component renders to null or if another component fatals and causes the state of the tree to be corrupted, `node` here can be null.
If a connection profile has a default remote server command, replace it with an empty string.
If a different port is associated with the other protocol we need to update that as well
If a first node doesn't exist then there isn't ever code that would result in a require being changed.
If a font scale is not set, this returns the device pixel ratio.
If a fragment pointer is null, warn if it was found on another prop.
If a gen function is supplied, then the promise it returns will block execution of tasks already in the queue until it resolves.
If a line number is specified by the tag, jump to that line.
If a location can be found for the declaration, it will be available via the 'location' field on the returned object.
If a negated pattern matches, this will override lower precedence patterns sources.
If a new binding matching the catch parameter name was created while scanning the catch body, ignore it because it actually refers to the catch parameter and not the outer scope that we're currently scanning.
If a node was inserted in the middle of existing list dynamically we might need to increase the limit.
If a packager instance was not provided, then just create one for this bundle command and close it down afterwards.
If a paint doesn't have a corresponding graphics layer id, it paints into its parent so add an effectivePaintId to these events.
If a palm is accidentally counted as a touch, but a finger is moving greatly, the palm will move slightly, but we only want to count the single moving touch.
If a particular environment requires that some resources be cleaned up, specify this in the injected Mixin.
If a password is provided, all parts of the profile will be save except the password.
If a paste event occurs after a keypress, throw out the input chars.
If a path has no changes, it will not appear in the returned Map.
If a path is not in the project, it will be ignored.
If a port is specified explicitly, use it as is
If a profile does not inclide a remote server command, this means the user intended to use the default server command.
If a reducer is returned, it be called to get the new state that will be pushed
If a remote directory path is a local `Directory` instance, the project path isn't yet ready for consumption.
If a schema is provided, it will be used to validate.
If a second command is given, pipe stdout of first to stdin of second.
If a string URI/URL was given, parse it into a URL object
If a subsequent touch move exceeds the boundary of the element, it should unhighlight, but if that same touch is brought back within the boundary, it should rehighlight again.
If a task schedules additional tasks recursively, the task queue can grow unbounded.
If a task throws an exception, `flush` ensures that its state will remain consistent and will resume where it left off when called again.
If a test reaches its final state, it is not expected to do anything more
If a test run throws an exception, the stack trace is returned in 'details'.
If a view with a given ID already exists in the side bar, attempting to register another view with the same ID has no effect.
If aRoot is a URL, then its path portion is updated with the result and aRoot is returned.
If aSourceFile is omitted, we will use the file property of the SourceMap
If absent, data will be extracted with the `defaultGetRowData` and `defaultGetSectionHeaderData` functions.
If absent, there is insufficient data to render the container.
If after some amount of time all pending tasks haven't finished, we force the process to end
If all else fails, guess that strings containing certain substrings meant to identify certain licenses.
If all of the children are needed it's easier to return as promise, to make the caller oblivious to the way children were fetched.
If all subscribers unsubscribe, it will unsubscribe from Atom's text events.
If all the fields are filled out, there are some additional checks we want to do.
If already resolving, error out
If already working, error out
If an AL is found, change the type of the European number to Arabic number.
If an L is found, then change the type of the European number to L.
If an error is thrown, a rejected Promise will be returned instead.
If an exception is encountered on the last trial, the exception is thrown.
If an existing element was found, just move it.
If an onLayout event hasn't come in yet, then we skip here and assume it will come in later.
If an output file is specified, remove that argument.
If another error is encontered, it's thrown to be handled up the stack.
If any cells are in progress, then other updates are skipped because they will just be wasted work.
If any child was tracked then `field` will also be tracked
If any of `_pendingElement`, `_pendingStateQueue`, or `_pendingForceUpdate` is set, update the component.
If any of the children of this tree have conflicting binaries then we need to decline to install this package here.
If any of the items are arrays, then join them with a space.
If any of the params have a type that cannot be expressed, then we have to render a simple function instead of a detailed one
If any others are needed, simply add them here, or in their own files.
If any part of a line is indentation-locked, the whole line will be indentation-locked.
If any pending queries were subtracted, they will be added as dependencies and the query will only resolve once the subtracted query and all dependencies have resolved.
If any save requests finished in the meantime, previousContents is not longer accurate.
If anyone ever complains about this, then I guess the strategy could be made configurable somehow.
If at least one of the diagnostics is an error rather than the warning, display the glyph in the gutter to represent an error rather than a warning.
If available, also call the original `console` method since that is sometimes useful.
If both are happening, we only set values for the transition and the gesture will catch up later
If both are present, tokenizedText is preferred.
If both are semvers, compare them
If both have versions, compare their versions using semver
If both nodes are subtypes of Expression, then we should be able to fill the location occupied by the old node with code printed for the new node with no ill consequences.
If both targets are range, check that both have same higher cap
If change and propertychange bubbled, we'd just bind to it like all the other events and have it go through ReactBrowserEventEmitter.
If clear is set to true, it will set the component to its initial state and re-fetch the images.
If concat is unsuccessful, nothing will be changed.
If connection fails using saved config, open connect dialog.
If consuming a single written chunk would result in multiple output chunks, then the first outputted bit calls the readcb, and subsequent chunks just go into the read buffer, and will cause it to emit 'readable' if necessary.
If containersByReactRootID contains the container we find by crawling up the tree, we know that this instance of React rendered the node.
If currentContents is null, it means that the file has not changed since it has been saved, so we can avoid piping the whole contents to the Flow process.
If default is null, make it '' so that it does not retry
If defaultFlags was provided and used, this will be set to true.
If dominator of the entry has already been set to root, then it can't propagate any further.
If duplicate labels prevent the nodes from rendering, this test will fail.
If duplicates have been added, than those do not count towards the size.
If either offset value has changed, set the values and emit the `change` event.
If empty sections are not desired to be rendered their indices should be excluded from sectionID object.
If enableForAllGrammars is true, it overrides the grammars in grammarScopes.
If enabled, skip leading hashbang line.
If encountered, nodes of these types should be either left alone or desugared into AST types that are fully supported by the pretty-printer.
If endpoints is an empty array, null them
If equal to Prism.languages, it can be omitted.
If error is EXDEV it means that we are trying to rename across different drives, so we copy and remove it instead
If expecting a statement and finding a slash operator, parse a regular expression literal.
If extractor is null, then the archive type is unknown
If false the user won't be able to interact with the control.
If false, disables auto-correct.
If false, it will get called only when the user saves.
If false, text is not editable.
If false, then unknown args are included in the _args array.
If false, then we are trying to unmarshal.
If firstChunk ends with colon remove it because we add it manually later.
If force flag is used, bypass cache, but write to cache anyway
If force is specified, delete folder
If force latest is enabled, resolve to the highest semver version or whatever non-semver if none available
If formatCode exists, it'll be used if the editor selection isn't empty, or if it's empty but formatEntireFile doesn't exist.
If found, consume it, otherwise, raise an unexpected token error.
If function exists in stack trace, his length will be great than 0 If there is no known caller func we sent full stack trace
If gadget is at the top level "hiding" is kind of a murky concept but we'll take it to mean "close."
If given the client id for a range view, returns the canonical client id for the entire range.
If global, leave it as-is.
If gutter is destroyed by some outside force, ensure the gutter is not destroyed again.
If hostname is null or empty string, it returns a local service, otherwise a remote service will be returned.
If idom has already reached the root, it doesn't make sense to check other retainers.
If included, this will be used to verify that the edit still applies cleanly.
If index is negative, it should resolve relative to the size of the collection.
If interactive is disabled, error out
If it  ncounters a node that is not in `cachedRecords`, it will queued that node by adding it into the `pendingNodeStates` list.
If it could retry, we don't want to log because it just means the server is busy and we don't want to wait.
If it couldn't retry, it means there was a legitimate error.
If it does not exist, temporarily create it and initiate a fetch.
If it does not reject, then this function will return a rejected Promise.
If it doesn't exist, then just mark the lack of results
If it encounters a node that was already read but still missing data, then it will short circuit the evaluation since there is no way for us to satisfy this query even with additional data from disk cache and resturn
If it fails to read, invalidate the in memory cache for the source and delete the entry directory
If it fails, call onFetchFailure
If it goes to 0, then the parent also detaches itself and so on.
If it has a different kind of operator we force it into a new scope.
If it has the same kind of operator we do not need to open a new scope.
If it is a pre-release it will bump up to the same patch version.
If it is a text node, use a range to retrieve the coordinates.
If it is a widget, simply get the box for the whole widget.
If it is an assignment expression, it resolves to the right hand side.
If it is called when not inside of an emitting cycle it will throw.
If it is not, this is the empty array and our base case.
If it is present then `id` would be added as a requisite field.
If it is, then it's the level below where its installed.
If it isn't, then it'll simply be ignored
If it returns true, the `edges` and `page_info` fields will be filtered out.
If it satisifes the range it is not outside
If it wasn't returned, this means its status may have changed, in which case it should be removed from the hgStatusCache.
If it's a GitHub repository, return the specialized resolver
If it's a call to StyleSheetPropType, do stuff
If it's a call to deprecatedPropType, do stuff
If it's a clone we swap any requests for any of the urls we're mocking with the path to the bare repo
If it's a folder
If it's a local directory, it must be loaded with packages activation.
If it's a remote directory, it should come on a path change event.
If it's a semver target, compare using semver spec
If it's a spacebar character, assume that we have already handled it at the keypress level and bail immediately.
If it's a symlink, and we're in a globstar, then stop
If it's a symlink, then treat it as the target, unless the target does not exist, then treat it as a file.
If it's absolute, then we don't bother searching the pathenv.
If it's determined that a component should not update, we still want to set props and state but we shortcut the rest of the update.
If it's going to end after it starts, it's empty.
If it's negative, it counts from the back.
If it's not a symlink or a dir, then it's definitely a regular file.
If it's not one of these, we won't treat it as an image.
If it's not, then it's likely a mistake so we'll warn you to use the static property, property initializer or constructor respectively.
If it's the only child, treat the name as if it was wrapped in an array so that it's consistent if the number of children grows.
If iterable.size is undefined, the size of the realized sliceSeq is unknown at this point unless the number of items to slice is 0
If jumping to earlier lines, reset columns to the ends of those lines.
If jumping to later lines, reset columns to the beginnings of those lines.
If lastRow is changing, reset so we can call onEndReached again
If left empty, the icon will be tinted in blue.
If liberal is false, it checks whether a gutter or scrollbar was clicked, and returns null if it was.
If listening to data, and it has not explicitly been paused, then call resume to start the flow of data on the next tick.
If localDirectory is not within a Git repo, the Promise rejects.
If localDirectory is not within an Hg repo, the Promise rejects.
If message parsing fails, then our contract with HHVM is violated and we need to kill the connection.
If metadata fields but not edges are fetched, diff as a normal field.
If multiple calls were done asynchronously, then return the single-created HackLanguage.
If names is an empty array, null them
If native `textInput` events are available, our goal is to make use of them.
If necessary, it will remove all items that this object previously registered with Atom's ContextMenuManager.
If negating, then just one match means that we have failed.
If newNode.original node was set to null, reprint the node.
If no blame information is available, returns an empty Map.
If no characters are being inserted, no BeforeInput event should be fired.
If no column is provided, returns all mappings corresponding to a either the line we are searching for or the next closest line that has any mappings.
If no command was specified, show bower help Do the same if the command is unknown
If no cursor is present, items are added to the very first segment.
If no cursor is present, items are added to the very last segment.
If no data passed, it means the user aborted
If no default config is provided and no configuration can be found in the directory hierarchy an error will be thrown.
If no descendant has the necessary dataset to create this menu item, don't create it.
If no digit follows the ".", then the precision should be zero.
If no extra information was requested, resolve simply with the versions
If no location is provided, return the complete Lines object.
If no main was specified, fallback to canonical dir
If no names are passed, grab all links
If no names were specified, update every package
If no necessary `.name` descendant is found, don't display a context menu.
If no options, return null
If no properties were found, the returned array will be of zero length.
If no reducer is returned, no action will be taken
If no selection is done, then, the whole file is wanted to be formatted.
If no such Promise is produced, then the Promise returned by this function will resolve to null.
If no such URL exists, returns null.
If no valid response is found, an exception is thrown.
If no variables changed, the same object is returned.
If node is something like a window, document, or text node, none of which support attributes or a .getAttribute method, gracefully return the empty string, as if the attribute were missing.
If non interactive or user forced, bypass confirmation
If none exist, we do not extract events.
If none is provided, the Progressbar will render in `indefinite` mode.
If not a stateless component, we now render
If not a target/resolved, add as target
If not focused, move the scene to the far away.
If not found, look inline.
If not given, positional args will use Bash's 'default' completion.
If not given, the curve's base point is used.
If not global, then set the user to the owner of the prefix folder.
If not provided, it's assumed that the keys of dataBlob are the section identities.
If not provided, it's assumed that the keys of the section data are the row identities.
If not provided, the default action is to simply append the output of the process to the view.
If not provided, the function appends instead.
If not provided, the query will be inferred from the optimistic response.
If not recursing update to navigator at all, may as well avoid computation of navigator children.
If not supplied, metadata on the parent record and any connections without entries in `rangeBehaviors` will not be updated.
If not then close the new socket.
If not, add it as a true ancestor.
If not, an exception will be thrown.
If not, check if source is a valid Subversion repository
If not, check if source is a valid file/folder
If not, display it above the glyph rather than below it.
If not, it is likely the caller's fault.
If not, methods calling randombytes will throw.
If not, then assume it's something that'll be compiled, or some other sort of script, and just call it directly.
If not, this is a plain composition event and we have nothing special to extract.
If not, use the fallback JS implementation.
If nothing changed, bail.
If nothing matches, device scale is larger than any available scales, so we return the biggest one.
If nothing to install, skip the code bellow
If null, no item is initially selected.
If offline flag is used, use directly the cached one
If offline, resolve using the cached versions
If omitted, SourceMapConsumer's file property will be used.
If one exists, make sure it is a valid "reactRoot" ID.
If one is stopped, stop all.
If one of the callbacks throw an error, the execution will be aborted and the returned promise be rejected with the thrown error.
If one of the targets is range and other is version, check version against the range
If one of them are semvers, give higher priority
If one of them has a version, it's considered higher
If only one main file, use a string Otherwise use an array
If onlyOnce was true, do not add if already traversed
If option is enabled, start timing latency of keys on the new text editor.
If options is set to true, use defaults
If other error, then fail.
If our current sorting method starts at zero, that means it shows all requests starting at the same point, and so onLoad event and DOMContent event lines really wouldn't make much sense here, so don't render them.
If output isn't verbose, hide prereleases
If owning frame has navigated to somewhere else window properties will be undefined.
If package.json exists, use it's values as defaults
If packages is an empty array, null them
If parsing actually alters the URL, it is almost certainly an scp-style URL, or an invalid one.
If passed a function, it will be called when the user taps 'OK'.
If passed a function, it will be called with the prompt's value when the user taps 'OK'.
If passed an array of button configurations, each button should include a `text` key, as well as optional `onPress` and `style` keys.
If passes an `Error` object, it will print the message and stack.
If path is null, empty or undefined, then return the connection which matches the hostname and ignore the initial working directory.
If performUpdateIfNecessary happens to enqueue any new updates, we shouldn't execute the callbacks until the next render happens, so stash the callbacks first
If pos.column does not exceed the indentation amount, then there must be only whitespace before it.
If possible, select the file.
If possible, use a WeakMap.
If present scriptRegex must be a valid RegExp.
If present, add cb, and return.
If present, the statements will be appended to its body instead of creating a new node.
If previous comparison failed, it would have stopped execution
If promise1 later resolved, the first callsite would receive an 'outdated' status.
If provided, this option will be passed along to the source map generator as a root directory for relative source file paths.
If records were collected there would be insufficient data in the cache to render.
If recursion is found the chain of types which recursively contain each other is reported.
If relative, it is relative to the SourceMapConsumer.
If reload happens before the timeout, the flag will be already unset and the timeout callback won't change anything.
If requested otherwise, cap the offset at 0 minimum to avoid content shifting down.
If resolution is a commit, we need to clone the entire repo and check it out Because a commit is not a named ref, there's no better solution
If resolved to a target that is not a version, remove the version from the meta
If resolved to a version, there is new content if the tags are not equal
If resolver doesn't define versions function, it's not targetable..
If restoring state, then the project already exists with local directory and wrong repo instances.
If returning `false`, results from the provider will only be shown in the OmniSearch result list.
If returning `true`, the provider should also provide the `getPromptText` and `getTabTitle` methods.
If segment has null cursors, retrieve whole range.
If set to false, ::addEvent becomes a no-op.
If set to false, the picker will be disabled, i.e. the user will not be able to make a selection.
If set to true it renders the image as original, it defaults to being displayed as a template
If set to true, it can.
If set, the left header button image will appear with this source
If set, the left header button image will appear with this source.
If set, the left header button will appear with this name
If set, the left header button will appear with this name.
If set, the right header button image will appear with this source
If set, the right header button will appear with this name
If set, this replaces the pin or custom pin image.
If showIfHidden is false, this will enqueue a pending reveal to be executed when the file tree is shown again.
If so, it sets this.charLength to the byte length that character, and sets this.charReceived to the number of bytes that are available for this character.
If so, return success.
If so, return the marker for that span.
If so, then if the two path lengths are equal OR if the next character in the path to check is a path separator, then we know the checked path is in this path.
If so, those relative source paths need to be rewritten relative to the SourceMapGenerator.
If so, we should just stop immediately.
If something failed, reject the whole resolve promise with the first error
If something the target.path links to was what was found, just remove target.path in the location it was found.
If something went wrong, also extend the error
If something went wrong, unset the temporary dir
If source is ./ or ../ or an absolute path
If source map exposed in inline mode, we can easy fix some potential issues.
If specified, overrides hint.
If specified, this object will be the value of `this` every time that `aCallback` is called.
If startAtZero is set, then this is useless, and we want to return 0.
If stat fails, it is expected to return ENOENT
If static-only, then we don't need to pass the type hint params since we're not going to do any dynamic checking.
If status code is not in the 2xx range, then just resolve to true
If status is an error, content is likely to be of an inconsistent type, as it's going to be an error message.
If subdirs is an empty array, then simply search in directory.
If successful, open the URL for the revision.
If target is a range, check if resolved version satisfies it
If target is a semver, find a suitable version
If target is a version, compare against the resolved version
If target is a wildcard, simply return true
If target was specified, error out
If target was specified, simply reject the promise
If that fails, it returns the line with the smallest indentation, which tends to need the least context to parse correctly.
If that happens, re-invoke the method against context.visitor.
If that is not the case we return 0 matches, which will trigger the default bash complete.
If that property is enabled, this View will be rendered off-screen once, saved in a hardware texture, and then composited onto the screen with an alpha each frame without having to switch rendering targets on the GPU.
If that resulting state will trigger a _read, then call _read.
If that's a problem, you should create and fresh instances instead.
If that's the case go ahead and break the scope.
If the DbgpProperty represents an empty array or object, the `pagesize` and `numchildren` will be omitted so we handle this "zero" case specially.
If the Flow server fails we will not try to restart it again automatically.
If the NSM is at the start of the level run, it will get the type of sor.
If the React component was previously rendered into `container`, this will perform an update on it and only mutate the DOM as necessary to reflect the latest React component.
If the Set of selected items is new, like when navigating the tree with the arrow keys, scroll the first item into view.
If the _sourcesContents map is empty, set the property to null.
If the `displaySize` param is not specified, this has no effect.
If the `hg diff` call fails, this method returns null.
If the `idOfCurrentlySelectedItem` is null, this means there is no item selected.
If the `value` prop is not updated, the component will continue to render the supplied `value` prop instead of the expected result of any user actions.
If the active directory is removed, fall back to the default.
If the active text editor has no path, bail because there's nowhere to run tests.
If the anchor/focus nodes and offsets are the same, the range is collapsed.
If the axis is oriented the same way as the split, and the container that we're going to add our item to isn't split itself, return an existing pane.
If the axis isn't in the same direction as the split, things get tricky.
If the buffer is modified while it is being iterated, an Error will be thrown.
If the callback returns `false`, traversal is stopped.
If the change is before the event, the event's positions are updated.
If the change touches the same lines as the event, the event, and everything 'behind' it, is discarded.
If the class is defined in the scopeChain, export that instead.
If the click did not happen on the dialog or on any of its descendants, the click was elsewhere on the document and should close the modal.
If the comment is a //-style comment and indented more deeply than the node itself, reconsider it as trailing.
If the commits haven't changed ids, then thier diff haven't changed as well.
If the connection does not match the given pid/idekey/path then close the connection and continue waiting for a match.
If the connection is not in `rangeBehaviors` or we have explicitly set the behavior to `refetch`, re-fetch it.
If the connection matches the given pid/ideky/path then resolve with the connection and stop listening for new connections.
If the content type is 'x-git', then the server supports shallow cloning
If the cropping process is successful, the resultant cropped image will be stored in the ImageStore, and the URI returned in the success callback will point to the image in the store.
If the current running animation is stopped, no following animations will be started.
If the cursor has moved the highlighted ranges we just computed are useless, so abort
If the data won't fit nicely in a simple header, then generate the appropriate extended header file, and return that.
If the data, order, and number of resolved records has not changed since the last call to `resolve`, the same array will be returned.
If the debugger is still paused then, we continue.
If the destination is HTTPS, tunnel.
If the determinant is -1, then negate the matrix and the scaling factors.
If the directory does not exists, resolve as an empty array
If the directory is not part of a Mercurial repository, returns null.
If the edge version comparator has a operator then our version isn't outside it
If the editor of the new location matches the current location, then the current location is updated, otherwise a new entry is pushed.
If the editors don't match then push a new top.
If the endpoint is marked as newly, make it unresolvable
If the error is handled, all subsequent tasks will resume.
If the error is handled, then we abort if not, we threw out of here
If the event did not happen on the `name` span, search for it in the descendants.
If the exact position the target in the file cannot be determined position property of the target location will be set to null.
If the expression is an identifier, it is resolved in the scope chain.
If the feature is explicitly enabled or disabled, then the config value will be set regardless of when `atom.config.get` is called.
If the fetch indicated that some children were removed - dispose of all their subscriptions
If the file didn't exist on the previous revision, return empty contents.
If the file does not exist, then ENOENT will be thrown.
If the file ends in /, then it can only match a a pattern that ends in /, unless the pattern just doesn't have any more for it.
If the file is currently open, create a marker.
If the first instance of the connection passes validation, all will.
If the flex scale is zero, the container isn't expanded.
If the focused crumb is the first child, pick the farthest crumb that is still hidden.
If the found-day-of-month flag is not set and the date-token matches the day-of-month production, set the found-day-of- month flag and set the day-of-month-value to the number denoted by the date-token.
If the found-month flag is not set and the date-token matches the month production, set the found-month flag and set the month-value to the month denoted by the date-token.
If the found-time flag is not set and the token matches the time production, set the found-time flag and set the hour- value, minute-value, and second-value to the numbers denoted by the digits in the date-token, respectively.
If the found-year flag is not set and the date-token matches the year production, set the found-year flag and set the year-value to the number denoted by the date-token.
If the gadget isn't in the workspace, create it.
If the gesture can end and restart during one continuous touch
If the given AST Node is a string literal, return its literal value.
If the grid node has the same sorting as previously, then there is no point in sorting it again.
If the histories were shared, split them again
If the id is has an index and is not deleted
If the identifying value is null or undefined, the supplied callback will be invoked once.
If the image cannot be loaded/downloaded, the failure callback will be called.
If the index hasn't been set, return the index as-is.
If the index of `child` is less than `lastIndex`, then it needs to be moved.
If the input is a non-prerelease version, this acts the same as prepatch.
If the input length is not a multiple of the count, it'll fill the last array with null so you can display a placeholder.
If the instance doesn't have a list of notifiers yet, create one.
If the item is a placeholder, try to replace it.
If the jsbundle is running from a sideload location, this resolves assets relative to its location E.g.
If the key on the original is valid, then the clone is valid
If the last character before oldLoc and the first character of newLines are both identifier characters, they must be separated by a space, otherwise they will most likely get fused together into a single token.
If the last character of newLines and the first character after oldLoc are both identifier characters, they must be separated by a space, otherwise they will most likely get fused together into a single token.
If the last line has changes, JsDiff doesn't return that.
If the last suggestion had multiple ranges, we have no choice but to fetch suggestions because the new word might be between those ranges.
If the leading space contains newlines, then replace it with just that many newlines, sans all other spaces.
If the leading space contains no newlines, then we want to preserve it exactly as we found it.
If the lowest version comparator has an operator and our version is less than it then it isn't higher than the range
If the max line changed since it was last measured, measure it, and ensure the document's width matches it.
If the method failed to interpret the process arguments show the command help
If the module is required by ANY non-top level package then we don't want to include this.
If the module isn't installed above us yet, that'd be the very top.
If the mouse is currently over the element, we want to trigger the new popup to appear.
If the name was guessed
If the name was guessed, remove the trailing .git
If the network activity indicator should be visible.
If the new origin is within the tail, then we do not need a root.
If the next argument looks like it might be an argument for this option, we pass it on.
If the node and offset values are the same, the selection is collapsed.
If the node has any comments, their locations might contribute to the true start/end positions of the node.
If the node is an export declaration and its .declaration has any decorators, their locations might contribute to the true start/end positions of the export declaration node.
If the node was collapsed, deselect its descendants so only nodes visible in the tree remain selected.
If the number of servers is even, an additional member will be added to the set as an arbiter process.
If the object has a `Symbol.iterator` method we just call that.
If the object has no corresponding Def, the callback will never be called.
If the outline view has focus, we don't want to re-render anything.
If the package has no dependants or the force config is enabled, mark it to be removed
If the parent and child instances have a common owner ancestor, start with that -- otherwise we just start with the parent's owners.
If the parent node has type DeclareExportDeclaration, then it will be responsible for printing the "declare" token.
If the parent node is an export declaration, it will be responsible for printing node.decorators.
If the platform returns a non-empty PATH, use it.
If the predicate returns a non-null value it signifies that the handling of the sub-branch is complete and the descent to children is not performed.
If the prepareStackTrace is already been hooked, just return it.
If the previous cache headers contain an ETag, send the "If-None-Match" header with it
If the progress bar will show indeterminate progress.
If the property is optional, it's okay for it to be missing.
If the provider is renderable and specifies a keybinding, wire it up with the toggle command.
If the query could initially trigger a skip then fail, still treturn a result.
If the record is in the store, gets a version of the record in the store being used for writes.
If the remainder of attribute-value contains a non-DIGIT character, ignore the cookie-av."
If the remote connection goes away, it won't be possible to stop tests.
If the remote directory hasn't yet loaded.
If the remote-projects package hasn't loaded yet remote directories will be instantiated as local directories but with invalid paths.
If the request had a :: in it, it's a full name, so we should compare to the name of the result in that format.
If the resolutions is empty, delete key
If the response content is being decoded, the Content-Encoding header of the response doesn't represent the piped content, so don't pass it.
If the response is the whole package info, the package meta is under the "latest" property
If the result is not NaN, then the callback is called with the product.
If the result is smaller than 25 lines, ensure that it is a single leaf node.
If the returned subscription is disposed, the Atom commands will be removed.
If the root call has no arguments, the result array will contain exactly one element.
If the selection is a single file or a single collapsed directory, the selection is set to the directory's parent.
If the selection is already collapsed or it's not a container, select its parent.
If the server parameter is an array, its length will determine the number of nodes in the replica set.
If the server responded with 303 then the resource still has the same ETag
If the side bar became visible or if it was already visible and the active view changed, call the next active view's `onDidShow` so it can respond to becoming visible.
If the size has been reduced, there's a chance the tail needs to be trimmed.
If the specified URI does not match an image in the store, the failure callback will be called.
If the state of the CircularBuffer changes while it is being iterated, it will throw an exception.
If the statement does not start with a statement keyword or a brace, it's an ExpressionStatement or LabeledStatement.
If the status bar is hidden.
If the status bar is translucent.
If the stream is completed timeout will not return its default value and we will see an EmptyError.
If the target is in a managed directory and is in a symlink, but was not in our parent that usually means someone else installed a bin file with the same name as one of our bin files.
If the task threw an error, we do not want to exit the domain here.
If the test runner is debuggable, and the user has checked the box, then we will launch the debugger before running the tests.
If the test runner panel is not rendered yet, ensure it is rendered before continuing.
If the text is more than one word but does not terminate with period, add the period.
If the toolbar has an only child, it will be displayed between the title and actions.
If the toolbar is currently hidden for some reason, then toolbarNode will be null.
If the trailing space contains newlines, then replace it with just that many newlines, with all other spaces removed.
If the trailing space contains no newlines, then we want to preserve it exactly as we found it.
If the transition between status bar property changes should be animated.
If the type is parameterized, we send the parameters as an optional fourth argument.
If the type resolves to an alias it returns the alias's definition.
If the update contains messages at a scope that already has messages from this provider in the store, the existing messages will be overwritten by the new messages.
If the user clicked on a ChangeSet ID, extract it from the DOM element via the data- attribute and find the corresponding Differential revision.
If the user decided to skip it, remove from the array so that it won't influence subsequent dependants
If the user dismissed the dialog, the Promise will still be resolved with action being `DatePickerAndroid.dismissedAction` and all the other keys being undefined.
If the user dismissed the dialog, the Promise will still be resolved with action being `TimePickerAndroid.dismissedAction` and all the other keys being undefined.
If the user has already committed, most of the times, he'd be working on an amend.
If the user has cancelled the test run while control was yielded, we should not run the test.
If the user has manually shown any provider they have probably forgotten they are in distraction-free mode, and intend to enter it.
If the user is pressing either the meta/ctrl key or the alt key.
If the user presses the enter key, confirm the selection.
If the user types a colon outside of a method call, it searches the entire buffer.
If the v8 output changes, then remove this test.
If the value does not exist, adds it.
If the value exists, deletes it.
If the value of this path is some child of a Node and not a Node itself, then it doesn't need parentheses.
If the values of existing properties are changed, the value passed to `callback` will be the value at the time `mapObject` visits them.
If the version doesn't match, the server is automatically killed and the client returns 9.
If the view is already visible in the side bar, nothing will happen.
If the visitor returns false, the object's children are not traversed.
If the year-value is greater than or equal to 0 and less than or equal to 69, increment the year-value by 2000.
If the year-value is greater than or equal to 70 and less than or equal to 99, increment the year-value by 1900.
If there are both semver and non-semver, there's no way to figure out the suitable one
If there are multiple providers for a given grammar, the one with the highest priority will be used.
If there are multiple text editors for this path, one is chosen arbitrarily.
If there are multiple valid discriminant fields, we just pick the first.
If there are no children, that's fine, just return
If there are no errors: a.
If there are no matched entries, then nothing matches.
If there are no more packages being fetched, finish the resolve process by dissecting all resolved packages
If there are no new contents, resolve to the cached one
If there are no params needed, returns null.
If there are no params to pass to the body, then don't wrap the body function.
If there are no pending requests just destroy the socket and it will get removed from the pool.
If there are no quasi elements, then there is nothing to fix.
If there are not enough substitutions for the current substitutionIndex just output the format specifier literally and move on.
If there are only non-semver ones, the suitable is elected only if there's one
If there are only semver ones, figure out which one is compatible with every requirement
If there are options and the selected index is out of bounds, default to the first item.
If there are profiles, pre-fill the form with the information from the specified selected profile.
If there are still any unknown options, then we simply die, unless someone asked for help, in which case we give it to them, and then we die.
If there are test runners, start with the first one selected.
If there are too many breakpoints in a storage, it is likely due to a recent bug that caused periodical breakpoints duplication leading to inspector slowness.
If there aren't any options, don't select anything.
If there has been existing heartbeat error/warning, that means connection has been lost and we shall show a message about connection being restored without a reconnect prompt.
If there have only been optional params so far, and this one is optional, add it to the list of trailing optional params.
If there is a declaration and the kind is 'type', the declaration must be a type alias of some sort which already includes the word 'type'.
If there is a hex code of the error, display only this.
If there is a key conflict we throw.
If there is allocation info parse it, otherwise jump straight to strings.
If there is already an open form, don't open another one.
If there is an error spawning the command, reject the promise
If there is any problem parsing just fall back on the original string
If there is no 'error' event listener then throw.
If there is no error attached to loggingEvent.data, we create a new error and append it to loggingEvent.data, so that we could get stack information which helps categorization in logview.
If there is no native Symbol nor polyfill, then a plain number is used for performance.
If there is no path component, this is the empty string.
If there is no pkgMeta, resolvedVersion is downloading now Check based on target requirements
If there is no record containing the time than use the latest one before that time.
If there is no running test suite, fill the progress bar because there is no progress to track.
If there is samples array parse it, otherwise jump straight to strings.
If there is, we cancel the timer and do not consider this a panel switch.
If there was an error, invalidate the in-memory cache, delete the cached package and try again
If there was no race - it's a noop.
If there was no visitor method to call, visit the children of this node generically.
If there was somehow another popup for this gutter item, dispose it.
If there were no args and we have unknown options, then they are extraneous and we need to error.
If there's a problem with the stat, then it means that one or more of the links in the realpath couldn't be resolved.
If there's a remainder, just add whatever is left
If there's an error, removes the temp file.
If there's native implementation of given symbol, let's fallback to it to ensure proper interoperability with other native functions e.g. Array.from
If there's no component for this item, it isn't a gadget.
If there's no gadget registered with the provided ID, abort.
If there's no package in the cache
If there's no path yet, get the path from the active `TextEditor`.
If there's not enough space for the id, adjust it for subsequent logs
If there's not text, use a space to make sure the row doesn't collapse.
If there's nothing to resolve, simply dissect
If there's only one initial capital letter, just lower-case it.
If these records were collected there would be insufficient data in the cache to render.
If these tests start failing because Atom can't find a view, look here.
If they are equal and one of them is a wildcard target, give lower priority
If they are equal, the ID is returned.
If they are expensive to re-render, wrap them in StaticContainer or other mechanism as appropriate.
If they didn't ask for help, then this is not a "success"
If they don't fit they are placed in an 'overflow' menu.
If this Def is already buildable, update self.buildParams and continue using the old builder function.
If this activation is happening during the normal startup activation, the `onDidActivateInitialPackages` handler below must unload the 'tree-view' because it will have been loaded during startup.
If this becomes valuable, we can define a representation and extend the implementation to support it.
If this causes problems, figure out how to mock the clock properly.
If this directory is "www" and you are trying to check "www-base", just using startsWith would return true, even though "www-base" is at the same level as "Www", not contained in it.
If this editor has been previously active, we will have already initialized diff info and registered listeners on it.
If this ever fires, either ensure that your test closes all RemoteConnections or we can add a force shutdown method to ServerConnection.
If this function is called multiple times in parallel, the later calls will cause the previous promises to reject even if they end up expanding the node key successfully.
If this function is ever called with anything but `one` and `two` being `Array`s, it is the fault of the merge utilities.
If this function is not called after the DataGrid is attached to its parent element, then the DataGrid's columns will not be resizable.
If this is a constructor, write to the prototype, otherwise write to the singleton object.
If this is a controlled radio button group, forcing the input that was previously checked to update will cause it to be come re-checked as appropriate.
If this is a pre-major version, bump up to the same major version.
If this is a pre-minor version, bump up to the same minor version.
If this is a strict mode function, verify that argument names are not repeated, and it does not try to bind the words `eval` or `arguments`.
If this is already a prerelease, it will bump to the next version drop any prereleases that might already exist, since they are not relevant at this point.
If this is available on the event object, use it.
If this is made configurable, consider using autocomplete-plus' minimumWordLength setting, as per https://github.com/atom/autocomplete-plus/issues/594
If this is not a pre-release version, it will increment the patch.
If this is not already the active view, switch to it and ensure the side bar is visible or is the specified `display` value.
If this is not called before calling onNewLayout, the number of inProgress cells will remain non-zero, and thus the onNewLayout call will not fire the needed state change update.
If this is not specified and the property is missing, an error will be thrown.
If this is not the first segment, we should not request edges that would overlap the last element of the previous segment.
If this is not the last segment, we should not request edges that would overlap the first element of the next segment.
If this is the view that was last serialized, render synchronously and immediately so the side-bar appears quickly on start up.
If this node needs parentheses and will not be wrapped with parentheses when reprinted, then return false to skip reprinting and let it be printed generically.
If this package is disabled, stop updating the button and remove it from the toolbar.
If this returns null, then it is not safe to run flow.
If this returns null, then it is not safe to run hack.
If this segment already has the first element, we don't need any segments before this.
If this segment already has the last element, we don't need any segments after this.
If this turns out to be a popular use case it's possible to implement by overiding `Object.freeze` to store a "hash" property on the object for later use with the map.
If this view is already active, just toggle the visibility of the side bar or set it to the desired `display`.
If this._connection is not set, then the superclass constructor is still executing.
If this.traverse still hasn't been called, visit the children of the replacement node.
If this.visitWithoutReset threw an exception and this._abortRequested was set to true, return the root of the AST instead of letting the exception propagate, so that client code does not have to provide a try-catch block to intercept the AbortRequest exception.
If tool-bar is disabled, stop updating the button state and remove tool-bar related cleanup from this package's disposal actions.
If true spaces will be used for indentation, otherwise tabs will be used.
If true the switch will be turned on.
If true the user won't be able to move the slider.
If true the user won't be able to toggle the switch.
If true, a note stating the `default` for this option, if any, will be appended to the help output.
If true, all text will automatically be selected on focus
If true, before opening the new tab, it will close any existing tab with the same title.
If true, disable all interactions for this component.
If true, focuses the input on componentDidMount.
If true, the keyboard disables the return key when there is no text and automatically enables it when there is text.
If true, the text field will blur when submitted.
If true, the text input can be multiple lines.
If true, the text input obscures the text entered so that sensitive text like passwords stay secure.
If true, then selecting a segment won't persist visually.
If true, this will cause onTextEditorEvent to get called more often -- approximately whenever the user stops typing.
If true, we read from the DOM before updating to ensure that the value is only set if it has changed.
If true, we will query providers for updates whenever the text in the editor is changed.
If truthy, adds `value`, if falsy deletes `value`.
If two or more parameters share the same name, they are sorted by their value.
If two touches start, one moves five in a direction, then stops and the other touch moves fives in the same direction, the cumulative distance is ten.
If types are added here, make sure to also add them to FlowConstants.js.
If undefined, the default for the current locale is used.
If user changes any config, update the health - and reset the polling cycles.
If user response was negative, abort
If using spaces this is how many spaces will be inserted.
If using tab charcters this is how many spaces a single tab is expected to be displayed as.
If validation succeeds: an object containing a valid profile to save.
If variable is updated, the properties array is patched locally.
If we already had a child with this URI - keep it
If we already have this child, then merge the data together.
If we already processed all orphan nodes that have only weak retainers and still have some orphans...
If we are a recently built node, and the directory structure is that of a repository.
If we are editing, return early to prevent canceling the edit.
If we are in a testing environment then we want to use a default atom config.
If we are not in a transition from this index, make sure opacity is 0 to prevent the enabled scene from flashing over the presented scene
If we are on Windows then we only need to go one level up, everything else, two
If we are only doing script debugging, then the dummy connection listener's port can also be used to listen for the script's xdebug requests.
If we are secure then we don't need the ssh tunnel.
If we are under maxSockets create a new one.
If we aren't using plain objects, optionally prefix keys that would overwrite object prototype properties
If we call it once with a larger value, the first promise will resolve first, even though the timeout is larger
If we cannot execute based on adb devices output, fall back to shell am start
If we clean up the buffer before the `openUriInPane` finishes, the pane will be closed, because it could have no other items.
If we couldn't locate the key comment, though, there may be whitespace shenanigans going on that have conjoined the comment to the rest of the key.
If we did traverse, this fragment reference would lead us to create an object with a __dataID__ instead of the desired `null`.
If we did traverse, this fragment reference would lead us to create an object with a __dataID__ instead of the desired `undefined`.
If we didn't, we'd have shared state between these various tests.
If we don't have a shasum yet, compute it.
If we don't know, then assume that we are waiting for one.
If we don't remove it, we're gonna have a bad time.
If we ever supported this then we must handle exceptions and side-effects.
If we fail to connect to hack, then retry on next request.
If we find a child whose ID is an ancestor of the given ID, then we can be sure that we only want to search the subtree rooted at this child, so we can throw out the rest of the search state.
If we find a private key, we just take the public component of it and use that.
If we found one, add as resolved and copy resolved properties from the compatible one
If we found one, merge stuff instead of adding as resolved
If we get a map from the transformer we'll switch to a mode were we're combining the source maps as opposed to
If we get any other code we must have exited earlier.
If we get here before consuming all the bytes, then that is a bug in node.
If we get something that is not a buffer, string, null, or undefined, and we're not in objectMode, then that's an error.
If we got authorization, make sure it's the right password.
If we had to start a Flow server, store the process here so we can kill it when we shut down.
If we have a beforeCursor and there is no next page, then there is no gap between the current segment and the next.
If we have a valid `dataID`, ensure that a record is created for it even if we do not actually end up populating it with fields.
If we have an afterCursor and there is no previous page, then there is no gap between the current segment and the previous.
If we have default value in percents, calculate it on first use.
If we have no .loc information for oldNode, then we won't be able to reprint it.
If we have not specified any module dirs let's add some defaults
If we have past steps, put the end event for each range rather than start one.
If we have pending requests and a socket gets closed a new one needs to be created to take over in the pool for the one that closed.
If we have reached this point, charA and charB are different, but only one of them is uppercase.
If we haven't received anything after LOADING_DELAY_MS, display a loading indicator.
If we issued an unexpected argument we have learned nothing about the state of the Flow server.
If we made it all the way through the loop, provider must be lower priority than all of the existing providers, so add it to the end.
If we managed to parse the key and locate the key comment with the regex, then do a non-partial read and assert that we have consumed all bytes.
If we match the uppercase characters of the filename, we should be ranked the highest
If we need to scroll a specific position into view, do so.
If we put this type on the definition, use sites will not see the individual properties in the Server object for things like autocomplete.
If we saw typeName earlier in the breadth-first traversal, delete the last-seen occurrence.
If we set secondaries to maintenance mode, wait for them to become unhealthy.
If we skipped validation above, we get a second chance here.
If we try to replace the argument of a ReturnStatement like return"asdf" with e.g. a literal null expression, we run the risk of ending up with returnnull, so we need to add an extra leading space in situations where that might happen.
If we were successful, then we know the item is up-to-date, so there's no need to update it and we can move on to the next item.
If we were to continue synchronously here, the debugger would no longer be paused when the remaining subscribers' callbacks were invoked.
If we're asking for more than the target buffer level, then raise the water mark.
If we're at the top, always use real timeline start as a left window bound so that expansion arrow padding logic works.
If we're being called from the command line, just execute, using the command-line arguments.
If we're in Chrome or Firefox, provide a download link if not installed.
If we're in IE8, check to see if we are in compatibility mode and provide information on preventing compatibility mode
If we're in an ES6 environment, make parsers iterable
If we're looking at the latest movies, aren't currently loading, and still have no results, show a message
If we're looking globally only look at the one package we're operating on
If we're saving bundled deps, normalize the key before we start
If we're switching from children to content/html or vice versa, remove the old content
If we're updating to null or undefined, we should remove the property from the DOM node instead of inadvertantly setting to a string.
If we've already got an array, just append.
If window is too small, don't even try to resize.
If you are looking for a function that creates an Array instance based on an "Array-like" object, use createArrayFrom instead.
If you are using it, please donate.
If you decide to catch this exception and stop it from propagating, make sure to call its cancel method to avoid silencing other exceptions that might be thrown later in the traversal.
If you do not need precise scroll position tracking, set this value higher to limit the information being sent across the bridge.
If you don't care about sections you should safely be able to use `cloneWithRows`.
If you have no idea what ASN.1 or BER is, see this: ftp://ftp.rsa.com/pub/pkcs/ascii/layman.asc
If you need data to be fetched in addition to rendering, please use `RelayRenderer`.
If you need it, you are probably looking for `componentWillUpdate`.
If you need real error handling don't use this mock.
If you need this property, create an instance with the appropriate root and use execFlow.
If you need to add a new command, please add it to local-cli/.
If you need to convert an array-like object, like `arguments`, into an array use toArray instead.
If you need to override any of this functions do so by defining the file `rn-cli.config.js` on the root of your project with the functions you need to tweak.
If you omit any of the other render functions, ListView will simply skip rendering them.
If you open Atom via Spotlight such that it opens with a tab named "untitled" that does not correspond to a file on disk, this will return null.
If you pass an error, then that'll put the hurt on the whole operation.
If you provide a source map that was generated from a previous call to recast.print as options.inputSourceMap, the old source map will be composed with the new source map.
If you really want the pretty-printer to use tabs instead of spaces, make this option true.
If you see a blank content, you probably forgot to add a selected one.
If you set a process.env field to null or undefined, it gets cast to the string 'null' or 'undefined'.
If you want esprima not to throw exceptions when it encounters non-fatal errors, keep this option true.
If you want those, you can opt in to the higher-level `RelayMutation` API.
If you want to animate a composite component, you need to re-render it.
If you want to communicate between Atom and the webview, you can use webview's API.
If you want to print trailing commas in object literals, array expressions, functions calls and function definitions pass true for this option.
If you want to set the opacity of the drawer, use rgba.
If you want to take ownership, you must make your own copy.
If you wish to maintain the existing data you must handle merging of old and new data separately and then pass that into this function as the `dataBlob`.
If you're not setting the userconfig explicitly, then it will be loaded twice, which is harmless but excessive.
If your attribute isn't in here, it won't get written to the DOM.
If/When support for 0.9.4 is dropped, this should be unnecessary.
If/when the saved connection profiles change, we want to re-render the dialog with the new set of connection profiles.
Ignore CompositeComponent proptype check.
Ignore __proto__ property, stay lossless.
Ignore `RelayQLFragmentSpread` selections.
Ignore all non-export top level program elements including: imports, statements, variable declarations, function declarations
Ignore anything in node_modules that isn't a package folder.
Ignore case score matches gets a good score.
Ignore case where FbHgBlameProvider is unavailable.
Ignore changes to other files.
Ignore computed properties, turn lossy.
Ignore empty path components resulting from //, as well as a leading and traling slashes.
Ignore exported variables.
Ignore falsy entries due to errors reading package metas
Ignore falsy values and Expressions.
Ignore if folder does not exist
Ignore if it fails.
Ignore if link does not exist
Ignore length property of array, stay lossless.
Ignore long-living WebSockets for the sake of progress indicator, as we won't be waiting them anyway.
Ignore lurking files, e.g.: .DS_Store if the user has navigated throughout the cache
Ignore malformed settings.
Ignore nested replacement ranges.
Ignore non-enumerable members on prototype, stay lossless.
Ignore non-text editors and new editors with empty uris / paths.
Ignore not found .git directory
Ignore rest.
Ignore size property of map, set, stay lossless.
Ignore the inserted text if the user is typing in a string or comment.
Ignore the rest of the response
Ignore the whole call when the value is null
Ignore them.
Ignore this hook.
Ignore typehints that span too many lines.
Ignores `h1`, because you should only have one per page.
Ignores the cache and fetches data required to resolve a set of queries.
Image formats
Image.propTypes.source is required but we want it to be optional, so we OR it with a nullable propType.
Images are stored in memory and must be manually removed when you are finished with them, otherwise they will continue to use up RAM until the app is terminated.
Immediate call again in case of race condition there
Immediately after `j` is incremented in this loop, the following hold true:
Immediately convert line and column to 0-based numbers.
Implementation derived from TweetNaCl version 20140427.
Implements Source Map V3 model.
Implements the Flux pattern for our file tree.
Implicit invalidation semantics:
Implicit key determined by the index in the set
Implicit octal, unless there is a non-octal digit.
Implies default.
ImportNamespaceSpecifier's only appear by themselves or to the "right" of an ImportDefaultSpecifier:
Important for 0-time items to have 0 width.
Importantly, it also short-circuits in some cases if the path is null or undefined.
Imported from nuclide-files-service, which is an apm package, preventing a direct import.
Imports from non-Nuclide modules.
Imports from other Nuclide packages.
Imports from within this Nuclide package.
Imports store data from a previous export.
Improve performance by isolating this hot code path from the try/catch block in `updateChildren`.
In Atom, this is false - prevent accidental unnecessary use.
In Buck, the 'cursor to previous line' and 'erase line' escape characters occur in pairs.
In HTML5, select fires only on input and textarea thus if there's no focused element we won't dispatch.
In IE it is not safe to call document.activeElement if there is nothing focused.
In IE8, `mountAt` is a host object and doesn't have `hasOwnProperty` directly.
In IE8, we can capture almost all .value changes by adding a propertychange handler and looking for events with propertyName equal to 'value' In IE9, propertychange fires for most input events but is buggy and doesn't fire when text is deleted, but conveniently, selectionchange appears to fire in all of the remaining cases so we catch those and forward the event if the value has changed In either case, we don't want to call the event handler if the value is changed from JS so we redefine a setter for `.value` that updates our activeElementValue variable, allowing us to ignore those changes
In IE9, the selection range will get reset if `textContent` is mutated.
In Node.js, uncaught exceptions are considered fatal errors.
In a transform stream, the written data is placed in a buffer.
In a web browser, exceptions are not fatal.
In addition to executing ordinary .js files, the other Node process can also run .js files under the Babel transpiler, so long as they have the `'use babel'` pragma used in Atom.
In addition to subscribing to all subsequent events, this method will also handle any events that have already been emitted, held, and not released.
In addition to the data for the given event it also sends a event control object which allows the listeners/handlers to prevent the default behavior of the given event.
In addition, each field name may map to an array of data IDs if the field is plural.
In addition, supplying a `renderLoading` that returns undefined has the same effect as not supplying the callback.
In addition, the Store will immediately invoke the callback with data currently in the Store, iff there is any.
In addition, the Store will immediately invoke the callback with the data currently in the Store, iff there is any.
In addition, time_t defaults to 64-bit.
In all other cases the expression itself is returned.
In any case, major browsers allow duplicate keys, so that's what we'll do too.
In any case, we need to guard against it.
In apps written with React Native from the root view down, you should use Navigator instead of Modal.
In both cases we want to ignore the timer id, but in the former case we warn as well.
In both cases where null is returned, test will be applied to the next item in the array.
In both the case of the `UIWebView` based `RCTJavaScriptCaller` and `RCTContextCaller`, we implement our own custom timing bridge that should be immune to unexplainably dropped timing signals.
In bottom up mode, our parents are our children since we display an inverted tree.
In case of "message", the `data` property contains the incoming data.
In case of exception the override won't be called.
In case of globally installed, get the base dir where executable subcommand file should be located at
In case of redirect request id is reassigned to a redirected request and we need to update _nodesByRequestId and search results.
In case of self time, first add self, then children of the same category.
In case they do, we don't want to fail the render phase where it didn't fail before.
In case this id is already selected, anyways persist it as the last saved value.
In case we have no closing Layout event, endData is not available.
In case you didn't know, the caught parameter shadows any variable of the same name in an outer scope.
In case you want to use the Rotten Tomatoes' API on a real app you should create an account at http://developer.rottentomatoes.com/
In each of these, `this` refers to the Class itself, not an instance.
In heavy mode, we take our visual identity from ancestor node...
In jest environment, XmlHttpRequest doesn't exist so getOwnPropertyDescriptor returns undefined and defineProperty default for writable is false.
In modern non-IE browsers, we can support both forward and backward selections.
In normal operation, these are only for long filenames or link names, which are rarely very big.
In oldIE we use the DOM Node `uniqueID` property to get create the hash.
In older browsers we can't create a null-prototype object so we have to defend against key collisions with built-in methods.
In order to avoid back tracking, it returns `null` if the position is not a MethodDefinition and the caller is responsible to visit other options.
In order to avoid exponential backtracking, we use two flags to denote if the production can be binding element or assignment target.
In order to ensure we reprint leading and trailing program comments, wrap the original Program node with a File node.
In order to generate such stream, here is a sample bash command:
In order to get the stateful object with the methods that Atom wants for items, we actually have to mount it.
In order to keep our status 'types' the same, we map the string StatusCodeId to numbers.
In order to retrieve the image dimensions, the image may first need to be loaded or downloaded, after which it will be cached.
In order to return the same Def instance every time Type.def is called with a particular name, those instances need to be stored in a cache.
In order to send minimal queries and avoid re-retrieving data, `RelayPendingQueryTracker` maintains a registry of pending queries, and "subtracts" those from any new queries that callers enqueue.
In order to use it pass this component as `renderScrollComponent` to the list view.
In other words, the embedder of this component should be the source of truth, not the native component.
In particular, it's useful for erroring if the server fails to send data halfway through streaming a response.
In particular, this allows JavaScript animations to run smoothly.
In particular, this helps when the old range is empty so there is no old text for us to compare against.
In particular, this is needed to support PropTypes
In particular, this system allows for circular and forward definitions.
In practice, this has not appeared to cause any issues thus far.
In practice, this should be OK for now.
In release mode you should always use a drawable resource for these icons.
In remote-projects/main.js, we remove these generic directories.
In such a pathological inflating mechanism, there'd be no way to tell the system to stop doing the transform.
In such cases the node will be harmlessly wrapped in an additional layer of parentheses.
In that case, cache first so there is a known size and these do not resolve to NaN.
In that case, just bump it up again.
In that case, resolvedSize will be NaN and sliceSize will remain undefined.
In that case, we don't want to throw if we can't find the source - we just want to return null, so we provide a flag to exit gracefully.
In that case, we want to re-enter distraction-free mode, hiding the currently-visible providers, but when we exit we want to restore both the previously-hidden providers and the currently-visible providers.
In the DOM, we would likely want to purge any cached node ID lookups.
In the Flow crashes I have observed, the code is 2 and the signal is null.
In the case of "break on uncaught exception" triggered by "TypeError: undefined is not a function", the exception is thrown by a V8 builtin CALL_NON_FUNCTION defined in v8/src/runtime.js.
In the case of `ReactDOMComponent`, a mount image is a string of markup.
In the case of any other error, just see if there's a dir there already.
In the case the cursor does not correspond first cursor, walk through the edges to see if we can trim edges to only those before the first cursor.
In the case the cursor does not correspond last cursor, walk through the edges to see if we can trim edges to only those after the last cursor.
In the event of a failed `concatSegment` operation, rollback internal properties to their former values.
In the example, this would be "/path/to/directory".
In the example, this would be "nuclide://example.com:9090".
In the following example, the nested title and body text will inherit the `fontFamily` from `styles.baseText`, but the title provides its own additional styles.
In the future let's look into adding a command line option to specify this location.
In the future release empty section headers will be rendered by default, and the flag will be deprecated.
In the future this may be used to indicate that required data for the fragment has not been fetched or was evicted from the cache.
In the future we need a way to generate GUIDs but for now this will work on a smaller scale.
In the future, it will be possible to load only one set of definitions appropriate for a given parser, but until then we must rely on default functions to reconcile the conflicting AST formats.
In the inherited sections, only show overrides for the potentially inherited properties.
In the interest of a performance, a transformer should only return a Promise if necessary.
In the official Linter API, the providerName is just "name".
In the phpize mode, the subdirs are always relative to BUID_DIR.
In the real version, you'd be able to add multiple callbacks for each event.
In this case we need to listen for incoming connections to attach to, as well as on the port that the dummy connection will use.
In this case we will just print the value.
In this case, `stale` will be true.
In this case, it is both a client id and does not have a corresponding mapping in the client server id map.
In this case, only the stderr content is evaluated.
In this case, simply checking whether the root is a prefix of the path won't work.
In this case, the arguments need to contain "--depth 1".
In this case, the arguments should not contain "--depth 1".
In this case, we can just let Atom open a blank editor.
In this case, we can scope the 'hg status -i' call to just the added file.
In this case, we have a fallback that uses forceUpdate.
In this case, we just want to return an empty string if there is no current bookmark.
In this case, we only want the untracked files under the given localDirectory.
In this case, we return our remaining data and end the stream, if appropriate.
In this case, we use the `mouseover` top-level event.
In this case, we want to run a fresh 'hg status -i'.
In this case, you could write a very small amount of input, and end up with a very large amount of output.
In this example, a component receives data in chunks, handled by `_onDataArrived`, which concats the new data onto the old data and updates the data source.
In this way, other module could still overwrite Error.prepareStackTrace to customize stacktrace.
In this way, writing to Error.prepareStackTrace will put the new prepareStackTrace functions in a wrapper that calls the hook.
In this way, you can share images, videos, PDF files, etc.
In turn, `TouchableMixin` expects us to implement some abstract methods to handle interesting interactions such as `handleTouchablePress`.
In turn, data received by the socket is forwarded to the stdout of this process.
Inaccurate, just a sanity check.
Include `tabIndex` so this component can be focused by calling its native `focus` method.
Include edges from all connections that exist in `rangeBehaviors`.
Include even hidden options in `optargs` so that bash completion of its arg still works.
Include modules used by integration tests
Include npm-version and node-version in user-agent
Include null-filtered edges as "seen" so that they will be subscribed.
Include the path to the nuclide package.
Include this.depth in the name to make sure the name does not collide with any variables in nested/enclosing scopes.
Includes additional information that is useful to the UI, but redundant or nonsensical for providers to include in their responses.
Includes inherited fields.
Includes own typeName.
Includes partial query strings.
Includes query
Includes the newlines in the resulting stream.
Includes those for files that are not open.
Inclusive time is not useful for many components without knowing where they are instantiated.
Incompatibles
Increase the indentation after this line.
Increasing promise resolve time will gurantee maximum parallelization.
Increment the counters / check values.
Increment the last row one at a time per JS event loop
Incrementally add a string to this hash
Incrementally adds only escaped chars, adding other chunks as-is as a micro-optimization.
Indeed, this was already supported, but it was a bit to keen on this.
Indent the starts of attribute names.
Indentation contexted
Index 0 will be the whole email.
Index 1 is the capture group.
Index 1 is the captured pid.
Index of initial page that should be selected.
Index of the first retainer in the _retainingNodes and _retainingEdges arrays.
Index of the row, passed through to other callbacks.
Indicates that a provider is registered but that it did not return an outline.
Indicates that no provider is registered for the given grammar.
Indicates that we are in the middle of a activate/onDidStopChangingActivePaneItem pair of events.
Indicates that we're processing a forward/backwards navigation in the stack.
Indicates this field is hidden from eachField iteration.
Indicates to accessibility services to treat UI component like a native one.
Indicates to accessibility services whether the user should be notified when this view changes.
Indicates whether or not the packager is running.
Indices are split up according to data types to avoid collisions.
Indirect causes.
Individual apps can disable this
Individual selectable item in a Picker.
Infinite animations
Information about the rendered lines.
Informational
Inherit from `EventEmitter.prototype`.
Inherit the prototype methods from one constructor into another.
Init git repo
Init svn repo
InitWithRetries
Initial add
Initial call
Initial dimensions are set before `runApplication` is called so they should be available before any other require's are run, but may be updated later.
Initial maximum value of the slider.
Initial minimum value of the slider.
Initial root directories
Initial setup.
Initial value of the slider.
Initial value.
Initialize PRNG if environment provides CSPRNG.
Initialize a delegator.
Initialize a mongobridge.
Initialize a new `Command`.
Initialize a new `Option` with the given `flags` and `description`.
Initialize a replica set.
Initialize a sharded cluster.
Initialize a standalone server.
Initialize and render the contents of the panel only if the hosting container is visible by the user's choice.
Initialize empty function node.
Initialize the SVG elements since we know they'll always need to be wrapped consistently.
Initialize the defaultProps property after all mixins have been merged.
Initialize the pool with junk if needed.
Initialize the public class
Initialize this to the default connection profile.
Initialize to 'active' instead of null.
Initializes `panelComponent` so it does not need to be considered nullable.
Initializes an array clone.
Initializes an object clone based on its `toStringTag`.
Initializes an object clone.
Initializes garbage collection: must be called before any records are fetched.
Initializes the component, renders markup, and registers event listeners.
Initializes the internal `onDOMReady` queue.
Initializes the parser, reads any number of statements, and wraps them in a Program node.
Initially false to indicate the cell should be rendered "offscreen" with position: absolute so that incremental rendering doesn't cause things to jump around.
Initially we have no changed files so the diff view tool-bar counter should be empty.
Initially when data with children is returned to the Chrome debugger only the ObjectId is returned.
Initiates the fetching of node's children if it's not already in the process.
Inject data generated from fallback path into the synthetic event.
Inject modules for resolving DOM hierarchy and plugin ordering.
Inject some specialized knowledge about the DOM.
Inject the runtime into a devtools global hook regardless of browser.
Injectable event backend
Injectable mapping from names to event plugin modules.
Injectable ordering of event plugins.
Injected dependencies:
Injects any key/value pairs from the given Observable value into the component as named props.
Injects plugins to be used by `EventPluginHub`.
Injects the client mutation id associated with the record store instance into the given record.
Inline fragments without type conditions fall back to parent type.
Inline strings when formatting.
Inline style has the greatest specificity.
Inline-Level Grammar
Inlined `register` since this is a reasonably hot code path.
Inlined for performance, see `ReactInstanceHandles.createReactID`.
Inner ranges may reference cache keys defined in their parents.
Input Range
Input must be homogenously typed.
Input selection module for React.
Inputs to the state machine.
Insecure configs are used for testing only.
Insecure connections are used for testing and will fail the encryption call below.
Insert a function that wraps the function body.
Insert a sentinel executor that will not be called until all of the other promises in the queue have been flushed.
Insert a token before another token in a language literal
Insert at the same index for the first profile of the group.
Insert close tag.
Insert in sorted order
Insert in the alphabetical order, first domains, then folders, then scripts.
Insert in the alphabetical order, first frames, then resources.
Insert non-breaking spaces to ensure the changeset is right-aligned.
Insert shortcuts to distrubuted children.
Insert spaces when the tab key is pressed
Insert the given array of lines at offset 'at', count them as having the given height.
Inserts `aStr` between each of `this.children`.
Inserts `childNode` as a child of `parentNode` at the `index`.
Insets define the minimum margin for these components and can be used to effectively align Toolbar content along well-known gridlines.
Insets for the map's legal label, originally at bottom left of the map.
Inside double quotes: any symbol except double quote and backslash or any symbol escaped with a backslash.
Install Headers
Install glass pane capturing events.
Install linked package deps
Install public, 3rd-party Atom packages listed in this package's 'package-deps' setting.
Install without the optional dependency
Installs event handlers for all the events we care about.
Instantiate a map with internal slots.
Instantiate resolver cache
Instantiate stub for web-hosted mode if necessary.
Instantiate the registry
Instantiate the resolve cache
Instead of calling _addInvalidationToEvent directly, we create synthetic StyleRecalcInvalidationTracking events which will be added in _addInvalidationToEvent.
Instead of making single child node just for the type name, we'll graft the type onto the end of the property name.
Instead of showing the user a bunch of un-mounted blank space, WLV sets contentInset to prevent scrolling into unrendered areas.
Instead of the "map" field, it's also possible to have a "url" field specifying a URL to retrieve a source map from, but that's currently unsupported.
Instead of using expandos on components, we should be storing the state needed by the diffing algorithms elsewhere.
Instead, a provider may set enableForAllGrammars to true, and then it will get notified of changes in all TextEditors.
Instead, display updates are batched and then all combined and executed at once.
Instead, it's more useful to identify the group of gadgets to which this one belongs and get it out of the way.
Instead, just go to index 0
Instead, send the HMR updates right away and clear the bundles cache so that if the user reloads we send them a fresh bundle
Instead, simply create wrapped transformers that assert the type of their argument.
Instead, the `value` prop must change in order for the rendered element to be updated.
Instead, the `value` prop must change in order for the rendered options to update.
Instead, the first match of the filtering here is the only possible match.
Instead, the props must change in order for the rendered element to be updated.
Instead, the way to achieve this effect is to create an ordinary TextEditor and then override any methods that would allow it to change its contents.
Instead, they should use the result of this method to attach listeners for bubbling events.
Instead, they use the getInitialState and componentWillMount methods for initialization.
Instead, this function keeps filtering local.
Instead, use the onMouseEnter/onMouseLeave created by `EnterLeaveEventPlugin`.
Instead, we define a getter that warns if it's accessed.
Instead, we must take all recently moved touches, and calculate how the centroid has changed just for those recently moved touches, and append that change to an accumulator.
Instead, we need to remove components from the root one by one, until either we find a prefix that fits, or we run out of components to remove.
Instead, we periodically shift 1024 tasks off the queue.
Instead, we write all the results in the same stdin stream.
Instruments methods on a class or object.
Instruments profiling for arbitrarily asynchronous code by a name.
Integer division by 2, mod q
Integer literals may be "long"
Intentionally fetch the filesystem contents after getting the committed contents to make sure we have the latest filesystem version.
InteractionManager allows long-running work to be scheduled after any interactions/animations have completed.
Interacts with the background and text classes because the mode may output tokens that influence these classes.
Intercept Parse API call.
Intercept all logs, adding additional information
Interface similar to findNodeAt.
Interfaces for Chrome Dev Tools internal APIs.
Intermediate scroll position, not pushed to DOM yet
Internal instances should fully constructed at this point, so they should not get any new fields added to them at this point.
Internal queue of events that have accumulated their dispatches and are waiting to have their dispatches executed.
Internal state
Internal store for event listeners
Internal tweaks for real symbol producer
Internally, the HgRepository uses the string StatusCodeId to do bookkeeping.
Internet Explorer 10 is the only browser that has setImmediate but does not have MutationObservers.
Interpolate to provide an initial guess for t
Interpolates the value before updating the property, e.g. mapping 0-1 to 0-10.
Interpret and default an options object
Intersection point lies inside of the polygon if scalar products of normal of the plane and cross products of successive tVects are all nonstrictly above or all nonstrictly below zero
Interset the added and removed lines maps, taking the values of the added lines.
Invalid URI: it may generate lot of bad errors, like 'TypeError: Cannot call method `indexOf` of undefined' in CookieJar Detect and reject it as soon as possible
Invalid base64 digit.
Invalid chars shouldn't get passed to native
Invalid credential object
Invalid sets are not expanded.
Invalid syntax for a selector
Invalidate all file messages.
Invalidate all project messages.
Invalidate file messages from ProviderA.
Invalidate if there there is no longer a revision with that id.
Invalidate layout below.
Invalidate project messages from ProviderA.
Invalidate the current revisions state because the current commit info has changed.
Invariant: All contained MessageRecords must have a count greater than or equal to one.
Invariant: This model can only be constructed on a ServiceWorker target.
Invariant: the Set values are never empty.
Inverse of a matrix.
Invert bytes.
Investigate if we can use localhost and match protocol version between client/server.
Invoke synthetic calls for events that are missing ResourceSendRequest
Invoke the Makefile in the 'build' dir.
Invoke the callback on just the original child paths, regardless of any modifications made to the array by the callback.
Invoke the service.
Invoke this from an `onMomentumScrollBegin` event.
Invoke this from an `onMomentumScrollEnd` event.
Invoke this from an `onResponderGrant` event.
Invoke this from an `onResponderReject` event.
Invoke this from an `onResponderRelease` event.
Invoke this from an `onScrollBeginDrag` event.
Invoke this from an `onScrollEndDrag` event.
Invoke this from an `onScroll` event.
Invoke this from an `onStartShouldSetResponderCapture` event.
Invoke this from an `onStartShouldSetResponder` event.
Invoke this from an `onTouchEnd` event.
Invoke this from an `onTouchMove` event.
Invoke this from an `onTouchStart` event.
Invoked after the make/msbuild command exits.
Invoked before the component receives new props.
Invoked by ReactTestUtils.Simulate so that any errors thrown by the event handler are sure to be rethrown by rethrowCaughtError.
Invoked on load start
Invoked once before the component is mounted.
Invoked when connection is fails
Invoked when connection is sucessful
Invoked when load completes successfully
Invoked when load either succeeds or fails
Invoked when load fails
Invoked when load finish
Invoked when server requests keyboard interaction
Invoked when the component has been mounted and has a DOM representation.
Invoked when the component is about to be removed from its parent and have its DOM representation destroyed.
Invoked when the component is about to update due to a transition from `this.props`, `this.state` and `this.context` to `nextProps`, `nextState` and `nextContext`.
Invoked when the component is initially created and about to be mounted.
Invoked when the component is mounted.
Invoked when the component's DOM representation has been updated.
Invoked when the item is "selected" - meaning the interaction ended by letting up while the item was either in the state `RESPONDER_ACTIVE_PRESS_IN` or `RESPONDER_INACTIVE_PRESS_IN`.
Invoked when the item is long pressed - meaning the interaction ended by letting up while the item was in `RESPONDER_ACTIVE_LONG_PRESS_IN`.
Invoked when the item should be highlighted.
Invoked when trying to connect
Invoked while deciding if the component should be updated as a result of receiving new props, state and/or context.
Invoked with the new value when the value changes.
Invokes a remote method that is specified as an export of a .js file.
Invokes all enqueued callbacks and clears the queue.
Invokes the success callback once with the latest location info.
Invokes the success callback whenever the location changes.
Invokes the terminal "beep" sound once per second on every exact second.
Is currently only supported on android.
Is idempotent.
Is not transpiled, allow `var` and console usage.
Issue onresize to the sidebar element, its size won't change.
It accepts a map of all of the different types of events that the emitter can emit.
It accepts an object mapping of style properties to values.
It accepts event listeners and DOM properties that are valid according to `DOMProperty`.
It adds a necessary unique requestId to each network request that can be used to abort that request later on.
It allows each concrete provider to provide customized debugging types, actions and UI.
It also allows the ability to add new primitives, ranging from Buffer to NuclideUri that are not handled at the transport layer.
It also includes server changes that break older clients.
It also indexes by height, and is used to convert between height and line object, and to find the total height of the document.
It also keeps cowboy devs at bay from introducing exotic syntax, stage 0 features, and/or obscene module systems like Haste.
It also moves any leading and trailing markers outside of the parenthesis.
It also removes the password if provided, and only retains the remote server command if it is not the default.
It always refers to the navigation context the event handler has been attached to as opposed to event.target which identifies the navigation context on which the event occurred.
It caches data fetched from an HgService.
It calls onFailure when some data is unabled to be satisfied from cache.
It calls onSuccess when all the data has been loaded into memory.
It can also be a function.
It can be a superset of the actual response payload if certain fields that are affected have not been queried by the client, yet.
It can be used as the thickness of a border or division between two elements.
It can be used to store accumulations or anything else that the callback might find relevant.
It can remove its own subscription.
It cannot be a directory.
It compiles a new normalized keymap, and then updates the old object to reflect this.
It contains a process that's created using the provided factory upon subscription.
It contains common properties and methods to any event.
It could be different than the given path if the file is a symlink or exists in a symlinked directory.
It currently returns an Observable just to circumvent the 60s service timeout for Promises.
It definitely makes sense that the lines we get are 1-based and the columns are 0-based...
It did not apply, cancel editing.
It does not remove arbitrary extra new lines.
It doesn't matter what the search term is.
It emits "entry" events, which provide a readable stream that has header info attached.
It emits events when things change that you can subscribe to.
It exists from the moment the quick-open UI becomes visible until it gets closed, either via file selection or cancellation.
It exists, but maybe not how we need it
It exports the FS on http via the endpoint: http://your.server:your_port/fs/method where method is one of readFile, writeFile, etc.
It fetches all non-yet-fetching dependencies with _fetch.
It happens in Safari, that getter is still called after property was defined with a value, following workarounds that
It happens when piping command to "head" util
It has been adapted here for stricter adherence to RFC 3986
It has to be on any parent directory of the cli.
It has to return a non-null node, but it may be the same instance as it was called with.
It holds references to DOM nodes and display-related state.
It improves the greppability of the code, 2.
It is a simple multicast mechanism on top of which extra functionality can be composed.
It is able to avoid re-rendering and directly set the attributes that changed.
It is an ugly unfortunate mess of history.
It is common practice to put libs under one of these dir names
It is different from event.currentTarget when the event handler is called during the bubbling or capturing phase of the event.
It is duplicated here to handle tarballs that are created using other means, such as system tar or git archive.
It is expected to reject.
It is however not recommended to use the static API and the component for the same prop because any value set by the static API will get overriden by the one set by the component in the next render.
It is ignored when a system icon is defined.
It is implemented as a meta-marker-object controlling multiple normal markers.
It is important that this has a lower priority than the handler from fb-diffs-and-tasks.
It is important to kick controller lifetime after apps are instantiated.
It is impossible to create the subscription and pass it in - this method must be the one to create the subscription and therefore can guarantee it is retained in a way that will be cleaned up.
It is inexact because the loading might be unrelated to the tracked node, however it is cheap and false positives will only last until loading is complete or until the user clicks another node in the tree.
It is intended for use by AbstractTextEditor-based components for identifying the appropriate start/end positions to modify the DocumentContent, and for programatically setting browser selection when components re-render.
It is not a communication protocol per se.
It is not sufficient to exit the domain, because domains exist on a stack.
It is passed as a prop to any component rendered by NavigatorIOS.
It is possible for the path to be above the root.
It is possible to parse multiple files into a single AST by passing the tree produced by parsing the first file as `program` option in subsequent parses.
It is recommended not to cache the result of this function in case the user updates his or her preferences in Atom, in which case the return value will be stale.
It is recommended that it be the name of the provider's package.
It is recommended that readers of this test be familiar with the end-to-end test in GraphQL.js first, as this test skips over the basics covered there in favor of illustrating the key aspects of the Relay spec that this test is designed to illustrate.
It is recommended that you use an abstraction on top of AsyncStorage instead of AsyncStorage directly for anything more than light usage since it operates globally.
It is recommended to name your tasks for easier async debugging.
It is relativized based on the path of the source code.
It is safe to call cancel even if no connection is started
It is somewhat obscure, because it works in character codes rather than characters, and because operator parsing has been inlined into it.
It is supposed to run in CI environment, not on a developer's machine.
It is the interface that other Atom packages will use to access Mercurial.
It is the sum of communication and services API.
It is the user's responsibility to make sure that the private key is a uniformly random, secret value.
It is up to the listeners to determine any necessary deltas required for their use-case.
It is used only by "bower info".
It is used to add generic typing and respective type inference where available.
It is used to bootstrap a forked process.
It is useful for matching pressed keys.
It isn't possible to produce an "empty" ref query dependency with `Relay.QL`, but in order to be future-proof against this possible edge case, we create such a query by hand.
It leaves last matching endpoint.
It makes network requests that never return in a test env.
It makes single-touch gestures resilient to extra touches, and can be used to recognize simple multi-touch gestures.
It means that we can accept ranges as targets
It must be a primitive type -- just return it.
It must be an integer greater than zero.
It must be removed from the list of command-line arguments passed to libclang.
It mutates the first object and also returns it.
It needs to be connected to a Wall object that can send JSONable data to the bridge on the other side.
It notifies your component when it should give feedback to the user.
It only supports static images.
It probably belongs where the key checking and instantiateReactComponent is done.
It requires each resolver defined in config.resolvers and calls its "match" to check if given resolves supports given decEndpoint
It returns a minimal set of queries that will fulfill the difference, or an empty array if the query can be resolved locally.
It returns all semver versions.
It returns the field name without any calls.
It returns the paths relative to the directory in which this command is run.
It returns the status of only files under the given path.
It runs `apm test` under a timeout to ensure that the test terminates.
It ruturns a promise that when fulfilled can returns one out of these possible values: - `running`: the packager is running - `not_running`: the packager nor any process is running on the expected port.
It seems a linked list but it is not there will be only 2 of these for each stream
It seems strange for Flow to report errors in one place when run from one root, and not report errors in that same place when run from another root.
It seems that if they are killed, the code is null and the signal is 'SIGTERM'.
It should also work if we fetch each one separately.
It should be used instead of LocalStorage.
It should hide provider2 and enter a distraction-free mode where it will restore both
It should just return elements now.
It should not error out
It should not fail on enosys ever, as this just indicates that a fs doesn't support the intended operation.
It should not technically be optional in the Babel/Acorn AST format, but it must be optional in the Esprima AST format.
It should still be possible to add items to the submenu after it has been cleared out.
It should work when invoking as a Mixin.
It should, and we will make it do so, but for now we're going to set this to `true` always, and make the plugin warn when it encounters an empty field that supports subselections in a non-pattern fragment.
It shows an error when issuing `bower install` and no bower.json is present in current directory
It simply passes the functions defined at construction to a new data source with the data specified.
It simply renders rows passed as children in a separate recycler view cells similarly to how `ScrollView` is doing it.
It specifies whether the children are visible or not.
It starts by sorting the words by length.
It starts recursive fetching of targets.
It stores selected packages in the this._dissected array.
It takes an object with `type` property and extra data depending on the `type`.
It throw exception here
It trades a neglibable overhead in general case for a large speedup in case of mappings being added in order.
It turns out that, on non-Chrome browsers, to check whether a string is in a set, a predicate containing a big ugly `switch` statement is faster than a regular expression, and on Chrome the two are about on par.
It updates the version in podspec/json/gradle files and makes sure they are consistent between each other After changing the files it makes a commit and tags it.
It uses timestamp-based caching and partial updates, because it is a monster.
It uses two different representations for big integers: The jsbn BigInteger class, which can represent arbitrary-length numbers, and a special fixed-length representation optimised for 256-bit integers.
It was later adapted to RSVP which made further amendments.
It will add the necessary requestId, so that you don't have to generate it yourself.
It will also recover from `scribe_cat` failure automatically.
It will be compared in `shouldComponentUpdate`.
It will be rerendered when the routes change.
It will break if node contains any sort of circular structure.
It will not // be invoked again until `executeTask` has been invoked.
It will not be altered in any way.
It will not however check the signature, or the keyId format as those are specific to your environment.
It will not touch any elements above this one.
It will only match dot entries if it starts with a dot, or if dot is set.
It will receive the route object in the `route` prop, a navigator, and all of the props specified in `passProps`.
It will reset the debugger agent.
It will return false for other array-like objects like Filelist.
It will take the first one.
It works by creating a new constructor that has the same prototype as the original constructor, and simply applies the original constructor directly to 'this'.
It works by rendering a subset of rows and replacing offscreen rows with an empty spacer, which means that it has to re-render rows when scrolling back up.
It would be annoying if the user had to save before using the jump-to-definition feature to ensure he or she got accurate results.
It would be nice if it would use the path for filtering, as currently the client has to do the filtering.
It'll be slightly off from native, but better than glitching out.
It's a perf optimization.
It's an alternative to `Array.prototype.filter` that accepts an async function.
It's an alternative to `Array.prototype.some` that accepts an async some function.
It's as close as you can get to Atom's path.
It's attractive to try to do a default serialization but that's probably a bad idea because it could be costly and confusing to serialize a bunch of unneeded stuff.
It's better to have it running at faster speed than jumping to the end.
It's better to just leave the existing outline visible until the new results come in.
It's easier to test some things this way
It's fast, but is of unspecified quality.
It's fine the user connected to a different project on the same host: we should still be able to restore this using the new connection.
It's hard to handle JSON in a safe manner without inspecting it at runtime, hence the any
It's impactful to memoize our requires here since these commons are so often used.
It's important that only one instance of this function runs at any time.
It's important that we build the array of ancestors before calling any event handlers, because event handlers can modify the DOM, leading to inconsistencies with ReactMount's node cache.
It's important to make sure that the buffer hasn't already been destroyed.
It's just less weird than some kind of placeholder.
It's necessary to get them both in one function because items don't have links back to their parent.
It's not actually needed for things to work correctly.
It's not advisable to add code directly here, but if you do, it'll appear at the bottom of the compiled file.
It's not an error to finalize a type more than once, but only the first call to .finalize does anything.
It's not guaranteed to remove all markers.
It's not properly implemented in canvas mode.
It's not safe to use value for number literals that would lose precision.
It's not silenceable and has no effect, so just ignore it.
It's not smart to choose a naive heuristic like "log all string arguments" because services such as Flow take the unsaved file contents as an argument, which would clutter our logs.
It's not spec-compliant.
It's possible for state to be mutable but such change should trigger an update of the owner which would recreate the element.
It's possible that the element exists but doesn't have a component.
It's possible that the number of rows decreased by more than one increment could compensate for.
It's possible to end up with dangling processes if pipe isn't implemented correctly.
It's prefer that mixins determine state in this way, having the class explicitly mix the state in the one and only `getInitialState` method.
It's recommended to use one of the static methods to generate that dictionary.
It's still not a complete check if some flags with spaces got added.
It's the same behavior as without this statement except with a better message.
It's typically full of platform-specific stuff like symlinks and .cmd files anyway.
It's unclear why the 1-based to 0-based indexing works the way that it does, but this has the desired effect in the UI, in practice.
Item is removed from queue.
Items comes with a few predefined system icons.
Iterate backwards through tiesToBreak, examining the gaps between the tied comments.
Iterate each node in pre-order.
Iterate in reverse so that we can't get tripped up by the items we're adding.
Iterate over each mapping between an original source/line/column and a generated line/column in this source map.
Iterate over invisible nodes beyond the upper bound of viewport.
Iterate over the document.
Iterate over the keys and setup the new object
Iterate over the logical lines that make up this visual line.
Iterate through each node in the program body.
Iterate through internal items.
Iterate through the line, determining if we have balanced brackets.
Iterate until either we run out of mappings, or we run into a mapping for a different line than the one we found.
Iterate until either we run out of mappings, or we run into a mapping for a different line than the one we were searching for.
Iteratee functions may exit iteration early by explicitly returning `false`.
Iterates from edges.length - 1 to 0
Iterates through children that are typically specified as `props.children`.
Iterating over object properties is faster than iterating over arrays.
Its corresponding value will be the list of matching build targets in its results.
Its name will be periodically randomized to break any code that depends on its existence.
Its output is suitable for passing it onto ReactMultiChild which does diffed reordering and insertion.
Its start and end offset
JS implementation of timer functions.
JS objects have odd ids, skip native objects.
JSBN-specific extension
JSCompiler does not model this well.
JSON.parse compat
JSON.parse failed, just log the contents probably a naughty.
JSON.stringify and util.inspect have some collision potential as well, though less, and collision detection is expensive.
JSON.stringify can't stringify instance of Error.
JSON.stringify's replacer is not called _after_ serialization.
JSX extensions below.
JSXAttributes should always use double quotes.
JSXElements don't need quotes, so we need special handling.
JSXMemberExpressions can only contain identifiers so we do not allow any sort of breaking between accesses unlike in a standard member expression.
Jasmine 1.3 does not support `jasmine.objectContaining`, so we need to check the results manually:
Jasmine global
Jasmine has trouble spying on properties supplied by getters, so to make it work we have to get the value, delete the getter, and set the value as a property.
Jasmine won't trigger temp's cleanup handler.
JavaScript Array "length" is bound to an unsigned 32-bit int.
JavaScript engine analysis
Jest does not allow running only one tick, so just assert that broadcasts occurring twice means `mockCallback` was invoked separately.
Jest/Jasmine build ins.
Joins two paths/URLs.
Jump backward without unmounting the current scene.
Jump by 10 when shift is down or jump by 0.1 when Alt/Option is down.
Jump forward to the next scene in the route stack.
Jump to line/column if provided.
Jump to the root of this React render tree
Just a standard identifier.
Just assert that it's already there, otherwise raise a warning.
Just closing its pane and would potentially leave siblings which, presumably, the user would then have to also close.
Just continue through, and bail out if we try to use it.
Just delete instead.
Just encode everything.
Just for convenience.
Just give it a cold observable and let it handle the rest.
Just ignore inspector frames.
Just ignore that, because it doesn't matter.
Just ignore them.
Just in case the AST has been modified to contain falsy "statements," it's safer simply to skip them.
Just in case there's a race between the update of the root keys and the cwdKey and the cwdKey is set too early - set it again.
Just let git fail if it turns out that the commit-ish is invalid.
Just like the parent property, some operations require an ability to find siblings easily.
Just make a dummy prop object with only the flattened style
Just need to override the parent's "Not Implemented" error-thrower.
Just pass the start index.
Just set the default, so it can be overridden.
Just so we have a known starting state for the tests
Just stashing it in the data at this point.
Just the generated position.
Just to be sure...
Just to make sure the JS gets packaged up.
Just use cached values.
Just wait until we get a master
KEY EVENTS Run a handler that was bound to a key.
KEYMAP DISPATCH
Keep a running string of stderr, in case we need to throw an error.
Keep attempting to connect.
Keep in sync with .data-grid col.corner style rule.
Keep in sync with .network-blue-divider CSS rule.
Keep in sync with .network-red-divider CSS rule.
Keep in sync with LayoutStyleConstants.h PseudoId enum.
Keep in sync with the Python server.
Keep looping until it does.
Keep offset at 1 second precision
Keep selection even if the node is not in the current viewport.
Keep settings up to date with Nuclide config and precalculate options.
Keep src as a buffer so calculating its digest with crypto is fast.
Keep the Atom commands in sync with the application state.
Keep the atom commands up to date with the registered gadgets.
Keep the field if the connection is unfetched
Keep the original open editor item with a unique name until the remote buffer is loaded, Then, we are ready to replace it with the remote tab in the same pane.
Keep the side-bar hidden when there is no active view instance.
Keep them as a list so we can fill in when nonull is set.
Keep this file in vanilla JavaScript so we can add perf measuring hooks and not have to worry about accounting for transpile costs or `import` hosting.
Keep this list in sync with RCTRootViewIntegrationTests.m
Keep this list in sync with UIExplorerIntegrationTests.m
Keep track of how many mouse listeners were returned for the text editor so we know when it's safe to actually dispose it.
Keep track of the diagnostics created by each text buffer.
Keep track of the last colon that we see.
Keep track of the provided types, union the types if they already exist, which allows for prototype subclasses to provide more types.
Keeps track of the current owner.
Kennedy "A Simple, Fast Dominance Algorithm" Softw.
Key event with given key identifier.
Key is the name of the option and value is a description string that will be displayed.
Key value gets bigger incrementally.
Key/val minification may have aliased that key to be 'xa12'.
KeyPress is deprecated, but its replacement is not yet final and not implemented in any major browser.
Kick animation on first frame.
Kick off a fetch to get the current bookmark.
Kick off all the arc execs at once, then await later so they all happen in parallel.
Kick this off early, so we don't need to repeat this on every call.
Kill the Clang server for a particular source file, as well as all the cached compilation flags.
Kill the appropriate scope markers.
Kill the search process on dispose.
Kills the nuclide server associated with `connection`, and closes the connection.
Kind of weird to have a default max of Infinity, but oh well.
Kinds of map iterations 23.1.5.3
Kloss  You should have received a copy of the license along with this program.
Kloss, Michele Bini  You should have received a copy of the license along with this program.
Kloss, Michele Bini, Ron Garret  You should have received a copy of the license along with this program.
Kloss, Ron Garret  You should have received a copy of the license along with this program.
Kludge to prevent 'maybelse' from blocking lexical scope pops
LINE DATA STRUCTURE Line objects.
LINE NUMBERS Re-align line numbers and gutter marks to compensate for horizontal scrolling.
LINE UTILITIES Find the line object corresponding to the given line number.
LINE WIDGETS Line widgets are block elements displayed above or below a line.
Label max chars
Labels are going to be over their grid lines.
Labels are going to be under their grid lines.
Labels in scope.
Last call should not trigger flags.
Last character of the reprinted node.
Last resort, use old skool env vars
Lastly, project and absolute.
Late binding
Launches an alert dialog with the specified title and message.
Layers panel
Layout 1: Measure total and normal crumb sizes
Layout 2: Measure collapsed crumb sizes
Layout 3: Measure collapsed crumb size
Lazily allocate the array to conserve memory.
Lazily allocates the refs object and stores `component` as `ref`.
Lazily computed and memoized private properties
Lazily create the child cache.
Lazily create the flux stuff.
Lazy execute the domain module.
Lazy panel creation.
Lazy require these functions so that we could spyOn them while testing in ServiceIntegrationTestHelper.
Lazy update.
Leading comments are defined as:  - let N be the number of leading comments numbered 0 to N-1 - if there is space betwee comment N-1 and first, comments 0 to N-1 - else comments 0 to N-2
Leading comments are invalid trailing comments.
Leap indicator
Leaves enough room in the environment for implementing your own: 1.
Leaves remote URI's alone.
Leftover arguments need to be pushed back.
Legacy Interface
Legacy Mixed-Case
Legacy browsers don't have a path attribute on native events
Legacy events does not support event bubbling and reconciliation.
Legacy hook TODO: Warn if this is accessed
Legacy members portred from `Navigator`.
Legacy name.
Legacy static members.
Lendiff is the amount of lines added or subtracted by the change.
Length is the combined lengths of all the buffers in the list.
Less opaque
Let `testPath` be `undefined` so the path will be taken from the active `TextEditor`
Let the component unmount before propagating the final message change to the model, So the subsequent change event avoids re-rendering this component.
Let the drag handler handle this.
Let the watchman Client find the watchman binary via the default env PATH.
Let's guess where it is
Let's just console log it anyway.
Let's leave the scopeChain empty for now.
Let's mock it so that we can run the tests.
Let's return a descriptive comment then.
Let's the build system minify keys without losing the ability to dynamically use key strings as values themselves.
Leverage the exponentiation by squaring algorithm for a faster repeat.
Lexing/Compiling
Licensed under the MIT License.
Lie about our children to prevent expanding on double click and to collapse shorthands.
Lie about our children to prevent expanding on double click and to collapse subproperties.
Life cycle and private methods below.
Lightweight form of highlight -- proceed over this line and update state, but don't save a style array.
Like .check, except that failure triggers an AssertionError.
Like Array.prototype.some, the final result is either true or false to indicates whether the callback returned true for any element or not.
Like GNU ncurses "clear" command.
Like JavaScript's built-in Error class, but supports a "cause" argument and a printf-style message.
Like JavaScript's built-in Error class, but supports a "cause" argument which is wrapped, not "folded in" as with VError.
Like ModuleSpecifier, except type:"ExportSpecifier" and buildable.
Like ModuleSpecifier, except type:"ImportSpecifier" and buildable.
Like Object.keys, but aware of what fields each AST type should have.
Like `Rx.Observable.fromPromise`, but the resulting Observable sequence does not automatically complete once the promise resolves.
Like `String.prototype.join` except for SourceNodes.
Like `addAllParentDirectoriesToCache`, except it removes all parent directories.
Like a ball
Like images etc.
Like most implementations of mkdirp, if it fails, it is possible that directories were created for some prefix of the given path.
Like slide.chain, but runs all commands even if they have errors, also throws away results.
Like this: /
Likely requires a fix to 'request'.
Likewise for "asdf"in obj.
Likewise, within the root use the property to efficiently find the needed node
Limit that we get worried about randomness.
Limit the length of uris and headers to avoid a DoS attack on string matching
Limit the number of active Clang servers.
Limit the number of dividers to one per pixel.
Limit the total memory usage of all Clang servers.
Limits async function execution parallelism to only one at a time.
Limits the maximum number of characters that can be entered.
Line attributes
Line length settings.
Line/start/end are 1 based.
LineTerminator is an end of singleline comment
Linear inheritance hierarchy.
Lines are stored 0-based
Lines count as hidden when they are part of a visual line that starts with another line, or when they are entirely covered by collapsed, non-widget span.
Lines of context to show around each preview block.
Lines with gutter elements, widgets or a background class need to be wrapped, and have the extra elements added to the wrapper div
Link exists, check if it points to a folder that still exists
Link globally
Link locally
Link to the project's GitHub page: https://github.com/pickhardt/coffeescript-codemirror-mode
Linter APIs, for compatibility with the Atom linter package.
List all of the counters that have been created.
List extracted from the atom-styleguide package.
List of bookmarks at this revision.
List of children that will be moved or removed.
List of items that have been added to this context menu in the order they were added.
List of most recently used query strings, used for pruning the result cache.
List of segments where each segment is a continuous chunk.
List of supported methods.
List only 1 level deep dependencies
ListView - A core component designed for efficient display of vertically scrolling lists of changing data.
ListView can be notified when a row is being highlighted by calling highlightRow function.
ListView wraps ScrollView and so takes on its properties.
Listed in order of severity.
Listen for 'next', 'error', and 'completed' events.
Listen for a single message, and resolve or reject a promise on that message.
Listen for connections.
Listen for file tree context menu file item events to open the diff view.
Listen for in-editor context menu item diff view open command.
Listen for menu item workspace diff view open command.
Listen for removed connections and kill the debugger if it is using that connection.
Listen for run events on directories in the file tree
Listen for run events on files in the file tree
Listen for switching to editor mode for the active file.
Listen for watcher changes to route them to watched files and directories.
Listen to DOM events during the bubble phase.
Listen to DOM events during the capture phase.
Listen to incoming messages
Listen to the close event instead of exit They are similar but close ensures that streams are flushed
Listen to wheel events in order to try and update the viewport on time.
Listeners and IDs are two parallel arrays that are always in sync.
Listening to the `notification` event and invoking `popInitialNotification` is sufficient
Listens to window scroll and resize events.
Literal types.
Little red bubble that sits at the top right of the icon.
Load 1 story with message
Load 2 stories without message
Load `namespaces`.
Load any missing dependencies in the given tree
Load any packages that might have been passed in from the command line.
Load development dependencies into the given tree
Load entry module and return exports
Load expensive libs so we don't skew the results.
Load feature deserializers and require them.
Load modules
Load nuclide-node-transpiler to start transpiling.
Load plugins
Load service configs, and resolve all of the paths to absolute paths.
Load the "config.gypi" file that was generated during "configure".
Load the definitions, cached by their resolved file path.
Load the file contents locally or remotely.
Load the module directly from a string,
Load the service parser module.
Load waitsForPromise into global.
Loading has completed.
Local variable so that the type refinement holds in the onClick handler.
Localstorage attempts to return the localstorage.
Locate or create the new tail.
Locate the root containing the tracked node efficiently by using the child-derived containsTrackedNode property
Log an error and proceed as usual.
Log error and mark the directory as dirty so the failed subscription will be attempted again next time the directory is expanded.
Log the error and continue the server crash.
Logic to work around this issue: https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/10952.
Logs an observable to the console.
Lone high surrogates
Lone low surrogates
Long Package Names
Long filenames should not break stuff.
Long format for `ms`.
Long option
Long resume.
Longer than DEBOUNCE_INTERVAL so when we wait for this amount of time, a debounced event will be emitted.
Look at the previous children and classify any removed scenes as `stale`.
Look for ARG_ENABLE or ARG_WITH calls
Look for a manually provided compilation database.
Look for a nearby BUCK or TARGETS file.
Look for exact match.
Look for extraneous resolutions
Look for presence match, e.g. in 'static method in FooBarClass'.
Look for the first colon after the start of the current method.
Look here: https://github.com/facebook/nuclide/blob/master/pkg/nuclide-diagnostics-provider-base/ for a complete list of options.
Look in the nearest node_modules directory for react-native and extract the packager script if it's found.
Look into how to fix this.
Look up the gadget.
Look up the keys of the object.
Look up the name of a key as indicated by an event object.
Look up the service function.
Look up whether this option is 'selected' via context
Looks for a node with the given URI in the sub branch - returns null if not found
Looks for a node with the given URI in the sub branch - returns the deepest found ancesstor of the node being looked for.
Looks like a bug to me, although it's probably a harmless one.
Looks like emitAllMessages does not actually emit all messages.
Looks up the plugin for the supplied event.
Looks up the value identified by `key` in `state.data`.
Lookup module names and resolve them by calling the definition function if needed.
Lookup the MIME type for a file path/extension.
Loop over that, wrapping quotes around any that have spaces, and writing them to stdout.
Loop through children appending to the array until we hit depth
Loop through the hierarchy, in case there's any nested components.
Looseness is ignored here.
Low-level API into merlin service useful for debugging and for prototyping on top of bleeding edge Merlin branches.
Lurking file should have been removed
MAC normalization format version
MD5 hash function for Node.js.
MDN says that any new values should be appended to existing values.
MISC UTILITIES Number of pixels added to scroller and sizer to hide scrollbar
MODE DEFINITION AND QUERYING Known modes, by name and by MIME
MODE STATE HANDLING Utility functions for working with state.
MOUSE EVENTS Return true when the given mouse event happened in a widget
Magic theory: IE8 supposedly differentiates between added and updated nodes when processing innerHTML, innerHTML on updated nodes suffers from worse whitespace behavior.
Magnitude of offset indicates the number of offset lines required for version.
Main world context should always go first.
Maintain a list of states to process after each read completes.
Maintain iOS 7 compatibility which doesn't have JS typed arrays.
Maintain the order fetched from the FS
Maintains a map from the client id to the server id of optimistically added nodes
Make "aSourceFile" relative if an absolute Url is passed.
Make "sourceFile" relative if an absolute Url is passed.
Make Array say that they are Array
Make RQLTransform ignore this call.
Make RegExps say that they are RegExps
Make `delete` a no-op to effectively create a read-only buffer.
Make a PropertyPreview from the RemoteObject similar to the backend logic.
Make a caret selection inside the new element if there isn't a range selection and there isn't already a caret selection inside.
Make a copy because shiftRight is destructive
Make a group TreeElement now that there are 2 profiles.
Make a path relative to a URL or another path.
Make absolutely sure the calling code does not attempt to reprint any nodes.
Make an HEAD request to the source
Make an rs_signer for HMACs, not a rs_signFunc -- HMACs digest their data in chunks rather than requiring it all to be given in one go at the end, so they are more similar to signers than signFuncs.
Make any React component Animatable.
Make black quotes.
Make both sides relayout boundaries.
Make canonical dir relative
Make dates with properties first say the date
Make equalTo implicitly true if it wasn't specified there is no other operator.
Make error with message first say the error
Make fs.stat take 100ms to return its data This is important because, in a test scenario where we're statting the same exact file rapid-fire like this, it'll end up being cached by the FS, and never trigger the race condition we're trying to expose.
Make functions say that they are functions
Make it a const for Flow
Make it easier to expect prop values.
Make it so all of the test paths are deemed within the repo.
Make n - 1 resizers for n columns.
Make relative option true by default when used with paths
Make root dominator of orphans.
Make setTimeout work as expected.
Make sure ProfilesPanel is initialized and CPUProfileType is created.
Make sure a close event on the old socket doesn't have any effect on the reconnect with a new socket.
Make sure a non-zero number of paths have been specified.
Make sure all of the pane items reflect the current state of the app.
Make sure all previous requests are caught up first.
Make sure at least one highlight is visible.
Make sure cache gets reset.
Make sure default populate won't take action.
Make sure different git references get different folders
Make sure elementForSelection is not a child of attributeValueElement.
Make sure existing environment vars don't muck up the test
Make sure it rolled back the deleted edge from indices map
Make sure it's protocol-specific
Make sure main is first in the children list.
Make sure main is the first in the children list.
Make sure navigation completed and possible console messages were pushed.
Make sure only one file watcher is created.
Make sure pauses didn't stick skipped.
Make sure that at the end of the operation the current cursor is shown.
Make sure that none of the executors overlapped.
Make sure that once we render once, we stay rendered even if incrementalGroupEnabled gets flipped.
Make sure that the "type" field was filled automatically.
Make sure that the quotes match up.
Make sure that this path refers specifically to a Node, rather than some non-Node subproperty of a Node.
Make sure that we don't sit around waiting for lock files
Make sure that whether the fetch succeeds or fails, the _pendingFetch field is cleared.
Make sure the `yes` process actually terminates.
Make sure the bidirectional communication channel is set up before resolving this Promise.
Make sure the bidirectional communication channel is set up before sending data.
Make sure the file watcher event runs through the system before we rebuild the bundles.
Make sure the gutters options contains the element "CodeMirror-linenumbers" when the lineNumbers option is true.
Make sure the process is killed when we get it.
Make sure the work units get done in order
Make sure the worker is loaded.
Make sure there is a new line at the end.
Make sure there's a "top" to link to.
Make sure these are actually pane item containers:
Make sure this is cached.
Make sure times is a number
Make sure to do this after saving in the scope map.
Make sure to fire the mostRecentEventCount first so it is already set on native when the text value is set.
Make sure we allow at least one server to stay alive.
Make sure we always return the smallest of these.
Make sure we call onEndReached exactly once every time we reach the end.
Make sure we didn't create any zero-length spans
Make sure we don't try get flags for non-source files.
Make sure we get the graceful-fs that fstream is using.
Make sure we have a chance to update all existing widgets.
Make sure we have a worker to run the JS.
Make sure we installed local version of react-native
Make sure we invalidate the messages for the current path.
Make sure we return at least the __dataID__.
Make the Changes and trigger the moveToNextCallback after updating.
Make the archive lower case to match against the types This ensures that upper-cased extensions work
Make the drawer take the entire screen and draw the background of the status bar to allow it to open over the status bar.
Make the new number and constrain it to a precision of 6, this matches numbers the engine returns.
Make the right pane 2/3 the width of the parent since console output is generally wider than the test tree.
Make the transfer.
Make the whole process to fail fast
Make these modules available to the schema author through a require shim.
Make this a bit more than the actual debounce time.
Makes any easing function symmetrical.
Makes sure a certain child node is present in the file tree, creating all its ancestors, if needed and scheduling a chilld key fetch.
Makes sure a specific child exists for a given node.
Makes sure we update cursor and id to index map correctly based on removal time.
Makes use of `Map`'s insertion ordering, so values are irrelevant and always set to `null`.
Manages the IDs assigned to DOM representations of React components.
Managing Cursor Position
Managing Enabled Themes
Managing Grammars
Managing Keyboard Events
Managing Keymap Files
Managing Paths
Managing Settings
Managing Syntax Scopes
Manipulate the cache and check if it resolves for the cached ones
Manually manage hover highlight since :hover does not work in case of click-and-hold menu invocation.
Manually manipulate the menu template order.
Manually resolve all default Babel plugins.
Manually shift all values starting at the index back to the beginning of the queue.
Manufactures the absolute path of a file that should pass as being within the repo.
Many are trivial to parse, some require a bit of complexity.
Many files being changed may be a sign that we are picking up changes that were created in an automated way -- so in addition, there may be many batches of changes in succession.
Many host objects are `Object` objects that can coerce to strings despite having improperly defined `toString` methods.
Many people use restrict_root_files so watchman only will watch folders that have those listed files in them.
Map an application action to an Array of tracking events.
Map annotations with title/subtitle.
Map application actions to tracking events.
Map contains a key corresponding to our fragment
Map data set into arrays of values keyed by distinct keyColumn values and columns.
Map does not contain a key corresponding to our fragment
Map from fake arc config dir to fake files within it.
Map from full process name to binary that starts the process We can't just re-use full process name, because it will spawn a new instance of the app every time
Map from property "standard name" to an object with info about how to set the property in the DOM.
Map keyword names to token types.
Map objects are collections of key/value pairs where both the keys and values may be arbitrary ECMAScript language values.
Map of a TextEditor to its BlameGutter, if it exists.
Map of a TextEditor to the subscription on its ::onDidDestroy.
Map of directory path to the number of modified files within that directory.
Map uses `Map`'s insertion ordering to keep files in order.
Mapping from class specification keys to special processing functions.
Mapping from event name to dispatch config
Mapping from lowercase property names to the properly cased version, used to warn in the case of missing properties.
Mapping from normalized, camelcased property names to a configuration that specifies how the associated DOM property should be accessed or rendered.
Mapping from parent IDs to initial child orderings.
Mapping from reactRootID to React component instance.
Mapping from reactRootID to `container` nodes.
Mapping from registration name to event name
Mapping from registration name to plugin module
Mappings do not contain a field for the last generated columnt.
Mappings end at eol
Maps Dbgp properties to/from Chrome RemoteObjects.
Maps a URL to an identifier.
Maps a string key to a simple callback that should return a string payload to be attached to a bug report.
Maps children that are typically specified as `props.children`.
Maps clang's cursor types to the actual declaration types: for a full list see https://github.com/llvm-mirror/clang/blob/master/include/clang/Basic/DeclNodes.td
Maps flow root to the set of file paths under that root for which we have ever reported diagnostics.
Maps hack config dir to HackConnection
Maps hack root to the set of file paths under that root for which we have ever reported diagnostics.
Mark a component as needing a rerender, adding an optional callback to a list of functions which will be executed once the rerender occurs.
Mark a given record as having received data for a deferred fragment.
Mark a given record as having received data for a fragment.
Mark all edges with given id to be deleted.
Mark all non-required deps as extraneous.
Mark as a direct dep of root
Mark as being fetched
Mark as conflicted so that the resolution is not removed
Mark as extraneous at this point.
Mark as updated only if a record exists in both the store and disk cache.
Mark each root dependency as targets
Mark endpoint as unresolvable if the parent is also unresolvable
Mark incompatibles
Mark records as created/updated as necessary.
Mark text editors with a working provider with a special CSS class.
Mark that a method should not be used.
Mark the component as having rendered to null.
Mark the currently valid edge with given id to be deleted.
Mark the most recent observation regardless of if we can lock the navigator.
Mark the name as extra, since the ID is more important.
Mark the root direct children as affected.
Mark the selectors in group if necessary.
Mark this as a match
Mark this fragment for inclusion only if the given variable is falsy.
Mark this fragment for inclusion only if the given variable is truthy.
Mark this usage of the fragment as deferred.
Mark top fragment as local, and child fragment as non-local.
Markers are ordered in ascending order by line number.
Markers have links back to the lines they currently touch.
Marks it as done when the promise returned by the given function is resolved or rejected.
Marshal an object using the appropriate marshal function.
Marshal the result, to send over the network.
Marshalling an unexpected value throws.
Match array operator
Match object operator
Matches a hunk summary line as specified in the unified diff format.
Matches something like: textA: or textA:textB:
Matches starting with the prefix gets the highest score.
Math minus sign, same width as plus.
Maximum date.
Maximum depth of traversals before we consider the possibility of a bad ID.
Maximum number of levels to traverse.
Maximum number of results to render in the table before truncating and displaying a "Max results reached" message.
Maximum number of rows to render while scrolling, i.e. the window size.
Maximum size of area that can be displayed.
May be ToastAndroid.SHORT or ToastAndroid.LONG
May be undefined in tests.
May not be consistent between clang versions.
May not send/recieve messages.
May only call when in paused state.
Maybe the user just deactivated that package.
Meaning is "at least and backwards compatible with"
Meaning is "reasonably at or greater than"
Meaning that the markers we place here may be in the wrong place already.
Means that something is not allowed.
Meant to be called from parseTypeAnnotation.
Meant to make it simple and easy for a DiagnosticProvider to subscribe to relevant events.
Measure a bunch of lines, for browsers that compute fractional heights.
Measure width to pretty-print the output
Measured in DIP.
Measured layout will be only available when the component is mounted.
Measurement can be split in two steps, the set-up work that applies to the whole line, and the measurement of the actual character.
Measurement may not have returned yet.
Measures multiple methods of a class.
Measures the `HitRect` node on activation.
Media Query Inspector.
Memoizes the `RelayQueryFragment` equivalent of a given GraphQL fragment for the given route, variables, and deferred status.
Memoizes the return value of a function that accepts one string argument.
Mercurial creates the .hg/wlock file before it modifies the working directory, and deletes it when it's done.
Mercurial history emails can be invalid.
Merely touch starting is not sufficient for a scroll view to become the responder.
Merge Tail into tree.
Merge all the properties of source into target, source wins in conflict, and by default null and undefined from source are applied
Merge common CLI options into the config
Merge dependants
Merge head component with prevIncompletedMessage if needed.
Merge in the feature's config
Merge this change into the last event
Merge two objects, but throw if both contain the same key.
Merge with the next range.
Merge with the pending element if it exists, otherwise with existing element props.
Merges a given arguments of maps into one Map, with the latest maps overriding the values of the prior maps.
Merges a partial update into a set of variables.
Merges existing value with input value, assuming they are stringified json.
Merges existing values with input values, assuming they are stringified json.
Merges new props and state, notifies delegate methods of update and performs update.
Merges the file change statuses of the dirty filesystem state with the revision changes, where dirty changes and more recent revisions take priority in deciding which status a file is in.
Merges the offset value into the base value and resets the offset to zero.
Merges the prop stack with the default values.
Merges the results of a single top-level field into the store.
Message is displayed above the input.
Message order within a provider is respected.
Message will remain unchaged if not provided.
MessageChannels are desirable because they give direct access to the HTML task queue, are implemented in Internet Explorer 10, Safari 5.0-1, and Opera 11-12, and in web workers in many engines.
Messaging the User
Method definitions don't have the function keyword.
Methods and props used by native Animated impl
Methods for injecting dependencies.
Methods from the PendingTransaction interface.
Microsoft Azure absolute filepath
Might be a file drop, in which case we simply extract the text and insert it.
Might be a text scaling operation, clear size caches.
Might be not known for cached resources with null responses.
Might have already been rolled back via `onFailure`.
Might have been detached already.
Mimic the loading state where `dir1` reports itself as expanded but has no children yet.
Mimics empty from PHP.
Minimal default mode.
Minimally validate the parsed object
Minimize new string creation.
Minimum date.
Minimum size of area that can be displayed.
Minimum width of the comments or code pane, in pixels.
Missing `__range__`
Missing `body.text` on the comment.
Missing `comments.count` in store
Missing `doesViewerLike` in store
Missing `edge_id`
Missing `hometownid`
Missing `isVerified` in the first element.
Missing `name`
Missing `sn2`
Missing edges due to non-empty `diffCalls`.
Missing the actor node.
Mix in a 32-bit integer into the pool
Mixed is safer than any, but that safety comes from Flow forcing you to inspect a mixed value at runtime before using it.
Mixers shouldn't access them - not even to provide them as callback handlers.
Mixin helper which handles policy validation and reserved specification keys when building React classses.
Mixin options into this
Mixin subclasses
Mixin that can be integrated in order to handle scrolling that plays well with `ResponderEventPlugin`.
Mobile Safari does not fire properly bubble click events on non-interactive elements, which means delegated click listeners do not fire.
Mock 2 hack languages
Mock `Date.now` to use the fake Jasmine clock so `advanceClock` can be called synchronously and call appropriate callbacks deterministically.
Mock a diagnostic provider with 2 flow roots, sharing common file real paths.
Mock a diagnostic provider with 2 hack language roots, sharing common file real paths.
Mock authenticated ID
Mock object to simulate the behavior of a request.
Mock out the dependency on fb-watchman.
Mock the `publishMessageInvalidation` call to capture call arguments.
Mock the call, return false for this test.
Mock the call, return true for this test.
Mock the resolver factory to always return a resolver for the test package
Mock the services we use.
Mock todo data
Mock user data
Mock watcher service handlers registry.
Model types
Moderately fast, high quality
Modern browser with input or textarea.
Modified events could be late that it doesn't capture the latest edits/ state changes.
Modifier key presses don't count as 'real' key presses for the purpose of keymap fallthrough.
Modify the URL to make sure we get the inline source map.
Modular reduction using "classic" algorithm
Module build commands
Module built ins.
Module capable of getting the configuration that should be used for the `rn-cli`.
Module dependencies.
Module exports.
Module for creating composite components.
Module that is injectable into `EventPluginHub`, that specifies a deterministic ordering of `EventPlugin`s.
Module that provides a function for creating a unique identifier.
Module variables.
Modules required for integration tests
Monkey patch applyIgnores such that we get hold of all ignored files
Monkey patch source to file://
Monkey-patching lets developers work on Nuclide in the same way as any other Atom package.
Montgomery reduction
Month 0 is January.
More Complex Objects.
More complex types.
More opaque
More recent revision changes takes priority in specifying a files' statuses.
Most default values are '' or false, but not all.
Most field types are already tested in the normal read function above.
Most likely no package.json so just set default name
Most likely, this is an invalid target, so do nothing.
Most of the external API clips given positions to make sure they actually exist within the document.
Most of the methods defined on the Doc type are also injected into CodeMirror.prototype, for backwards compatibility and convenience.
Most providers will include a set of grammarScopes, and will therefore get notifications only about TextEditors that are associated with those grammarScopes.
Most simple solution here to `resume` data stream, instead of dump it, otherwise we'll never get a data.
Most subclasses shouldn't need to extend this method.
Most types of statements are recognized by the keyword they start with.
Mostly S5.1.2 and S5.2.3:
Mostly implements https://atom.io/docs/api/latest/Directory
Mostly implements https://atom.io/docs/api/latest/File
Mostly just for testing and legacy API reasons
Mostly, this is here so that reading a dir with a socket in it doesn't blow up.
Mounted rows always form a contiguous block so it is expressed as a range of start plus count.
Mounting is the process of initializing a React component by creating its representative DOM elements and inserting them into a supplied `container`.
Mounts a child with the supplied name.
Mounts this component and inserts it into the DOM.
Move a module from one point in the node_modules tree to another.
Move it down vertically so it does not end up under the mouse pointer.
Move selection up and down.
Move shallow copy items to storage
Move the cursor to right after the inserted colon.
Move the cursor to the end of the function body.
Move the first profile to the group.
Move the hidden textarea near the cursor to prevent scrolling artifacts
Move the last profile out of its group and remove the group.
Move this left of the toolbar, when it is on the right.
Move through initial spaces if any.
Move to the next token
Moved around its parent to cover visible view.
Moves a child component to the supplied index.
Moves current to the previous entry.
Moves cursor to specific position
Moves the selection one node down.
Moves the selection one node up.
Moves to the next entry.
Moving From the "New Attribute" position.
Moving from "New Attribute" that holds new value
Moving from "New Attribute" that was not edited
Moving to top gives errors due to NativeModules not being initialized
Mozilla/Netscape seems to prefer am3
Multiple children of the same name become arrays.
Multiple lines may point to the same marker when it spans across lines.
Multiple parameters with the first being a format string.
Multiplying by the inverse is used in matrix math instead of division.
Must add first to prevent the ServerConnection from going away in a possible race.
Must be a path to a directory, not a file.
Must be completely driven by an external clock signal, all that's stored here is timerID, timer type, and callback.
Must be either 3, or 5, or 6.
Must be implemented by subclasses.
Must be one or the other.
Must be unique to the provider.
Must be unique.
Must contain a .hg-rename folder.
Must guard against an unmounted component here.
Must not be a mouse in or mouse out - ignoring.
Must not be used by any another gutter in this TextEditor.
Must not change target assignment
Must not have duplicate values in any alternate.
Must return true if embedded in a native platform scroll view.
Must return true to start the process of `Touchable`.
Must use `global` instead of `window` to work in both frames and web workers.
Must use arrow here to get correct 'this'
Must use lazy require to get the spied version.
Mutates and returns a nested `SplitQueries` structure, updating any deferred "ref queries" to actually reference their contexts.
Mutating Text
Mutating the event's members allows us to not have to create a wrapping "dispatch" object that pairs the event with the listener.
MutationObservers are desirable because they have high priority and work reliably everywhere they are implemented.
Mutations and subscriptions must have a concrete type due to the need for requisite top-level fields.
Mutations to this object fires off high level events to listeners such as UI controllers, giving them a chance to update.
Mutations with the same collision are sent to the server serially and in-order to avoid unpredictable and potentially incorrect behavior.
NB: Taken straight from: https://github.com/IvanVergiliev/2048-react/blob/master/src/board.js with no modification except to format it for CommonJS and fix lint/flow errors
NB: This is a pretty rare edge case.
NB: this measures wall-clock time, not the time between bytes sent by the server.
NEVER DO THIS.
NM is NativeModule
NOTE: Call `_setDebugEventListener` before all other changes in Debug Context.
NOTE: Does not invoke the callback on the nearest common ancestor because nothing "entered" or "left" that element.
NOTE: Early return to implement immutable `.size` in DEV.
NOTE: Generated fields might get in the way.
NOTE: If the given record is still referenced, no records are collected.
NOTE: If there is no other `error` listeners handling of `error` event changes program behavior We won't to destroy app on each failed request, but we need to notify user about unhandled `error` event.
NOTE: If there is no other `response` listeners handling of `response` event changes program behavior Without our listener all data will be dumped, but we pause data by our listener.
NOTE: Null values reduce hidden classes.
NOTE: On Android, only GET and POST are supported.
NOTE: On Android, this can only be used with GET requests.
NOTE: On Android, this can only be used with POST requests.
NOTE: Scroll events do not bubble.
NOTE: The order of the mappings is NOT guaranteed.
NOTE: There is no `componentDidUnmount` since your component will have been destroyed by that point.
NOTE: These checks are imperfect because we cannot trace fragment spreads.
NOTE: This file cannot `require` any other modules.
NOTE: This file is run as-is from Node, which is why we do not use let or Flow types.
NOTE: This is in addition to the standard set of "built-in" modules.
NOTE: This is part of `updateChildren` and is here for readability.
NOTE: This is specifically for use in Diff View, so don't expose a menu item.
NOTE: This is used by external open source projects.
NOTE: This lazily detects which wraps are necessary for the current browser.
NOTE: This may contain spoilers for the original Star Wars trilogy.
NOTE: This method will fail if the system doesn't know how to open the specified URL.
NOTE: This traversal happens on IDs without touching the DOM.
NOTE: This will not work correctly for non-generic events such as `change`, `reset`, `load`, `error`, and `select`.
NOTE: Two fragments in the same scope will have different names.
NOTE: We can step in this function only if `afterCompile` event is broken This is issue for node v0.12: https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/25266
NOTE: Will also mutate the incoming definitions in place to make them easier to marshal.
NOTE: `IntentAndroid` is being deprecated.
NOTE: `LinkingIOS` is being deprecated.
NOTE: `VibrationIOS` is being deprecated.
NOTE: `arguments` has a very significant performance penalty, which is why we don't support unlimited arguments.
NOTE: `segments.edges.node` is scalar.
NOTE: falls through to _var
NOTE: localizedString has not yet been added.
NOTE: menuitem's close tag should be omitted, but that causes problems.
NOTE: this can get identifiers that are declared, if you want access to identifiers that are access but undeclared see getUndeclaredIdentifiers
NOTE: this can get types that are declared, if you want access to types that are used but undeclared see getUndeclaredTypes
NOTE: this constructor is not exported
NOTE: this method currently ignores the passed-in text, and instead diffs against the currently saved contents of the file.
NOTE: we might not have any clue what we think it is, for example if the user just did `npm install ./foo.tgz`
NOTE: we're not reading the project's .babelrc here.
NaN is poisonous.
Name of the saved connection profile.
Named types are represented as Generic types with no type parameters.
Names modeled after https://github.com/facebook/flow/blob/master/src/common/flowExitStatus.ml
Native Attributes
Native Components
Native component will handle positioning of elements, so it's not important to offset them correctly.
Native method references for those with the same name as other `lodash` methods.
Native method references.
Native methods mixin.
Navigate forward to a new route
Navigate forward to a new scene, squashing any scenes that you could `jumpForward` to.
Navigate the code iframe to the given url and update the code popout link.
Navigate to a new scene and reset route stack.
Navigation State
Navigation to the new backend process.
NavigationAction
NavigationAnimatedValue
NavigationEvent shall be disposed after being emitted by `NavigationEventEmitter`.
NavigationFindReducer takes an array of reducers, and returns a reducer that iterates through all of the reducers and the result of the first reducer that modifies the input
NavigationLayout
NavigationLegacyNavigator is meant to replace Navigator seemlessly with minimum API changes.
NavigationPanPanHandlers
NavigationParentState
NavigationScene
NavigationSceneRendererProps
NavigationState
NavigatorIOS uses "route" objects to identify child views, their props, and navigation bar configuration.
NavigatorIOS will automatically provide "route" and "navigator" components
NavigatorIOS wraps UIKit navigation and allows you to add back-swipe functionality across your app.
Necessary so the type refinement holds in the callback later
Need a leading 0 to prevent sign extension
Need to actually print the query to see this invariant.
Need to call q.process once per concurrent worker to preserve full concurrency after pause
Need to check for null explicitly.
Need to chmodr before removing..at least on windows because .git has some read only files
Need to create a resolution response to pass to the bundler to process requires after transform.
Need to guard against this possibility.
Need to handle surrogate pairs.
Need to make sure we don't render more than one new row at a time, but don't want to render past the end of the data.
Need to restore attributes structure.
Need to send modules to the client in an order it can process them: if a new dependency graph was uncovered because a new dependency was added, the file that was changed, which is the root of the dependency tree that will be sent, needs to be the last module that gets processed.
Need to set message again because it is not enumerable in some cases
Need to subtract 2: one to move from 1-indexed to 0-indexed, another to account for the open paren we had to add on the first line.
Need to synthesize an Error object from its JSON representation.
Need to wait for the event loop to flush before continuing.
Needed so stdout/stderr are available.
Needed to handle Tab key in KHTML
Needed to hide big blue blinking cursor on Mobile Safari
Needs to be a boolean, but autocomplete-plus gives us undefined instead of false.
Needs to be the same as glyph-height in gutter.atom-text-editor.less.
Negative zero.
Neither PASS nor FAIL, so wait for more messages.
Neither the name of Apple Computer, Inc.
Neither the name of Salesforce.com nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
Network requests
Never added
Never forget.
Never generate synthetic shorthands when no value is available.
Never move original objects, clone them
Never preview prototype properties, turn lossy.
Never remove a multiHardBreak.
Never render functions in object preview, turn lossy
Never resolve this, so we know that no suggestion is set.
Never return 0 as otherwise equal records would be merged.
Never sends an empty string.
Never treat objects as equal - their properties might change over time.
Nevertheless, we need it to access the deepest dom element receiving DOM events.
Nevertheless, we return a new JSON object here to protect the cached source map from outside modification.
New browsers have a path attribute on native events
New edge will replace previous edge that have the same id.
New edges will replace previous edges in the range.
New entries can be pushed on the stack.
New format.
New origin might need creating a higher root.
New properties applied via up/down or live editing have an _originalPropertyText and will be deleted later on, if cancelled, when the empty string gets applied as their style text.
New selection, which happens on user interaction via select and collapse, resets the tracked node.
New size might need creating a higher root.
New versions
New versions of the toolbar use negative priority to push icons to the far end.
New's precedence is slightly tricky.
Next attempt will start reporting download progress immediately
Next test interleaved
Next try arcanist relative.
Next we need to exclude the closing ` from the .loc of the last quasi element, in case the parser accidentally decided to include it.
Next, get Z scale and normalize 3rd row.
Next, merge those two ends
Next, remove those actual ranges.
Nice for doing trailing effects.
No API exists for adding breakpoints to source files that are not yet known, store it locally and try to add them later.
No `dataID`
No `id` or `__typename` fields
No `id` or `__typename` fields or responses
No `input` event will occur.
No arguments passed in - edit the name element by default.
No character is inserted, and no `input` event will occur.
No children to visit.
No contest: we have a leading comment.
No contest: we have a trailing comment.
No data for slot, request it.
No data or configuration is shared between instances.
No event is being processed at this time.
No existing element found, insert a new element.
No frame - sometimes happens when they come out of order, so just wait for the rest.
No funny business
No guarantees are made about when or how often this method is invoked, so it must not have side effects.
No json file was found, assume one
No keyboard shortcut for this.
No matter what notification we are in, dispatching onResize is not needed.
No matter what we do here, Atom is going to create a blank editor.
No more Nuclide events will be fired.
No more remaining code, continue
No need to compact the crumbs more.
No need to compact the crumbs, they all fit at full size.
No need to compute visible rows if there is no callback
No need to differentiate by extension, only one gets built.
No need to dispose of this subscription since we want to keep it for the entire life of this object.
No need to pop anything from newPath.stack or oldPath.stack, since newPath and oldPath are fresh local variables.
No need to recalculate this._sidebarSizeDIP and this._totalSizeDIP again.
No need to recurse, as the target alias definition will get validated seperately.
No need to reload scope variables, as the remote object never changes its properties.
No need to remove from the set explicitly since we do that on the marker's onDidDestroy handler.
No need to restore the original method since the constructor gets re-assigned every time in beforeEach
No need to sanitize if defined as a function
No need to send anything back to the user.
No need to wrap child nodes of a known concrete type.
No newline characters.
No next page means we have the very last edge.
No node added
No operation performed.
No other authentication
No other item will be selected if there aren't any other profiles, so make sure that view gets cleared when the last profile is removed.
No previous page means we have the very first edge.
No resolved fragment map at all
No space for the label, so no line as well.
No special handling needed for connections, edges, page_info etc.
No spies should immediately be called because there is no data in the store now.
No status code.
No tasks are executed unless `processNext` is called.
No valid "reactRoot" ID found, create one.
No validation
No values to return.
No-op for iOS, but used on the web.
No-op when `console.log` is not a "function".
Nobody is listening for the result of this expression.
Nobody is watching this expression anymore.
Node 1 is selected, node 2 is not selected
Node Props TODO: The desktop version of ART has title and cursor.
Node builtins
Node reads yield the `Record` associated with a supplied `dataID`, if found.
Node walkers.
Node-level changes will broadcast at the node ID.
Node.DOCUMENT_TYPE_NODE
Node.ELEMENT_NODE
Node.js 0.8 hack
Node.js crypto-based RNG - http://nodejs.org/docs/v0.6.2/api/crypto.html
Node/IO Core
NodeList in JSC is a function, check for array prior to this.
Non zero offset implies this block is neither a removal or an addition, and is thus equal in both versions of the document.
Non-animated styles are set using `setNativeProps`, no need to pass those as a part of the node config
Non-colliding keys: both transactions run.
Non-hidden keys of allFields.
Non-null iff we have entered distraction-free mode without explicitly exiting it.
Non-public interface for adding and removing lines.
Non-scalar types not in the map default to `deepDiffer`.
Non-scalars deoptimize `RelayContainer.shouldComponentUpdate`.
Non-standard APIs
Non-standard AST node type.
Non-standard Properties
Non-static edges
Non-zero length guarantees value max and min indices.
None of the input objects are modified.
None of the remaining cases matter if node is falsy.
Normal Block Grammar
Normal Inline Grammar
Normal behavior is to insert the new text into every selection
Normal drop Don't do a replace if the drop happened inside of the selected text.
Normal selection, as opposed to text dragging.
Normal string
Normalise plugin to an array.
Normalise slope
Normalize `args`, splitting joined short flags.
Normalize `path` relative to the current path.
Normalize by total number of samples accumulated.
Normalize inconsistent values reported by browsers due to implementations of a working draft specification.
Normalize main
Normalize these first so that future comparisons will succeed.
Normalizes a path, or the path portion of a URL:  - Replaces consequtive slashes with one slash.
Normally an ugly pattern, but calls to `requestAnimationFrame` cannot be canceled.
Normally can't print fields directly, so wrap it in a fake fragment.
Normally, we'd just disable the `UIScrollView`, but a touch has already began on it, the `UIScrollView` will not accept being disabled after that.
Not Modified
Not a DOMElement, therefore not a React component
Not a MethodDefinition.
Not a Node.
Not a semver
Not all URIs are actually URIs, so use regex for the treeish.
Not all bindings provide proper descriptors.
Not all directories on a host correspond to repositories that contain Hack code.
Not all fonts have a variant for each of the numeric values, in that case the closest one is chosen.
Not all native implementations support merge.
Not doing this results in an "Runtime.getProperties failed" error in node-inspector since that call is only valid during a paused state.
Not drawn yet
Not enough space even for minimum sizes.
Not enough time elapsed yet, wait for highlight - this is just a perf optimization.
Not every plugin in the ordering may be loaded at runtime.
Not guarded in a canDefineProperty check: IE8 supports defineProperty only on DOM elements
Not initialized yet.
Not on browser
Not only it's always potentially cacheable, but also always potenially new.
Not own constructor property must be Object
Not really an alias, but an iterating reference
Not really expecting this scope type here.
Not recommended: `observeStderr` provides more complete information.
Not recommended: `observeStdout` provides more complete information.
Not ref query dependencies:
Not supported
Not supported by all native implementations.
Not supported yet.
Not sure how to create any of these.
Not the responder
Not used in this test.
Notably, this value should be undefined if subscriptionRoot is the same as subscriptionPath.
Note stream._type is used for test-module-load-list.js
Note that "x.x" is a valid xRange identifer, meaning "any version" Only the first item is strictly required.
Note that 'shell' is not the public 'shell' package on npm but an Atom built-in.
Note that 0 pid also does not filter on process id.
Note that `Animated` is designed to be fully serializable so that animations can be run in a high performance way, independent of the normal JavaScript event loop.
Note that `mapData.length` should be computed on each iteration to support iterating over new items in the map that were added after the start of the iteration.
Note that `onDidChangeScrollTop` isn't technically in the public API.
Note that `pageInfo` also triggers the error...
Note that `this._scrollComponent` might not be a `ScrollView`, so we need to check that it responds to `getScrollResponder` before calling it.
Note that all line/column values are 1 based.
Note that all line/column values are 1-based.
Note that as of 5.8.14, there is a bug with parsing optional props in Babel.
Note that due to our own strict renaming rules, this must be a private method instead of a static function becuase of the access to _menuOptions and _items.
Note that failure is an acceptable option here, since the only result will be a stale cache for some helper commands.
Note that for multiline fields, setting blurOnSubmit to true means that pressing return will blur the field and trigger the onSubmitEditing event instead of inserting a newline into the field.
Note that if the record is known to be deleted in the store then it will have been been marked as created already.
Note that if the tracked query doesn't have the field then we can't validate.
Note that if you are using them, the title and selectedIcon will be overridden with the system ones.
Note that in edge cases, some architecture components instance's in-memory cache might be skipped.
Note that it is possible that this method can return false in cases where `equals` would return true.
Note that it is very inefficient to transfer large quantities of binary data between JS and native code, so you should avoid calling this more than necessary.
Note that it's important we be able to open and then close within a single cycle of this loop.
Note that it's possible to scroll faster than rows can be rendered.
Note that lazily loaded modules won't be able to consume platform events from their actions.
Note that long tokens in a help string can go past this.
Note that none of these types are buildable because the Mozilla Parser API doesn't specify any builder functions, and nobody uses E4X anymore.
Note that normally, tokens simply exist as properties on the parser object.
Note that on iOS 8 and earlier, only the standard PinColor constants are supported for regular pins.
Note that only JSON-compliant objects are currently supported, as there's no provision for traversing prototypes, extracting class names via constructor, handling properties or functions.
Note that options does NOT include 'encoding' this ensures that the return value is always a Buffer and never a string.
Note that providing the name argument is not necessary in most cases.
Note that regardless of `interspersed` the presence of '--' will stop option parsing, as all good option parsers should.
Note that required fields may be missing if the fragment was not fetched with `Relay.Store.primeCache` or `Relay.Store.forceFetch` before creating a subscription.
Note that rows must be the same height when they are re-mounted as when they are unmounted otherwise the content will jump around.
Note that running includes the state where there are no connections.
Note that scalar plural fields are handled by `_diffScalar`.
Note that service being non-null only verifies that the nuclide-server that corresponds to the directory has the HackService registered: it does not guarantee that the specified directory is searchable via Hack.
Note that the children may be a combination of PagedObjectIds and SinglePageObjectIds.
Note that the children of PagedObjectIds may be a combination of SinglePageObjectIds and PagedObjectIds.
Note that the children of an ElementRange may be aggregated into ranges whose size is larger than the debuggeee pagesize.
Note that the inverse - attempt to resolve based on fragment plurarity - doesn't work because there's no way convert plural ids to singular w/o losing data.
Note that the module JSTimers is split into two in order to solve a cycle in dependencies.
Note that the only major, minor, patch, and pre-release sections of the version string are capturing groups.
Note that the range property of the event is undocumented.
Note that the root is filtered from the dependants as well as other dependants marked to be uninstalled
Note that the save and find-related commands aren't defined by default.
Note that the scores are different: 0 represents the best match while larger numbers are worse.
Note that the stack will be restored to its original state after the callback is finished, so it is probably a mistake to retain a reference to the path.
Note that the state variable would need to be updated as the user selects a value and changes the index, as shown in the example below.
Note that the visitor object is the prototype of Context.prototype, so all visitor methods are inherited by context objects.
Note that these could occur in different files.
Note that they are not supported in Glob itself anyway.
Note that this API will add a Date header if it's not already set.
Note that this API will fully validate the Authorization header, and throw on any error.
Note that this allows an extension to ordinary LinterProviders.
Note that this can only be false if styleAttr is Horizontal.
Note that this class also provides support for submenu items.
Note that this combined with `maxNumToRender` and the number of rows that can fit in one screen will determine how many rows to render above the viewport.
Note that this does not recurse, so the algorithm will always terminate.
Note that this doesn't apply for the header of the current view, but the ones of the views that are pushed afterward.
Note that this expects indentation to already have been taken into account when breaking, just not resolved yet.
Note that this function assumes node EventEmitter semantics: namely, that adding the same combination of eventName and callback adds a second listener.
Note that this has no effect unless `showsUserLocation` is enabled.
Note that this is a "flattened" array and your defined getters and setters won't be invoked when you interact with the returned Array.
Note that this is a copy of the internal array used for storing the members so that no one can mess with internal state.
Note that this is date will be displayed in the local time zone of the viewer rather than that of the author of the commit.
Note that this list does not get sorted: only a filtered version of it does.
Note that this may be asynchronous, or synchronous.
Note that this may just be one dir.
Note that this method is optional.
Note that this only works for identifiers that appear in the current file.
Note that this tree does not perform cyclic redundancy check while appending child node.
Note that this will not actually update the scroll position The scroll position update will happen on the next tick.
Note that this will throw on failure, which will fail the test.
Note that using this method means that you get no guarantee that the Flow version specified in any given .flowconfig is the one that will be executed here, because it has no association with any given root.
Note that validation works even when we don't have a tracked query.
Note that validation works even when we don't have tracked query.
Note that waitsForPromise has an optional first argument.
Note that we do not use the TextBuffer here, since a close/reopen is acceptable.
Note that we keep getting warned as edit distance increases...
Note that we need to allow dot files by default, and not switch the meaning of their exclusion
Note that we need to to parse the flattened tree because it might contain additional packages
Note that we use the resolver methods to query the cache because transformations/normalisations can occur
Note that whatever file is used should also be included in bug reports.
Note that widthPercentage properties should add up to 90 since the ID column always adds 10.
Note the native date picker dialog has some UI glitches on Android 4 and lower when using the `minDate` and `maxDate` options.
Note the sensitive matter about accessor property: the property may be physically defined in some proto object, but logically it is bound to the object in question.
Note there is no dataSource like in the standard `ListView`.
Note there is some overhead, so you don't want to slice things up too much.
Note this codepath could also be exercised due to a logical error in Nuclide, so we try to differentiate.
Note this will return true if it contains only empty submenu items.
Note we use Error.captureStackTrace to get stacktrace which is v8-engine only.
Note: "Head" in this set of helper functions refers to the "current working directory parent" in Hg terms.
Note: 'password' is not settable.
Note: A self closing tag gets its own scope, but a non-self closing tag will use the scope opened up in the parent JSXElement.
Note: Although this function is `async`, it never rejects.
Note: An optimistic update may only be applied once.
Note: Disposing the values of the statement below removes the stylesheets.
Note: Ideally we'd just handle this in `uiOutlinesForResult`, but since switchMap disconnects the previous observable as soon as a new result comes in, any 'edit' event interrupts the pending loading event from 'pane-change'.
Note: If "where" is on an open bracket, then this bracket is ignored.
Note: If paths is empty, a full `hg status` will be run, which follows the spec.
Note: If someone maintains a reference to the structure within options they could mutate the ModuleMap's behavior.
Note: It's not guaranteed to keep lines within this length, but it will do its best.
Note: It's possible for the server to come back and ask more questions.
Note: It's safe to call forceUpdate here because the change events are de-bounced.
Note: Keep these constants in sync with the ones in Console.h
Note: RFCs offer an option for quoted values that may contain commas and semicolons.
Note: Scope is already opened in the JSXElement.
Note: Tasks are only actually executed with explicit calls to `processNext`.
Note: The resolution for the resulting mappings is the minimium of this map and the supplied map.
Note: The resolution for the resulting mappings is the minimum of this map and the supplied map.
Note: These fields are ordered by precendence.
Note: This array can be potentially sparse as subscriptions are deleted from it when they are removed.
Note: This does not fully test the git ref format.
Note: This form displays DEFAULT_SERVER_COMMAND_PLACEHOLDER as the prefilled remote server command.
Note: This function does NOT clone the data in this data source.
Note: This is a fork of the fb-specific transform.js
Note: This is not part of the public API.
Note: This method is called via `requestAnimationFrame` rather than `process.nextTick` like Atom's tree-view does because this does not have a guarantee a paint will have already happened when `componentDidMount` gets called the first time.
Note: This method may only be called once per instance.
Note: This mirrors logic in the fs read operations that are employed during tarball creation, in the fstream-npm module.
Note: This only applies to requires.
Note: This only applies to type imports.
Note: We do not allow listening to mouseOver events.
Note: We never need to add a first node.
Note: `npm install foo` inside of the `foo` package will abort earlier if `--force` is not set.
Note: because of this extension, the key equality of Immutable.Map and the value equality of Immutable.Set will differ from ES6 Map and Set.
Note: caseSensitive, numThreads, and recordMatchIndexes will be ignored.
Note: children must be traversed before printing variable definitions
Note: difference from C - smlen returned, not passed as argument.
Note: ending in / means that we'll get a final "" at the end of the pattern.
Note: esprima does not recognize conditional catch clauses.
Note: for Observables we only track how long it takes to create the initial Observable.
Note: getLengthSync DOESN'T calculate streams length As workaround one can calculate file size manually and add it as knownLength option
Note: host of uri must match this._host.
Note: ignoring n.lexical because it has no printing consequences.
Note: it might be more performant to maintain the sorting as we insert them, rather than as we serialize them, but the big O is the same either way.
Note: must declare params as optional.
Note: product-specific hacks use aliased cursors/ids to poll for data.
Note: replacing with the ASCII symbol `x` might cause false negatives in unlikely scenarios.
Note: resolvedEnd is undefined when the original sequence's length is unknown and this slice did not supply an end and should contain all elements after resolvedBegin.
Note: stops the spring animation
Note: subscription is an experimental non-spec addition.
Note: the `cleanupSubscriptionFunc` is called when the dialog closes: `onConnect`, `onError`, or `onCancel`.
Note: this a generic base implementation of __iterate in terms of __iterator which may be more generically useful in the future.
Note: this code is probably the code from the child shell if one is in use.
Note: this is the semver.org version of the spec that it implements Not necessarily the package version of this code.
Note: undefined values in `env` get serialized to the string "undefined".
Note: we don't know the real updated status of the file, so don't send a change event.
Note: we must not add args object if it was not sent.
Note: we're actually relying on RelayMutationTransaction invariant.
Nothing in the try block should ever null the `_run` property.
Nothing needs to be done if the root directory was watched correctly.
Nothing needs to be done if the root directory watch has ended.
Nothing pertains to our managed components.
Nothing should live on this prototype.
Nothing to do if our debug session is local.
Nothing to do if we're not debugging.
Nothing to fetch for records 1-3, fetch extension of range for 4-5
Nothing to observe: pass the empty array through
Nothing to show.
Notice extra empty line at the beginning.
Notifies the node about the change that happened in the configuration object.
Notify listeners, process queue, etc
Notify manager that an interaction has completed.
Notify manager that an interaction has started.
Notify never heard a heartbeat from the server.
Notify success watcher setup.
Notify switching networks, disconnected, timeout, unreachable server or fragile connection.
Notify the collector that GC should be put on hold/paused.
Notify the server was there, but now gone.
Now do the killing.
Now double-hash to avoid leaking timing information - there's no easy constant-time compare in JS, so we use this approach instead.
Now get scale and shear.
Now install the real 1.5.1.
Now it would be weird if this somehow bumped us back into distraction-free mode.
Now make a sorted array with the results.
Now prompt user to make changes
Now set any defaults we might have missed out earlier
Now singleton
Now that the iframe is in the DOM, subscribe to its resize events.
Now that the initial VCS statuses are set, subscribe to changes to the Repository so that the VCS statuses are kept up to date.
Now that the listener is in place, send the message.
Now that the user has selected a build system, we no longer care about what the selected one was the last session.
Now that we have the gadget, we can deserialize the state.
Now that we know the real path, it's possible this collides with an existing connection.
Now that we match urls like 'facebook.com', we have to prepend http:// to them for them to open properly.
Now the magic: trying to recover the key comment when it's gotten conjoined to the key or otherwise shenanigan'd.
Now they are leaving distraction-free mode.
Now we rerequest the top of stack that we observed.
Now we will resolve some newlines where possible.
Now, compute Y scale and normalize 2nd row.
Now, get the rotations out
Nuclide URI of the file path
Nuclide behaves badly when remote directories are opened which are parent/child of each other.
Nuclide can't handle nested arrays well in settings, so we save it in a flat array and fix up each pair or entries before using it in the transform
Nuclide code should be able to run on a stock Atom w/o these transforms.
Nuclide package settings used to calculate the module map, the blacklist, and control the plugin behavior.
Nuclide packages for Atom are called "features"
NuclideUris should never be shown to humans.
Nuke elements from the UI
Null -- XXX this probably isn't good practice
Null object is object with 'null' subtype.
Null out the existing pane item's URI so we can insert the new one without closing the pane.
Null out the prefix, and fallthrough to default.
Nullable breaks the layout chain
Nullable type.
Nullable values are captured as nullable in lambdas, as they may change between lambda capture and lambda evaluation.
Nullify .loc information for the child declaration so that we never try to reprint it without also reprinting the export declaration.
Number keys
Number of bytes expected for the current incomplete multi-byte character.
Number of bytes received for the current incomplete multi-byte character.
Number of elements in the cache before periodic cleanup kicks in.
Number of files to show on every page.
Number of images that will be fetched in one page.
Number of logical lines in this visual line
Number of requires within Nuclide that it took to load this module.
Number of rows to render beyond the viewport.
Number of rows to render on first mount.
Number of rows to render per event loop.
Number of spaces the pretty-printer should use per tab for indentation.
Numbers, booleans, undefined, and null.
Numeric values are decimal strings.
OCaml.Pervasives has a lot of stuff that gets shown on every keystroke without this.
OPTION DEFAULTS The default configuration options.
OS X apps don't inherit PATH when not launched from the CLI, so reconstruct it.
OVERVIEW The FileTreeNode class is almost entirely immutable.
Obj-C selector with multiple arguments, e.g. doFoo:withBar: This implementation uses a simple greedy heuristic to find the location of the different parts of a selector.
Object Instances
Object index maps from an object "hash" to index.
Object passed by reference over RPC are assigned an ID.
Object patterns are sorted and then the first identifier in each of patterns is used for sorting.
Object type used to represent tokens.
Object with a a nullable property and a buffer property.
Object.defineProperty failed.
ObjectIds for stack frame contexts just have the 3 required fields.
ObjectIds identify data values with children.
ObjectTypeAnnotation is always converted to a simple object type, as we don't support records
Observable dispose function, which is called on subscription dipsose, on stream completion, and on stream error.
Observe a stream like stdout or stderr.
Observe focus change events from the owner.
Observe focus change events from this component.
Observe the stdout, stderr and exit code of a process.
Observes one of more files has changed.
Observes that a .hgignore file has changed.
Observes that the Mercurial bookmark has changed.
Observes the relevant Nuclide package settings.
Obtain a monotonically increasing timestamp in milliseconds, if possible.
Obtain host and port information
Obviously not all Emitters should be limited to 10.
Obviously that won't fix anything.
Obviously, this breaks abstraction by reaching into private properties.
Ocamlmerlin doesn't include a `file` field at all if the destination is in the same file.
Occasionally, the watchman client may hang while waiting for a query.
Occupy the same space on the left in all items.
Octal number in ES6 starts with '0o'.
Octal number starts with '0'.
Octicon icon name, without the `icon-` prefix.
Octicons v2.1.2.
Of course we collect tokens here.
Of course, it'll still fail eventually if it's a true cycle, and leave things in an undefined state, but that's what is to be expected when `--force` is used.
Offset singleton
Often we'll get contiguous blocks of errors on the same line.
Often you want to reference an identifier in a comment.
Often, we may want to respond to Atom events, but only after a buffer period of no change.
Often, we want to signal events at a point where we are in the middle of some work, but don't want the handler to start calling other methods on the editor, which might be in an inconsistent state or simply not expect any other events to happen.
Ok, that's a hack, but it works.
Old IE doesn't give collections access to hasOwnProperty.
Old ones just use large positive priority.
Older IE's will not fire a second mousedown for a double click
On Android there's a special flag telling us the user is dragging the slider.
On Android this component uses native state drawable to display touch feedback.
On Android wrap the ScrollView with a AndroidSwipeRefreshLayout.
On Android, AsyncStorage will use either RocksDB or SQLite based on what is available.
On Android, display the options in a dialog.
On Android, specifies how to display the selection items when the user taps on the picker:  - 'dialog': Show a modal dialog.
On Android, the tag is a local URI, such as `"file:///sdcard/img.png"`.
On Android, this is useful for animations and interactions that only modify opacity, rotation, translation, and/or scale: in those cases, the view doesn't have to be redrawn and display lists don't need to be re-executed.
On Atom restart, it tries to open the uri path as a file tab because it's not a local directory.
On Atom restart, it tries to open uri paths as local `TextEditor` pane items.
On Enter or Return start editing the first attribute or create a new attribute on the selected element.
On Linux, script takes the command to run as the -c parameter.
On Mac OSX El Capitan, bash seems to wipe out the `LD_LIBRARY_PATH` and `DYLD_LIBRARY_PATH` environment variables.
On Mac Os X / macports there's only the ossp-uuid package that provides uuid On Linux there's uuid-runtime which provides uuidgen
On OS X, script takes the program to run and its arguments as varargs at the end.
On Unix systems, it uses ctime by default for staleness checks, since it's the most reliable.
On Windows the 'comspec' environment variable is used, so cmd.exe does not need to be on the path.
On Windows, change backslashes to slashes to get proper URL path from file path.
On Windows, launch the editor in a shell because spawn can only launch .exe files.
On Windows, we really want to use the "start" command.
On Windows, we should receive '/C:/path/to/file'.
On android this is not supported and it will have the same behavior as 'none'.
On iOS 8 and earlier these are the only supported values when using regular pins.
On iOS 9 and later you are not obliged to use these, but they are useful for matching the standard iOS look and feel.
On iOS the RefreshControl is a child of the ScrollView.
On iOS, AsyncStorage is backed by native code that stores small values in a serialized dictionary and larger values in separate files.
On iOS, calling this function will trigger a one second vibration.
On main thread, only coalesce if the last event is of same type.
On non-Windows, without the path to the shell, nothing usually works.
On press down, the opacity of the wrapped view is decreased, dimming it.
On press down, the opacity of the wrapped view is decreased, which allows the underlay color to show through, darkening or tinting the view.
On some browsers, horizontal scrolling will cause redraws to happen before the gutter has been realigned, causing it to wriggle around in a most unseemly way.
On some platforms, we would need to implement it as a `className` anyways.
On that rendered node, forward all `Touchable` responder handlers.
On the other side of the barrier, the cleaned list is used to "re-hydrate" the cleaned representation into an object with symbols as attributes, so that a sanitized object can be distinguished from a normal object.
On the selectionchange event, the target is just document which isn't helpful for us so just check activeElement instead.
On windows and no 'msbuild' found.
Once Babel understands "export interface", revert it to the normal one.
Once a flush has been requested, no further calls to `requestFlush` are necessary until the next `flush` completes.
Once again, Sass deviates from the spec and supplies the version as a string rather than a number, so we use loose equality checking here.
Once all RemoteConnections have been closed, then the ServerConnection will close.
Once an animation has been stopped or finished its course, it will not be reused.
Once calculated the properties are immutable.
Once connected you can enter xdebug commands, messages from the xdebug connection are displayed on stdout.
Once in break-disabled state, the connection mux will immediately enable one of the broken connections and move to break-enabled state.
Once initialized, the ConnectionMultiplexer can be in one of 3 main states: running, break-disabled, and break-enabled.
Once last row is set, figure out the first row
Once onNewLayout is called after offscreen rendering has completed, includeInLayout will be set true and the finished cell can be dropped into place.
Once perf is enabled, it stays enabled
Once the connection is re-established, the `onDidAddRemoteConnection` logic above will restore the editor contents as appropriate.
Once the debuggee resumes, all RemoteObjects become invalid.
Once the fetch is completed, clears the node's .isLoading property, builds the map of the node's children out of the fetched children URIs and a change subscription is created for the node to monitor future changes.
Once the gutter is shown for the first time, it is displayed for the lifetime of the TextEditor.
Once the index is implemented, consumers of this need to be updated.
Once the node is the responder, you can rely on every start/end event being processed by the gesture and `gestureState` being updated accordingly.
Once the user has interacted with distraction-free mode it would be weird if another package loading triggered a change in the state.
Once they're all done, then we can resume completely.
Once those are updated to use the string representation, we can drop this code path.
Once we can directly apply a matrix, we can remove this decomposition.
Once we provide all diagnostics, instead of just the current file, we can probably remove the activeTextEditor parameter.
Once we render in layout, make sure it sticks.
One `Animated.Value` can drive multiple properties in a synchronized fashion, but can only be driven by one mechanism at a time.
One after the other
One already exists in the cache, the other is going to be attempted to be updated.
One of 'GLOBAL', 'DIRECTORY'.
One of 'plain-text', 'secure-text' or 'login-password'.
One of each.
One of hint and hintTree must be provided.
One of text or snippet is required.
One of the editors' dimensions is pending sync.
One of the items is a horizontal scroll view
One of two or more EOF null blocks
One use case is to specify status bar styles per route using `Navigator`.
Only KeyPress has charCode.
Only a comma marker retains any length when trimmed from the right.
Only accept "native" animated nodes as children
Only add non-shasum'ed packages if --forced.
Only after 1.7.10 --branch accepts tags Detect those cases and inform the user to update git otherwise it's a lot slower than newer versions
Only allow revealing a single directory/file at a time.
Only ancient things would lack this for good reasons nowadays.
Only applies to create/delete
Only applies to renderable providers.
Only assigned if touch is needed.
Only break //after// visiting `stop`.
Only broadcast a list-level change if a record was changed/added/removed
Only broadcast an update to the range if an edge was added/changed.
Only called when incremental rendering is done and triggers the parent to re-render this row with includeInLayout true.
Only change the cursor to a pointer if there is a suggestion ready.
Only consider this section if the requested source is in the list of sources of the consumer.
Only create a range if `edges` field is present Overwrite an existing range only if the new force index is greater
Only create if stat failed
Only dbgp connections whose script path matches scriptRegex will be accepted.
Only deal with non-null/undefined values
Only directories can be expanded.
Only do the expensive require once.
Only download SHASUMS.txt if not using tarPath override
Only drag upon left button.
Only employed if the user elects to use domains.
Only expose tabId on chrome.devtools.inspectedWindow, not webInspector.inspectedWindow.
Only expressions need parentheses.
Only fire when selection has actually changed.
Only for color codes
Only for main window.
Only get the text from stdout.
Only handle drags of the nodes specified.
Only install command line api object for the time of evaluation.
Only keep layer paint events, skip paints for subframes that get painted to the same layer as parent.
Only leads to headaches.
Only monitor this failure once because there tends to be a lot of the same error.
Only object and function can have properties
Only pause new worker if debugging SW - we are going through the pause on start checkbox.
Only perform the default action if a single node is selected.
Only populate once and if this property is a shorthand.
Only print debug errors if test fails.
Only process deps that are not yet processed
Only re-render occasionally so we don't slow down timers.
Only rename if there's only one file and it's not the json
Only render name once in the given continuous block.
Only render tabs for providers that are eligible for at least one directory.
Only requested segment that does not include very first item from the range can have next page and diff calls
Only requested segment that does not include very last item from the range can have next page and diff calls
Only resolve the plugin if it's a string reference.
Only retry on 408, 5xx or no `response`.
Only return diff/tracked node if there are non-generated fields
Only send command if we either removed an existing handler or added handler and had none before.
Only show initialization of constants, which according to python style are all upper case.
Only static images are supported.
Only strings are supported for membership.
Only support ArrayBuffers for POST method.
Only supported on iOS.
Only the length terminates the string.
Only the nodes that should be shown are returned.
Only track user-initiated selection-change events.
Only update query data if variables changed.
Only use `mouseout` so that we do not extract duplicate events.
Only use the identifier name if it's an identifier in both SourceMaps
Only used for error messages.
Only used for forceUpdate periodicidy
Only used when passed a node Http.ServerRequest object.
Only used when passed a node request object.
Only warn when we have a callerName.
Only write in the cursor map if existing edge with cursor is deleted or have and older deletion time.
Only write to the front of map if existing edge with id is deleted or have an older deletion time.
Open a file in the flow project we copied, and get reference to the editor's HTML.
Open a file in the project.
Open a file within this project.
Open a remote file in the flow project we copied, and get reference to the editor's HTML.
Open a remote file in the project.
Open a right split pane to compare the contents.
Open a second pane, containing a second editor with the same file.
Open diff view with the `test.txt` file.
Open is always preceded by activate, unless opening the current file
Open the console window if it's not already opened.
Open the file, insert text, append text, save and close.
Open the test.txt file in the repo.
Open two tabs.
Open-source version
Opening bracket
Opening tag spotted
Opens a tab that loads facebook.com.
Opens the drawer.
Opens the given file at the line/column.
Opens the path in the next pane, or the current one if there's only one.
Opens the standard Android date picker dialog.
Opens the standard Android time picker dialog.
Opera crashes at this point
Opera has no cut event...
Opera is difficult.
Operation types
OperationConfig was originally typed such that each property had the type mixed.
Operations for dealing with CSS properties.
Operations for dealing with DOM properties.
Operations for updating with DOM children.
Operations used to process updates to DOM nodes.
Operators    -not  -and  -eq
Operators are parsed inline in tiny state machines.
Opinionated decision warning:
Opt-in navigation is handled in the same way as a file open with no preceeding activation
Optimistic queries are inferred and fields have a generic 'any' type.
Optimistically continue down this branch, but not before examining the other siblings.
Optimization: Avoid JSON parsing if it can't reasonably be an Atom package
Optimization: Our directories don't have periods - this must be a file
Optimize appearance for 30fps, but leave some space so it's evident when a frame overflows.
Optimize some code when these features are not used.
Optimize the case of one listener.
Optimized case for simple insertion -- don't want to add new changesets for every character typed
Optimized for most common case
Optimized version of general operation applications that can be used when the target matrix is known to be the identity matrix.
Option on Mac, Shift on other platforms
Optional args.
Optional function that allows configuration about scene animations and gestures.
Optional method because this was added post-1.0.
Optional specifier for special buttons, e.g. primary, info, success or error buttons.
Optional string representing the octicon that is rendered next to the title.
Optionally injectable environment dependent cleanup hook.
Optionally injectable hook for processing a queue of child updates.
Optionally injectable hook for swapping out mount images in the middle of the tree.
Optionally pass in `true` as `onlyCompareGenerated` to consider two mappings with the same generated line and column, but different source/name/original line and column the same.
Optionally pass in `true` as `onlyCompareGenerated` to consider two mappings with the same original source/line/column, but different generated line and column the same.
Optionally provide a component as navigation bar that persists across scene transitions.
Optionally provide a list of buttons.
Optionally provide the navigator object from a parent Navigator
Optionally restricts the set of canceled notifications to those notifications whose `userInfo` fields match the corresponding fields in the `userInfo` argument.
Optionally set `wordRegExp` to adjust word-matching.
Optionally takes a `program` argument.
Optionally wire in some hacks into the token-rendering algorithm, to deal with browser quirks.
Options matching.
Options used to be as added as '.' to the entry module name.
Or if the value is a function expression.
Or it might be a click on something we should not interfere with, such as a scrollbar or widget.
Or: The cookie's host-only-flag is false and the canonicalized request-host domain-matches the cookie's domain."
Order by the first element name in the array pattern.
Order by the first property name in the object pattern.
Order views in DOM properly.
Ordered based on occurrences on Facebook codebase
Ordered list of injected plugins.
Ordinarily this is run via the gen-changelog shell script, which appends the result to the changelog.
Ordinarily we would have to provide an element or register a view, but since we are just testing the model here and not actually rendering anything Atom doesn't complain.
Original column.
Original line.
Original name.
Original props are copied
Original source.
Originally adapted from https://github.com/azer/relative-date.
Originally defined in Runtime.js
Originally taken from http://www.w3.org/TR/CSS21/propidx.html and augmented.
Originate timestamp
Orphan paths have no relationship to repair.
Oscillate a lot
Other falsey values allowed
Other fields fall through to regular diffing.
Other fragments are for diff optimization only and do not require a re-render.
Other keys should get added.
Other kinds of exceptions will propagate without being intercepted and rethrown by a catch block, so their stacks will accurately reflect the original throwing context.
Other methods get called on the bridge
Other optional arguments are not supported yet
Other properties:
Other variables.
Otherwise add stubs for missing methods that are declared in the interface.
Otherwise check for new contents
Otherwise check if .git is already created
Otherwise check if there's an exact match
Otherwise err on the side of overparenthesization, adding explicit exceptions above if this proves overzealous.
Otherwise extract the version from the comparator using a simple regexp
Otherwise increment major.
Otherwise increment minor.
Otherwise it does not fill the whole panel, which might be alright except it means that the resize-handle doesn't extend all the way to the bottom.
Otherwise it needs to be printed with this non-exported declaration node.
Otherwise just do a plain text search.
Otherwise no-op.
Otherwise people can pipe Writable streams, which is just wrong.
Otherwise reject.
Otherwise remove them from the temp dir
Otherwise resolve to the newest one
Otherwise return diffCalls/filterCalls with empty edges.
Otherwise return null
Otherwise returns the input.
Otherwise store -1 to later indicate there were no active test runners.
Otherwise that was the final repetition of the final iteration of the final benchmark.
Otherwise the diff output is a clone of `field` with updated after/first and before/last calls.
Otherwise the dominators for the objects that also were retained by debugger would be affected.
Otherwise the result is returned.
Otherwise they are considered equal
Otherwise two separate editor instances attach to the stdin/stdout which gets confusing.
Otherwise use obj as the value of the new FastPath instance.
Otherwise use passed ones
Otherwise use the default set of common binary paths.
Otherwise we are checking out a named ref so we can optimize it
Otherwise we implement the ES6 `Array` and `String` Iterator.
Otherwise we jump to the sources.
Otherwise we need to figure it out if the user really wants to remove it, even with dependants As such we need to prompt the user with a meaningful message
Otherwise we should be silent.
Otherwise, `querySet` and `fragmentPointers` will be empty, and `nextVariables` will be equal to `lastVariables`.
Otherwise, a new array will be returned.
Otherwise, a new object is returned.
Otherwise, call _write If we return false, then we need a drain event, so set that flag.
Otherwise, compare against target/release
Otherwise, do not use tunnel.
Otherwise, fetch each target from the repository and let the process roll out
Otherwise, fetch remotely
Otherwise, if the root has been trimmed, garbage collect.
Otherwise, inspector page reacts on drop event and tries to load the event data.
Otherwise, it will default to an array containing only the `initialRoute`
Otherwise, just fetch it from the repository
Otherwise, read the file, compile and cache
Otherwise, returns all mappings corresponding to the given line and either the column we are searching for or the next closest column that has any offsets.
Otherwise, returns null.
Otherwise, selectively update the specified ones
Otherwise, separators and terminators change to Other Neutral.
Otherwise, simply generate a flat `switch` statement.
Otherwise, simply returns the range between the given positions.
Otherwise, target is either a tag or a branch
Otherwise, the callback is called with an error.
Otherwise, the error is unexpected, so log it.
Otherwise, the returned promise will be resolved with the return value of the last callback.
Otherwise, turn off editing until further notice, and return the start of the doc
Otherwise, wait for healthy secondaries.
Otherwise, we do not need to move it because a child will be inserted or moved before `child`.
Otherwise, we end up in a deadlock.
Otherwise, we have to resolve it
Otherwise, we pass the string directly to the Date constructor to parse.
Otherwise, we will query only when there is a save event.
Otherwise, we'll have to look up the pattern in the file.
Otherwise, what we wrote and what we read should match exactly.
Otherwise, will schedule an async call when it's done.
Otherwise, you would always wonder if the scroll responder is currently in a state where it recognizes new keyboard positions etc.
Otherwise: 1:16 odds on 30 digits
Otherwise: Let cookie-path be the attribute-value."  We'll represent the default-path as null since it depends on the context of the parsing.
Our last row target that we will approach incrementally
Our list items have 1-pixel cracks between them vertically.
Outdent whatever the list item contains.
Output Range
Output from executor.js
Output help if necessary
Output help information and exit.
Output window messages.
Outputs a number of spans to make up a line, taking highlighting and marked text into account.
Overlapping values not supported
Overridden by ancestors.
Overridden by subclasses
Overridden by subclasses.
Override "value" property for values that can not be JSON-stringified.
Override Dp.buildable for this Def instance.
Override XHR.open to allow this page to be located outside the devtools tree, and resources to be selectively mapped back into the devtools tree.
Override and customize some functionalities of WebInspector.
Override magic textarea content restore that IE sometimes does on our hidden textarea on reload
Override of TextBuffer's implementation.
Override push to accept second parameter representing priority
Override styles so that each page will fill the parent.
Override the _applyPkgMeta function to prevent it from deleting ignored files
Override the method with a new version on first access.
Override this function to include a meaningful message related to proxies if necessary
Override this to do fancier things, like read the "files" array from a package.json file or something.
Overrides any `size` props on child buttons.
Overrides the default blue gradient image.
Overrides the method with specified name until it's called first time.
Overrides the text that's read by the screen reader when the user interacts with the element.
Overwrite fs.readFile so that when .gitignore and .ignore are read in parallel, .ignore will always be read first.
Overwrites any existing profiles.
Own properties are enumerated firstly, so to speed up, if last one is own, then all properties are own.
Owner will be preserved, unless ref is overridden
PATH_2 existed in the cache, and its status did not change, so it shouldn't generate an event.
PATH_3 was previously in the cache.
PATH_4 was queried for but not returned, and the fetch was for ignored files.
PATH_4 was queried for but not returned, but the fetch was for non-ignored files.
PATH_5 was queried for but not returned, and the fetch was for non-ignored files.
PATH_5 was queried for but not returned, but the fetch was for ignored files.
PATH_6 did not exist in the cache, but its status is clean, so it shouldn't generate an event.
PATH_6 was never in the cache.
PECL project url - this will eventually work correctly for all
PHP DLL link flags
POSITION MEASUREMENT
POSITION OBJECT A Pos instance represents a position within the text.
PROCESSING_INSTRUCTION
PS: oh God, I hate Unicode ECMAScript 5.1/Unicode v6.3.0 NonAsciiIdentifierStart:
Pack sign, exponent, fraction
Package system data
Packager guarantees that `scales` array is sorted
Packager is running from node_modules.
Packages that didn't have any conflicts in resolution yet have "resolution" entry in bower.json are deemed unnecessary
Packages with invalid metas should have been removed
Packs the specified package into a .tgz file, which can then be installed.
Pad `str` to `width`.
Pad `str` up to total length `max` with `chr`, on the left.
Pad `str` up to total length `max` with `chr`.
Pad with '0' at the front.
Padding characters are truncated if they can't be evenly divided by `length`.
Padding characters are truncated if they exceed `length`.
Pads `string` on the left and right sides if it's shorter than `length`.
Pads `string` on the left side if it's shorter than `length`.
Pads `string` on the right side if it's shorter than `length`.
Page info comes from the range metadata, so we do a custom traversal here which is simpler than passing through page-info-related state as a hint for the normal traversal.
Page scale controls.
Paged id's children are constructed directly in chrome format from the contents of the object id.
PagedObjectIds have fullname and elementRange set.
Paint top and bottom gutter.
PaintInvalidationTracking events provide a paintId and a nodeId which we can use to update the paintId for all other invalidation tracking events.
PaintInvalidationTracking is only used for updating paintIds.
Pan responder that handles gesture for a card in the cards list.
Pan responder that handles gesture for a card in the cards stack.
Pan vertically when shift down only.
Pane items are deserialized before the gadget providers have had a chance to register their gadgets.
Panel Details
Parallel arrays:
Parameterized types like Array, or Object can use this to recursively call other transformers.
Parameterized types.
Parent property, however, can't be one of the node's immutable fields, otherwise it'd create circular references.
Parse Content-Type header content
Parse Current Token
Parse HTTP Authorization header
Parse HTTP Server-Authorization header
Parse HTTP WWW-Authenticate header
Parse Text Tokens
Parse `argv`, settings options and invoking commands when defined.
Parse a ClassDeclaration AST Node.
Parse a `for`/`in` and `for`/`of` loop, which are almost same from parser's perspective.
Parse a definition file, returning an intermediate representation that has all of the information required to generate the remote proxy, as well as marshal and unmarshal the data over a network.
Parse a full expression.
Parse a list of variable declarations.
Parse a regular `for` loop.
Parse a regular expression.
Parse a single statement.
Parse a string of code into an augmented syntax tree suitable for arbitrary modification and reprinting.
Parse a typehint into the 'nice' form, if possible.
Parse an assignment expression.
Parse an object literal or binding pattern.
Parse any so-far unknown options
Parse args.
Parse argv with the given options.
Parse arrow function expression with given parameters.
Parse bewit
Parse binary operators with the operator precedence parsing algorithm.
Parse classes as remotable interfaces.
Parse command `args`.
Parse dependencies
Parse environment.
Parse expected `args`.
Parse function body and check parameters.
Parse headers
Parse object or class method.
Parse options from `argv` returning `argv` void of these options.
Parse options from the given argv.
Parse or format the given `val`.
Parse package dependencies
Parse requires AsyncStorage.
Parse template expression.
Parse the args passed as JSON.
Parse the file list to create an aggregated structure based on the subdirs passed.
Parse the given `str` and return milliseconds.
Parse the next token as an identifier.
Parse the plists.
Parse the result of `hg bookmarks` into a `Map` from revision id to a array of bookmark names applied to revision.
Parse the source code once, then reuse the root node
Parse unary operators, both prefix and postfix.
Parser constructor.
Parses `uri` with Node's `url.parse` and calls `decodeURI` on `href`, `path`, and `pathname` of the parsed URL object.
Parses a comma-separated list of expressions, and returns them as an array.
Parses a comma-separated list of module exports.
Parses a comma-separated list of module imports.
Parses a string like '0.5rad' or '60deg' into radians expressed in a float.
Parses array and generator comprehensions.
Parses assignment pattern around given atom if possible.
Parses decEndpoint dependencies and fetches missing ones.
Parses environment variable names in field values 3.
Parses import declaration.
Parses module export declaration.
Parses out comments from AST and populates commentsByLine and docBlocksByLine
Parses spread element.
Parses the 'Authorization' header out of an http.ServerRequest object.
Parses the GraphQL document string into a RelayQLDocument.
Parses the command line and runs a command of the CLI.
Parses the given argv array and sets the 'opts', 'argv' and 'command' properties.
Parses the next sequence in this BER buffer.
Parses the output of `hg diff --unified 0 --noprefix` from one or more files.
Parses the output of `hg diff --unified 0`.
Parses the output of `xcrun simctl list devices` command
Parses the output of the 'adb devices' command
Parses the request body in an anyc/promise way
Parses the source into an AST and then prints it according to the given options.
Parses yield expression inside generator.
Partial invalidation tracking.
Pass `top` to keep the current "toplevel" state.
Pass `true` below to allow duplicate names and sources.
Pass a string as options.sourceFileName to recast.parse to tell the reprinter to keep track of reused code so that it can construct a source map automatically.
Pass an empty title, the title gets made later in onattach.
Pass down initial value so initial generated markup has correct `selected` attributes
Pass down our tag name to child components for validation purposes
Pass in an object with a single key/val pair and it will return you the string key of that single record.
Pass less stop characters to rangeOfWord so the range will be a more complete expression.
Pass the already-active view ID to simply toggle the side bar's visibility.
Pass the right function
Pass the settle filesystem time.
Pass true to prevent coalescing.
Pass undefined so the default parameter gets used.
Pass zero as contextId to search all contexts.
Passed to option handlers when there is no old value.
Passing "unsupported" props should work just fine as long as they are not animated
Passing 0 here will simply return 'revisionExpression'.
Passing an 'undefined' expression causes an exception in fb-watchman.
Passing false causes the minimum necessary scroll to occur, so the selection sticks to the top/bottom.
Passing the object is too much.
Paste copied line.
Paste events should not lead to BeforeInput events.
Patch the global fs module here at the app level
Path is being fetched, await the Promise that's in flight.
Path to remote directory user should start in upon connection.
Paths will be relative.
Pattern nodes may contain non-scalar fields without children that should not be removed.
Pattern used by `getNodeName`.
Pause on Exception
Pausing it causes it to stop emitting entry events, and also pauses the current entry if there is one.
Payload will be null when not in the composited mode.
Pedantic Inline Grammar
Pending dependencies further down the graph either don't affect the result or are already in `_pendingDependencyMap`.
People normally won't write queries like this by hand, but they can be produced as the result of splitting deferred queries.
People use this property instead all the time, so support it
Per 4.1.4 - Convert from unix epoch to Gregorian epoch
Per 4.2.1.2 Throw error if too many uuids are requested
Per 4.2.1.2, Bump clockseq on clock regression
Per 4.2.1.2, use count of uuid's generated during the current clock cycle to simulate higher resolution clock
Per 4.4, set bits for version and `clock_seq_hi_and_reserved`
Perf optimization: when conf does not change the derived fields will be passed along with the options it's not type-safe, but it's way more efficient than recalculate them
Perform a change on the document data structure.
Perform a heuristic test to determine if an object is "array-like".
Perform a shallow check to ensure the value conforms to `CallValue` type: For performance reasons, skip recursively testing array/object values.
Perform a try catch, just in case the object has a circular reference or stringify throws for some other reason.
Perform actions on text editors of a given language.
Perform an update to a mounted component.
Perform attach if necessary.
Perform measurement
Performance optimization to avoid constantly re-generating these objects.
Performance:  - Making a stylesheet from a style object makes it possible to refer to it by ID instead of creating a new style object every time.
Performes a deep BFS scanning expand of contained nodes.
Performs a Hack symbol search in the specified directory.
Performs a breadth-first iteration over the directories of the tree starting with a given node.
Performs a destructive operation on a transform matrix.
Performs a fast comparison of whether `this` and `that` represent identical query nodes.
Performs a fuzzy file search in the specified directory.
Performs a single pass over the enqueued immediates.
Performs an update of a tree branch.
Performs equality by iterating through keys on an object and returning false when any key has values which are not strictly equal between the arguments.
Perhaps you want 2 command lines with a different set of commands in each, for example.
Permanent state.
Permit negative indentations.
Pick bases at random, instead of starting at 2
Pick provisional load requests.
Pick up confs from TSRM and Zend if present
Piggyback on the whitespace fix and simply check if any non-visible tags appear in the source.
Ping the server until it leaves the current state
Pipe output from forked process.
Pipe to writer
Pipes through normal onScroll events from the underlying `ScrollView`.
PixelRatio class gives access to the device pixel density.
Place as callback for a DOM element's `onResponderGrant` event.
Place as callback for a DOM element's `onResponderMove` event.
Place as callback for a DOM element's `onResponderRelease` event.
Place as callback for a DOM element's `onResponderTerminate` event.
Place it here so that all "Copy"-ing items stick together.
Plain browser env
Plain string
Please convert your array into string the way web server expects it
Please refer to the css-layout README for details.
Pluck off n bytes from an array of buffers.
Pluck the ReactElement from the call, and export it instead.
Plug in your RNG constructor here
Pluggable, initialized in high-level API below.
Plugin resolvers.
Plugin to make entity title show the real entity, idea by Roman Komarov
Plugins can be injected as part of page initialization or on-the-fly.
Plugins can override original methods, events or types, so we don't need to throw error on conflict, we only print a warning to console.
Plural fragments require the prop value to be an array of fragment pointers, which are merged into a single fragment pointer to pass to the query resolver `resolve`.
Pluralization helper.
Plus, for many of the individual attributes in S5.3 it says to use the "attribute-value of the last attribute in the cookie-attribute-list".
Point of the intersection
Point on the first quad side clockwise
Point on the third quad side clockwise
Point to ssh-agent's socket for ssh-agent-based authentication.
Pointer has a different ID or is/was fake data.
Poke around for some headers
Policies that describe methods in `ReactClassInterface`.
Poll selection to see whether it's changed.
Polyfill a module if it is not already defined in `scope`.
Polyline coordinates
Pool size must be a multiple of 4 and greater than 32.
PooledClass representing the bookkeeping associated with performing a child mapping.
PooledClass representing the bookkeeping associated with performing a child traversal.
PooledClass representing the bounding rectangle of a region.
Pop all selection events off the end of a history array.
Pop off selection events that are in the way.
Pop off the top of the stack and add it to the list of nodes to display.
Pop to a particular scene, as specified by its route.
Pop to larger size.
Pop to the first scene in the stack, unmounting every other scene.
Pop up a dialog that is pre-filled with the default params.
Populate Publish UI with the most recent data after a successful push.
Populate node cache
Populate real files from real disk like real people.
Populate sidebar
Populate stale scenes from previous scenes marked as stale.
Populate the extensions and types maps.
Populate the extensions/types maps
Populate the left stack.
Populate the only stack.
Populate the top level nodes.
Port of Andrew Moon's Poly1305-donna-16.
Ported from underscore.js isObject
Ported in 2014 by Dmitry Chestnykh and Devi Mandiri.
Ported loosely from BouncyCastle's Java EC code Only Fp curves implemented for now Requires jsbn.js and jsbn2.js
Position arrow accurately.
Position does not expose methods for construction via an `HTMLDOMElement`, because it isn't meaningful to construct such a thing without first defining a frame of reference.
Position information for the previous token
Position relative to main DevTools element.
Position resizer.
Position the mover div to align with the current scroll position
Position timline grid location.
Position types for which top, left, bottom and right are ignored.
Position/Index mapping
Positioning above the anchor.
Positioning below the anchor.
Positions of the first endString after the end of the selection, and the last startString before it.
Positions of the last startString before the start of the selection, and the first endString after it.
Positions returned by coordsChar contain some extra information.
Positive IDs represent objects which live on the server, negative IDs represent objects which live on the client.
Positive numbers mean the size expands outwards.
Possible Return formats.
Possible configuration types:  -  FIELDS_CHANGE provides configuration for mutation fields.
Possible identifier start in a surrogate pair.
Possible nodes include the root, fields, and fragments.
Possible values are 'Album', 'All', 'Event', 'Faces', 'Library', 'PhotoStream' and SavedPhotos.
Possibly more trouble than it's worth, though, since this may be a temporary option.
Possibly split or suppress the update based on the presence of read-only spans in its range.
Postpone for now
Potential race condition if intervalSeconds is too small.
Potentially we could use similar technique for Windows and Linux
Pre-populates `state` with a suitable `data` object if needed, and copies over any metadata fields, if present.
Pre-populates `state` with a suitable `data` objects if needed.
Precise rendering behavior is configured via the `render` prop which takes a callback.
Precompute a pack of callbacks that's frequently generated and passed to instances.
Precompute crumb styles so that they don't need to be recomputed on every interaction.
Precompute samples table
Predicate that tests whether the next token is of the given type, and if yes, consumes it as a side effect.
Preface gives us something to blacklist in warning module
Prefer endTime since it might be from the network stack.
Prefer to get updates via ::onAllMessagesDidUpdate.
Prefer to get updates via ::onFileMessagesDidUpdate.
Prefer to get updates via ::onProjectMessagesDidUpdate.
Prefetches a remote image for later use by downloading it to the disk cache
Prefix a token with this to indicate that no breaks should happen here.
Prefix with a space, thus making sure the current flag is not a substring of some other.
Preload fields into local variables for better performance.
Prepare data to be sent bellow 1 - Sort picks by version/release
Prepare inputs
Prepend on new range
Prepend on new segment
Prepend on range that already has edge
Prepend on segment that already has item
Prepend the help information
Prepend, append, or delete edges to/from a range.
Preprocessing
Presentation record does not have model record to highlight.
Preserve getters with warnings on the internal ReactNative copy without invoking them.
Preserve requests from the new session.
Preserve the original `console` as `originalConsole`
Preserve the original environment
Preserves existing new lines.
Pressed key value is passed as an argument to the callback handler.
Pretend some of them are ref query dependencies:
Pretend that nothing has happened.
Pretend the optional dependency was specified, but somehow failed to load:
Pretty printer that prints top-level React elements using JSX.
Prevent 'this' from being bound to DelayedEventManager.
Prevent duplicated error.
Prevent editing the user agent and user rules.
Prevent flickering by always rendering cached children -- if they're invalid, then the fetch will happen soon.
Prevent from infinite recursion when installing cyclic dependencies
Prevent infinite expansion of cross-referencing arrays.
Prevent leaking memory for long chains of recursive calls to `asap`.
Prevent leaking private data in the sourcemap file path
Prevent never-ending loop
Prevent scrolling the editor when scrolling the suggestion list.
Prevent selecting the nearest word on double click.
Prevent selection and cursors from interfering with the scroll width and height.
Prevent submission of a blank field from creating a directory.
Prevent submission of a blank field from creating a file.
Prevent the container from being scrolled off the end.
Prevent the link from navigating, since we don't do any navigation by following links normally.
Prevent this from being ran twice
Prevent user from scrolling into empty space of unmounted rows.
Prevent wrapper from ever scrolling
Prevents the path to the current file to be prepended, so that the overwritten XHR.open can properly prepend the new path prefix.
Prevents truncating a tiny bit off the end
Preview Next Token
Previous log timestamp.
Previous uuid creation time
Previously assigned color.
Previously we would throw an error if we didn't have an internal instance.
Previously, if you had a dep in your shrinkwrap then anything that required that dependency would count as a match, regardless of version.
Previously, we were doing simple string matching that would give us false positives when checking if paths were in PATH.
Primarily for unit tests.
Primary goal
Primes the store by sending requests for any missing data that would be required to satisfy the supplied set of queries.
Primitive gesture actions.
Primitive gesture directions.
Primitive or null object.
Primitive types cannot have properties
Primitive types.
Primitives can be directly compared
Print a console warning and replace the code with a function that will immediately throw an error in the browser.
Print also a tree of the installed packages
Print bower version, node version and system info.
Print the entire AST generically.
Print the new source.
Print the root node generically, but then resume reprinting its children non-generically.
Print the specifier.
Print trace if verbose, the error has no code or if the error is a node error
Print without attempting to reuse any original source code.
Prints a banner with a border around it containing the given message.
Prints a textual representation of the query node to the console for debugging purposes.
Prints the node ignoring comments.
Prints the type for arguments that are transmitted via variables.
Prints the version of react-native and exits.
Prior to 0.4.1 you would have to specify the args in your range behaviors in the same order they appeared in your query.
Prior to Atom v1.7.0, `atom.inSpecMode` had a chance of performing an IPC call that could be expensive depending on how much work the other process was doing.
Prioritize handling transition in progress over a gesture:
Prioritize the cached compaereCommitId, if it exists.
Prioritizes checking of indices that are most likely to change so that the comparison bails as early as possible.
Private API
Private APIs
Private Classes
Private functions gets negative score.
Private helper methods
Private helper methods used by the transformed code.
Private helper vars
Private members and methods.
Private methods
Private state that needs to be reset before every traversal.
Private struct class that holds the key for a route.
Private stuff
Private symbol for identifying `SourceNode`s when multiple versions of the source-map library are loaded.
Proactively render more rows in case some of them will be collapsed without triggering refresh.
Probably IE8.
Probably in future we want to use them for force given resolution, but for now...
Probably in the "in body" parsing mode, so we outlaw only tag combos where the parsing rules cause implicit opens or closes to be added.
Probably just the default registry.
Process and execute the selected commands.
Process buildconf arguments
Process each date-token sequentially in the order the date-tokens appear in the cookie-date
Process everything in chunks.
Process message type.
Process might issue synchronous calls to this throttler.
Process packages.json
Process regular animation frame.
Process this into the format nuclide-find-references expects.
Process two tail components into prevIncompletedMessage for incompleted response.
Processed fragments are removed from this array, by calling `shiftNextLine`.
Processes an individual byte being written to a stream
Processes any enqueued updates.
Processes props by setting default values for unspecified props and asserting that the props are valid.
Produce number
Products were able to do this because the Babel Relay plugin doesn't produce validation errors for empty fields.
ProfileDataGridNode
Profiles panel
Profiles time from request to receiving the first server response.
Profiling code in Relay consists of three steps:  - Instrument the function to be profiled.
Program nodes introduce global scopes.
Project scope.
Project-relative path.
Promise-ify the flux cycle around SearchResultManager::executeQuery.
Promisify calls to watchman client.
Prompt string for this picker, used on Android in dialog mode as the title of the dialog.
Prompt the user
Prompt the user to enter some text.
Prop type validation may throw.
Propagate retained sizes for each node excluding root.
Propagate the scroll position to the actual DOM scroller
Propagate to the linked documents
Proper implementation of methods exposed on Symbol.prototype They won't be accessible on produced symbol instances as they derive from HiddenSymbol.prototype
Proper implementaton of toPrimitive and toStringTag for returned symbol instances
Proper tooling would allow actual inlining.
Properly terminate if the parent server crashes.
Properties allowed by the native animated implementation.
Properties not set: endLine: undefined, endColumn: undefined, isContentScript: undefined, hasSourceURL: undefined,
Properties of the current token: Its type
Properties that are deleted before being visited are not visited.
Properties that are fetched via fields with arguments can be encoded by serializing the arguments in property keys.
Properties that are methods don't use the function keyword.
Property names not specified use the normalized name.
Props passed as properties to a route object will set the configuration for that route's navigation bar, overriding any props passed to the NavigatorIOS component.
Props provide configurability for several features, such as auto-correction, auto-capitalization, placeholder text, and different keyboard types, such as a numeric keypad.
Protect against Object overwritten by the user code.
Protect against double callback
Provide a 'Clean and rebuild' command to restart the Clang server for the current file and reset all compilation flags.
Provide a hook for user-specified inspect functions.
Provide a link from the copy to the original.
Provide a linked `value` attribute for controlled forms.
Provide a set of routes to initially mount.
Provide an imperative API as static functions of the component.
Provide empty IDs to simulate non-refetchable nodes
Provide linkingActionMap to instruct the container to subscribe to linking events, and use this mapper to convert URIs into actions that your app can handle
Provide the JIT with a nice shape / hidden class.
Provide this key, and the container will store the navigation state in AsyncStorage through refreshes, with the provided key
Provide user-friendly number values.
Provider for autocomplete service.
Provider for code format service.
ProviderB messages should remain the same.
Providers should implement at least one of formatCode / formatEntireFile.
Provides Diagnostics for un-typed regions of Hack code.
Provides a `CallbackQueue` queue for collecting `onDOMReady` callbacks during the performing of the transaction.
Provides a handle to the underlying scroll responder.
Provides a navigation stack abstraction, useful for going forward/backwards while browsing code.
Provides a promise along with methods to change its state.
Provides a queue for collecting `componentDidMount` and `componentDidUpdate` callbacks during the the transaction.
Provides additional traits to screen reader.
Provides an API that can be called during an eventing cycle to release the last event that was invoked, so that it is no longer "held".
Provides an API that can be called during an eventing cycle to remove the last listener that was invoked.
Provides an initial value that will change when the user starts typing.
Provides an opportunity to perform additional logic on the variables.
Provides common functionality for components that must reconcile multiple children.
Provides efficient data processing and access to the `ListView` component.
Provides feedback to the user of the health of a NuclideSocket.
Provides methods to control the garbage collection of records in `RelayStoreData`.
Proxy for converting between Chrome dev tools debugger and HHVM Dbgp debuggee.
Proxy generation failed.
Pruning certain nodes will result in empty or incomplete nodes, here we clean those nodes up.
Public API for controlling garbage collection of `RelayStoreData`.
Public APIs
Public actions
Public alias.
Public domain.
Public interface
Public methods
Public state
Publish as AMD module
Publish as node.js module
Publish mode only shows the changes of the active repository.
Publishes a 'busy' message with the given string.
Publishes a registration name that is used to identify dispatched events and can be used with `EventPluginHub.putListener` to register listeners.
Publishes an event so that it can be dispatched by the supplied plugin.
Pull all the redirects of the main request upon commit load.
Pull in code from sapi and extensions
Punctuation token types.
Punctuation tokens.
Purely defensive, as query is guaranteed to be non-empty.
Push a scene off the screen, so that opacity:0 scenes will not block touches sent to the presented scenes
Push initial default config to log4js.
Push the node's children on the stack in reverse order so that when they are popped off the stack, they are iterated in the original order.
Push the requested markup with an additional RESULT_INDEX_ATTR attribute.
Pushes a committed text into the history.
Pushing new elements is done relative to the current location not relative to the top of the stack.
Pushing removes any elements above the current location before pushing the new element.
Put Flexbox into the Polyfills category
Put in the first slot of each dominatedNodes slice the count of entries that will be filled.
Put the object in the registry.
Put the scene back into the state as defined by props.sceneStyle, so transitions can happen normally
Put this back to the pool to reuse the instance.
Put this event cycle into the queue and will finish them later.
Put this match into lists grouped by files.
Put visible nodes into the data grid.
Qualified type identifiers are not handled by runtime typechecker, so simply omit the annotation for now.
Queried fields that are `undefined` are stored as nulls.
Queries are blocked on asynchronous requests.
Queries the layout of a view.
Query for 3 stories with text
Queue of markup to be rendered.
Queue of update configuration objects.
Queuers:  Perform the work of kicking off a root/node read.
Quick and dirty way to get an approximation for the plain text from HTML.
Quick check for a common case, an Obj-C selector with one argument.
Quick lookup for states that are considered to be "pressing" and are therefore eligible to result in a "selection" if the press stops.
Quick lookup map for states that are considered to be "active"
Quietly ignore stray async events, we're probably too late for the start.
Quit if there's nothing to scroll here
Quite a lot of acorn.js is duplicated here.
Quotes produce strings.
RC release, package will be installed only if users specifically do it
RCTScrollViewManager.calculateChildFrames is not available on every platform
RDFa Properties
REPL has null main script file and calls `evaluate` with `repl` as the file name.
RFC 2617: handle both MD5 and MD5-sess algorithms.
RFC 2965 suggests using Discard attribute to mark session cookies, but this does not seem to be widely used.
RFC 6265 indicates that the max-age attribute takes precedence over the expires attribute
RFC6265 S4.1.2.2 If a cookie has both the Max-Age and the Expires attribute, the Max-Age attribute has precedence and controls the expiration date of the cookie.
RFC6265 S5.1.1: 2.
RFC6265 S5.1.4 Paths and Path-Match
RFC6365 S5.4
RIGHTWARDS ARROW OVER LEFTWARDS ARROW.
RSS, heap and usage.
RTFM: http://www.ecma-international.org/publications/files/ECMA-ST/Ecma-262.pdf
Raise an unexpected token error.
Ran off the end of the file - the whole thing is a comment
Range in the input where the symbol reference occurs.
Range resolution
Ranges publish events for the entire range, not the specific view of that range.
Rasterization incurs an off-screen drawing pass and the bitmap consumes memory.
Rather than annoying tagged union
Rather than crash on mismatched plurality of fragment/ids just warn and resolve as if the fragment's pluarity matched the format of the ids.
Ratio of gesture completion when non-velocity release will cause action
Raw strings.
RawTasks are recycled to reduce GC churn.
Re-adding a node like this triggers the initial and more favorable whitespace behavior.
Re-enable Atom's bundled 'tree-view' when this package is disabled to leave the user's environment the way this package found it.
Re-position menu in case it does not fit.
Re-render on activation.
Re-render the item with the new props.
Re-render whenever the data in the store changes.
Re-set this, in case some other handler touched the selection in the meantime.
Re-synchronize the fake scrollbars with the actual size of the content.
Re-use 'watch-group' since some backends throw when they encounted an unrecognized object group.
Re-use styles from the Atom welcome pane where possible.
Reach out with your feelings.
React Fragments error if you try to inspect them.
React ID utilities.
React Native CLI configuration file
React Native helps make apps smooth by doing all the heavy lifting off the main thread, in JavaScript.
React Native in dev mode often starts with Red Box "Can't fibd variable __fbBatchedBridge..." This is fixed by clicking Reload JS which will trigger a request to packager server
React Native was installed using CocoaPods.
React Native's layout system is based on Flexbox and is powered both on iOS and Android by an open source project called css-layout: https://github.com/facebook/css-layout  The implementation in css-layout is slightly different from what the Flexbox spec defines - for example, we chose more sensible default values.
React component PropTypes Definitions.
React component that wraps the Android-only `ProgressBar`.
React life cycle hooks.
React lifecycle methods may be used normally.
React references `ReactReconcileTransaction` using this property in order to allow dependency injection.
React style object.
ReactART doesn't handle update to the bounding box correctly.
ReactChildReconciler provides helpers for initializing or updating a set of children.
ReactClasses doesn't have constructors.
ReactDOMServer
ReactElementValidator provides a wrapper around a element factory which validates the props passed to the element.
ReactMultiChild are capable of reconciling multiple children.
ReactOwners are capable of storing references to owned components.
ReactPerf is a general AOP system designed to measure performance.
ReactUpdateQueue allows for state updates to be scheduled into a later reconciliation step.
Read a single token, updating the parser object's token-related properties.
Read a string value, interpreting backslash-escapes.
Read an identifier or keyword token.
Read an identifier, and return it as a string.
Read an integer in the given radix.
Read an integer, octal integer, or floating-point number.
Read and store the height of line widgets associated with the given line.
Read directory, looking for links
Read every package meta
Read from cache and we still don't have a valid `dataID`.
Read input from the textarea, and update the document to match.
Read json, generating the package meta
Read package metadata
Read the actual heights of the rendered lines, and update their stored heights to match.
Read the bower.json inside the folder, so that we copy only the necessary files if it has ignore specified
Read unsigned value.
Reading Status
Reading Text
Reading and Writing
Reads and subscribes to query data anchored at the supplied data ID.
Reads query data anchored at the supplied data ID.
Reads query data anchored at the supplied data IDs.
Reads query data, where each element in the result array corresponds to a root call argument.
Reads template string tokens.
Reads the configuration file for the Buck project and returns the requested property.
Reads the file contents and returns empty string if the file doesn't exist which means it was removed in the HEAD dirty repository status.
Ready State
Really try to only have up to h3, please
Really we should create references to unique objects so when we insert a marker it's impossible that it has appeared elsewhere in the source.
Really, one should not be tossing away EPIPE errors, or any errors, so casually.
Reassign as const so the type refinement holds in the closure below
Rebasing/resetting history to deal with externally-sourced changes
Rebound spring parameters when transitioning FROM this scene
Rebuild the gutter elements, ensure the margin to the left of the code matches their width.
Recalculate selection highlight dimensions.
Recalculate the new treeElement for the same property we were going to edit next.
Recalculate the total diagnostic count.
Recall that origLoc is the .loc of an ancestor node that is guaranteed to contain all the reprinted nodes and comments.
Receive timestamp
Received on the first stable websocket connection.
Received on the reconnected stable websocket connection.
Receives a next element and updates the component.
Receives a state machine signal, performs side effects of the transition and stores the new state.
Receives a variargs array of leaf node names and creates the structure in a temporary folder.
Receives two optional predicates  The `prePredicate` is invoked at pre-descent.
Receiving ArrayBuffers happens via Blobs, instead.
Recommended method to use to get the line diffs of files in this repo.
Recommended method to use to get the status of files in this repo.
Recommended to be the package name.
Recomputes the plugin list using the injected plugins and plugin ordering.
Recomputing which rows to render is batched up and run asynchronously to avoid wastful updates, e.g. from multiple layout updates in rapid succession.
Reconciles the children with the various properties that affect the children content.
Reconciles the properties by detecting differences in property values and updating the DOM as necessary.
Reconciles the root DOM node, then recurses.
Reconsider where this check is made.
Record State is unknown because it has not yet been fetched from the server.
Record an update to a record.
Record index of the last subscriber so we do not later unintentionally invoke callbacks that were subscribed after this broadcast.
Record might contain data from optimistic update.
Record that the given node is no longer part of the connection.
Record that the node is contained in the connection.
Record the characters to be added to the DOM.
Record the component responsible for creating this element.
Record the creation of a record.
Record the invalidation so later events can look it up.
Record the new index of the last-seen occurrence of typeName.
Record the root element in case it later gets transplanted.
Record the root node ID associated with the mutation.
Record tracked nodes.
Records are "created" whenever an entry did not previously exist for the `recordID`, including cases when a `recordID` is created with a null value.
Records are plain objects with special metadata properties.
Records are shapes of data with globally unique "data IDs".
Recover leading whitespace by temporarily prepending any character.
Recover tree
Rect is in layer content coordinates, make it relative to picture by offsetting to the top left corner.
Recurse down into the child.
Recurse if we're merging plain objects or arrays
Recurse through connection subfields and write their results.
Recursive implementation of binary search.
Recursively copy the contents of the fixture to the temp directory.
Recycles subtrees from `prevData` by replacing equal subtrees in `nextData`.
Red/error if the test class had errors.
Redefine element to the external one.
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met:  1.
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met: 1.
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met: Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
Redraw the line's text.
Reduce time spent doing lookups by setting these on the prototype.
Reduce: make a binary expression from the three topmost entries.
Reduces cognitive load by limiting identifier ambiguity, 3.
Reference identifier
Reference timestamp
ReferenceGroup
References in each file are grouped together if they're adjacent.
References:  - http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/ANSI_escape_code - http://www.termsys.demon.co.uk/vtansi.htm
Refresh the usage for the current query.
Refs are available when mounted and updated during reconciliation.
Regardless of how frequently the service sends file change updates, Only one batched status update can be running at any point of time.
Regardless, we haven't tested local hack services so save that for another day.
Regenerates the .proxy baseline files in the spec/fixtures directory.
Region that can trigger swipe.
Register NuclideUri type conversions.
Register NullableType and NamedType
Register a callback for this fake editor.
Register a change handler that is invoked whenever the store changes.
Register a change in the history.
Register a change to a single line.
Register a type by providing both a marshaller and an unmarshaller.
Register all of the static methods as remote functions.
Register callback `fn` for the command.
Register helpers
Register interfaces.
Register module at `path` with callback `definition`.
Register module-level functions.
Register spies.
Register suitable examples for snapshot tests
Register the diagnostic store for updates from the new provider.
Register the subscriptions after the filesystem settles.
Register these transformers
Register type aliases.
Registered aliases.
Registered modules.
Registered plugins
Registers a container node into which React components will be rendered.
Registers a host formatter for nuclideUriToDisplayString
Registers a service function to a service name.
Registers plugins so that they can extract and dispatch events.
Regression test for crbug.com/370035.
Rehydrate the state of the benchmark run following a restart or a reload.
Reject early with the result when encountering an error.
Reject if error is not a network error
Reject on error.
Relatedly, when upgrading, if a bundled module is replacing an existing module we want to choose the bundled version, not the version we're replacing.
Relative ../
Relative ./
Relative path
Relative path to folder with .git file
Relative to WorkerRuntimeAgent::enable in core/inspector/WorkerRuntimeAgent.cpp
Relative to https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/25266
Relative to nuclide-debugger/scripts, where html page is loaded.
Relative with just one slash, to test fs resolution priority against shorthands
Relativize paths Also normalize paths on windows
Relay allows the same variable at both locations, regardless of type:
Relay contains the set of public methods used to initialize and orchestrate a React application that uses GraphQL to declare data dependencies.
Relay does not currently have a GraphQL argument parser, so...
Relay profiles use await calls, so likely occur out of current stack frame therefore async variant of profiling is used
Relay will materialize this prop based on the result of the query in the next component.
Relay-aware comparators for props and state provide a reasonable default implementation of `shouldComponentUpdate`.
Release the oldest cached results once the cache is full.
Releases all events of a certain type.
Releases any resources allocated by `mountComponent`.
Releases control over execution.
Releases the event corresponding to the handle that was returned when the event was first held.
Relies on `updateStylesByID` not mutating `styleUpdates`.
Reload inspected page to sniff network events
Reload inspected page.
Reload main frame.
Reload who the current slaves are.
Reloads the current page.
Rely on keypress instead.
Remaining properties are added to a new props object
Remaining properties override existing props
Remaps must be run before builtin transforms because short-methods may shadow import names.
Remember that these lines changed, for updating the display
Remember that we already checked any headers in the params were in the request, so if this passes we're good.
Remember to delete the cropped image from the ImageStore when you are done with it.
Remotable object
RemoteObjects are only valid while the debuggee is paused.
Remove "assets_" prefix
Remove "show next" button if there is one.
Remove '.js' from the end of the package name if it is there
Remove a file versioned under Hg.
Remove a handler by passing the `change` event type and the handler
Remove all breakpoints.
Remove all new lines between require fences that are not explicitly added by the NewLine module.
Remove all the markers if we've finished loading and there's no suggestion.
Remove any OS specific files from the files array before checking its length
Remove any edges in the range if it matches any of the ids in the input.
Remove any links for this record
Remove any rendered children.
Remove any trailing whitespace on lines.
Remove any tree elements that no longer have this node as their parent and save all existing elements that could be reused.
Remove any unneeded rendered routes.
Remove archive
Remove automatic id suffix added by kramdown if heading with same name exists.
Remove byte order marker.
Remove cache folder afterwards
Remove children that are no longer present.
Remove colors in case some log has colors..
Remove deprecated transform props from docs
Remove duplicate items from array
Remove duplicates
Remove each link that was declared as invalid
Remove editor.
Remove existent and copy canonical dir
Remove expand all button and shadow host toolbar.
Remove extension
Remove extra rows.
Remove extras.
Remove files marked for deletion.
Remove folder
Remove from _connections to not be considered in future connection queries.
Remove from being fetched list
Remove from json only if successfully deleted
Remove from string
Remove full paths and relative line numbers from stack traces so that we can compare against "known-good" output.
Remove illegal chars
Remove in M45.
Remove listener for local notifications
Remove listener for push notifications
Remove listeners, then invalidate all messages from ProviderB.
Remove master and test only for the first 7 refs
Remove multiple lines
Remove new lines at the start.
Remove or update next button.
Remove packages
Remove parameters from the previous response, unless this is the second request for a server that requires digest authentication.
Remove previous side class and add new one.
Remove project
Remove properties that might affect total size calculation.
Remove root from the flattened tree
Remove selection from hidden nodes under this root
Remove selection rendering.p
Remove servers until we're under the memory limit.
Remove shebang
Remove spans that are empty and don't have a clearWhenEmpty option of false.
Remove temp package
Remove the 'build' dir
Remove the NewLine markers.
Remove the button from the toolbar.
Remove the cursor line decorations because that's distracting in read-only mode.
Remove the empty line, which is a message separator.
Remove the file from the diff stats cache when the editor is closed.
Remove the first index, because this is the default connection profile, not a user-created profile.
Remove the given messages, if they are currently present
Remove the indentation introduced by JSX
Remove the index of the profile to delete.
Remove the index so new ones get assigned during deserialization
Remove the last parenthesis
Remove the leading absolute path prepended to the file paths between atom reloads.
Remove the link to viewer.actor and broadcast an update
Remove the list item's bullet so it is seen as the next token.
Remove the listener in a home-made disposable for when this editor is no-longer active.
Remove the loading spinner before setting the contents of the blame gutter.
Remove the middle edge
Remove the n lines at offset 'at'.
Remove the pending progress and we will be in a normal activeGesture state
Remove the quotes printValue adds.
Remove the source file from the _sourcesContents map.
Remove the transaction that called this function.
Remove these escape sequences.
Remove these.
Remove things based on the config.
Remove this counter from the global list.
Remove this url from the saved URLs while it is being saved.
Remove this.
Remove trailing slashes
Remove unshift function
Remove unused requires.
Remove updated children first so that `toIndex` is consistent.
Remove zero-width spaces that were added by nodeTitleInfo.
Removed to create an eval-free library Reserved word lists for various dialects of the language
Removes `key` and its value from the associative array.
Removes `key` and its value from the hash.
Removes `key` and its value from the map.
Removes `key` and its value from the stack.
Removes a bulk set of the subscriptions.
Removes a child component.
Removes a component by ref from an owner component.
Removes a specific subscription.
Removes all entries which do not match the predicate.
Removes all items this object has added to Atom's ContextMenuManager.
Removes all key-value entries from the map.
Removes all key-value entries from the stack.
Removes all nodes that are tracking the given DataID from the query-tracker.
Removes all of the registered listeners, including those registered as listener maps.
Removes all text from the input.
Removes an edge from a connection without modifying the node data.
Removes an edge from this range such that the edge will never be reachable regardless of the client session.
Removes any elements below current, then pushes newTop onto the stack.
Removes directories even if they are non-empty.
Removes edge in range if it matches id in input edge.
Removes files.
Removes spans entirely within the change, reconnects spans belonging to the same marker that appear on both sides of the change, and cuts off spans partially within the change.
Removes the event listener.
Removes the leading comments from the first node.
Removes this subscription from the subscriber that controls it.
Removing a field should not result in a diff query since the edge is tracked.
Removing elements from the set is not supported.
Removing the logging code for production environments will keep the same logic and follow the same code paths.
Removing unlisted breakpoints and mark the ones that already exist.
Rename a file versioned under Hg.
Rename file to index
Rename, may be clobbered later.
Renamed "package" to "bundle".
Renames this directory to the given absolute path.
Render a blank outline when we change panes.
Render a line into the hidden node display.externalMeasured.
Render a new component into the DOM.
Render each group of markup with similar wrapping `nodeName`.
Render own properties.
Render package meta
Render template.
Render the DOM representation of the text of a line.
Render the button, making sure that the icon is centered.
Render the group heading with the heading-specific indent.
Render the initial style when the initial layout isn't measured yet.
Render the source map being generated to a string.
Render the versions at the end
Render truly inherited properties with black, i.e. return them as non-inherited.
Render will return this component if there are no root nodes.
Renderables
Rendered when the list is scrolled faster than rows can be rendered.
Rendering ANSI codes.
Rendering is done incrementally one row at a time to minimize the amount of work done per JS event tick.
Rendering offscreen to preserve correct alpha behavior is extremely expensive and hard to debug for non-native developers, which is why it is not turned on by default.
Rendering options
Renders a React component into the DOM in the supplied `container`.
Renders a boolean input.
Renders a native WebView.
Renders markup into an array of nodes.
Renders static content efficiently by allowing React to short-circuit the reconciliation process.
Renders the actual row contents.
Renders the native picker component on iOS and Android.
Renew the cached list of directories, as well as the cached map of eligible providers for every directory.
Reopen the picker for another anchor element.
Repeats the given string `n` times.
Replace a route in the navigation stack.
Replace a scene as specified by an index  `index` specifies the route in the stack that should be replaced.
Replace all the props.
Replace any instances already present with a re-opening code otherwise only the part of the string until said closing code will be colored, and the rest will simply be 'plain'.
Replace debugger script-based uiSourceCode with a network-based one.
Replace each astral symbol and every Unicode escape sequence that possibly represents an astral symbol or a paired surrogate with a single ASCII symbol to avoid throwing on regular expressions that are only valid in combination with the `/u` flag.
Replace each backslash with double backslash to make sure MS Crt arguments parser won't collapse them.
Replace each paired surrogate with a single ASCII symbol to avoid throwing on regular expressions that are only valid in combination with the "u" flag.
Replace every Unicode escape sequence with the equivalent BMP character or a constant ASCII code point in the case of astral symbols.
Replace new line outside of quotes since cmd.exe doesn't let to do it inside.
Replace the current active route with a new route, and pops out the rest routes after it.
Replace the current line with the properly-indented line.
Replace the current scene with a new route.
Replace the ext_pickle.js with the new content
Replace the item if it is a placeholder, returning the new item.
Replace the old pane axis with our new one and add the old one as a child to it.
Replace the placeholder with the real item.
Replace the previous scene and pop to it.
Replace the previous scene.
Replace the route for the current page and immediately load the view for the new route.
Replace the route/view for the previous page.
Replace the signature with the TOKEN, then hash and see if it matches the value in the file.
Replace this with a comma if the scope is broken.
Replaces a DOM node that exists in the document with markup.
Replaces a node with a string of markup at its current position within its parent.
Replaces all of the props.
Replaces all of the state.
Replaces all uses of type aliases in return types with their definition so that clients need not be aware of aliases.
Replaces any rendered children with a markup string.
Replaces any rendered children with a text content string.
Replaces the previous route/view and transitions back to it.
Replaces the top item and popToTop
Report the event as non-handled if there is no selected item, to commit the input or handle it otherwise.
Reports analytics including timing for a single operation.
Reports have shown that much more than 5 or 10 cause issues for corporate networks, private repos or situations where internet bandwidth is limited.
Reports test failure.
Repository Details
Repository-relative path.
Represents a Buck project on disk.
Represents a collection of errors for the purpose of consumers that generally only deal with one error.
Represents a named, custom type.
Represents a query fragment that is conditional upon the active route as a function that returns either a literal fragment or a fragment reference.
Represents one contiguous segment of edges within a `GraphQLRange`.
Represents one entry in a TreeComponent.
Represents the result of an executor executing code.
Represents the state of the CircularBuffer when an Iterator for it is created.
Reprint a modified syntax tree using as much of the original source code as possible.
Reprint transform.
Request a non-intersecting superset with after
Request a non-intersecting superset with before
Request a subset
Request a subset with after
Request a subset with before
Request a superset
Request a superset with after
Request a superset with before
Request from empty range
Request id is passed along to the native module so that the native module can identify the particular call instance.
Request offset once
Request server time
Request super set
Request the from empty range
Request the full set
Request the full set to make sure it is stitched properly
Request the super set
RequestSigners come in two varieties: ones with an rs_signFunc, and ones with an rs_signer.
Requests an update to variables.
Requests are always asynchronous, so do nothing.
Requests are processed serially and strictly in order.
Requests coming from React Native
Requests inspected page to be placed atop of the inspector frontend with specified bounds.
Requests notification permissions from iOS, prompting the user's dialog box.
Require Alert on demand.
Require commands only when called.
Require examples in this string must be split to prevent React's build tools from mistaking them for real requires.
Require system.
Require the babel-preset's listed in the default babel config
Require the given path.
Required by Hawk.client.header
Required function which renders the scene for a given route.
Required if no initialRoute is provided.
Requirements: 1.
Requires API Level 21 - `WIFI` - The WIFI data connection.
Requires ec.js, jsbn.js, and jsbn2.js
Requires will still be generated for these modules unless they are also provided in 'builtIns'.
Requiring it too early can lead to issues with things like Platform not being fully initialized.
Requst a superset
Reserve space for the entry, as they have to be ordered by startTime.
Reserved names are extracted
Reserved values are passed in at call site.
Reserved word lists for various dialects of the language
Reset actions dropdown for input DebuggerLaunchAttachProvider.
Reset again after, in case modified in handler
Reset cache
Reset cache for branches, tags, etc
Reset connections dropdown with latest connections.
Reset crumb styles.
Reset data store.
Reset debugging types dropdown for input connection.
Reset every scene with an array of routes.
Reset for subsequent tests.
Reset hooks
Reset in memory cache for each test
Reset pending fields Even if this component is scheduled for another update in ReactUpdates, it would still be ignored because these fields are reset.
Reset query numbers back to q0.
Reset regex wrt.
Reset scope object prototype to null so that the proto properties don't appear in the local scope section.
Reset search restore.
Reset selected item to DEFAULT_OPTION_INDEX if target is not launchable anymore.
Reset selector marks in group.
Reset so that subsequent non-key-initiated buffer updates don't produce silly big numbers.
Reset state
Reset stuff
Reset the current text selection only if the click is done outside of the selection and 'resetSelectionOnContextMenu' option is true.
Reset the file path.
Reset the hash object for reuse
Reset the original 'dim' if we changed it to work around the Windows dimmed gray issue.
Reset the regex so it will start the next search at the beginning of the string.
Reset the selection to a single range.
Reset the state of the RegExp.
Reset to false every time becomes responder.
Resets all ANSI formatting on the stream.
Resets if scoll back up and down again.
Resets the color.
Resets the internal queue.
Resets the node to be kept in view if no more data is being awaited.
Resize gaps first.
Resize main element early and force layout.
Resize the pane to fit its contents.
Resolutions
Resolve `path`.
Resolve default props
Resolve everything except for indents and cursor.
Resolve keys you want to use once at startup time, then reuse those resolutions.
Resolve promise to the dst dir
Resolve promise with canonical dir and package meta
Resolve reference IP address
Resolve relative path arguments against the Buck project root.
Resolve relative to the parent.
Resolve self
Resolve service path defined in services-3.json to absolute path.
Resolve the resolver
Resolve the source using the factory because the source can actually be a registry name
Resolve to an empty array if the directory deson't exist.
Resolve to null because it's a dir
Resolve to some-branch
Resolve with canonical dir and package meta
Resolve with meaningful data
Resolve with removed packages
Resolve with the final location
Resolve with the folder
Resolves a plural fragment pointer into an array of records.
Resolves a value from CallArgument description.
Resolves data for a single fragment pointer.
Resolves if the connection looks healthy.
Resolves non-plural fragments.
Resolves onLoaderBreakpointResumePromise.
Resolves plural fragments.
Resolves to just the scaled asset filename E.g.
Resolves to where the bundle is running from, with a scaled asset filename E.g.
Resolves when the server is ready or the request times out, as indicated by the result of the returned Promise.
Resort to using the resolver name for unnamed endpoints
Resources are automatically cleaned up once all subscribers of an expression have unsubscribed.
Respond in the UI immediately and assume the process is properly killed.
Responder, active, in the `PressRect`
Responder, active, in the `PressRect`, after long press threshold
Responder, active, out of `PressRect`
Responder, active, out of `PressRect`, after long press threshold
Responder, inactive, in the `PressRect`
Responder, inactive, out of `PressRect`
Response controls running state.
Response header columns
Responses and Messages are transformed into these.
Responses to the DBGP 'status' command
Restart replica set primary.
Restore all breakpoints from saved decorations.
Restore docked layout in case of smooth transition.
Restore oldFsRename
Restore pathToConnection to its original state
Restore the original dependencies cross-references, that is, the parent-child relationships
Restores a setting for a Nuclide feature key to its default value.
Restores data for a fragment incrementally from cache.
Restores data for queries incrementally from cache.
Restoring selection even in the event of an unexpected error.
Restricts the range of possible date/time values.
Result from register action on stub
Result: Non plain array
Result: Plain array
Results in the current file, have filename set to empty string.
Results may be `null` if the data was marked as deleted or `undefined` if the fragment was either not fetched or evicted from the cache.
Results should be cached keyed by the query with values of null meaning "being fetched" and anything besides null and undefined as the result of a valid query
Resume the debugger if needed.
Retrieve an object's values as an array.
Retrieve and filter the old marked spans stored in a change event.
Retrieve specific property
Retrieves `state.data`, initializing it if necessary.
Retrieves a reference to the fragment by name.
Retrieves the base64-encoded data for an image in the ImageStore.
Retrieving Diffs
Retry a maximum of 4 times when nonsense rectangles are returned
Retry every second until we find an active device.
Retry on network errors
Retry should go through.
Return 'true' for polyfills
Return a Range if the marker is still valid, otherwise return null
Return a copy of the original AST so that any changes made may be compared to the original.
Return a defensive copy of any existing FastPath instances.
Return a memoized function that checks for the existence of a project level .babelrc file, and if it doesn't exist, reads the default RN babelrc file and uses that.
Return a new Disposable that upon dispose, will remove the bound watch subscription.
Return a non-matching owner
Return a promise that resolves on search completion.
Return a regular expression object for this pattern-flag pair, or `null` in case the current environment doesn't support the flags it uses.
Return a require function relative to the `parent` path.
Return a selection that does not partially select any atomic ranges.
Return a simpler request object to allow serialization
Return a simpler response object to allow serialization
Return a string suitable for a Bash completion file for this tool.
Return absolute URLs as-is.
Return an array
Return an array of lines wrapping the given text to the given width.
Return an option matching `arg` if any.
Return an outline object with the node under the cursor highlighted.
Return attachables.
Return available launch/attach provider for input connection.
Return command help documentation.
Return early in case 0 selection window.
Return help for options.
Return help output for the current options.
Return how many unique items are in this ArraySet.
Return if this is simple 'click', since dispatched on glass pane, can't use 'click' event.
Return index of the leftmost element that is equal or greater than the specimen object.
Return index of the leftmost element that is greater than the specimen object.
Return list of commits, including one tag.
Return locally bound variables in these three cases:
Return null here.
Return null if zero digits were read, the integer value otherwise.
Return null in the case where there isn't a closing tag.
Return null when the line isn't visible.
Return option name.
Return otherwise.
Return program help documentation.
Return relative paths to status code number values object.
Return special URLs as-is.
Return the Object shape expected by `HgServiceBase`.
Return the actual search results.
Return the always-fail directory when it is expanded.
Return the appropriate call.
Return the column of the colon to align with, or null if it doesn't exist.
Return the config names, with the same number of dashes as the current word has.
Return the deepest cached node whose ID is a prefix of `targetID`.
Return the exports of the module
Return the first path found that any target is inside
Return the key for the first node that is selected, or null if there are none.
Return the largest option length.
Return the modified object
Return the object, which will automatically be converted to an id through the marshalling system.
Return the remote module.
Return the response as a JSON encoded string.
Return the string representation of this source node.
Return the tab URI for the opened diff view tab item.
Return the tab title for the opened diff view tab item.
Return the version string, if it exists
Return true if the next token is an assignment operator
Return true if the next token matches the specified keyword
Return true if the next token matches the specified punctuator.
Return true if we have the source content for every source in the source map, false otherwise.
Return true if your provider supports finding references for the provided TextEditor.
Return true or false from this method to continue loading the request.
Return true to cancel press on long press.
Return types.
Return variables for tokenizers
Return whether a native keypress event is assumed to be a command.
Returned comparator is splitted to comparator and version parts.
Returned or thrown by various protocols to signal 'I'm not handling this'.
Returns -1 on failure.
Returns RSS of the child process in bytes.
Returns `true` if `node` is considered "empty", which means that it contains no non-generated fields, and no ref query dependencies.
Returns `true` if the feature with the given name is disabled either directly or because the 'nuclide' package itself is disabled.
Returns a Babel Expression AST node, or null if the parse does not succeed.
Returns a Promise that resolves to a target location.
Returns a Promise that resolves to the last result of `run`, as soon as there are no more outstanding `run` calls.
Returns a Promise that's resolved when the roots are rendered.
Returns a Promise which when resolved will be of shape `getPhotosReturnChecker`.
Returns a Promise with photo identifier objects from the local camera roll of the device matching shape defined by `getPhotosReturnChecker`.
Returns a Promise.
Returns a Set excluding any routes contained within the stack given.
Returns a `Promise` object.
Returns a `Promise` that's resolved when the latest suggestion's available.
Returns a box for a given cursor position, which may have an 'other' property containing the position of the secondary cursor on a bidi boundary.
Returns a breakpoint id
Returns a clone of the input with `edges` and `node` sub-fields split into separate `edges` and `node` roots.
Returns a copy of the input Array with all `null` and `undefined` values filtered out.
Returns a filter for whether or not the given status code should be returned, given the passed-in options for ::getStatuses.
Returns a free index if one is available, and the next consecutive index otherwise.
Returns a hash of the field name and all argument values.
Returns a language-sensitive string representation of this number.
Returns a list of all IDs that were registered for this segment.
Returns a list of all expression around the given position.
Returns a list of client mutation IDs for queued mutations whose optimistic updates are affecting the record corresponding the given dataID.
Returns a list of supported debugger actions.
Returns a modified function which warns once by default.
Returns a new Babel Transformer that uses the supplied schema to transform template strings tagged with `Relay.QL` into an internal representation of GraphQL queries.
Returns a new stack a size ones less than this stack, excluding the last index in this stack.
Returns a new stack with the provided route appended, starting at this stack size.
Returns a node if it is the only one selected, or null otherwise
Returns a path like 'drawable-mdpi/icon.png'
Returns a promise that resolves to the result of executing a process.
Returns a promise that will resolve after `milliSeconds` milli seconds.
Returns a property descriptor for the given "index", with "get" and "set" functions created within the closure.
Returns a random integer within the range `low ..
Returns a reference to the underlying scroll responder, which supports operations like `scrollTo`.
Returns a regular expression for modules that should be ignored by the packager on a given platform.
Returns a reverse-chronological list of recently opened files.
Returns a stream of counters as they are created.
Returns a string with backslashes replaced by two backslashes for use with strings passed to the `RegExp` constructor.
Returns a sub-reducer that will be used when pushing a new route.
Returns a text editor that has the given path open, or null if none exists.
Returns a token that can be parsed using parseRangeClientID to recover the attributes needed to retrieve the corresponding items from a GraphQLRange.
Returns a type that matches the given value iff any of type1, type2, etc.
Returns a unique key which can be associated with the component.
Returns a value derived asynchronously from an element in the items array.
Returns a version of the query text with extraneous whitespace removed.
Returns all generated line and column information for the original source, line, and column provided.
Returns all loaded non anonymous uiSourceCodes.
Returns all valid ids and cursors.
Returns an absolute URL which can be used to fetch the asset from the devserver
Returns an absolute path
Returns an array containing the number of rows in each section
Returns an array of LineDiff that describes the diffs between the given file's `HEAD` contents and its current contents.
Returns an array of key names that were found on the object, but did not appear in the list of allowed properties.
Returns an array of listeners that are currently registered for the given event.
Returns an array of logical lines that continue the visual line started by the argument, or undefined if there are no such lines.
Returns an array of saved connection profiles.
Returns an array of the given object's own enumerable entries.
Returns an array of transforms that return true when shouldTransformFile is called.
Returns an array of trasnforms that return true when shouldTransformFunction is called.
Returns an empty array for nodes with no leading or trailing comments.
Returns an existing buffer for that uri, or create one if not existing.
Returns an exsting buffer for that uri, or null if not existing.
Returns an integer value which specifies the current evaluation phase of the event flow.
Returns an object containing the resulting attributes.
Returns an object mapping from every known type in the defCache to the most specific supertype whose name is an own property of the candidates object.
Returns an object that tracks the mouse position in a text editor.
Returns an object to insert in the props stack from the props and the transition/animation info.
Returns an object to remove the source when the component unmounts.
Returns an object whose keys are labels and values are TreeNodeComponent's.
Returns an object with scrollTop and scrollLeft properties.
Returns an observable of evaluation results for a given expression.
Returns an profiled version of the input function.
Returns class name of the object, if any.
Returns dx/dt given t, x1, and x2, or dy/dt given t, y1, and y2.
Returns early if the field has not been fetched, otherwise the result of traversal.
Returns early if the range has not been fetched or the entire range has already been fetched.
Returns either 'DIR', 'FILE', or false
Returns false for lines that are fully left-to-right, and an array of BidiSpan objects otherwise.
Returns false when no bracket was found, null when it reached maxScanLines and gave up
Returns if the `rootPath` directory contains the `checkPath` which could be: - A file or directory path that's a direct child of the root path.
Returns if the input is currently focused.
Returns if the row is dirtied and needs to be rerendered
Returns if the section header is dirtied and needs to be rerendered
Returns itself so as to provide a "fluent interface".
Returns markup similar to that produced by fixed-data-table v0.6.0.
Returns mixed so a cast is necessary.
Returns null for null cursors
Returns null if Flow cannot be found.
Returns null if all fields can be subtracted, `minuend` if no fields can be subtracted, and a new query otherwise.
Returns null if already at the last entry.
Returns null if no original source content is available.
Returns null if not a valid file: URI.
Returns null if target cannot be parsed from given arguments.
Returns null if the formatter won't shorten the hostname.
Returns null if the node can not belong to the sub-branch
Returns null if the object is already disposed.
Returns null if the record isn't affected by any optimistic updates.
Returns null if there is no previous entry.
Returns null if we can't get the key at this time because the RemoteConnection is initializing.
Returns one of: starting, stopping, stopped, running, break
Returns paths of currently opened editor tabs.
Returns property for basic edges
Returns range information for the given connection field: - `filteredEdges`: any edges already fetched for the given `calls`.
Returns target as object with path and name properties.
Returns target uri for this provider.
Returns the Atom action for toggling this provider.
Returns the DOM node rendered by this component.
Returns the DOM node rendered by this element.
Returns the FlowService for the given URI, or the local FlowService if the given URI is null.
Returns the ID of the currently focused text field, if one exists If no text field is focused it returns null
Returns the RelayMutationTransaction.
Returns the UI component for input debug action.
Returns the amount to extend the `HitRect` into the `PressRect`.
Returns the array of subscriptions that are currently registered for the given event type.
Returns the base 64 VLQ encoded value.
Returns the component-specific DataID stored in `state`, falling back to the generic "store" DataID.
Returns the current list of routes.
Returns the current resizable length.
Returns the definition of a named type.
Returns the dependencies an entry path has.
Returns the device pixel density.
Returns the empty string on failure
Returns the exception breakpoint id.
Returns the field name based on the object key used to store the data in nodeData.
Returns the first child in a collection of children and verifies that there is only one child in the collection.
Returns the first suggestion from the consumed providers.
Returns the flat, sorted array of mappings.
Returns the generated line and column information for the original source, line, and column positions provided.
Returns the iterator method function contained on the iterable object.
Returns the key associated with the route.
Returns the last shown descendant according to the natural tree order as is to be displayed by the file-tree panel.
Returns the name of the .res file that will be generated
Returns the native webview node.
Returns the nested AliasMap for `node`, initializing if it necessary.
Returns the node that represents native view that can be scrolled.
Returns the number of millis to wait before triggering a highlight.
Returns the original source content.
Returns the original source, line, and column information for the generated source's line and column positions provided.
Returns the path to a non-refetchable record.
Returns the pending mutation transactions affecting the given record.
Returns the pixel position in the DOM of the text editor's screen position.
Returns the provider name or a default value
Returns the query fragment that matches the given route, if any.
Returns the related files and the given file's index in that array.
Returns the requisite siblings of `node`, but filters any non-requisite children of those siblings.
Returns the scaling factor for font sizes.
Returns the score of the common subsequence between `needle` and `haystack` or -1 if there is no common subsequence.
Returns the signing token to be embedded, generally in a header comment, in the file you wish to be signed.
Returns the status of the record stored at `dataID`.
Returns the string representation of this source node along with a source map.
Returns the sub-reducer for a particular state to handle.
Returns the text and range for the word that contains the given position.
Returns the total number of non-deleted edges in the segment.
Returns the usage instructions for node-gyp.
Returns the value of a setting for a Nuclide feature key.
Returns the value of the "length" Symbol.
Returns the value of the config item at `key`.
Returns the value of the field for the given dataID.
Returns the values of literals and simple constant variables.
Returns the wrapped function.
Returns to the start
Returns total size in DIP.
Returns true by default.
Returns true if `bufferPosition` is prefixed with any of the passed `checkPrefixes`.
Returns true if `query` contains a node that equals the `target` node
Returns true if a promise was returned.
Returns true if child is equal to, or is a proper child of parent.
Returns true if the given mode name is enabled, false otherwise.
Returns true if the path being checked exists in a `NFS` mounted directory device.
Returns true if the store has no data, i.e. no roots, no children.
Returns true if the value was found and deleted and false otherwise.
Returns true if there are any transforms that would want to modify the current source.
Returns true iff the fix succeeds.
Returns true only if the concrete nodes, routes, and variables are all the same.
Returns true when an update is needed.
Returns true when the values of all keys are strictly equal.
Returns two arrays of keys that contain each object's exclusive keys.
Returns undefined for empty segment
Returns undefined when all edges are deleted
Returns undefined when the input cannot be reconciled.
Returns whether
Returns whether a given record is affected by an optimistic update.
Returns whether an event should be handled by hyperclick or not.
Returns whether there is a range at `connectionID`.
Returns whether this is currently a set of static calls that GraphQLRange supports.
Reusable props objects.
Reuse `prevScene` as `scene` so view can avoid unnecessary re-render.
Reuse `root` if it only maps to one result.
Reuse divider elements and labels.
Reuse existing generated IDs if the node does not have its own `id`.
Reuse original spaces if the indentation is correct.
Reuse scheduled promise and resolve to 2 in 20 ms.
Reused empty array added for node fields that are always empty.
Reveal the file of a given tab based on the path stored on the DOM.
Reveal the file that currently has focus in the file tree.
Reverse direction.
Reverse edges because larger index were added first
Reverse it to insert items correctly.
Reversing the new modules makes sense because we get them through the resolver which returns a BFS ordered list.
Revert a change stored in a document's history.
Revert the customization and verify it has been reverted.
Revert the select back to its default unselected state.
Revert this when done.
Revert to a trimmed version of the selector if need be.
Revert to the DOM batching strategy since these two renderers currently share these stateful modules.
Revision ids are unique and don't change, except when the revision is amended/rebased.
Rewrite this to only work one way.
Rhino's regular expression parser is flaky and throws uncatchable exceptions, so don't do detection if we are running under Rhino
Right now our internals discard the information about the relationship between the queries that is encoded in the nested structure.
Right now we only care about messages with fixes.
Right now, GitRepository dictates either 'did-change-status' or 'did-change-statuses'.
Right will likely cause a context menu.
Root and fragment nodes must always have children.
Root fields that do not accept arguments
Root is tracked after setting it.
Root node - no siblings.
Root reads yield the `dataID` of the root, if found.
Rotating matVar by q
Rotating matVar which is known to be identity by q
Row data should be provided as a simple array corresponding to rows.
Rule number two.
Run a task and transform its output into domain-specific actions.
Run all the benchmarks in the benchmarks folder.
Run bower info jquery to list the available versions.
Run overlays, adjust style array.
Run post-uninstall hook before resolving with removed packages.
Run snippet.
Run specified test on a fresh instance of the test suite.
Run specified test.
Run the benchmark for this iteration/repetition and append the results to the result file.
Run the first scheduled task instantly.
Run the given function in an operation
Run the given mode's parser over a line, calling f for each token.
Run the search on each subdirectory that exists.
Running in an iframe on the Relay website
Running locally
Running state means that all connections are in the running state.
Runs `buck query --json` with a query that contains placeholders and therefore expects arguments.
Runs `buck query --json` with the specified query.
Runs `queryNode` against the data in `dataID` and returns the result.
Runs a script on the node's remote object that toggles a class name on the node and injects a stylesheet into the head of the node's document containing a rule to set "visibility: hidden" on the class and all it's ancestors.
Runs an easing function backwards.
Runs the appropriate `atom --test` command and exits when the test completes.
Runs the equivalent of `cp sourcePath destinationPath`.
Runs the equivalent of `mkdir -p` with the given path.
Runs the equivalent of `mv sourcePath destinationPath`.
Runs the server in the appropriate place.
Runtime domain types.
S4.1.1 Trailing semi-colons are not part of the specification.
S4.1.2.3 suggests that this is bad.
S5.1.2 Canonicalized Host Names
S5.1.3 Domain Matching
S5.2 step 1
S5.2.3 "If the attribute-value is empty, the behavior is undefined.
S5.2.6 -- effectively the same as 'secure'
S5.3 step 1
S5.3 step 11 - "If the cookie store contains a cookie with the same name, domain, and path as the newly created cookie:"
S5.3 step 2
S5.3 step 6:
S5.4 part 3
SCROLL EVENTS Sync the scrollable area and scrollbars, ensure the viewport covers the visible area.
SCROLLBARS Prepare DOM reads needed to update the scrollbars.
SCROLLING THINGS INTO VIEW If an editor sits on the top or bottom of the window, partially scrolled out of view, this ensures that the cursor is visible.
SECTION: handle `change` event
SECTION: handle `click` event
SECTION: handle `input` event
SELECTION / CURSOR Selection objects are immutable.
SELECTION DRAWING Redraw the selection and/or cursor
SELECTION UPDATES The 'scroll' parameter given to many of these indicated whether the new cursor position should be scrolled into view after modifying the selection.
SES uses a different domain from the service name
SHARED TEXTMARKERS A shared marker spans multiple linked documents.
SIGTERM should have reached inner child
STANDARD COMMANDS Commands are parameter-less actions that can be performed on an editor, mostly used for keybindings.
STANDARD KEYMAPS
STATE UPDATES Used to get the editor into a consistent state again when options change.
STRING STREAM Fed to the mode parsers, provides helper functions to make parsers more succinct.
SVG-related properties
SVG-specific
Sadly we can't just give the line number to github, we have to give the line number relative to the patch file which is super annoying.
Sadly, our setup fatals when doing multiple concurrent requests I don't have the time to dig into why, it's easier to just serialize requests.
Safari 5.0 bug
Safari 8.1 incorrectly makes `arguments.callee` enumerable in strict mode.
Safe to call many times because it only changes state if a node is being tracked.
Same as FlowStatusErrorMessageComponent, except without the 'level' field.
Same as `accumulateDirectDispatchesSingle` but without requiring that the `dispatchMarker` be the same as the dispatched ID.
Same as `accumulateTwoPhaseDispatchesSingle`, but skips over the targetID.
Same as `build`, but returns additional output via an Observable.
Same as `install`, but returns additional output via an Observable.
Same as `toEqualAtomRange` but for an array of Ranges.
Same as `traverseTwoPhase` but skips the `targetID`.
Same as document.activeElement but wraps in a try-catch block.
Same as the above, but works for non-homogenous input.
Same semantics as install and publish.
Sample React Native App https://github.com/facebook/react-native
Sample packages are disabled by default.
Sanitize a URL for a link or image
Sanitize choice
Sanitize the value from the HTTP server
Sanity check.
Sanity checks:
Save JSON of full schema introspection for Babel Relay Plugin to use
Save JSON, might contain changes to dependencies and resolutions
Save JSON, might contain changes to resolutions
Save `namespaces`.
Save and remove muted breakpoint decorations.
Save last official command to detect upgrade.
Save only if there's something different
Save present categories only upon user gesture to clean up junk from past versions and removed extensions.
Save resolution
Save resolution to be used in hasNew later
Save serverOpts before extracting servers from the array's length
Save the assets of the bundle
Save the file if that option is specified.
Save the generic parts of all stack traces so we can avoid hardcoding Node-specific implementation details in our testing of stack traces.
Save the latest edited commit message for layout switches.
Save the latest edited publish message for layout switches.
Save the remote server command only if it is changed.
Save the resolved, shasum, etc.
Save the underlying nodes before removing the paths
Save the validated profile, and show any warning messages.
Save things
Save timeout before retrying to report
Save unused substitutions.
Save user readable type system shorthand of schema
Save version/tag/commit in the release Note that we can't store branches because _release is supposed to be an unique id of this ref.
Saves a connection configuration along with the last official server command.
Saves all JS modules of an app as a single file, separated with null bytes.
Saves lots of bytes.
Saves the connection profiles.
Saves the edited file in the editable right text editor.
Saves the image to the camera roll / gallery.
Scale an image to the minimum size that is large enough to completely fill the crop box.
Scale should be applied to page-scale-dependent UI bits.
Scaling matVar by opVar
Scaling matVar known to be identity by opVar
Scene is far away from the active scene.
Scene's children should not receive touches until the position is close enough to scene's index.
Schedule a function to run after all interactions have completed.
Schedule an asynchronous update to the interaction state.
Schedule refresh to update boundaries and draw the new line.
Schedule scroll to first line after all lines have been rendered.
Schedule the next async, and resolve to 2 in 20 ms.
Schedule work for after all interactions have completed.
ScheduleStyleInvalidationTracking events are only used for adding information to StyleInvalidatorInvalidationTracking events.
Scheduler only sees one task at a time.
Scheduler only sees the next task after `resolveImmediate`.
Schedules a collection for any currently unreferenced records.
Schedules a collection starting at the given record.
Schedules an animation to happen on the next layout.
Schedules the localNotification for future presentation.
Schedules the localNotification for immediate presentation.
Schedules the supplied `query` to be sent to the server.
Scope has null `edgeID` to skip looking at `edges` fields.
Scope objects always fetch preview.
Score item.
Score values are difficult to test.
Scores this object's string against the query given.
Screen and window dimensions are different on android
Screw you if you pick something less than 40...
Script block: mode to change to depends on type attribute
Script execution can already be paused.
Script failed to parse.
Scroll to the bottom of the list if autoscroll is active.
Scrollable mixin.
Scrolled out of the end zone, so it should be able to trigger again.
Scrolling the TextEditor
Scrolls to a given x, y offset, either immediately or with a smooth animation.
Search And Replace
Search an array of spans for a span matching the given marker.
Search for the attribute's position, and then decide where to move to.
Search for the location of "msbuild.exe" file on Windows.
Search for the pattern in the file.
Search fragments and the root node for matching fields, but skip descendant non-matching fields.
Search in the fixtures/basic directory.
Search results: jquery http://jquery.io bower http://bower.io
Searches for all instances of a pattern in a directory.
Searches upwards through the filesystem from pathToFile to find a file with fileName.
Searching and Replacing
Second half of `ToInteger`
Second view should be gone.
Second view should be in the DOM.
Secondary cursor, shown when on a 'jump' in bi-directional text
Section: Add/Remove PathSets
Section: Bookmarks
Section: Checking Out
Section: Constants, Type Definitions
Section: Consuming Services
Section: Default Connection Profile
Section: Default/Last-Used Connection Profiles
Section: Event Emitting
Section: Event Subscription
Section: Expression Formation
Section: Feedback from the UI
Section: File and Repository Status
Section: HgRepositoryClient
Section: HgService subscriptions
Section: Invalid Profiles
Section: Managing Context Menus
Section: Managing Gutters
Section: Methods to modify the store.
Section: Methods to read from the store.
Section: PathSet Updating
Section: Repository Details
Section: Repository State at Specific Revisions
Section: Revision Sets
Section: Special Cases
Section: User-created Connection Profiles
Section: Valid Profiles
Section: Watchman Subscriptions
See "LICENSE" for details.
See "examples/ddcompletion.js" for an example.
See "short-method-shadow.test".
See ExtensionAPI.js for details.
See GH-483.
See HgService.getBlameAtHead.
See HgService.getDifferentialRevisionForChangeSetId.
See HgService::getStatuses for more information.
See Incremental.js for more info.
See LICENSE or: http://opensource.org/licenses/BSD-3-Clause
See LICENSE or: http://opensource.org/licenses/BSD-3-Clause  Based on the Base 64 VLQ implementation in Closure Compiler: https://code.google.com/p/closure-compiler/source/browse/trunk/src/com/google/debugging/sourcemap/Base64VLQ.java  Copyright 2011 The Closure Compiler Authors.
See LICENSE.txt or: http://opensource.org/licenses/BSD-3-Clause
See Mercurial documentation for ways to specify a revision.
See ReactUpdateQueue
See ReactUpdates and ReactUpdateQueue.
See UIManager.js for options
See `::_isSecure`, which returns the security of this connection after the server is started.
See `EdgeInsetsPropType.js` for more information.
See `InitializeJavascriptAppEngine.js`
See `Navigator.SceneConfigs` for default animations and more info on scene config options.
See `ReactClassInterface` for more the comprehensive protocol.
See `StyleSheet.js` and `ViewStylePropTypes.js` for more info.
See `_updateDOMProperties`.
See `createPrimitiveTypeChecker`.
See `handleChange` comment below
See `specExtra` for providing Bash `complete_TYPE` functions, e.g. `complete_fruit` and `complete_veggie` in this example.
See also http://marijnhaverbeke.nl/blog/codemirror-line-tree.html
See also tools/generate-unicode-regex.js.
See bugzil.la/1090768.
See comment for NewExpression above.
See corresponding comment in `callTimers` for reasoning behind this
See crbug.com/410899
See discussion below on event order ...
See discussion below on event order.
See doc/install.md for more description Managing contexts...
See documentation for each of these class methods that you should implement.
See enqueueUpdates.
See ensureComponentIsNative.js for more info
See for details: http://tweetnacl.cr.yp.to/
See for more info: https://www.isecpartners.com/blog/2011/february/double-hmac- verification.aspx
See here: http://nodejs.org/api/child_process.html The additional options we provide: queueName string The queue on which to block dependent calls.
See http://bugs.jquery.com/ticket/12385.
See http://code.google.com/p/closure-compiler/wiki/SourceMaps for format description.
See http://facebook.github.io/react/docs/addons.html
See http://schema.org/docs/gs.html
See http://timelessrepo.com/json-isnt-a-javascript-subset
See http://www.softwareishard.com/blog/har-12-spec/ for HAR specification.
See https://codereview.chromium.org/121173009/ .
See https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/API/CloseEvent
See https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/API/WebSocket See https://github.com/websockets/ws
See https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Exponentiation_by_squaring for more details.
See https://github.com/ReactiveX/rxjs/issues/1610
See https://github.com/atom/atom/pull/9968.
See https://github.com/atom/autocomplete-plus/issues/597
See https://github.com/broofa/node-uuid for API details
See https://github.com/facebook/flow/issues/1654.
See https://github.com/facebook/nuclide/issues/416
See https://github.com/facebook/react/issues/708.
See https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/1726
See https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/7139
See https://github.com/mozilla/source-map/issues/16
See https://github.com/mozilla/sweet.js/wiki/design
See https://github.com/node-inspector/node-inspector/issues/344
See https://github.com/npm/npm/issues/8881
See https://www.kernel.org/pub/software/scm/git/docs/git-check-ref-format.html
See if "".split is the broken IE version, if so, provide an alternative way to split lines.
See if cache can find it.
See if there's anything else
See if this is React Native itself and, if so, return the command to run the packager.
See node-verror for an example.
See note below for how this affected non-hosted URLs.
See paste handler for more on the fakedLastChar kludge
See readInput and resetInput
See resorceStarted for details.
See t6913624.
See the GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.
See the License for the specific language governing permissions and limitations under the License.
See the README for how to specify each option spec.
See the `RelayStore` module for documentation on the callback.
See the constructor of ProcessOutputView for more information.
See the corresponding prop for more detail.
See the initialRoute propType for a complete definition of a route.
See type `MutationConfig` and the `buildFragmentForEdgeInsertion`, `buildFragmentForEdgeDeletion` and `buildFragmentForFields` methods above for possible configs.
See what push permissions are currently enabled.
See: D3192728
See: _addSyntheticStyleRecalcInvalidations.
See: http://stackoverflow.com/a/1068308/13216
See: http://stackoverflow.com/a/6155063/376773
See: https://atom.io/packages/file-icons
See: https://github.com/bower/bower/issues/1362
See: https://github.com/facebook/react/issues/2295
See: https://github.com/paulmillr/es6-shim/blob/master/es6-shim.js
See: https://our.intern.facebook.com/intern/dex/nuclide/writing-an-integration-test/ for instructions on how to write integration tests.
See: webreflection.blogspot.com/2007/07/quick-fix-internet-explorer-and.html
Seed with a compile request to ensure fast responses.
Select a color.
Select it and expand if necessary.
Select tab if this file was the last to be shown.
Select the default connection profile, which should always be index 0.
Select the final connection profile in the list because one of the above conditions means the current selected index is outdated.
Select the node on right-click.
Select-all will be greyed out if there's nothing to select, so this adds a zero-width space so that we can later check whether it got selected.
Selecting a single node, node2, deselects nodes in all other roots
Selecting a value in the dropdown changes the text as well.
Selects a single node and tracks it.
Selects the first comment from the list and forces a refresh of the code view.
Self is preserved since the owner is preserved.
Self-resetting timeout for the poller
Send a batched update and clear the pending changes.
Send a dummy request so that we can read the state from the response.
Send a message to front-end.
Send a message to server to call the dispose function of the remote Observable subscription.
Send a request to the Clang server.
Send a response to a front-end request.
Send an array of file/line objects.
Send an event to the front-end.
Send authenticated request
Send back the result.
Send synchronous XHR to sniff network events
Send the incoming requests to the worker process for evaluation.
Send the next, error, and completion events of the observable across the socket.
Send the result of the promise across the socket.
Send the update to the native module only once at the end of the frame.
Send unauthenticated request
Sends a POST request with optional files.
Sends any non-newline terminated data before closing.
Sends command to hhvm.
Sentinel catch-all version constraint used when a dependency is not listed in the package.json file.
Separate the lines into groups, beginning with metadata lines.
Serialize / Deserialize Arrays.
Serialize / Deserialize Buffer objects through Base64 strings
Serialize / Deserialize Javascript Date objects
Serialize / Deserialize Maps.
Serialize / Deserialize RegExp objects
Serialize / Deserialize Sets.
Serialize / Deserialize Tuples.
Serialize / Deserialize any Object type
Serialize a JS object in a way that the result is valid JavaScript.
Serialize and Deserialize Objects.
Serialize the accumulated mappings in to the stream of base 64 VLQs specified by the source map format.
Serialize the restore state via an array of provider names.
Serialized state is in reverse chronological order.
Serializes array of uiSourceCodes to string.
Serializes the method arguments to args and argTypes arrays to send the metadata about the argument types with the data to help the server understand and parse it.
Serve static resources
Serve the Relay app
Server sends headers after 100ms, then sends data during another 100ms.
Server shut down or port no longer accessible.
ServerConnection represents the client side of a connection to a remote machine.
Servers may have been deleted in the meantime, so calculate the total now.
Serves as infimum
Serves language requests from HackService.
Services don't support empty query string keys
Set / get the command usage `str`.
Set Agent from Tunnel Data
Set MongoRunner dataDir and dataPath properties.
Set StatusBar with light contents to get better contrast
Set `eventQueue` to null before processing it so that we can tell if more events get enqueued while processing.
Set a new selection.
Set as GitHub homepage if it's a GitHub repository
Set autofocus to true if this textarea is focused, or if it has autofocus and no other element is focused.
Set config related to script launching.
Set config.
Set content of string type.
Set dependencies based on the response
Set features.
Set global.atom before running any more code.
Set homepage if not defined
Set ignore based on the response
Set initial count.
Set language on the element, if not present
Set language on the parent, for styling
Set loglevel
Set maintenance mode for all secondaries
Set new text content.
Set objects are collections of unique values.
Set of handlers to fire cursorActivity on
Set of names for providers that were hidden when Nuclide last exited, but have not yet been consumed.
Set of possible behaviors of merge algorithms when encountering two Arrays that must be merged together.
Set some debug/release specific options
Set state as "Running" to give immediate feedback in the UI.
Set template dir to the empty directory so that user templates are not run This environment variable is not multiple config aware but it's not documented anyway
Set the `DEBUG_FD` env variable to override with another value.
Set the buffer content to query against.
Set the changes subscription observable.
Set the description to `str`.
Set the initial state of the store.
Set the initial version by reading from the file.
Set the innerHTML property of a node, ensuring that whitespace is preserved even in IE8.
Set the partial bit after metadata has been copied over.
Set the program version to `str`.
Set the project.
Set the source content for a source file.
Set the testing window dimensions.
Set the text editor's initial value and keep the cursor at the beginning of the line.
Set the textContent property of a node, ensuring that whitespace is preserved even in IE8.
Set the title.
Set the versions also for the root node
Set this before onpopulate.
Set this property to `false` to disable this optimization and ensure that this View exists in the native view hierarchy.
Set this to null so this promise can't be rejected anymore.
Set this to true to override that behavior.
Set this up before we call jasmine-node.
Set timeout
Set to 'none' to not do this sorting.
Set to false by default to prevent accidental logging and perf loss.
Set to the height of the document, allowing scrolling.
Set to true if this is an 'arrayOf' type that collects multiple usages of the option in process.argv and puts results in an array.
Set to true when a non-horizontal-scrolling line widget is added.
Set to zero for unlimited.
Set up a class to get strong type checking.
Set up a config to easily add require formats
Set up a mechanism to cleanly shut down the socket.
Set up and Teardown of Atom Opener
Set up flux stuff.
Set up guard timer.
Set up methods on CodeMirror's prototype to redirect to the editor's document.
Set up some mock paths to be removed.
Set up the HackService to return some canned results.
Set up the cache as if these two other files were already inserted: '/A/blah.js' and '/Z/blah.js'.
Set up the console before running any user code.
Set up the functions for the rendering ANSI codes.
Set up the listener for the ack that the message was received.
Set up the on-the-fly transpiler.
Set up the positional ANSI codes.
Set up the rendering of the app for a given navigation state
Set up the state of the store.
Set up token state The current position of the tokenizer in the input.
Set when the widest line needs to be determined anew
Sets `end`, `val`, and maintains `context` and `exprAllowed`, and skips the space after the token, so that the next one's `start` will point at the right position.
Sets `value` for `key` and calls `callback` on completion, along with an `Error` if there is any.
Sets a given config setting in the debugger to a given value.
Sets a subset of the props.
Sets a subset of the state.
Sets an image for the thumb.
Sets an offset that is applied on top of whatever value is set, whether via `setValue`, an animation, or `Animated.event`.
Sets possible actions on the toolbar as part of the action menu.
Sets the JS to be injected when the webpage loads.
Sets the React-specific ID of the given node.
Sets the `env` object's `PATH` string to the values in the passed in Array instance.
Sets the associative array `key` to `value`.
Sets the badge number for the app icon on the home screen
Sets the color of the status bar text.
Sets the content inset for the toolbar ending edge.
Sets the content inset for the toolbar starting edge.
Sets the foreground color with the given RGB values.
Sets the hash `key` to `value`.
Sets the map `key` to `value`.
Sets the navigation icon.
Sets the number of lines for a TextInput.
Sets the overflow icon.
Sets the protected property `__node`.
Sets the schema of a setting for a Nuclide feature key.
Sets the stack `key` to `value`.
Sets the target on all links nested inside comments to be _blank.
Sets the toolbar logo.
Sets the toolbar subtitle color.
Sets the toolbar subtitle.
Sets the toolbar title color.
Sets the toolbar title.
Sets the user-agent for this WebView.
Sets the value for a property on a node.
Sets the value for multiple styles on a node.
Sets the value of a scalar field.
Sets the value of a setting for a Nuclide feature key.
Sets this markup string.
Sets this text content string.
Sets up a set of window environment wrappers that ensure that the BatchedBridge is flushed after each tick.
Sets up global variables typical in most JavaScript environments.
Sets up listeners so the user can jump to related files.
Sets up the instance.
Sets up this instance so that it is prepared for collecting metrics.
Sets whether or not any created callbacks should be enabled.
Sets whether the DelayedEventManager can currently accept more events.
Sets whether the webpage scales to fit the view and the user can change the scale.
Sets/clears the cache manager that is used to cache changes written to the store.
Sets/clears the scheduling function used by the internal task queue to schedule units of work for execution.
Setter for the "length" property.
Setting relaxed expectations to reduce flakiness.
Setting the lastIndex determines where the next search begins.
Setting the number to 0 removes the icon badge.
Setup 1.0 and 2.0 services.
Setup Proxy Header Exclusive List and White List
Setup Proxy Headers and Proxy Headers Host Only send the Proxy White Listed Header names
Setup error handler.
Setup methods on prototype: The following member methods should not be automatically bound: 1.
Setup the functions for the standard colors.
Setup the main package with a directory with the same name
Setup the test folder.
Several custom versions for each potential number of arguments.
Shallow copy args to avoid modifying original payload which may be saved to file.
Shallow copy the stored items and restore
Shallow merges two structures by mutating the first parameter.
Shallow merges two structures into a return value, without mutating either.
Shape Note: ART has a notion of width and height on Shape but AFAIK it's a noop in ReactART.
Shape of the param arg for the `getPhotos` function.
Shape of the return value of the `getPhotos` function.
Share image data
Shared base for platform-specific XMLHttpRequest implementations.
Shared by integration tests for ScrollView and HorizontalScrollView
Shared warning and monitoring code for the key warnings.
Shave off provisionally allocated space.
Shells out of the `hg status` to get the statuses of the paths.
Shells out to `hg diff` to retrieve line diff information for the paths.
Shift by 0 fixes the sign on the high part.
Shift the popup back down by GLYPH_HEIGHT, so that the bottom padding overlaps with the glyph.
Shims to Node.js objects when running under Rhino.
Short circuit on identical object references instead of traversing them.
Short format for `ms`.
Short option
Shorter than the default so the tests don't run long.
Shorthand for the property found.
Shorthand property that IE8 won't like unsetting, so unset each component to placate it
Should already be path-split by now.
Should be called after isVertical has the right value.
Should be implemented by subclasses.
Should be lower than all language-specific providers.
Should be present in the DOM.
Should be the active element.
Should be the last call in the method as it might force layout.
Should be the unique to all providers.
Should be used for properties that make no sense to be owned by the tree elements, yet such that affect the tree.
Should by in sync with style declarations.
Should get the same stdout and stderr each time
Should go over the list in reverse order alphabetically.
Should have skipped the repeated ones.
Should ignore release candidates
Should never happen.
Should not be documented.
Should not be invalidated
Should not collapse as it is not selectable.
Should not return extra edges
Should only be used on records read out from RelayRecordStore by `readRelayQueryData`.
Should see if there is a better spinner option that is not as expensive.
Should work again after compilation finishes.
Show --help
Show all of the containers recursively up the tree.
Show element's Style Attributes after all author rules.
Show or hide the panel, if necessary, to match the current state.
Show the gadget if it doesn't already exist in the workspace.
Show the gadget if it's hidden.
Show the given file in a file manager.
Show the loading cursor.
Show the second view
Show the side bar.
Show the suggestion at the last known mouse position.
Show the view
Show yellow box for the `warning` module.
Shown as a placeholder in the query input.
Shows a popup for the diagnostic just below the specified item.
Shows a redbox with stacktrace for all console.error messages.
Shows an indefinite, animated LoadingSpinner.
Shrink crumbs one at a time by applying the shrinkingFunction until the crumbs fit in the container or we run out of crumbs to shrink.
Shrinkwraps need to let you override dependency versions specified in package.json files.
Shutdown all test servers, replica sets, shard clusters, and bridges.
Siblings at the root node
Sign a source file which you have previously embedded a signing token into.
Signal as root
Signal that the changes stream is over.
Signals that the marker's widget changed, and surrounding layout should be recomputed.
Signing modifies only the signing token, so the semantics of the file will not change if you've put it in a comment.
Silent catch.
Silently exit when the watchID is invalid or already cleared This is consistent with timers
Silently steal the ref from the parent.
Silently swallow error
Similar to FastPath.prototype.each, except that the results of the callback function invocations are stored in an array and returned at the end of the iteration.
Similar to `getConfig`, this is used to create the query corresponding to the `optimisticResponse`.
Similar to addListener, except that the listener is removed after it is invoked once.
Similar to eachField, except that iteration stops as soon as the callback returns a truthy value.
Similar to invariant but only logs a warning if the condition is not met.
Similar to the logic for BlockStatement.
Similarly, if a file has been excluded, then there's no point trying it against rules that have already been applied
Simple alert examples.
Simple corrections to nearly valid identifiers.
Simple function for formatting strings.
Simple printers.
Simple regexp
Simple syntax
Simple utility for running the android yeoman generator.
Simple wrappers around NativeANimatedModule to provide flow and autocmplete support for the native module methods
Simple, lightweight module assisting with the detection and context of Worker.
Simplest method for creating a RelayGraphQLMutation instance from a static `mutation`, some `variables` and an `environment`.
Simplified subset
Simply a convenient way to inline functions using the function's toString method.
Simply applies the view's styles to the inner View component and renders its children.
Simply passes through the measured function, without measuring it.
Simply strip the 'resume wrapping' and 'stop wrapping' escape characters.
Simulate 'Toggle blame' click in context menu.
Simulate a keypress to trigger the autocomplete menu.
Simulate deactivation of FakeProvider
Simulate keyboard commands.
Simulate missed "frameAttached" for a main frame navigation to the new backend process.
Simulate racy removal by creating a file after vacuum thinks the directory is empty
Simulate scenes transtion with changes of navigation states.
Simulate the providers serializing their own state -- they would start out hidden if we exited Nuclide in distraction-free-mode.
Simulate the removing of a directory from the project list.
Simulates the traversal of a two-phase, capture/bubble event dispatch.
Since JS doesn't have multiple prototypal inheritance, this class prototypally inherits from Readable, and then parasitically from Writable.
Since Lines objects are immutable, we can reuse any source map that was previously generated.
Since RelayRenderer has not yet sent a request, view gets to update.
Since WebSockets are potentially long-living, fail requests immediately to prevent caller blocking until resource is marked as finished.
Since `_repositoryAdded` will no longer be about side effects, it should then be renamed.
Since `method` didn't throw, we don't want to silence the exception here.
Since `patternNode` exists, `subjectNode` must be in the intersection.
Since `pointerEvents` does not affect layout/appearance, and we are already deviating from the spec by adding additional modes, we opt to not include `pointerEvents` on `style`.
Since `setTimeout` gets preempted by them, it works great for a more realistic "first render".
Since compilation has been triggered but not awaited, this should instantly fail.
Since console.log support string format as first parameter, we should preserve this behavior by concating eventInfo with first parameter if it is string.
Since cursors are added at the end of nodes this will keep the most valid cursor that appears deepest in the tree.
Since elements are immutable after the owner is rendered, we can do a cheap identity compare here to determine if this is a superfluous reconcile.
Since it can render as 3 different native components we need to update viewConfig accordingly
Since it doesn't, we manually listen for the events and so we have to enqueue and process the abstract event manually.
Since it implements the emitter interface it can also be combined with anything that uses an emitter.
Since it's just a struct in RAM, this Store is synchronous
Since mappings are sorted, this is guaranteed to find all mappings for the line we are searching for.
Since mappings are sorted, this is guaranteed to find all mappings for the line we found.
Since no subdirs were specified, run search on the root directory.
Since nuclide-commons is a Node package, we might end up having multiple copy of it running in Node/Atom.
Since onpopulate can add elements, this makes sure the expanded flag is true before calling those functions.
Since our implementation is spec-compliant for the most part we can safely delegate to a built-in version if exists and is implemented correctly.
Since plain JS classes are defined without any special initialization logic, we can not catch common errors early.
Since previous versions didn't check for Content-Encoding header, ignore any invalid values to preserve backwards-compatibility
Since providers can be slow, the pane-change and edit events are emitted immediately in case the UI needs to clear outdated results.
Since something is open, the intent is probably to get back into the distraction-free mode.
Since string, number, and boolean are JSON primitives, they require no marshalling.
Since the ScrollView is wrapped add the style props to the AndroidSwipeRefreshLayout and use flex: 1 for the ScrollView.
Since the browser may natively replace the target node during composition, we can use its position to find its replacement.
Since the buffer is managed by this class, an undo will never happen.
Since the delta values reported on mouse wheel events are unstandardized between browsers and even browser versions, and generally horribly unpredictable, this code starts by measuring the scroll effect that the first few mouse wheel events have, and, from that, detects the way it can convert deltas to pixel offsets afterwards.
Since the directives have to go first, we can't use that mechanism to disable this check.
Since the input might not even be in a form, let's just use the global `querySelectorAll` to ensure we don't miss anything.
Since the parent is rendered in the list above the children, it doesn't really make sense to highlight it if you are below the start position of any child.
Since the print function that we pass to the reprinter will be used to print "new" nodes, it's tempting to think we should pass printRootGenerically instead of print, to avoid calling maybeReprint again, but that would be a mistake because the new nodes might not be entirely new, but merely moved from elsewhere in the AST.
Since there are multiple places where an error could occur, don't let the cb be called more than once.
Since there is no gap, we can stitch into the beginning of existing segment
Since there is no gap, we can stitch to the end of existing segment
Since there's various security issues with parsing this header, we only interpret word chars plus dots, dashes and spaces
Since this is a function it will not show up in `JSON.stringify` which is what we want.
Since this will be happening onmousemove, we also have to be careful to make sure this is not expensive.
Since using `List` is really just the implementation detail, we don't want to accept `routeNodes` as `list` from constructor for developer.
Since we can't define a non-enumerable property on the object we'll hijack one of the less-used non-enumerable properties to save our hash on it.
Since we register these buffers with the project, they will get serialized with NuclideTextBuffer as the deserializer.
Since we send a few http requests to setup the process, we don't want to run this file one time per code analysis tool.
Since we were not able to preserve all leading/trailing comments, we delete oldNode's comments, print newPath with comments, and then patch the resulting lines where oldNode used to be.
Single argument methods get dispatched with the param.
Single line comment
Single parameter, or unused substitutions from above.
Single tokens longer than `width` are not broken up.
SinglePageObjectIds have fullname and page set.
Size of dropdown.
Size of the indicator.
Size of the reactRoot ID space.
Size of the refresh indicator, see PullToRefreshViewAndroid.SIZE
Size of the refresh indicator, see RefreshControl.SIZE.
Sizes match .btn classes in Atom's style guide.
Skinny tooltips are not pretty, their arrow location is not nice.
Skip 0th handler, as it's 'Use default panel' one.
Skip adding "Reveal..." menu item for our own tree outline.
Skip already added nodes.
Skip cached modules
Skip checking prop types again -- we don't read inst.props to avoid warning for DOM component props in this upgrade
Skip current element
Skip fragments that do not match the record's concrete type.
Skip group headers.
Skip internal variables like ".arguments"
Skip it if already created
Skip key warning if the type isn't valid since our key validation logic doesn't expect a non-string/function type and can throw confusing errors.
Skip linked dependencies
Skip linked packages
Skip modules outside of Nuclide
Skip non-directory nodes.
Skip over elements that have been deleted so we can add new edges in the front.
Skip over elements that have been deleted so we can add new edges on the end.
Skip over kdfoptions.
Skip over the ancestor and the immediate separator.
Skip printing EmptyStatement nodes to avoid leaving stray semicolons lying around.
Skip restoring the editer who has remote content loaded.
Skip ssh and/or URL with auth
Skip the button if there is one.
Skip the remaining sub-steps and continue to the next date-token.
Skip the single historical log.
Skip the update if cursors are invalid
Skip this one, already seen.
Skip till nearest visible ancestor.
Skip visiting children if missingData is already false.
Skip visiting children if result is already false.
Skip whitespace tokens.
Skipping backward.
Skipping forward.
Skips broken link
Skips over deleted edges
Skips whitespace and comments, and.
Slice off the leading `./` that find will add on here.
Slice on unescaped parentheses followed immediately by a `.`
Slice to the end if no end position was provided.
Slow case, write chunks one-by-one
Small has a height of 20, large has a height of 36.
Small helper function to validate that a path is absolute.
Small score for a match that contains the token case-sensitive.
Small utility that can be used as an error handler.
Smallish, yet realistic testing window dimensions.
Smartypants Transformations
Snapshot intrinsics
So after the initial example list is shown, we then transition to the initial example.
So default to a recursion cap of 3 levels, since that gives fairly good results.
So first check startsWith.
So here we temporarily walk around this by following hack, until https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/9641 get addressed.
So here, we restore top of the stack to the previous location before pushing a new nav stack entry.
So if the treshold is set to 100 and a timer fires 150 ms later than it was scheduled because the event loop was tied up, that would be considered a 50ms stall.
So let's disregard transforms, scrolling and relative layer positioning and choose the largest dimensions of all layers.
So make the area wide instead.
So resolver can decide wheter use cached version of contents new one.
So the comparison below can fail of the two calls span a second boundary.
So the easiest way to deal with this is to pass off the responsibility to "cmd /c", which has that logic built in.
So there is no benefit to lazy loading them, and it increases code complexity.
So we aggregate inclusive time with both the owner and current displayName as the key.
So we can use this hack.
So we construct the hash from this uniqueID to avoid memory leaks and the IE cloneNode bug where it clones properties in addition to the attributes.
So we just document it and throw in dangerous cases.
So we just merge them into 1 block.
So we log it.
So we must clean up after.
So we need to create a new uri using the right port.
So we override this to the expected path.
So we suppress finish from being emitted here, and only emit it after our target stream is closed and we've moved everything around.
So what happens is the "nobody" user doesn't have permission to create the dev dir.
So while this is a memory leak, it's very small.
So will ctrl-click on mac.
So, currently, it would only work if there is no `hh_client` or `.hhconfig` where the `HackWorker` model will diagnose with the updated editor contents.
So, don't update.
So, if a URI points to a directory - all its sub-directories and files in them are included.
So, if requested source was loaded in app, we need to require it from app.
So, if this is awaiting a drain, then we just call it now.
So, in order to not ask hyperclick for the same thing again and again which will be anyway null, we check if the mouse position has changed.
So, let's blacklist conservatively for now and we can add cases later if we observe Flow crashes that do not fit this pattern.
So, negated rules are only relevant if the file has been excluded.
So, provide a defaultValue here so the promise resolves.
So, set this env var which is read by clang_server.py to explicitly set the file path to load.
So, the first negative lookahead, has to look ALL the way ahead, to the end of the pattern.
So, the heuristic here is to compare against the previous version, not the just-committed one, while the revisions timeline would give a way to specify otherwise.
So, the provider should be hidden.
So, the steps are: 1.
So, there'll be a/b/c/abc, a/b/c/aba, etc., and dot-versions of each.
So, they do not need to be associated with a FlowProcess instance and they may be executed from any working directory.
So, they need to be resolved against the target directory in order to be created properly.
So, unlike top-down, the statistics in each child still represent the root node.
So, unpack the fixtures with the system tar first.
So, we cache the output of runCommandInNewPane function and use the same instance of runCommandInNewPane to re-open output pane for the same server process.
So, we circumvent the type system here to maintain the desired runtime behavior.
So, we expect a situation, when original source and bundled script have equal name.
So, we pluck that off, and work with the rest, and then prepend it to everything we find.
So, we restore the current top to its previous location before pushing a new top.
So, we should do this manually.
So, when a matching search query is done in parallel, it will wait and resolve with the original search call.
So, you should pipe a tarball stream into it, and it needs these write/end methods to do that.
Solution: Do not load project config file that is the same as either the default or resolved userconfig value.
Solve the equation by inverting perspectiveMatrix and multiplying rightHandSide by the inverse.
Some URL objects are not from a URL parsed string and need href added
Some apps may see an improvement in perf, but sometimes perf and memory usage can actually get worse with this.
Some async length retrievers are present therefore synchronous length calculation is false.
Some browsers cannot use `innerHTML` to render certain elements standalone, so we wrap them, render the wrapped nodes, then extract the desired node.
Some browsers use the wrong event properties to signal cmd/ctrl on OS X
Some easy to use defaults to construct ModuleMapOptions with.
Some event types have a notion of different registration names for different "phases" of propagation.
Some filename returned from hhvm does not have protocol.
Some git servers do not support shallow clones When that happens, we mark this host and try again
Some leading comments may be invalid.
Some non-printable keys are reported in `charCode`/`keyCode`, discard them.
Some of the properties are derived from the properties of children.
Some other element is not yielding its role as responder.
Some other error or 'make' not found on Unix, report that to the user
Some properties in the environment are created by us for internal use, so we filter them out.
Some sanity checks on the comments.
Some servers add quotes around the content-type, so we trim that also
Some servers have max channels set to 1, so add a delay to ensure the old channel has been cleaned up on the server.
Some small helper functions.
Some source maps produce relative source paths like "./foo.js" instead of "foo.js".
Some source will transpile such that the "use babel" will still be the first in the file.
Some spies should be called immediately because there is data in the store.
Some test "absolute" paths.
Some trailing comments may be invalid.
Some type of object without properties can be shortcutted.
Some users were relying on this funky behavior, so after removing the aggressive normalization from non-hosted URIs, we brought this back.
SomeApp/ios/SomeApp
SomeApp/ios/SomeApp.xcodeproj
SomeApp/ios/SomeAppTests
Something caused path.name to become out of date, so attempt to recover by searching for path.value in parentValue.
Something like `1.2.3 - 1.2.4` Note that these all use the loose form, because they'll be checked against either the strict or loose comparator form later.
Something like `npm install --production` only installs production deps.
Sometimes a scope break may be adjacent to a hard break.
Sometimes a scrollview takes up more space than its content fills.
Sometimes it provides results as valid JSON objects separated by a newline.
Sometimes it's called a "filter", but that's not a great name for it, since that implies a thing where some bits pass through, and others are simply ignored.
Sometimes linters set original and replacement to the same value.
Sometimes remote directories are instantiated as local directories but with invalid paths.
Sometimes the linter puts in global errors on line 0, which will result in a negative index.
Sometimes this call throws 'not opened'
Sophisticated clients may wish to override this.
Sort and cache in memory
Sort by creationIndex so deserializing retains the creation order.
Sort by name
Sort by start time by default.
Sort by target
Sort by version
Sort for bonus consistency points
Sort results by filename to normalize order.
Sort semver ones DESC
Sort the auto-completions based on a scoring function considering: case sensitivity, position in the completion, private functions and alphabetical order.
Sort the given array in-place with the given comparator function.
Sort the list of matches by filename to normalize order.
Sort the specifiers.
Sort them by DESC order
Sorting the IDs to make testing easier.
Source callbacks are called when `collectExtraData` is called.
Source is preserved since cloneElement is unlikely to be targeted by a transpiler, and the original source is probably a better indicator of the true owner.
Source maps have some issues in different libraries.
Source: Arguments
Source: Array
Source: Iterator
Source: String
Source: array or array-like
SourceNodes provide a way to abstract over interpolating/concatenating snippets of generated JavaScript source code while maintaining the line and column information associated with the original source code.
SourcesNavigator does not need to update on EditorClosed.
Sparse array.
Spawn the search command in the given directory.
Spawns a child process and emits a 'spawn' event.
Spec says something about storing a list of markers, but it sounds equivalent to this check.
Special animatable View
Special case for S3 and SimpleDB in us-east-1
Special case getDefaultProps which should move into statics but requires automatic merging.
Special case string values
Special case the CENTER state of the first scene.
Special case.
Special cased handlers
Special demo text that makes itself untouchable so that it doesn't destroy the experiment and confuse the output.
Special directories like "atom://about"
Special-case HTMLAll.
Specialized method for creating RelayGraphQLMutation instances that takes a `files` object in addition to the base `mutation`, `variables` and `environment` parameters.
Specifically, if it decides to set node.loc to null, indicating that the node's .loc information is unreliable, then we don't want to add node to the resultArray.
Specifically, removing a breakpoint removes it from all connection's maps before returning.
Specifier and ModuleSpecifier are abstract non-standard types introduced for definitional convenience.
Specifies filter on asset type
Specifies filter on group names, like 'Recent Photos' or custom album titles.
Specifies font weight.
Specifies should fonts scale to respect Text Size accessibility setting on iOS.
Specifies text alignment.
Specifies the background color of the drawer.
Specifies the lock mode of the drawer.
Specifies the side of the screen from which the drawer will slide in.
Specifies the width of the drawer, more precisely the width of the view that be pulled in from the edge of the window.
Specifies whether to return the closest element that is smaller than or greater than the one we are searching for, respectively, if the exact element cannot be found.
Specifies whether you want to iterate over the mappings sorted by the generated file's line/column order or the original's source/line/column order, respectively.
Specifies which group types to filter the results to.
Specify a route to start on.
Specify additional props passed to the component.
Specify the build type, Release by default
Spies except spy_fileA should be called immediately because there is relevant data in the store.
Split a String `str` into lines of maxiumum length `max`.
Split lines into an array Update the refs with the actual refs
Split messages on new line characters.
Split on newlines without removing new line characters.
Split out an empty observable after waiting 20 ms.
Split stream into single lines.
Split the output by the symbols '--- '.
Split the parameters into two groups -- all of the trailing optional paramaters, and the rest of the parameters.
Split the path into highlighted and non-highlighted subsequences for optimal rendering perf.
Split them, then merge the results.
Splits a member or call expression into parts.
Splits a stream of strings on newlines.
Splits on word boundaries.
Splits the given pane in the specified direction and return the new pane.
Spoiler alert: that doesn't include IE8.
Spread operator: ...
Spread properties to test that functions are bound correctly.
Spring animation based on Rebound and Origami.
Squash the last breaks.
SshConnectionConfiguration's sshPort type is 'number', but we want to save everything as strings.
Stack trace: ./one.js:1 ./two.js:2
Stage files
Staleness checking algorithm 1.
Standard Properties
Standard iOS MapView pin color constants, to be used with the `annotation.tintColor` property.
Standard value class for driving animations.
Standard value for driving animations.
Standard/simple iteration through an event's collected dispatches, but stops at the first dispatch execution returning true, and returns that id.
Standard/simple iteration through an event's collected dispatches.
Star ranges basically just allow anything at all.
Start a debug session with the user-supplied information.
Start a new operation.
Start a new search "session" for analytics purposes.
Start a text drag.
Start a timeout if this is the first click, if the timeout is canceled before it fires, then a double clicked happened or another link was clicked.
Start an AST node, attaching a start offset.
Start an async, and resolve to 1 in 10 ms.
Start and end range of the preview text.
Start just after the "-webkit-" prefix.
Start loading more once the user scrolls within this many pixels of the bottom.
Start reporting progress after a few seconds
Start the Nuclide server and add a remote project.
Start the clock when a key is pressed.
Start the integration test helper.
Start the precedence parser.
Start the search in each directory, and merge the resulting streams.
Start watching the project for changes and initialize the root watcher for next calls to `watchFile` and `watchDirectory`.
Start websocket server with Chrome after attach completed.
Start websocket server with Chrome after launch completed.
Start with `panelVisible: false` to ensure the panel is initially hidden.
Start with a normal queue
Start with existing JSON details
Start with the built in types that are always declared.
Start with the globals since they are always "declared" and safe to use.
Starting status has no stack.
Starts a Flow server in the current root
Starts a corresponding external activity for the given URL.
Starts a local version of the nuclide server in insecure mode on the specified port.
Starts an animation after the given delay.
Starts an array of animations all at the same time.
Starts an array of animations in order, waiting for each to complete before starting the next.
Starts dragging the pane sizer.
Starts listening for socket connections on the given port.
Starts listening for xdebug connections on the given port.
Starts the React Native Packager Server.
Starts the app on a connected Android emulator or device.
Starts the app on iOS simulator
Starts the process if it has not already been started.
Stash a copy in case other scripts modify these
Stash the parent if it exists
State labels
State reset every time PathVisitor.prototype.visit is called.
Stateless functional.
Static Lex Method
Static Lexing/Compiling Method
Static Methods
Static Parse Method
Static calls define ranges that do not change over a period of time, given the same set of arguments.
Static convenience function for coercing a value to a FastPath.
Static method for creating ArraySet instances from an existing array.
Static poolers.
Status codes returned in the "status" field of the testing utility's JSON response.
Status page so that anyone who needs to can verify that the packager is running on 8081 and not another program / service.
Stderr forwarding is not implemented by HHVM yet so this will always return failure.
Stdout/err commands.
Step down for 5seconds, and prevent elections for 6 seconds so we can do some tests without primary
Step value of the slider.
Stick to the `ScrollResponder` callbacks, and everything will work.
Still don't have the gadget.
Still, it might prove useful in the future.
Stop any current debugger and show the debugger view.
Stop any existing debugging sessions, as install hangs if an existing app that's being overwritten is being debugged.
Stop at a change event.
Stop if the entire query is subtracted.
Stop listening once the task is done.
Stop profiling when queries have been sent to the network layer.
Stop replica set primary.
Stop replica set.
Stop the scan if the scanner has passed our position.
Stop the traversal after 100 nodes were added to the tree
Stop transtion, immediately resets the cached state and re-render the whole view.
Stops any running animation or tracking.
Store ETAG under _release
Store a mapping from a class name to a struct containing it's local constructor and it's interface definition.
Store a mapping from function name to a structure holding both the local implementation and the type definition of the function.
Store a reference from the instance back to the internal representation
Store additional metadata in bower.json
Store as usual
Store collected headers in the package meta
Store endpoint info in each log
Store hosts that do not support shallow clones here
Store hosts that support shallow clones here
Store in the cache
Store is updated
Store main if is a single file
Store marshallers and and unmarshallers, index by the kind of the type.
Store marshallers and and unmarshallers, index by the name of the type.
Store matches per-set, then uniq them
Store node in `pendingNodeStates` because we have not read data for this `dataID` from disk.
Store some needed stuff
Store the canonical dir and its meta in each log
Store the children before returning them from the Promise.
Store the headers to install
Store the last value set for this index.
Store the map and a cache object for the current logical line
Store the number on on every gadget item in the container just in case one gets moved or destroyed.
Store the original flex scale so we can restore to it later.
Store the promise in the refs object
Store the promise to be reused until it resolves to a specific value
Store the reference to the child process
Store the resolver info in each log
Store the two packages
Stored values
Stores a base64-encoded image in the ImageStore, and returns a URI that can be used to access or display the image later.
Stores all current FileDiagnosticMessages, indexed by file.
Stores all current markers, indexed by FileDiagnosticMessage.
Stores breakpoints and connections.
Stores callbacks that have subscribed to Atom text events.
Stores may be synchronous, but are still required to use a Continuation-Passing Style API.
Stores the host and cwd of a remote connection.
Stream from utf8 to hex to base64...
Streams a fired top-level event to `EventPluginHub` where plugins have the opportunity to create `ReactEvent`s to be dispatched.
Strict parsing doesn't allow older draft headers.
String comparator that lists the capitalized verson of a string before the lowercase version.
String index maps from strings to index.
String message: A string with the text to toast 2.
String output returned in this function's Promise will be stderr/stdout of the second command.
String that starts with a BMP symbol
String that starts with an astral symbol
String.format does treat formattedResult like a Builder, result is an object.
StringDecoder provides an interface for efficiently splitting a series of buffers into a series of JS strings without breaking apart multi-byte characters.
Stringify contents
Strip colors
Strip colors from the prompt if color is disabled
Strip off any /-rev/...
Strip off the extension and conventional suffixes like "Internal" and "-inl".
Strip off the extension.
Strip off the global namespace indicator.
Strip off the leading slashes from the fully-qualified build target.
Strip off the quotes
Strip the CSS or JS highlighting if present.
Strip the prefix from the start of the tag:
Strips out port number, hostname, and current file directory.
Strips the "static upstream" warning from the docblock.
Stub of Sample for Android.
Stub of VibrationIOS for Android.
Style invalidation events can occur before and during recalc style.
Style of the ProgressBar.
Style to apply to each of the item labels.
Styles for the navigation item containing the component
Styles should be loaded in alphabetical order according to https://atom.io/docs/v0.186.0/creating-a-package
Styles to apply to the container of each scene
Sub-views need their line numbers shifted when text is added above or below them in the parent document.
Subclass this.
Subclasses can implement.
Subclasses may override in order to short-circuit traversal.
Subclasses should override this method to render the pane using options passed from above.
Subclasses that have corresponding animation implementation done in native should override this method
Subscribable provides a mixin for safely subscribing a component to an eventEmitter  This will be replaced with the observe interface that will be coming soon to React Core
Subscribe opener before restoring the remote projects.
Subscribe to changes for the new `this._localPath`.
Subscribe to changes in the current Hg bookmark.
Subscribe to changes in this counter.
Subscribe to changes to a file that appears to be the 'arc build' lock file.
Subscribe to changes to files unrelated to source control.
Subscribe to events from counter1.
Subscribe to new connection updates from DebuggerActions.
Subscribe to the action stream and track things of interest.
Subscribers are notified as follows:  `onNext`: Called with the latest results of a fragment.
Subscribes to the appropriate event depending on whether we should run on the fly or not.
Subsequent calls by the debugger can request the child properties of an ObjectId.
Subsequent definitions will be chained.
Subsequent invocations will return null.
Subsequent root directories updated on change
Subtract a non-scalar/range field.
Subtract some padding.
Subtracts all pending queries from the supplied `query` and returns the resulting difference.
Subtracts any RelayQuery.Node that contains subfields.
Success - only one match and it is a package dir
Success callback is notified.
Success http status codes range from 200 to 299.
Success last time
Successful authentication
Successfully connected with lldb python process, fulfill the promise.
Succinct definitions of keyword token types
Such as some sort of natural compare algorithm.
Such as the configuration whether to use the prefix navigation, for instance, or the currently configured Working Set.
Such overlap is not allowed.
Suggest for localhost only.
Suggestions for alternative methods welcome.
Summary of `ReactBrowserEventEmitter` event handling:  - Top-level delegation is used to trap most native browser events.
Super dangerous and experimental - rows and all their decendents must be fully stateless otherwise recycling their instances may introduce nasty bugs.
Supertype of Block and Line.
Supply the `renderWindowBoundaryIndicator` prop to indicate the boundary to the user, e.g. with a row placeholder.
Support Unix Sockets
Support a empty string "group" to have a blank line between sets of options.
Support for selectors in the "file-icons" package.
Support for this was introduced by https://github.com/nodejs/io.js/pull/758 in io.js.
Support loading old CPU profiles that are missing timestamps.
Support style names that may come passed in prefixed by adding permutations of vendor prefixes.
Supported for backgroundColor, barStyle and hidden.
Supports string shapes by extracting numbers so new values can be computed, and recombines those values into new strings of the same shape.
Supports two forms -- with only one argument, it calls that for each line in the document.
Suppose you want to grab the value for a key 'className' inside of an object.
Suppress StyleInvalidator StyleRecalcInvalidationTracking invalidations because they will be handled by StyleInvalidatorInvalidationTracking.
Suppress mysterious IE10 errors
Suppress optimizelegibility in Webkit, since it breaks text measuring on line wrapping boundaries.
Suppress the error.
Supress ESLint no-undef about using WebInspector without window, which would not have flow types attached.
Surface - Root node of all ART
Surround the expression in with statements to inject our command line API so that the window object properties still take more precedent than our API functions.
Swallow the error while runing in open sourced version.
Swap the elements indexed by `x` and `y` in the array `ary`.
Switch to master
Symbol types we can get references for.
Sync any initial breakpoints to engine during loader breakpoint and continue from it.
Sync dependants
Sync dependencies
Sync editor state
Sync scroller and scrollbar, ensure the gutter elements are aligned.
Sync scrolling between fake scrollbars and real scrollable area, ensure viewport is updated when scrolling.
Sync the actual display DOM structure with display.view, removing nodes for lines that are no longer in view, and creating the ones that are not there yet, and updating the ones that are out of date.
Sync up dissected dependencies and dependants See: https://github.com/bower/bower/issues/879
Sync with consoleView.css
Sync word and regex pattern for parsing command stdout.
Synchronizes nuclide BreakpointStore and BreakpointManager
Synchronously load a file path.
Synchronously resolve a relative require from a parent module.
SyntaxHighlighter http://alexgorbatchev.com/SyntaxHighlighter  SyntaxHighlighter is donationware.
Synthesize an ObjectExpression union all exports
Synthesize property text disregarding any comments, custom whitespace etc.
Synthetic events are dispatched by event plugins, typically in response to a top-level event delegation handler.
T9254051 - Fix flow http/https definitions.
TEXTMARKER SPANS
TEXTMARKERS Created with markText and setBookmark methods.
THE CONFIGURATION Is the object passed to the constructor and conceptually shared among all instances in a tree.
THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON INFRINGEMENT.
THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT.
THIS IS A HACK.
THIS IS AN ES5 FILE
THIS IS FILE IS NOT TRANSPILED - USE ELECTRON COMPATIBLE JAVASCRIPT
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY APPLE AND ITS CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY APPLE INC.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY GOOGLE INC.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
TODO Consider optimizing for the common case of only a single flow root by invalidating all instead of enumerating the files.
TODO Could attach getters and setters here to enforce dynamic type safety.
TODO Deviating from the spec by reusing VariableDeclarator here.
TODO Esprima should return JSXText instead.
TODO Figure out how to silently coerce Expressions to ExpressionStatements where a Statement was expected.
TODO If there is a long delay between when the file is saved and results appear, the file may have changed in the mean time.
TODO Import from type-hints package once it exposes it.
TODO Make this all typecheck.
TODO Missing from the Parser API.
TODO Move a non-caching implementation of this function into ast-types, and implement a caching wrapper function here.
TODO Not in the Mozilla Parser API, but used by Esprima.
TODO Report this nonsense.
TODO Report this.
TODO Same concern.
TODO This could be represented as a RestElement in .params.
TODO This is a stub.
TODO Unsubscribe at some point.
TODO Warn if fields are overridden with incompatible types.
TODO XML types that nobody cares about or needs to print.
TODO allow duplicate field names if they have the same type.
TODO allow making text input non-editable via props TODO open/close options dropdown upon focus/blur TODO add public getter/setter for textInput TODO use generic search provider TODO move combobox to separate package.
TODO create a response file at least for the source files to work around the cmd line length limit.
TODO figure out what font Chrome devtools uses on Windows
TODO go through dispatcher
TODO handle bad input
TODO implement the new way of getting object properties
TODO improve this type
TODO jessicalin: Show this error message in a better place.
TODO match indices not yet implemented.
TODO move LESS styles to nuclide-ui
TODO net.Socket
TODO pack this into a function when response files are used for other kinds of info.
TODO persist lastAccessed
TODO properly type the options object
TODO remove this once we understand this case better
TODO replace `partial` with computed property whenever Flow supports it.
TODO replace this with a ranking algorithm.
TODO replace with computed property once Flow supports it.
TODO rework to use an array, so direct match can be done.
TODO t7093728 This is a simplified XHRExample.ios.js.
TODO this shows that clustering can be improved, as the following scores should be identical:
TODO when this is in the iframe window, we can just use Object
TODO would be better to export a native constant for this, like in iOS the RCTDatePickerManager.m
TODO: Add a limit so the transform is not run on files over a certain size.
TODO: Add enabling/disabling of registered source and only subscribe when enabled.
TODO: Add optional catch all at word boundaries to account for adding commas in a transform.
TODO: Add optional ext parameter
TODO: Add the __DEV__ check back in to verify the Promise result
TODO: Add timeout If we can't connect, or get disconnected, keep trying to connect.
TODO: All of the elements of the array are non-null, but it does not seem possible to convince Flow of that.
TODO: An `isValidNode` function would probably be more appropriate
TODO: Annotate return type better.
TODO: Annotate return type here
TODO: Annotate the listener arg's type.
TODO: Benchmark areas that can be improved with caching.
TODO: Better error message why each possibleFields is invalid.
TODO: Change to COMMAND_STOP: t10862085
TODO: Choosing the last selected key is inexact when there is more than 1 root.
TODO: Completely remove this in v0.15.
TODO: Computed class properties don't seem to be supported by Babylon yet.
TODO: Connection could have been lost for remote file.
TODO: Consider a more efficient strategy that does not blindly destroy all of the existing markers.
TODO: Consider logging socket info: remote ip, etc.
TODO: Currently first local dir only.
TODO: Currently first remote dir only.
TODO: Define undocumented ThemePackage class.
TODO: Delete this after https://github.com/facebook/jscodeshift/issues/34
TODO: Display all prompts, not just the first one.
TODO: Drop this when these are no longer allowed as the type argument.
TODO: Enable following when RN changes land.
TODO: Expose pendingState or don't use it during the merge.
TODO: Figure out where these types actually come from.
TODO: Figure out why `ownerDocument` is sometimes undefined in IE8.
TODO: Find a better place for this.
TODO: Flow: `nextValue` is an array, array indexing should work
TODO: Flow: `nodeID` is `string`
TODO: Force the scope to break when a property is a method.
TODO: Generalize to non-`Node` types.
TODO: Generate default title from gadgetId
TODO: Get initial state from serialized state.
TODO: Get this from deserialization.
TODO: Handle file read errors.
TODO: Handle non-file scriptIds
TODO: Handle other things like Syntax.ObjectPattern
TODO: Handle remaining params
TODO: I suspect we should key the local service off of the presence of a .hhconfig file rather than having a single HackLanguage for all local requests.
TODO: If nothing has changed, return the prevChildren object so that we can quickly bailout if nothing has changed.
TODO: Implement a timer to unset this, in case watchman update fails to notify of the removal of the lock.
TODO: Import types from `graphql`.
TODO: Investigate representing React components in the DOM with text nodes.
TODO: It may be a good idea to cache this to prevent unnecessary DOM traversal, but caching is difficult to do correctly without using a mutation observer to listen for all DOM changes.
TODO: Looks like there is bug in Node fs.createReadStream it doesn't respect `end` options without `start` options Fix it when node fixes it.
TODO: Make completedCount, edges, and totalCount optional
TODO: Make it possible to move or split a pane with a VcsLogPaneItem.
TODO: Make some config entries, such as: - Max MB - Max versions per source - Max MB per source - etc..
TODO: Make this configurable so that it's possible to only add known requires and ignore unknown modules.
TODO: Make this configurable so that the suffix for JSX can be changed.
TODO: Make this not necessary...
TODO: Mangle in the transactionId of the most recent pause/status.
TODO: Mark complete as optional
TODO: Mark completedCount and totalCount as optional
TODO: Mark completedCount optional
TODO: Mark edges and totalCount optional
TODO: More complete implementation of RFC 2617.
TODO: Move these around to solve the cycle in a cleaner way.
TODO: Move these to nested declarations on the native side.
TODO: Move this into an ART mode called "serialized" or something
TODO: Move this to nuclide-commons.
TODO: Move to nuclide-commons
TODO: Properly remove new lines from the node.
TODO: Re-enable event.path handling
TODO: Reenable this once the server connection is revived.
TODO: Remaining property types - closure, hashmap, ...
TODO: Remove deprecated onAnnotationPress API call later.
TODO: Remove the `key` once https://github.com/facebook/react/issues/1448 is resolved.
TODO: Remove the any cast once we have bi-directional marshalling.
TODO: Remove this case in the future
TODO: Remove this once all services have been moved to framework v3.
TODO: Replace RegExp with AST-based, more accurate approach.
TODO: Replace with enumeration for possible config types.
TODO: Report a soft error for this.
TODO: Return entries directly and change client to handle error.
TODO: Rewrite `_repositoryAdded` to return the subscription instead of adding it to a map as a side effect.
TODO: Rewrite to synchronous form
TODO: Should replace all aliases, however that will require rewriting marsalling.
TODO: Some of these tests do very bad things with backslashes, and will most likely fail badly on windows.
TODO: Sort alphabetically by label
TODO: Stderr redirection is not implemented in HHVM so we won't check this return value.
TODO: Stop updating the pathSet when the fileSearch is torn down.
TODO: Stop validating prop types here and only use the element validation.
TODO: Store the location of the closed pane for serialization so we can reopen this gadget there next time.
TODO: Strictly we should detect alternates which directly contain their parent union, or if all alternates indirectly contain the parent union.
TODO: Support enums in rpc3 framework.
TODO: Support exports and destructuring.
TODO: Support plural deletes
TODO: Test that a single child and an array with one item have the same key pattern.
TODO: The _entries and _hgRepositoryDescription should not be here.
TODO: The callback here is ignored when setState is called from componentWillMount.
TODO: The node location/path needs to be more configurable.
TODO: The setTextContent operation should be enough
TODO: There's room for improvement by using streams if the URL is an archive file, by piping read stream to the zip extractor This will likely increase the complexity of code but might worth it
TODO: These callers should be refactored to avoid the need for this injection.
TODO: This currently shows in the Firefox shell when navigating from a React page to a non-React page.
TODO: This is a hack since graphql does not export `buildDirective` directly.
TODO: This is currently true because these injections are shared between the client and the server package.
TODO: This is not technically correct.
TODO: This is technically an implementation detail.
TODO: This must be filtered intelligently.
TODO: This returns a nullable array.
TODO: This should be a custom marshaller registered in the TypeRegistry
TODO: This will be deprecated because state should always keep a consistent type signature and the only use case for this, is to avoid that.
TODO: Use a computed property when supported by Flow.
TODO: Use let for proper scoping.
TODO: Use let.
TODO: Use loader breakpoint configuration to choose between step/run.
TODO: Use nuclide-remote-uri instead.
TODO: Use the ReadOnlyTextBuffer class from nuclide-atom-text-editor when it is exported.
TODO: Validate that text is allowed as a child of this node
TODO: Verify this ...
TODO: We can use the diff-view here when ready.
TODO: We should add the following line to keep the cache up-to-date.
TODO: When HHVM handles the 'stop' message correctly, we don't need to await this promise, and we can delete this if check.
TODO: add a `localStorage` variable to explicitly enable/disable colors
TODO: allow reseeding after first request
TODO: check if filePath is in rootKey and if not, find the rootKey it belongs to.
TODO: columnNumber: from cmdbegin/end
TODO: compression flag
TODO: decide whether I just need the type
TODO: defer error events consistently everywhere, not just the cb
TODO: fill other fields from UI.
TODO: fix this.
TODO: getCurrentAppState callback seems to be called at a really late stage after app launch.
TODO: https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/9237.
TODO: https://github.com/babel/babel/issues/2600 Leading comments are screwed up in ImportSpecifiers.
TODO: make heap profiler not allocate while taking snapshot
TODO: make tab stop between textbox work.
TODO: make this configurable somehow, we probably don't want to explicitly list out all of the lowercase html tags that are built-in
TODO: make this into a proper hashtable
TODO: make xdebug_includes.php path configurable from hhconfig.
TODO: move this logic into RemoteConnection package.
TODO: node.rest
TODO: observe for when this editor's path changes.
TODO: optimized handling of constants
TODO: perform some validation for the input.
TODO: pull this into nuclide-commons.
TODO: refactor according to the chosen i18n approach
TODO: refactor tests, so they can use readOptions directly
TODO: refresh connections when new directories are removed/added in file-tree.
TODO: remove `console.log` and dev tools binary
TODO: remove once we deprecate this arg
TODO: remove these, they should be covered by TypeParameterDeclaration but there is a bug in jscodeshift
TODO: rename `observedTopOfStack` to `presentedIndex` in `NavigatorIOS`
TODO: respect encoding
TODO: revisit if we end up having too many segments
TODO: seems like these methods are very similar
TODO: smart fill the working directory textbox.
TODO: sync babel config with gulpfile.
TODO: t7467124 investigate if this can be removed
TODO: test with others
TODO: these should be separate events, to reduce bridge traffic
TODO: this is copied from fbjs because fbjs doesn't play well with non-haste module systems :/.
TODO: this is not ideal because there is no guarantee that the navigator is full screen, however we don't have a good way to measure the actual size of the navigator right now, so this is the next best thing.
TODO: totalTime isn't that useful since it doesn't count paints/reflows
TODO: use content-type or other module
TODO: use media-typer
TODO: utf16 / ucs2 / utf32
TODO: will remove when t10747769 is resolved.
TODO: wrap into separate React components.
TOOD: Put a better type for _picker
Tab Behavior Soft Wrap Behavior Indentation
Tab Settings.
Tab, Return, Esc, Space
TabView checks for the existence of this method and uses it if it is available: https://github.com/atom/tabs/blob/master/lib/tab-view.coffee.
Tag files are often not perfectly in sync - filter out missing files.
Tags a `SyntheticEvent` with dispatched listeners.
Tags instances and associated tasks for easier debugging.
Take a sectionID and rowID of the row above and whether its adjacent row is highlighted.
Take an unsorted, potentially overlapping set of ranges, and build a selection out of it.
Take five seconds to "create" the process.
Take startTime and responseReceivedTime from timing data for better accuracy.
Taken and modified from https://gist.github.com/SimplGy/a229d25cdb19d7f21231
Taken from http://csrc.nist.gov/groups/ST/toolkit/documents/dss/NISTReCur.pdf
Taken from http://ctags.sourceforge.net/FORMAT
Taken from the interface of GitRepository, which is also implemented by HgRepositoryClient.
Takes a data blob from the `data` array prop plus some meta info and should return a row.
Takes a loggingEvent object, returns string representation of it.
Takes a method from Node's fs module and returns a "denodeified" equivalent, i.e., an adapter with the same functionality, but returns a Promise rather than taking a callback.
Takes a node, returns a string.
Takes a string, returns an object with the correct log properties.
Takes a target as an argument.
Takes an argument an returns its human readable equivalent for help usage.
Takes an array of mappings and extracts values from each arg accordingly, then calls `setValue` on the mapped outputs.
Takes an autocomplete item from Flow and returns a valid autocomplete-plus response, as documented here: https://github.com/atom/autocomplete-plus/wiki/Provider-API
Takes an object, and recursively converts it to a Babel AST literal node.
Takes and returns the same types as `atom.config.getSchema`.
Takes and returns the same types as `atom.config.get` exception `keyPath` is not optional.
Takes and returns the same types as `atom.config.observe` except `keyPath` is not optional.
Takes and returns the same types as `atom.config.onDidChange` except `keyPath` is not optional.
Takes and returns the same types as `atom.config.setSchema`.
Takes and returns the same types as `atom.config.set`.
Takes care to render special characters separately.
Takes control over execution.
Takes in all the various params on the function in the docblock or inline comments and converts them into the format the annotator transform is expecting.
Takes in all the various params on the function in the docblock or inline comments and converts them into the format the bodyWrapper transform is expecting.
Takes target regex match and file path where given target is found as arguments.
Takes the contents of a service config JSON file, and formats each entry into a ConfigEntry.
Takes the info for a service call and returns a string description of the relevant arguments.
Tapping any button will fire the respective onPress callback and dismiss the alert.
Target is a range/version
Target is not a folder..
Targets - ignore those specified in ignoredDependencies
Task creates and manages communication with another Node process.
TaskQueue - A system for queueing and executing a mix of simple callbacks and trees of dependent tasks based on Promises.
TaskQueue instances are self contained and independent, so multiple tasks of varying semantics and priority can operate together.
Tasks will not be executed until `processNext` is called explicitly.
Tell Flow this is definitely non-null now.
Tell merlin where to find its per-repo .merlin config file.
Tell the controller to re-render only if it exists so test runner services won't force construction if the panel is still invisible.
Tell the parent menu to sort itself.
Tell the user if we can't connect to the debugger UI.
Temporarily attach in order to measure preferred dimensions.
Temporary hack to disable listing dependencies not under this directory.
Temporary warning about using length
Temporary workarounds to support legacy schemas
Test Constants
Test GitHub ones
Test also with the ignore property because the code is different
Test and measure when using this property.
Test connection first.
Test extension against all types supported by image-size module.
Test for A's keys different from B.
Test for B's keys missing from A.
Test if hasNew can be called again when done
Test if resolve can be called again when done
Test if the reference contains the values
Test only for the first 6 refs
Test only for the first 7 refs
Test parse/unparse
Test rejected connection.
Test set up: mock out dependency on hg.
Test setup: Mock out the dependency on HgRepository::_updateStatuses, and set up the cache state.
Test setup: force the state of the repo.
Test shortcuts
Test similar to GitHub but not real GitHub
Test suite for interactive UI tests.
Test that scalar constants are substituted, not only query fragments.
Test time order of v1 uuids
Test tree nodes that provide no `fetchChildren` get a default fetcher that returns nothing.
Test whether a given character code starts an identifier.
Test whether a given character is part of an identifier.
Test whether a semicolon can be inserted at the current position.
Test with extension
Test with name
Test with quotes
Test with target
Test with type 'branch' In this case, it should be the commit
Test with type 'commit'
Test with type 'tag'
Test with type 'version'
Test without name
Test without name and target
Testing add after: adding id2 to end of range
Testing add before: adding id99 to end of range
Testing append: adding id98 to the end of the range
Testing harness file:/// results in 0.
Testing prepend: adding id3 to the front of the range
Tests ToBeTested.functionToTest while mocking imported function toBeMocked.
Tests from Twitter documentation https://dev.twitter.com/docs/auth/oauth
Tests if a NodePath is a direct child of the Program node.
Tests if a variable declaration is a valid require declaration.
Tests network raw headers text.
Tests network size.
Tests network sync size.
Tests network timing.
Tests that debugger works correctly if pause event occurs when DevTools frontend is being loaded.
Tests that pressing "Pause" will pause script execution if the script is already running.
Tests that scripts are not duplicaed on Scripts tab switch.
Tests that scripts list contains content scripts.
Tests that scripts tab can be open and populated with inspected scripts.
Tests that scripts tab is populated with inspected scripts even if it hadn't been shown by the moment inspected paged refreshed.
Tests whether parsed token is a contextual keyword.
Text editor context menu items.
Text nodes violate a couple assumptions that React makes about components:  - When mounting text into the DOM, adjacent text nodes are merged.
Text that appears under the icon.
Text to display for this item.
TextBuffer::deleteRows is inclusive:
TextEditor Rendering
TextInput is a controlled component, which means the native value will be forced to match this value prop if provided.
Thankfully, this version of Safari supports MutationObservers, so we don't need to fall back in that case.
That can be useful if you decide to make your subclass of this mixin a "PooledClass".
That extends the `GitRepositoryAsync` implementation which takes a single file path.
That feature is not used in Nuclide and is instead treated as part of the path.
That feature is not used in Nuclide and is instead treated as part of the pathname.
That is a collection of values used to instantiate the set.
That is why we first need to collect information about the nodes in the first snapshot and then pass it to the second snapshot to calclulate the diff.
That is, it's not explicitly set, so we're going to make it whatever the thing already is, or "File"
That is, this main process dies, but Atom sticks around.
That makes it easy to ignore the optional parameters, since they will be selected along with the last non-optional parameter and you can just type to overwrite them.
That means that for the web, `pageXOffset/pageYOffset` should be added to to getBoundingClientRect to make consistent with touches.
That means that we can run publish/postpublish in the dir, rather than in the cache dir.
That means, no client new feature shall be enabled before the dependent server serice is in place, while it is OK to add a new server service before the client is ready.
That must be an a update triggered by an `amend` operation, done as part of diffing.
That must be done by the parent.
That particular tag will use this class instead of the generic one.
That said, although this attribute improves things, the resulting styles still do not match exactly what you see in Atom.
That way they can also disallow/undo/mutate the selection of certain values.
That way we can skip a lot of extra work when resolving symlinks for bundled dependencies in npm.
That way, we guarantee we only update the revisions state if the revisions are changed.
That way, we won't trigger cold observer side-effects when we don't need the results.
That we got here means that the readable side wants more data.
That works great a lot of the time, except that heavy operations like rendering may block the JS thread from responding quickly to events like taps, making the app feel sluggish.
That would leave this function as the only one doing side-effects.
That's because commit ids are unique and incremental.
That's why the - 1
That's why this trick works.
That's why we mutate this so that if it's reused, we reuse the same resolved box.
The "composite hash" is similar to the concrete instance hash, but it also differentiates between varying variable values or route names.
The "concrete fragment id" uniquely identifies a Relay.QL`fragment ...` within the source code of an application and will remain the same across runs of a particular version of an application.
The "core.customFileTypes" config was added in Atom v1.0.8.
The "linkedStylesheet" case.
The "resolve" handles logic of re-downloading target if needed.
The "right thing" is very nuanced.
The "spec" is Bash code that defines the CLI options and subcmds for the template's completion code.
The "stall" time is defined as the amount of time in access of the acceptable threshold, which is typically around 100-200ms.
The 'spelling' returned is the name of the clicked symbol.
The .comments field of the Node type is hidden, so we only visit it if the visitor defines visitBlock or visitLine, and value.comments is defined.
The .hgignore file changes.
The .loc checks below are sensitive to some of the problems that are fixed by this utility function.
The .watchmanconfig file, amonst others that could also be configured define the project root directory.
The 2nd argument of deprecatedPropType is the deprecation message.
The 2nd element is the field name
The 4-value 'clock' properties like margin, padding, border-width seem to behave without any problems.
The ANSI escape sequences.
The API is designed this way to discourage these propagation strategies from actually executing the dispatches, since we always want to collect the entire set of dispatches before executing event a single one.
The API is designed to be compatible with the CommonJS AMD spec and RequireJS.
The ART API expects the radial gradient to be repeated at the edges.
The AlertsIOS utility provides two functions: `alert` and `prompt`.
The App is declared in `module.json` and the highest priority one is loaded by `Main`.
The Atom spec runner spies on setTimeout and neuters it, but we need it to work as intended.
The Atom status-bar uses this as a signal to refresh the 'shortHead'.
The BMP character to use as a replacement for astral symbols when translating an ES6 "u"-flagged pattern to an ES5-compatible approximation.
The BlameForEditor completely replaces any previous blame information.
The BlameGutter could have been destroyed while blame was being fetched.
The Bounding rectangle is with respect to viewport - not page, so adding the `pageXOffset/pageYOffset` should result in points that are in the same coordinate system as an event's `globalX/globalY` data values.
The CA file can contain multiple certificates so split on certificate boundaries.
The Callback to start editing the next/previous property/selector.
The ChangeSet ID will be null for uncommitted local changes.
The ConnectionMultiplexer makes multiple debugger connections appear to be a single connection to the debugger UI.
The ConnectionMultiplexer will close only if there are no connections and if either the attach or launch DbgpConnectors are closed.
The CoverInitializedName check is deferred.
The CreateConnectionProfileForm will do basic validation on the inputs: It checks that the fields are non-empty before calling this function.
The DOM updates done when an operation finishes are batched so that the minimum number of relayouts are required.
The Darwin patch below results in callbacks first for the write and then for the error handler, so make sure we only call our callback once.
The DbgpConnectors will likely only close if HHVM crashes or is stopped.
The Def object d returned from Type.def may be used to configure the type d.type by calling methods such as d.bases, d.build, and d.field.
The Def type is used as a helper for constructing compound interface types for AST nodes.
The DiagnosticsProviderBase takes care of the details of event subscription.
The Diff View will open its main UI in a tab, like Atom's preferences and welcome pages.
The DiffViewEditor manages the lifecycle of the two editors used in the diff view, and controls its rendering of highlights and offsets.
The ESTree way of representing a ...rest parameter.
The Esprima ModuleSpecifier type is just a string-valued Literal identifying the imported-from module.
The Firstname Lastname may not appear sometimes.
The Flow error on the following line is due to a bug in Flow: https://github.com/facebook/flow/issues/428.
The Flow team believes it's an error in Flow if it does.
The Flow type does not capture this, but the first message always has a path, and the diagnostics package requires a FileDiagnosticMessage to have a path.
The Generated position, original position, and original source.
The HTTP Method to use.
The HTTP body to send with the request.
The IDs must not be the same, and there must exist a parent path between them.
The IE `textinput` event is not as useful, so we don't use it.
The Inspector uses TreeOutlines to represents object properties, so recursive expansion in some case can be infinite, since JavaScript objects can hold circular references.
The MarshallingContext is opaque to the TypeRegistry and allows for adding per-connection context to marshalling transformations.
The NavigationEvent interface represents any event of the navigation.
The ObservableManager keeps track of the streams we use to talk to the server-side nuclide debugger.
The ObservableManager takes ownership of its observables, and disposes them when its dispose method is called.
The Parser API calls this ArrowExpression, but Esprima and all other actual parsers use ArrowFunctionExpression.
The ProcessOutputStore that provides the data to display.
The Quick Sort algorithm.
The RFC doesn't say what the default encoding is if there is a mediatype so we will return null.
The React Class to render for this route
The Relay backend implements this call and is initialized from the injected script whereas this file is called from the Panel.
The Rpc channel owns the socket.
The Set constructor creates an empty Set if passed null or undefined.
The Set of selected keys should be maintained as a flat list across all roots to maintain insertion order.
The SourceNode we want to fill with the generated code and the SourceMap
The Symbol used to tag the ReactElement type.
The Tab-key is considered non-printable and does not have a `charCode`, presumably because it does not produce a tab-character in browsers.
The Transform stream has all the aspects of the readable and writable stream classes.
The TypeRegistry is a centralized place to register functions that serialize and deserialize types.
The URI to load in the WebView.
The URL root from which all sources are relative.
The View that contains both the actual drawer and the main view
The Windows implementation of `fs.access` has a bug where it will sometimes return access errors all the time for directories, even when access is available.
The XMLHttpRequest spec doesn't specify if duplicate keys are allowed.
The _derivedChange param is not for external use.
The _direct propery is saved by the manager when .newly is specified It may happen pkgMeta is undefined if package is uninstalled
The _dissected array is used later on by install method to move packages to config.directory.
The `Colorer` class manages both the background and foreground colors.
The `Component` must be a container created using `Relay.createContainer`.
The `Cursor` class.
The `Easing` module has tons of pre-defined curves, or you can use your own function.
The `PressRect` is an abstract box that is extended beyond the `HitRect`.
The `RCTNavigator` interprets changes in `requestedTopOfStack` to be pushes and pops of children that are rendered.
The `ScrollResponder` is a natural place to put this logic since it can support not dismissing the keyboard while scrolling, unless a recognized "tap"-like gesture has occurred.
The `Transaction` class itself will supply one additional automatic invariant for you - the invariant that any transaction instance should not be run while it is already being run.
The `beforeExpr` property is used to disambiguate between regular expressions and divisions.
The `callback` is invoked with three arguments:  - the property value - the property name - the object being traversed  Properties that are added after the call to `mapObject` will not be visited by `callback`.
The `chars` string is truncated if the number of characters exceeds `length`.
The `compositeConnectionProfiles` is the combination of the default connection profile plus any user-created connection profiles.
The `dataBlob` is just an arbitrary blob of data.
The `event.nativeEvent` object passed to this callback will have following fields: - position - index of page that has been selected
The `feedback` field here only has a generated `id`, so is "empty".
The `flags` string should contain both the short and long flags, separated by comma, a pipe or space.
The `gyp` function.
The `indetify-function` result is text, but passing --json option will eliminate any hh status messages that's irrelevant.
The `initialRoute` will default to the last item in the `initialRouteStack`.
The `keyboardWillShow` is called before input focus.
The `main` in `package.json` is rewritten to point to `./lib/main.js` at release time.
The `name` parameter can be either a function or a string.
The `onMoreTasks` constructor argument is used to inform the owner that an async task has resolved and that the queue should be processed again.
The `onValueChange` callback will still work as expected.
The `postPredicate` is invoked on the way up.
The `prepareVariables` function allows for variables to be modified based on the runtime environment or route name.
The `readyState` must be an accurate representation of the data that currently resides in the supplied `environment`.
The `remote` module provides functions related to communicating with the main Electron process.
The `rowIdentities` is is a 2D array of identifiers for rows.
The `shell` module provides functions related to desktop integration.
The `size` property on a map object is a regular property and not a computed property on the prototype as described by the spec.
The `style` property functions differently from the DOM API.
The `this` value is used if it's the global object to avoid Greasemonkey's restricted `window` object, otherwise the `window` object is used.
The `tokenize` export provides an interface to the tokenizer.
The `type` property is "open", "close", "message", "error" respectively.
The `view` argument can be the literal string `window` if you want to capture the entire window, or it can be a reference to a specific React Native component.
The above call to lstatSync actually updates the value of atime.
The above call to statSync actually updates the value of atime.
The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
The above should cover most cases, including BitBucket.
The absence of this method indicates to clients that they should not expose UI that depends on this functionality.
The absolute path to the .js file must be specified via the `file` property.
The activeElement will be null only if the document or document body is not yet defined.
The actual container is created the first time a container is being constructed by React's rendering engine.
The actual meaning of the value depends on the users' keyboard layout which cannot be detected.
The actual message transformations are tested in the tests from linterMessageToDiagnosticMessage -- no need to duplicate them here.
The actual regexps go on exports.re
The additional transforms applied here are only optimizations.
The affected array is used to mark entries which dominators have to be racalculated because of changes in their retainers.
The algorithm is based on the article: K.
The algorithm used to determine whether a regexp can appear at a given point in the program is loosely based on sweet.js' approach.
The alternative is to run a watcher and always run transpiled code in Atom.
The amount by which the scroll view content is inset from the edges of the scroll view.
The amount by which the scroll view indicators are inset from the edges of the scroll view.
The any is just explicit now.
The argument is used by mocks to assert on what gets mounted.
The argv to parse.
The array could grow and shrink or be reordered.
The array is in longest-to-shortest order.
The array is in shortest-to-longest order.
The array is needed to remember order.
The array of messages is meant to completely replace any previous messages for this file path.
The array of messages is meant to completely replace any previous messages.
The array of messages is meant to completely replace any previous project-scope messages.
The array this resolves to contains the `nodeKey` of each child
The asset type, one of 'Photos', 'Videos' or 'All'
The assignment of fine-grained, information-carrying type objects allows the tokenizer to store the information it has about a token in a way that is very cheap for the parser to look up.
The assumption is that looking up astral identifier characters is rare.
The async part of the method declaration lives below on the function expression....
The attached profile handlers will receive this as the second argument.
The await here is subtle, it ensures that the shutdown call is sent on the socket before the socket is closed on the next line.
The babel compiler is in the require cache, but use require so we fail fast if it ever goes missing.
The background color of the navigation bar
The background color of the refresh indicator
The background color of the refresh indicator.
The background color of the status bar.
The bad test run has no ID and so is not added to the TestSuiteModel's summary.
The base URL to be used for any relative links in the HTML.
The base implementation of `_.assign` without support for multiple sources or `customizer` functions.
The base implementation of `_.clone` and `_.cloneDeep` which tracks traversed objects.
The base implementation of `_.create` without support for assigning properties to the created object.
The base implementation of `_.flatten` with support for restricting flattening.
The base implementation of `_.forOwn` without support for iteratee shorthands.
The base implementation of `_.has` without support for deep paths.
The base implementation of `_.indexOf` without `fromIndex` bounds checks.
The base implementation of `_.indexOf` without support for binary searches.
The base implementation of `_.keys` which doesn't skip the constructor property of prototypes or treat sparse arrays as dense.
The base implementation of `_.property` without support for deep paths.
The base implementation of `_.times` without support for iteratee shorthands or max array length checks.
The base implementation of `_.unary` without support for storing wrapper metadata.
The base implementation of `_.uniqBy` without support for iteratee shorthands.
The base implementation of `baseForIn` and `baseForOwn` which iterates over `object` properties returned by `keysFunc` invoking `iteratee` for each property.
The base implementation of methods like `_.difference` without support for excluding multiple arrays or iteratee shorthands.
The biggest problem with this is safety.
The body part is a "blob", which in React Native just means an object with a `uri` attribute.
The boundaries changed, so all item graphs are stale.
The bridge is responsible for serializing requests between the Agent and the Frontend Store.
The buffer position and scroll top of the current location can also be updated in place with attemptUpdate.
The build failed.
The build metadata is not a capturing group, because it should not ever be used in version comparison.
The cache should be cleared before being fully refreshed.
The calculations performed here assume the scroll view takes up the entire screen - even if has some content inset.
The callback by which a provider is notified of text events, such as a file save.
The callback by which a provider is notified that a new consumer has subscribed to diagnostic invalidations.
The callback by which a provider is notified that a new consumer has subscribed to diagnostic updates.
The callback function will be called with `bool supported` as the only argument  NOTE: As of iOS 9, your app needs to provide the `LSApplicationQueriesSchemes` key inside `Info.plist`.
The callback will be called with a reference to this path object for each element of the array.
The callback will return a promise that resolves with a new callback when the next unit of work is available.
The caller is responsible for cleaning up the drectory.
The caller is responsible for cleaning up the file.
The canonical ID of a range customarily excludes the calls
The canonical name for the referenced field in the schema.
The case that deserves a warning is when the container is empty.
The catch here is that IE's selection API doesn't provide information about whether the selection is forward or backward, so we have to behave as though it's always forward.
The cause argument can be null.
The center pixel of the image will be stretched to fill the track.
The challenging case is the Obj-C selector, e.g. 'objectForKey:usingBlock:', which may appear in code as multiple segments separated by other text.
The change handler is delayed to break the race with the `DiffViewModel` subscription.
The changed files status tree takes 1/5 of the width and lives on the right most, while being vertically splt with the revision timeline stack pane.
The changes haven't touched the filesystem, keep user edits.
The character just after the location occupied by oldNode.
The character just before the location occupied by oldNode.
The check on response.connection is a workaround for browserify.
The checkout process could be similar to the GitRemoteResolver by prepending file:// to the source But from my performance measures, it's faster to copy the folder and just checkout in there
The child must be instantiated before it's mounted.
The children property is an OrderedMap instance keyed by child's name property.
The children should be in the tree if we `await` the promise.
The children shouldn't immediately be in the tree if we don't `await` the promise.
The chosen key is intentionally non-unique.
The chunk of new text may span several lines, each of which may contain ANSI escape characters.
The chunks are rendered sequentially using the `InteractionManager` queue, which means that rendering will pause if it's interrupted by an interaction, such as an animation or gesture.
The class contains multiple derived fields.
The client seems to want a copy of this Lines object, but Lines objects are immutable, so it's perfectly adequate to return the same object.
The clone methods suck in the new data and compute a diff for each row so ListView knows whether to re-render it or not.
The closeScope is part of it's own scope, we don't want to pop too soon.
The closest enclosing scope that governs this node.
The closest match out of the 216 colors is picked.
The code below should not be applied to text fields and text areas, hence _isTextEditingElement check.
The code is traversed twice: 1.
The code is written this way to avoid extra allocations
The color of the refresh indicator.
The color of the textInput underline.
The color of the underlay that will show through when the touch is active.
The color used for buttons in the navigation bar
The color used for the track to the left of the button.
The color used for the track to the right of the button.
The command should respond with an array.
The comment is completely contained by this child node.
The committed and filesystem state have changed, notify of override.
The component could have been unmounted by the time the promises are resolved.
The component will receive two props: `navigator` and `navState`.
The composite hash is used to: - Avoid printing the same fragment twice, in order to reduce upload size.
The concurrency limit here is kind of magic.
The condition shall be fulfilled in normal case.
The config specifies the path within the payload that contains the connection ID.
The configuration file is a JS file named `rn-cli.config.js`.
The configuration for the file-tree.
The configuration object should be treated as immutable by its owner.
The configuration specifies: - which field in the payload contains data for the new edge - the list of fetched ranges to which the edge should be added - whether to append/prepend to each of those ranges
The connection may not be explicit in the fat query, but if it is, we try to validate it.
The connection profiles could change, but the rest of the props passed to the ConnectionDialog will not.
The constructor takes a LinterProvider as an argument, and the resulting LinterAdapter is a valid DiagnosticProvider.
The container created using `Relay.createContainer` must be supplied via the `Container` prop, and the query configuration that conforms to the shape of a `RelayQueryConfig` must be supplied via the `queryConfig` prop.
The container might have been scrolled too far for the current elements
The content inset affects the valid area for Toolbar content other than the navigation button and menu.
The context stack is used to superficially track syntactic context to predict whether a regular expression is allowed in a given position.
The context-sensitive hack autocompletions are more relevant than snippets.
The continuation bit tells us whether there are more digits in this value following this digit.
The controller needs at least one test runner to run tests.
The controller should listen for changes rather than be told about them.
The controller uses the currently active file to decide when and what to reveal in the file tree when revealActiveFile is called.
The correct implementation of these is asserted in other tests.
The corresponding configure options aren't enabled through phpize, thus these dummy declarations are required.
The current behavior of everything having its own algorithm is bad.
The current clipping API requires x and y to be ignored in the transform
The current composition is stored statically and must not be overwritten while composition continues.
The current height of the status bar on the device.
The current implementation of this function assumes that a single child gets passed without a wrapper, but the purpose of this helper function is to abstract away the particular structure of children.
The current location can be updated with next/previous which return non-null if the current location has been updated, or null of current is already at the top/bottom of the stack.
The current merged values from the props stack.
The current navigation item is in the center stage.
The current owner is the component who should own any components that are currently being constructed.
The current scale of the scroll view content.
The current search needs to be performed again.
The current selection is outside the bounds of the next profiles list
The current spec forbids arrow generators, so I have taken the liberty of enforcing that.
The current stack should never go beyond the parent event's stack.
The current state of the Flow server in this directory
The currently active debug mode names, and names to skip.
The currently open "tab".
The currently selected date.
The data arguments emitted will be passed to the listener function.
The data in the data source is immutable, so you can't modify it directly.
The data structure that holds a list of routes and the focused index of the routes.
The date picker mode.
The day this approach stops working, we'll re-evaluate the watcher.
The debouncer relies on `Date.now`.
The debug function is excluded entirely from the minified version.
The default WebSocket's close timeout is 30 seconds.
The default action to be passed into the reducer when getting the first state.
The default background color of the navigation bar
The default color used for buttons in the navigation bar
The default for flex children is to shrink as needed.
The default is to be loose and support older versions for compatibility.
The default location of assets bundled with the app, located by resource identifier The Android resource system picks the correct scale.
The default text color of the navigation bar title
The default value is 1.0.
The default value is `false`.
The default value is false.
The default value is true for single-line fields and false for multiline fields.
The default value is true.
The default value is white.
The default value is zero, which results in the scroll event being sent only once each time the view is scrolled.
The default value of this property is 0, which means that no badge is displayed.
The default wrapper style for components in the navigator.
The default, SIGTERM, does not reliably kill the flow servers.
The depth is used to batch recursive updates to render markup more efficiently.
The derived fields are calculated from the options, from the configuration values and even from chieldren's properties.
The dialog has been dismissed.
The diff-view package can consume providers that return React components to be rendered inline.
The difference can be null if the entire query is pending.
The direct writing to the this._conf should be avoided.
The dirname of the path to the source map to be applied.
The dirstate gets modified in the middle of an update and at the end, but not the beginning.
The disambiguation code in `parseStatement` will already have parsed the init statement or expression.
The dispatcher is a mechanism through which FileTreeActions interfaces with FileTreeStore.
The disposable to call to remove the message
The dispose method calls `_client.disposeRemoteObject` with the object's id as a parameter.
The distance from the edge of the navigator which gesture response can start for.
The div that contains all of the comments and their controls.
The div that contains the code but excludes the options strip.
The div that contains the comments proper.
The div that wraps the iframe with the code, as well as the drop down menu listing the different files.
The div.highlights element has 0 or more children, each child being a div.highlight with a child div.region.
The document is represented as a BTree consisting of leaves, with chunk of lines in them, and branches, with up to ten leaves or other branch nodes below them.
The domain module is executed on demand
The dot product of a and b, two 3-element vectors.
The downside is that this can use up limited video memory, so this prop should be set back to false at the end of the interaction/animation.
The drawer can be in 3 states: - idle, meaning there is no interaction with the navigation view happening at the time - dragging, meaning there is currently an interaction with the navigation view - settling, meaning that there was an interaction with the navigation view, and the navigation view is now finishing it's closing or opening animation
The duplication of string literals here is necessary to make the disjoint unions work properly.
The duration of the card animation in milliseconds.
The easiest solution for now is to accept the limitation of disallowing this altogether.
The editor that the result was computed from
The editor was destroyed, but the destroy handler haven't yet been called to cancel the timer.
The effect is that once partition is done, the pivot is in the exact place it will be when the array is put in sorted order, and it will not need to be moved again.
The element in which the editor lives.
The element is in the lower half.
The element is in the upper half.
The emitter is designed to be generic enough to support all the different contexts in which one might want to emit events.
The empty string is necessary to reset the run of markers.
The emptyLines object needs to be created all the way down here so that Lines.prototype will be fully populated.
The enabled connection will be shown in the debugger UI and all commands will go to the enabled connection.
The enter-key is technically both printable and non-printable and can thus be captured by `keypress`, no other non-printable key should.
The entry itself will be put there in onCloseFrame.
The env to use for 'env' entries in the option specs.
The error message may change.
The error message thrown is suitable for display to a human.
The errorCatcherPlugin injects a series of import statements into the program body.
The event has arrived at the event's currentTarget.
The event is being propagated through the currentTarget's ancestor objects.
The event is propagating back up through the currentTarget's ancestors in reverse order, starting with the parent.
The event was already handled before `fn` was added to the emitter, so we need to call it on all the existing editors.
The exact needle element was not found in this haystack.
The example is already open, we should avoid pushing examples twice
The examples above would become 'foo'.
The examples provided by Facebook are for non-commercial testing and evaluation purposes only.
The executor function passed to the constructor of a Promise is evaluated immediately.
The expectation is that N will be much, much greater than K.
The export functions in this module mutate a dependency tree, adding items to them.
The extension ".cats" will match a file named ".cats".
The extract class basically just pipes the input to a Reader, and then to a fstream.DirWriter So, this is as much a test of fstream.Reader and fstream.Writer as it is of tar.Extract, but it sort of makes sense.
The failed property is given by a URI with an irrelevant prefix.
The fallback uses a different scoring mechanism, so this will fail if the native module failed to load.
The feature is already disabled.
The feature is already enabled.
The fetched files can now be updated again.
The field names must exist as top-level fields in the fat query.
The file begins with an offset table that contains module ids and their lengths/offsets.
The file is deleted in the current dirty status.
The file is likely untitled.
The file may be new.
The file must be currently open in Atom, and the changes will be applied to the buffer but not saved.
The file name is dummy here.
The file will either be in one of the following depending on whether it is an installed or development environment: - the include/node directory - the out/Release directory - the out/Debug directory - the root directory
The filename can't end with a dot because this is known to cause issues in Windows See: http://superuser.com/questions/230385/dots-at-end-of-file-name
The filename of the source file.
The final output of the value is unchanged.
The first ancestor Path whose value is a Node distinct from this.node.
The first and only argument is a Date object representing the new date and time.
The first argument is the value to be marshalled or unmarshalled.
The first caller of `popInitialNotification` will get the initial notification object, or `null`.
The first character is a number, it might be a substitution index.
The first class data structure for NavigationContext to manage the navigation stack of routes.
The first git call fetches the tags for the provided source
The first insertion forces buffer tokenization and is much slower than subsequent mutations.
The first level of defense is to watch for the creation and deletion of the wlock and ignore events accordingly.
The first line is a JSON blob indicating the new cursor position.
The first line of the string should be the file path.
The first method defines the way we resolve an ID to its object.
The first part is blank if the path is absolute.
The first result should be NSObject, with an annotated type.
The first route is initially rendered using a different style than all future routes.
The fixtureName parameter must contain a directory named .hg-rename.
The flow is as follows:  1.
The flush function processes all tasks that have been scheduled with `rawAsap` unless and until one of those tasks throws an exception.
The following Regular Expressions can be used for tokenizing, validating, and parsing SemVer version strings.
The following are all valid all will output this way when `--help` is used.
The following batched functions are useful for executing a lot of operations at once, allowing for native optimizations and provide the convenience of a single callback after all operations are complete.
The following code is a bit tricky to avoid code branching
The following default field values are used in the payload: important: false parsedOk: true implicit: false disabled: false
The following generated structure is used under the MPL version 2.0 See public-suffix.txt for more information
The following keys are optional in `RemoteConnectionConfiguration`.
The following permissions are supported:  - `alert` - `badge` - `sound`  If a map is provided to the method, only the permissions with truthy values will be requested.
The following post provides a lot of thoughts into how to build this loop: http://gafferongames.com/game-physics/fix-your-timestep/
The following solution - ignore the breakpoint and resume the execution - should be good enough in most cases.
The following two fields are necessary to compute the Regex tokens.
The following two options specify which grammars the provider is interested in.
The following types of arguments are non-core: - Range calls such as `first` or `find` on connections.
The following values work across platforms: - default - numeric - email-address
The following would normally be higher up the stack.
The for..of loop iterates in insertion order.
The forced null value here is compatible with the overridden definition of the "id" field in the Function interface.
The form must be fully filled-out.
The format of this stream is
The fragment pointers are of the same shape as the `_fragmentPointers` property.
The frameMirror and scopeMirror can be accessed only while paused on the debugger.
The frequency of the events can be controlled using the `scrollEventThrottle` prop.
The fromString function should be used to create new Lines objects.
The front-end therefore needs to check for `consts.inspected` on received objects, and can thereby display object proxies and inspect them.
The full-screen overlay that ensures we don't lose track of the mouse while dragging.
The function does not return the proxy module directly, but rather returns a 'factory' method that should be called with a ClientComponent object.
The function is regular expression based for speed reasons.
The function is typically called after the user changes the window size.
The function passed takes a callback to start the animation which should be run after this onPress handler is done.
The function to call when the underlined text is clicked.
The function will return all the default configuration functions overriden by those found on `rn-cli.config.js`, if any.
The function works for sorted array.
The fundamental problem is that the way a menu item is notified that it was selected is that the Atom command associated with the item is fired.
The gap string contained something other than whitespace.
The general approach is to iterate backwards, checking key characters.
The generate SourceNodes we need a code range.
The generated code Processed fragments are removed from this array.
The generated file this source map is associated with.
The gesture has enough velocity to complete, so we transition to the gesture's destination
The gesture may have been detached while responder, so there is no action here
The gesture to navigate backward.
The gesture velocity is so slow, is "not moving"
The given byteOffset must be a multiple of the element size of the specific type, otherwise an exception is raised.
The given file must be in the related files array.
The global config is WAY too much.
The global store of un-instantiated modules
The group where the photos will be fetched from.
The handler will be invoked with a hex string representing the deviceToken.
The handler will be invoked with an instance of `PushNotificationIOS`.
The hash being a unique property of our choosing that we associate with the object.
The hidden input field that we use to hold the focus so that we can detect shortcut keypresses.
The higher level `asap` function ensures that if an exception is thrown by a task, that the task queue will continue flushing as soon as possible, but if you use `rawAsap` directly, you are responsible to either ensure that no exceptions are thrown from your task, or to manually call `rawAsap.requestFlush` if an exception is thrown.
The higher this is, the more precedence the provider gets.
The hold can be released by calling the returned callback.
The host server is unreachable, could be in a VPN.
The how parameter can be "smart", "add"/null, "subtract", or "prev".
The id and name fields are used by Esprima.
The id field should not technically be optional in the Esprima AST format, but it must be optional in the Babel/Acorn AST format.
The id of a profile is its index in the list of props.
The idea is to track separately the objects owned by the page and the objects owned by debugger.
The ids are generated on the client API side and must be unique, so the check below shouldn't be hit unless someone is bypassing the API.
The image will be stored in a temporary file that will only exist for as long as the app is running.
The image will not be scaled up.
The immediate parent Path of this Path.
The immutable route stack.
The implementation of "doGet" is simpler, follows redirects, and has more features than "get".
The indentation amount depends on previous lines.
The index points to the opening quote.
The initial layout isn't measured.
The initial list of connection profiles that will be displayed.
The initial render is synchronous but any updates that happen during rendering, in componentWillMount or componentDidMount, will be batched according to the current batching strategy.
The initial state at startup.
The initial value can be a boolean or object so that's why it's forced to be a string.
The initialState is that the reducer will use when there is no previous state.
The initialization sequence occurs as follows: - the constructor is called - onStatus is called to hook up event handlers - initial breakpoints may be added here.
The input blob can be as simple as an array of strings, or an object with rows nested inside section objects.
The input field is not shown, but is a way for us to bring focus back to a place where we can detect keypresses.
The inputs to pre-fill the form with.
The instance is now retained.
The intent of this module is to interoperate with OpenSSL only, specifically the node crypto module's `verify` method.
The interesting bit:
The interpretation of a dot depends on whether it is followed by a digit or another two dots.
The interval at which minutes can be selected.
The invariant message will be stripped in production, but the invariant will remain to ensure logic does not differ in production.
The inverse of countColumn -- find the offset that corresponds to a particular column.
The issue leads to call frames belong to the same function invocation being split apart.
The items are not rendered directly
The items in this array are fetchable and may have been filled in from other sources, so check them all.
The items in this array are not fetchable by ID, so nothing else could have fetched additional data for individual items.
The iterable is expected to be a collection of pairs.
The iterator protocol depends on `Symbol.iterator`.
The key concept is that marshalling functions can be recursive, calling other marshalling functions, ending at the primitives.
The key will persist until the initial stack and its derived stack no longer contains this route.
The labels for the control's segment buttons, in order.
The last case is where we split the previous run.
The last case, 'edit', is already filtered out above, but Flow doesn't know that.
The last column is inclusive.
The last comment that was selected.
The last index that native has sent confirmation of completed push/pop for.
The last line of a file might not have a newline.
The last location update we've seen.
The last mapping for each line spans the entire line.
The last segment broken may be an empty string.
The last status to merge is the dirty filesystem status.
The last two arguments are optional.
The latest version of Safari supports quoted cookie values, though.
The layout does not reflect the element as seen by the user, rather it reflects the position within the layout system, before any transforms are applied.
The layout of the containing view of the scenes.
The left/right label data are the same, so a before/after label can be replaced by an on-bar label.
The leftmost pixel of the image will be stretched to fill the track.
The legacy API for Gradients allow for the bounding box to be used as a convenience for specifying gradient positions.
The length of the stack can be either even or odd, depending on whether or not we have a name for the root value.
The list of all possible AST node types.
The list of connection profiles that will be displayed.
The list of original sources.
The loader has been reset.
The loading map being empty is a heuristic for when loading has completed.
The location of the .flowconfig where these messages came from.
The location of the .hhconfig where these messages came from.
The location of the annotation.
The lock being created is a definitive start to a Mercurial action/arc build.
The lock being deleted is a definitive end to a Mercurial action/arc build.
The logic below matches latest versions of IE, Firefox, Chrome and Safari on some old platforms.
The logic there is setup to create a new buffer when there is a cache miss.
The loginUser will be used to authenticate before adding newUser.
The lstat endpoint is the same as the stat endpoint except it will return the stat of a link instead of the file the link points to.
The main public entry point.
The main reason to extract a single pass is so that we can track in the system trace
The major downside of using request instead of our hand-rolled implementation is that it has a lot of dependencies of its own.
The manager also allows two callback to be passed.
The map type to be displayed.
The mapping object should have the following properties:  - generated: An object with the generated line and column positions.
The mappings are sorted by generated position.
The mappings coming from the consumer for the section have generated positions relative to the start of the section, so we need to offset them to be relative to the start of the concatenated generated file.
The marker will be destroyed automatically when its associated TextBuffer is destroyed.
The markup is expected to render into a list of root nodes.
The markup must render into a single root node.
The marshaller will be called to transform the type before sending it out onto the network, while the unmarshaller will be called on values incoming from the network.
The match is an array that also has an index property, something that Flow does not appear to understand.
The math is pretty obscure, but this cool website has nice visual illustrations of what they represent: http://xaedes.de/dev/transitions/
The maximum allowed zoom scale.
The maximum number of characters to display in a URL.
The maximum number of elements this CircularBuffer can hold.
The maximum reconnect time is 5 seconds - advance clock to sip the reconnect time.
The maximum reconnect time is 5 seconds.
The message array may have more than one item.
The message channel technique was discovered by Malte Ubl and was the original foundation for this library.
The messages we're receiving from the worker process.
The messages will be cached and sent in order.
The method only receives the new child instance and the retrieval in from the map is performed by the child's name.
The method receives two predicates The first is invoked upon descent and with its return value controls whether need to traverse deeper into the tree.
The minimal observed height makes a good default
The minimum allowed zoom scale.
The mixin will invoke these if they are defined on your component.
The module cache
The most common use-case is for tabs, where no transition is needed
The most fundamental component for building UI, `View` is a container that supports layout with flexbox, style, some touch handling, and accessibility controls, and is designed to be nested inside other views and to have 0 to many children of any type.
The most important side effect is the `touchableHandlePress` abstract method invocation that occurs when a responder is released while in either of the "Press" states.
The most recent save request should trigger another change event, so we'll check for conflicts when that happens.
The motivation behind this approach is to provide a total order on menu item ordering rather than a partial order.
The name by which this field's results should be made available to the application.
The name for the field when serializing the query or interpreting query responses from the server.
The name indicates the start state and the transition being tested.
The name of the current property is always the penultimate element of this.stack, and always a String.
The name of the property of parentPath.value through which this Path's value was reached.
The name which Relay internals can use to reference this field, without collisions.
The named reference is known as a "ref".
The nanosecond component overflowed, so carry to the seconds field.
The native Promise implementation throws the following error: ERROR: Event loop not supported.
The native XMLHttpRequest in Chrome dev tools is CORS aware and won't let you fetch anything from the internet
The native scroll event is provided.
The navigation index that we wish to push/pop to.
The navigation state of the containing view.
The navigation view is initially not visible on the screen, but can be pulled in from the side of the window specified by the `drawerPosition` prop and its width can be set by the `drawerWidth` prop.
The navigation view that will be rendered to the side of the screen and can be pulled in.
The negating ANSI code for the rendering modes.
The new OpenSSH internal format abuses PEM headers
The new tab opens instantly, so this is no longer needed.
The newNode is assumed to be prevNode after some manipulateion done to it therefore they are assumed to belong to the same parent.
The next case is where we are at the end but cannont extend.
The next profiles list is longer than before, a new one was added
The next request should work as expected.
The node is hidden - unselect all nodes under it if there are any
The nodes have different types, and at least one of the types is not a subtype of the Expression type, so we cannot safely assume the nodes are syntactically interchangeable.
The number of messages outstanding
The offset fields are 0-based, but we use 1-based indices when encoding/decoding from VLQ.
The offset starts at 0x10000, and each pair of numbers represents an offset to the next range, and then a size of the range.
The old and new text editor contents use offsets to create a global line number identifier being the line number with offset.
The old path, line, etc.
The one method, `presentUI` is called by `Main` to attach the UI into the DOM.
The only argument is an object with the following properties:  - line: The line number in the generated source.
The only argument is an object with the following properties:  - source: The filename of the original source.
The only argument is the url of the original source file.
The only argument that is passed to the callback is the position of the action in the actions array.
The only case we haven't checked yet is keys that are in two but aren't in one, which means they are different.
The only exposed method is 'clearPassword'.
The only job of react-native-cli is to init the repository and then forward all the commands to the local version of react-native.
The only other requirement is that the `pageX, pageY` values be in the same coordinate system that events' `pageX/Y` are reported.
The only possible recovery here is reconnecting a new client, but the failed to serialize events will be missed.
The only reason to modify this file is to add more warnings and troubleshooting information for the `react-native init` command.
The only requirement of your class specification is that you implement a `render` method.
The only seemingly possible way to avoid erroring is to access a property that typically works for non-anonymous divs and catch any error that may otherwise arise.
The only thing that matters for this function is version number.
The only way to do this properly would be to shell out to git-check-ref-format, and as this is a fast sync function, we don't want to do that.
The operation field provides additional context.
The optimistic response may be a subset or superset of the actual response payload.
The optional arguments helps prevent the need to bind in many cases.
The optional flag indicates whether parsing should use strict enforcement of the version draft-cavage-http-signatures-04 of the spec or beyond.
The order of iteration should follow the order of assignment, which happens to match numerical index order, but we don't rely on that.
The origin URL of this repository.
The original query that prompted this result, e.g. to highlight it in the UI.
The other editor isn't yet attached, while both editors were already in sync when attached.
The other resolvable query will resolve imminently and call `readyState.update` instead.
The output format was changed to support more detailed failure information.
The output won't be in the language's grammar.
The overlaid div used as a grab handle for sizing the code/comment panes.
The overlay decoration only works through the view registry.
The owner of the BufferedProcessStore should subscribe to this and handle any errors.
The package expects icons to have a `data-name` attribute with the name of the file and for the list item in the tree to have the class names 'entry', 'file', and 'list-item'.
The page scrolling state can be in 3 states: - idle, meaning there is no interaction with the page scroller happening at the time - dragging, meaning there is currently an interaction with the page scroller - settling, meaning that there was an interaction with the page scroller, and the page scroller is now finishing it's closing or opening animation
The pane item specific properties.
The panel should be visible because of the last serialized state, initialize it immediately.
The parameters are sorted by name, using ascending byte value ordering.
The parameters in human-readable form for use on the right label.
The parameters turned into snippet strings.
The parent directory or something it symlinks to must eventually be in a folder that npm maintains.
The particular require runtime that we are using looks for a global `ErrorUtils` object and if it exists, then it requires modules with the error handler specified via ErrorUtils.setGlobalHandler by calling the require function with applyWithGuard.
The partitioning chooses a pivot between `p` and `r` and moves all elements that are less than or equal to the pivot to the before it, and all the elements that are greater than it after it.
The pass through stream is from readable-stream and is thus a current streams3 implementation that is free of these bugs even on 0.8.
The passed-in node has been detached from the container it was originally rendered into.
The path that relative sources in the SourceMapConsumer should be relative to.
The path to private key
The path to the directory where the .flowconfig is -- i.e. the root of the Flow project.
The paths are returned in absolute from code analysis tools but github works on paths relative from the root of the project.
The paths of the stripped out objects are appended to the `cleaned` list.
The percent of a row that must be visible to consider it "viewable".
The picker is a controlled component.
The picker will conform to whatever width is given, but we do have to set the component's height explicitly on the surrounding view to ensure it gets rendered.
The pin color.
The plugin names must be in the ordering injected by `injectEventPluginOrder`.
The position of the next task to execute in the task queue.
The position should be `after` if the offset is at the end of the file.
The positions are in text editor screen coordinates and are rounded down to the last position on each line.
The positon is still away from scene's index.
The prefix a URI must have for `RemoteDirectoryProvider` to try to produce a `RemoteDirectory` for it.
The prefix is required to store "__proto__" in a object-based map.
The presence of `rangeInfo` indicates that we are traversing connection metadata fields, in which case `visitField` will ensure that `edges` and `page_info` are kept when necessary.
The pretty printer allows a dangling Comment node to act as a Statement when the Comment can't be attached to any other non-Comment node in the tree.
The previous and the next sibling properties are too set when a child is assigned to its parent.
The primary difference between this and `createForFields` is whether or not the connection edges are re-fetched.
The print function is the right choice because it gives us the opportunity to reprint such nodes using their original source.
The private script context should be hidden behind an experiment.
The process is killed when there are no more subscribers.
The process should use its ordinary stderr for errors.
The profile passed to the function is the profile that the user has just created.
The progress bar style.
The progress value.
The progressive index of the containing view's navigation state.
The project paths may have changed during the delay time.
The project was removed from the tree.
The properties of this type match the properties of the `atom` global.
The property was deleted, so remove this tree element.
The props will be merged in the order the `StatusBar` components were mounted.
The proxyElement has been deleted, no need to remove listener.
The query will be run for each arg.
The range of the temporary ports for connection are all taken, This is temporal with many http requests, but should be counted as a network away event.
The range of this Marker doesn't matter, only the line it is on, because the Decoration is for a Gutter.
The range returned should just be the range of the original text.
The ranges returned should be all the ranges of all the segments, including the colons.
The read would fail since `name` is missing from cached data.
The read-only commands can be executed in parallel, but the rest must be executed serially.
The readdir endpoint accepts the following query parameters:  path: path to the folder to list entries inside.
The reason being is that we simply want to support ES3 environments which doesn't implement computed properties.
The reason being is we store a "hash" on the object for fast access to it's place in the internal map entries.
The reason for not requiring a module top-level is to lazy load it.
The reason we want to know the amount a wheel event will scroll is that it gives us a chance to update the display before the actual scrolling happens, reducing flickering.
The reason why we need this two-phases process is to deal with composite props such as transform which can receive values from multiple parents.
The recommended way of destroying a decoration is by destroying its marker.
The ref can change if you swap the keys of but not the refs.
The ref conceptually lives on the element.
The refresh is serialized, so it is safe to call it multiple times in succession.
The regex chunks
The regexp is used much further down.
The region is defined by the center coordinates and the span of coordinates to display.
The region to be displayed by the map.
The remaining code is added without mapping
The remaining middle components should all be completed messages.
The remaining view should be activated.
The remote server command will only be saved if the user changes it from this default.
The remove actions need to happen in the opposite of their normally defined order.
The repo type is not supported.
The reprinting code leaves leading whitespace untouched unless it has to reindent a line, or you pass false for this option.
The require function
The require parameter is needed because require is bound differently in each file, and we need to execute this in the caller's context.
The require profiling is really noisy during tests.
The requisite check alone could cause these fields to be added back when not needed.
The resolvedType will already have been checked to be a valid alias type.
The response data is expected to be an array of item objects.
The response data is expected to be array of edge objects.
The response data is expected to be scalar values or arrays of scalar values.
The rest ConnectivityStates are hidden by the Android API, but can be used if necessary.
The result can be null if `node` only contains empty fragments or fragments that only contain empty fragments.
The result can be nullish if a mock or a custom function is used.
The result is not valid JSON but it's what we get.
The result is under this root, but not the root itself - skipping it and searching recursively
The result of the dependency extraction is an de-duplicated array of dependencies, and an array of offsets to the string literals with module IDs.
The result should be HTML-escaped before insertion into the DOM.
The result that we publish when an editor event is emitted
The resulting component re-renders on updates to the observable.
The resulting data structure is an array.
The resulting promise will resolve on upload.
The return value must NOT be mutated, and should be treated as an immutable borrow.
The return value of each callback will be passed in as an argument to the next callback.
The return value will be used as the initial value of `this.state`.
The return value will not be consistent across nodes or browsers, but two identical selections on the same node will return identical objects.
The return value will only ever equal itself, and will not equal the return of any subsequent call of this function.
The return values are unbounded, unlike `getScrollPosition`.
The return values of the following functions must be JSON-serializable so they can be sent across a process boundary.
The returnType is not wrapped in a TypeAnnotation, so the colon needs to be added separately.
The returned Promise will resolve when results have been published.
The returned RelayMutationTransaction can be committed or rolled back at a later time.
The returned `trackedNode` is never tracked directly: instead it serves as an indicator to `diffConnection` that the entire connection field must be tracked.
The returned completions may have unrelated results, even though the offset is set on the end of the prefix.
The returned object contains the DOM node, this map, and information about line-wide styles that were set by the mode.
The returned observable emits updates as the data changes over time.
The returned value does not conform to the GUID standard, but should be globally unique in the context of the browser.
The revisions haven't changed if the revisions' ids are the same.
The rightmost pixel of the image will be stretched to fill the track.
The root directory that is opened in Atom, which this Repository serves.
The roundtrip delay d and system clock offset t are defined as:
The same TextEditor must be returned to prevent Atom from creating multiple tabs for the same file, because Atom doesn't cache pending opener promises.
The same as NuclideRemoteConnectionParams, minus `remoteServerCommand`.
The scene isn't focused.
The scene to render.
The scheduling function is invoked with a callback that will execute the next unit of work.
The schema.
The scope descriptor marks the text with semantic information, generally used for syntax highlighting.
The script should be in infinite loop.
The script who simluate behavior of scribe_cat.
The second argument is the actual type object that represent the value.
The second argument is the type object, which encodes all of the information required to marshal / unmarshal the value.
The second defines the way we resolve a node object to its GraphQL type.
The selected key is a node's index modulo the amount of the rendered nodes.
The selection changes after keydown and before keyup, but we check on keydown as well in the case of holding down a key, when multiple keydown events are fired but only one keyup is.
The selection end needs to be set before the start, otherwise there can be an intermediate non-empty selection between the two, which can override the middle-click paste buffer on linux and cause the wrong thing to get pasted.
The semihidden textarea that is focused when the editor is focused, and receives input.
The separators above and below will be hidden when a row is highlighted.
The serialization key is derived from all calls/values and hashed for compactness.
The serializer function keeps state inside the returned function and so far I'm not sure how to not do that.
The server is asking for replies to the given prompts for keyboard-interactive user authentication.
The server is started in a separate process than the caller's.
The service path could be in one of following forms: 1.
The set of transforms to blacklist.
The shasum's already been checked, but we haven't ever had a peek inside, so we unpack it here just to make sure it is what it says it is.
The side effects after this try/catch capture the purpose of this test.
The sign of `-0` is preserved.
The simplest use case is to plop down a `TextInput` and subscribe to the `onChangeText` events to read the user input.
The simplest workflow is to create an `Animated.Value`, hook it up to one or more style attributes of an animated component, and then drive updates either via animations, such as `Animated.timing`, or by hooking into gestures like panning or scrolling via `Animated.event`.
The size of the LoadingSpinner.
The size of the buttons within the group.
The sole purpose of wrapping the task is to catch the exception and recycle the task object after its single use.
The source can't be part of the message because we want to be able to populate a filter menu before we even have any messages.
The source of this file and that of plugins is used as part of the hash as a way to version our transforms.
The sourceLoc can stay the same because the contents of the targetLoc have not changed.
The spans will have null for their from/to properties when the marker continues beyond the start/end of the line.
The spec defines that the filename must be in quotes, though a wide range of servers do not follow the rule
The spring has finished catching up to a gesture in progress.
The spring is at zero, so the gesture is already complete
The stack maintains a current location which may be any element in the stack, not just the top.
The standard, styleable ANSI colors.
The starting line
The starting position of invalid leading comments.
The starting position of invalid trailing comments.
The stat endpoint accepts the following query parameters:  path: path to the file to read
The state have changed since the update started, and there must be another scheduled update.
The state is encoded in 3 booleans: enabled: is there an enabled connection break: are there any disabled connections in break status running: are there any connections in running status
The status is fetched by merging the changes right after the `compareCommitId` if specified, or `HEAD` if not.
The status update stream will be completed when a root is disposed, so there is no need to use takeUntil here to truncate the stream and release resources.
The sticky behavior means that it will scroll with the content at the top of the section until it reaches the top of the screen, at which point it will stick to the top until it is pushed off the screen by the next section header.
The string that will be rendered before text input has been entered
The string to show in generated help for options of this type.
The structural type of the return here is pretty obvious.
The style of the scroll indicators.
The stylesheets will be loaded asynchronously, so there might be a slight visual glitch if the widget is drawn before the stylesheets are loaded.
The subscribe function will put the given callback and the returned disposable in the variables above for inspection.
The subscription may have been removed during this event loop.
The subtree of data from this record contains partial data.
The summary output we get should be unfiltered, showing everything installed, so we clear these options before calling `ls`.
The supplied `callback` will be invoked whenever data returned by the last invocation to `resolve` has changed.
The supplied mapping may contain multiple field names.
The synchronous exist check is used to avoid the race condition of fast updates, when the watcher is called twice as the file is created/removed.
The system is best designed when setNativeProps is implemented.
The system should check `isPersistent` to determine whether the event should be released into the pool after being dispatched.
The systrace module will expose itself on the require function so that it can be used here.
The tag will be used for the clone call.
The tags package looks in the directory, so give it a sample file.
The target or something it symlinks to must eventually be in the parent or something the parent symlinks to
The temp directory will be deleted automatically when the current process exits.
The test file doesn't need any special flags.
The test function is applied sequentially to each element in items until one returns a Promise that resolves to a non-null value.
The tests below break the MarkerTracker abstraction so that they can ensure that disposal happens properly.
The tests for the nuclide-atom-script package cannot live in pkg/nuclide-atom-script/spec because nuclide-atom-script specifies a custom test runner as part of its implementation in its package.json.
The text 'OK' should be probably localized.
The text color of the navigation bar title
The text color of the placeholder string
The text is set via diffs to keep the cursor position when updating the file that is already active.
The text node might have been inlined if it was short, so try to find the parent element.
The text that's read by the screen reader when the user interacts with the image.
The textarea is kept positioned near the cursor to prevent the fact that it'll be scrolled into view on input from scrolling our fake cursor out of view.
The texture can just be re-used and re-composited with different parameters.
The thing that currently has focus is not a text editor.
The three productions have the relationship:
The threshold to invoke the `onNavigate` action.
The tint color of the progress bar itself.
The tint color of the progress bar track.
The title and subtitle are expanded so the logo and navigation icons are displayed on the left, title and subtitle in the middle and the actions on the right.
The title displayed in the nav bar and back button for this route
The title displayed under the refresh indicator.
The title of the quick-open tab that exclusively contains results from this provider.
The title will be updated in onattach.
The toType function should of course be idempotent.
The toggle command first negates this, and then if this is true shows a datatip, otherwise it hides the current datatip.
The toggle command first negates this, and then if this is true shows a type hint, otherwise it hides the current typehint.
The toolbar makes an effort to keep track of which BuckProject to act on, based on the last TextEditor that had focus that corresponded to a BuckProject.
The top-left corner of the cropped image, specified in the original image's coordinate space.
The top-level value will be displayed, and it can be expanded to reveal its children.
The top-most container isn't resizable so exclude that immediately.
The total time for this node has already been accounted for iff one of it's parents has already been visited.
The total time of this ancestor is accounted for if we're in any form of recursive cycle.
The transition between pages will be animated.
The transition effect when showing and hiding the status bar using the `hidden` prop.
The transpiled version of "Foo" would've looked like this:
The traversal is a map operation from `RelayQuery` nodes to nodes.
The tree is used both to go from line numbers to line objects, and to go from objects to numbers.
The tricky part is the 'jumps', where RTL and LTR text touch each other.
The two 'H' nodes have the same label but both should render and be part of the length.
The type gymnastics here are so `fn` can be garbage collected once we've used it.
The type provided to service consumers.
The type signature of this function cannot be expressed in Flow.
The typechecks transform has a static-only mode that doesn't actually perform a transform but validates the types.
The types are slightly different, so we need to copy to make Flow happy.
The underlay comes from adding a view to the view hierarchy, which can sometimes cause unwanted visual artifacts if not used correctly, for example if the backgroundColor of the wrapped view isn't explicitly set to an opaque color.
The underlying switch might have changed, but we're controlled, and so want to ensure it represents our value.
The upcoming format changes described elsewhere in this file fix the issue, but for now we must still work around it.
The update configurations are each expected to have a `parentNode` property.
The uppercase one should be returned first.
The url field will require support for asynchronicity.
The use of frozen objects as keys.
The use preview tabs setting was removed from 'tabs' package in atom 1.6 and moved to core instead.
The user added a new project root and the currently active working sets did not let it show.
The user could have selected that from the timeline view.
The user deleted everything and never applied a new property value via Up/Down scrolling/live editing, so remove the tree element and update.
The user has the responsibility to ensure the private key is valid or that this results in a safe protocol.
The user have edited since the last update.
The user is either in another app or on the home screen - `inactive` - This is a transition state that currently never happens for typical React Native apps.
The user should never get here because projects are inited by using `react-native-cli` from outside a project directory.
The user's intent is to create a new item for the list.
The user's intent is to create a new profile.
The user's intent is to delete the currently-selected item.
The user's intent is to delete the currently-selected profile.
The user-agent can also be set in native using WebViewConfig.
The usual file-wide error is 'too many errors emitted, stopping now'.
The validate method will return an array of validation errors.
The validation flag is currently mutative.
The value 'justify' is only supported on iOS and fallbacks to `left` on Android.
The value displayed inside the badge.
The value of the current property is always the final element of this.stack.
The value of the first ancestor Path whose value is a Node.
The value of the switch, if true the switch will be turned on.
The value of the switch.
The value should be between minimumValue and maximumValue, which default to 0 and 1 respectively.
The value to be passed to picker's `onValueChange` callback when this item is selected.
The value to drive
The value to show for the text input.
The values 'normal' and 'bold' are supported for most fonts.
The variable mapping is represented by `variableMapping`, a dictionary that maps from names of variables in the parent scope to variables that exist in the fragment.
The version of the source mapping spec that we are consuming.
The version of tough-cookie that serialized this jar.
The vibration is asynchronous so this method will return immediately.
The visually param controls whether, in right-to-left text, direction 1 means to move towards the next index in the string, or towards the character to the right of the current position.
The walking function is called for each source file content and is passed the filename and source content.
The walking function is called once for each snippet of JS and is passed that snippet and the its original associated source's line/column location.
The whole query must be fetched if the root dataID is unknown.
The widgets for all of them need to be drawn.
The width of a tab.
The wlock is surest way to detect the beginning and end of events.
The workaround for this bug involves attaching an empty click listener on the target node.
The working directory of this repository.
The wrapper function should do some stuff, and return a presumably different callback function.
The writeFile endpoint accepts the following query parameters:  path: path to the file to written.
Then create the item itself
Then insert AUTO332 in at this offset.
Then it will re-register everything in this._items once it has been sorted.
Then kill the appropriate duplicates in the run.
Then perform the search again the with same query and callback.
Then perform the search again with the same query and callback.
Then restore the pointer events and top value for this scene
Then take last path component.
Then test what we need to kill.
Then this module would export it.
Then this problem will be solved.
Then try to pick platform-specific asset records 5.
Then, depending on that, we'll figure out whether it's a single-file module, gzipped tarball, or naked tarball.
Then, get the parsed diff info.
Then, if a user attempts to emit an event that is not one of those specified types the emitter will throw an error.
Then, it will spawn a new flow process, and we want that to be successful
There already is a shorthand this longhands falls under.
There are 3 cases we handle.
There are 3 stages: left, center, right.
There are 3 valid forms of ObjectId.
There are a number of idiomatic ways of expressing types, so this function serves to coerce them all to actual Type objects.
There are also other events, such as `onSubmitEditing` and `onFocus` that can be subscribed to.
There are circumstances in which it will raise an error and give up, but they are very rare.
There are definitely other cases, but it's not a big issue.
There are div.tile elements, each of which has its own div.highlights element and many div.line elements.
There are gaps in between the segments.
There are legitimate times when there may be no current bookmark, such as during a rebase.
There are no visible top level nodes with such className.
There are other reasons why the keyboard could be dismissed.
There are several user scenarios, each which spawn different event orders: - startup - open file - onActivate, activePaneStopChanging - changing tabs - onActivate, activePaneStopChanging - atom.workspace.open of closed file - create, scroll, activate, open, scroll, activePaneStopChanging - atom.workspace.open of open file, no scroll or move - activate, open, activePaneStopChanging - atom.workspace.open of open file, with move - activate, position, open, scroll, activePaneStopChanging - atom.workspace.open of current file - position, open, scroll
There are so many media events, it makes sense to just maintain a list rather than create a `trapBubbledEvent` for each
There are still more digits in this value, so we must make sure the continuation bit is marked.
There are three events that may outdate the status of ignored files.
There are three productions that can be parsed in a parentheses pair that needs to be determined after the outermost pair is closed.
There are two situations when this happens, when a garbage timer ID was given and when a previously existing timer was deleted before this callback fired.
There can be at most one connection to a given remote machine at a time.
There can be string log and string eval result.
There can only be one selection per document in IE, so it must be in our element.
There is a folder in the components directory that has this name, but it was not installed by bower.
There is a small chance that the add/remove of the Repository could happen so quickly that the entry for the repo in _subscriptionForRepository has not been set yet.
There is also an `extra` field where additional details about certain kinds of errors are provided.
There is also some nuance with how we handle multiple moved touches in a single event.
There is an explict shorthand property this longhands falls under.
There is another benchmark of this run to do.
There is another iteration of this benchmark to do.
There is another repetition of this iteration to do.
There is currently no dedicated 'shortHeadDidChange' event.
There is no current transition, so we need to transition back to the presented index
There is no defined way to represent negative deltas, so it's illegal to diff B from A where the time denoted by B is later than the time denoted by A.
There is no expression, so the completion should happen against global properties.
There is no guarantee that `this.state` will be immediately updated, so accessing `this.state` after calling this method may return the old value.
There is no guarantee that calls to `setState` will run synchronously, as they may eventually be batched together.
There is no guarantee that that has happened yet.
There is no keyword or literal with only one character.
There is no modified character for this key combination and no character is inserted into the document, but FF fires the keypress for char code `100` anyway.
There is no new line in between.
There is no reason to include directories in these updates, and in fact they may make us overfetch statuses.
There is unfortunately no standard format to report an error, so we have to write a specific converter for each tool we want to support.
There isn't a best yet.
There may be connections in break-disabled state and running state as well.
There may be more than one error.
There may be some cases where scroll views actually should return `true` from `onStartShouldSetResponder`: Any time we are detecting a standard tap that gives priority to nested views.
There might already be a marker because there can be multiple TextEditors open for a given file.
There might have been a widget with a focused element that got hidden or updated, if so re-focus it.
There must be exactly one argument.
There should be a slight delay before showing a highlight when starting a touch.
There should be an opening element for every single closing element so we can just look for opening ones
There should be at least main page script.
There should be no remaining scopes after this method.
There should have been no additional calls on the spies.
There was an initial heartbeat, but we can't be sure if it went before or after we do listen here.
There will be no effect on devices that do not support Vibration, eg.
There will be no transtion.
There will only be one connection at a time.
There's a minimum requirement for re2c..
There's a race condition if we try to navigate to the specified example from the initial props at the same time the navigation logic is setting up the initial navigation state.
There's a ton of debate on this:  https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/6371 https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/7676  It appears the version of io.js bundled with Atom has proper i18n support, but it lists lowercase strings before uppercase strings, so we also need this custom function in Atom.
There's an existing editor process already and it's attached to the terminal, so go kill it.
There's at least one case where the property error message is confusing at best.
There's callers to various `reset` functions, so it's probably safer to have this.
There's no need to have 404 in the message as well.
There's no other great way for a consumer of this service to specify a ProcessOutputHandler.
There's no way, short of windows system calls or execing the chcp command line program to figure this out.
Therefore it's a bit noisier of a signal, and is prone to both false positives and negatives.
Therefore the CoverInitializedName check is conducted.
Therefore the parent property is never given to the node's constructor, but rather set by the parent itself when the node is assigned to it.
Therefore this copy cannot throw.
Therefore we can remove all '..' parts directly after the root.
Therefore, `PanResponder` does not call `onResponderMove` passed the first dispatch.
Therefore, if a file is included in the WorkingSet, then the file-tree must have a way to know that it must include its parent directories.
Therefore, if we detect that there was a change during the fetch we schedule another right after the first has finished.
Therefore, in this implementation, we overwrite the previous value.
Therefore, it's not very easy to tie the action to the result.
Therefore, we allow the gadget creator to provide a hook that creates a custom version of those events.
Therefore, we have to catch them here, at initialization time, instead.
Therefore, we include the Systrace module before the main module, and it will set itself as property on the require function.
Therefore, we need the third state, firstCoverInitializedNameError, to track the first usage of CoverInitializedName and report it when we reached the end of the parentheses pair.
Therefore, we need to create a placeholder item that we later replace.
Therefore, we only create a DiagnosticsPanel for the first call to consumeDiagnosticUpdates.
Therefore, we only need to diff the first record to figure out which fields have previously been fetched.
Therefore, we will just skip decoding for such URIs.
These APIs used to exist on classic React classes but since we would like to deprecate them, we're not going to move them over to this modern base class.
These annotations are copy/pasted from the built-in Flow definitions for Native Promises with some non-standard APIs added in
These are all accepted but ignored, since Javascript has no notion of the physical size of an argument.
These are all legacy features and therefore not already part of the modern ReactComponent.
These are all of the transforms that may be run via `transform`.
These are assigned lazily the first time the responder is set to make plain text nodes as cheap as possible.
These are defined only for code executing in the chrome devtools webview.
These are displayed as icons or text on the right side of the widget.
These are necessary to maintain contiguous runs of markers when relevant.
These are needed for tests only.
These are not provided by the FBIDE algorithm.
These are not valid tokens in an identifier so we have to remove them.
These are only applied when a character is found to actually have a code point above 128.
These are packages we want to activate, including some which come bundled with atom, or ones widely used in conjunction with nuclide.
These are paths to files that can be imported.
These are probably edge cases, though, and the information will be refetched the next time the file is edited.
These are special markers that can be used to identify special handling.
These are status codes used by Mercurial's output.
These are the options that are necessary to get a require out of a ModuleMap.
These are the things we should try to remove.
These are the ways in which an identifier might be declared, note that these identifiers are safe to use in code.
These are the ways in which one might access an undeclared identifier.
These are used when `options.locations` is on, for the `startLoc` and `endLoc` properties.
These benchmarks need to load packages fast, and re-use native module info in localstorage.
These cases should already be caught by validateMethodOverride.
These checks are adapted from es6-shim https://fburl.com/34437854
These configurations are used to generate the query for the mutation to be sent to the server and to correctly write the server's response into the client store.
These decisions, particularly to marginalize MessageChannel and to capture the MutationObserver implementation in a closure, were integrated back into ASAP proper.
These do not expose the same capabilities.
These elements are added from paging to extend the the range.
These fields are similar to connections, but do not support range calls such as `first` or `after`.
These fields do not really need to be reset since this object is no longer accessible.
These first two properties are not needed, but including them is easier than getting Flow to accept a disjoint union.
These functions are passed from above to facilitate testing.
These functions return arrays of errors, potentially one for every key.
These hold the "current" state
These identifiers are useful for assigning response payloads to their corresponding queries when sent in a single GraphQL request.
These items are ordered based on the specified priority with which they are added to this object.
These items don't get rendered directly.
These manage event subscriptions.
These members handle local objects which have been marshalled remotely.
These members handle remote objects.
These methods are added for backwards compatibility with Devtools CodeSchool extension.
These methods are overriding the base class.
These methods are similar to DEFINE_MANY, except we assume they return objects.
These methods may be defined by both the class specification and mixins.
These methods may be defined only once by the class specification or mixin.
These methods must return void.
These node references were useful for breaking ties, but we don't need them anymore, and they create cycles in the AST that may lead to infinite recursion if we don't delete them here.
These non-standard Blink-specific properties augment the InheritedProperties.
These operations should leave the cache unchanged.
These options are recognized:
These options control both how installs happen AND how `ls` shows output.
These paths are all relative to the remote fs.
These properties are a subset of our styles that are consumed by the layout algorithm and affect the positioning and sizing of views.
These properties required to conform to the PendingTransaction interface:
These properties used to be assigned to each new object in the Lines constructor, but we can more efficiently stuff them into the secret and let these lazy accessors compute their values on-the-fly.
These regions will now be 'modified' regions.
These represent groups of soft breaks.
These should always be used as a pair.
These should be set up in the constructor, but as a convenience for simpler class abstractions, we set them up after the fact.
These should be sorted in the final output.
These special components do the magic of binding the animated values to the properties, and do targeted native updates to avoid the cost of the react render and reconciliation process on every frame.
These styles will be applied to the scroll view content container which wraps all of the child views.
These systems should generally use pooling to reduce the frequency of garbage collection.
These tags are only valid with a few parents that have special child parsing rules -- if we're down here, then none of those matched and so we allow it only if we don't know what the parent is, as all other cases are invalid.
These tags we do not allow editing their tag name.
These technically contain all the fields listed above, but we don't really have a good use for them so they are omitted.
These tend to be super spammy.
These test cases test the state machine for mulitple connections.
These tests are a part of the continues build and are executed by the devtools_sanity_unittest.cc as a part of the Interactive UI Test suite.
These tests target the non-watchman-dependent features of LocalHgService.
These top-level fields are used to re-fetch any data that has changed for records identified by the data IDs.
These two 'protected' variables are accessed by ListView to iterate over the data in this class.
These two are populated during finalization.
These two are, on init, called from the constructor because they have to be initialized before the editor can start at all.
These two empty containers will cause all calls to ActionId.SOMETHING or MarkerId.OTHER to equal 'undefined', unless they are given a concrete value elsewhere.
These two fields are used by the DOM and ART diffing algorithms respectively.
These two functions are to defend against undocumented Node functions.
These two private variables are accessed by outsiders because ListView uses them to iterate over the data in this class.
These two should be hidden by the ConnectionMultiplexer
These values describe which phase the event flow is currently being evaluated.
These variables form the "input" to the mutation query sent to the server.
These variables should be serialized and sent in the GraphQL request.
These will be sent along with the mutation query to the server.
These will return the module if already loaded, or load it if not.
They also handle cleanup on unmount so they are safe by default.
They also must match algorithms, if given
They are implemented in all modern browsers.
They are lazily instantiated, accessed via the `_generatedMappings` and `_originalMappings` getters respectively, and we only parse the mappings and create these arrays once queried for a source location.
They are meant for development use only, and aren't included in Nuclide builds.
They are opaque tokens that are used by Relay containers to read data that is then passed to the underlying React component.
They are optimized for boyer-moore parsing.
They aren't valid JSON but nothing actually enforces that we are getting valid JSON and we are using a full JS parser so we have to handle cases like this.
They don't provide any bells and whistles such as fat queries or tracked queries.
They may be stage 0 proposals for example.
They only reflect updated `gestureState` for start/end events that bubble/capture to the Node.
They represent a single page of children of the value represented by fullname.
They represent multiple pages of children of the value represented by fullname.
They should be built independently and not share any injection state.
They should be considered private APIs.
They should not include types that have been declared.
They should not interfere with messages from the first provider.
They should overwrite existing messages from ProviderA at the same scope.
They should probably be skipped.
They were generated by tools/generate-identifier-regex.js
They'll simply get appended as additional form data parts in the request body, leaving the server to deal with them.
Thin wrapper to reprint requires, it's wrapped in a new function in order to easily attach comments to the node.
Things like chmod in particular, which in turn results in the dreaded ENOENT errors.
This "in your face" style of warning allows developers to notice and correct these issues as quickly as possible.
This "route" is the mount-point for the middleware, when given a value other than _/_ the middleware is only effective when that segment is present in the request's pathname.
This API assumes the caller knows the contents of the data type.
This API is defined at https://github.com/atom/status-bar.
This API should be called `delete` but we'd have to make sure to always transform these to strings for IE support.
This Disposable will also be automatically disposed when the process exits.
This GraphQL query executes against the schema in the 'schema' tab above.
This Higher Order Component decorator function is the way the components communicate with the central Store.
This JS code is a simple facade that provides a clear JS API, real Error objects, and simple non-multi functions.
This accepts a class that receives the tag string.
This accepts a keyed object with classes as values.
This accepts a text component class that takes the text string to be rendered as props.
This actualizes the forced markers we already have.
This adds a drop shadow to the item and affects z-order for overlapping views.
This allowed us a way to explicitly key a set a fragment of components.
This allows a way to hold onto a reference that won't be added back into the pool.
This allows for customized welcome messages, but should be used judiciously.
This allows for types defined in one service to include types from another service in another file.
This allows having multiple StatusBar components and the one that is added last or is deeper in the view hierachy will have priority.
This allows public methods to accept the user facing instance as an argument and map them back to internal methods.
This allows simple future calls of the service by name and arguments or http-triggered endpoint calls with arguments serialized over http.
This allows that identifier to appear as the first word in a comment even if it begins with a lower-case letter.
This allows the client to fall back to default autocomplete, ctags, etc.
This allows the creation of custom validation functions.
This allows the ordering to be decoupled from injection of the actual plugins so that ordering is always deterministic regardless of packaging, on-the-fly injection, etc.
This allows the user to expose every crumb.
This allows these props on both the top level and the nested style level.
This allows to use the fake timing by default and is a direct port from Atom's `spec-helper.coffee`
This allows us to keep track of children between updates.
This allows us to provide an API that is similar to CSS, where transforms may be applied in an arbitrary order, and yet have a universal, singular interface to native code.
This allows us to restore them all to their original state when we revert.
This allows working on multiple files at once, and simplifies per-file state handling.
This allows you to undo the more aggressive polyfills, should you need to.
This along with iOS quirks, justifies restricting top-level listeners to the document object only, at least for these movement types of events and possibly all events.
This also allows us to have uniquely named links even with headings of the same name.
This also cheapens cache invalidation, since you can just reset path.__childCache to null.
This also creates the "reactRoot" ID that will be assigned to the element rendered within.
This also explains the alternative use.
This also needs to be changed if minimumPrefixLength goes above 1, since after you type a single alphanumeric character, autocomplete-plus no longer includes the dot in the prefix.
This also removes closing tag element.
This ammounts to a call either to _client.marshal or _client.unmarshal.
This approach works across all browsers, whereas `change` does not fire until `blur` in IE8.
This array of profiles may change in the lifetime of `openConnectionDialog` flow.
This assumes all keys have a value, so will not preserve sparsely populated inputs.
This assumes noBreaks have already been removed and will not be encountered.
This assumes that the scene's navigation state is immutable.
This avoids doing potentially large sorts while the diagnostics pane is hidden.
This behavior can be useful for fine-grained formatting decisions like inserting blank lines.
This behavior ensures that when a connection is reestablished, a buffer exists with that path.
This bogus view is needed to load/unload CodeMirror-related CSS on demand.
This breaks all scopes as necessary.
This breaks up the work into smaller chunks to reduce the chance of dropping frames while rendering rows.
This brings us in line with the same behavior we have on initial render.
This call is not really meant to be called directly, as callers have to manipulate the internal buffer afterwards.
This call might fail if we try to watch a non-existing directory, or if permission denied.
This call will error, because the socket will be closed on the next statement synchronously.
This call would trigger complete reconstruction of the tree, to reflect the possibly changed derived properties.
This callback gets called whenever there is a text editor event, such as a file save, that should trigger a run of diagnostics.
This can be  useful when getting the "command line too long" linker errors.
This can be any valid color string, or you can use one of the predefined PinColors constants.
This can be called from a native bug reporting flow, or from JS code.
This can be replaced with a WeakMap once they are implemented in commonly used development environments.
This can be safely used if you're in a single- threaded environment, otherwise you need to create new hashes to use.
This can be used for horizontal pagination.
This can be used for paginating through children that have lengths smaller than the scroll view.
This can be used to attach properties to mode objects from outside the actual mode definition.
This can be used to log issues in development environments in critical paths.
This can be used to set an existing socket, bypassing normal UI flow to improve iteration speed for development.
This can happen if the user manages to scroll and escape disposal.
This can happen if the user triggered the save while closing the file.
This can happen if users switch between 'none' and 'uncaught' states.
This can happen in a variety of normal situations, such as Network module not being available, or when running locally
This can happen on startup when reloading remote files.
This can happen when the concrete nodes are different but structurally identical, or when the route/variables are different but do not have an effect on the structure of the query.
This can happen when using defaults in an object pattern.
This can happen when we step.
This can happen without the full execution of the command to fail, but we want to learn about it.
This can improve scrolling performance on long lists.
This can include modes separated by a colon and wildcards.
This can lead to `trackTiming` counting 49ms for 50ms of a 1ms-resolution clock elapsing.
This can lead to leaky behavior if the user retains a reference to the request object.
This can occur on a reconnect, where the old socket has been closed but its close event is sent asynchronously.
This can only be determined after we consumed up to the left parentheses.
This can only be useful for other `ui/tree` usages, like the `DiffViewTree`.
This can only happen none of the project folders are Mercurial repositories.
This can only happen via state.decoder -- no other venue exists for pushing a zero-length chunk into state.buffer and triggering this behavior.
This can only match a corresponding "" at the end of the file.
This can probably just move into the constructor now.
This can re-enter discardMenu due to blur.
This can return a richer element for a node and will be used instead of the label if present.
This can take some time
This can't be done in the main node process, because otherwise node would be running as that user from this point on.
This cannot handle circular references.
This causes Atom to transpile those files twice in production releases.
This check could be removed once we do not send this context to frontend.
This checks if the buffer is instance of NuclideTextBuffer.
This child node falls completely after the comment.
This child node falls completely before the comment.
This class creates and stores the output of a process and can push updates to listeners.
This class currently relies on the Nuclide WatchmanClient, which requires fb-watchman.
This class implements common easing functions.
This class is a wrapper around the native RCTNetworking module.
This class is meant to be stubbed out.
This class keeps the PathSets passed to it up to date by using file system watchers to observe when relevant file additions and deletions occur.
This class manages creating and canceling delayed events.
This class provides a central callback channel to communicate with debugger client.
This class represents a React Native debugging session in Nuclide.
This class represents a collection of context menu items that have been registered with Atom's ContextMenuManager under a single CSS selector.
This closes square brackets for Objective-C message calls.
This code implements the NuclideFs service.
This code works only for 0-width border.
This code would be cleaner if the drawer layout provided an `isOpen` prop and allowed us to pass a `onDrawerClose` handler.
This codepath will be exercised when Flow finds type errors as the exit code will be non-zero.
This command is exposed in the nuclide-working-sets menu config.
This command requires interactive to be enabled
This component contains the entire view in which the user inputs their connection information when connecting to a remote project.
This component is used inside a ScrollView or ListView to add pull to refresh functionality.
This component is used to indicate that the app is loading or there is some activity in the app.
This component is used to wrap strings in elements so that they can undergo the same reconciliation that is applied to elements.
This component should be used when you know that a subtree of components will never need to be updated.
This considers a property set to undefined to be equivalent to a property that was not set at all.
This constructor and its argument is currently used by mocks.
This constructor is overridden by mocks.
This context menu wrapper exists to address some of the limitations in the ContextMenuManager: https://atom.io/docs/api/latest/ContextMenuManager.
This contrasts with JSMs which are singletons, Domains allows us to optionally load a CommonJS module twice with separate data each time.
This convenience function would create such OrderedMap instance from a plain JS Array of FileTreeNode instances
This corresponds to what atom calls a 'root path' in a project.
This data is hard coded for the sake of the demo, but you could imagine fetching this data from a backend service rather than from hardcoded JSON objects in a more complex demo.
This data structure is designed to hold the top K scores from a collection of N scores where scores become available one at a time.
This defines a basic set of data for our Star Wars Schema.
This defines how far a touch event can start away from the view.
This defines how far your touch can start away from the button.
This designed for logging on both Nuclide client and Nuclide server.
This determines how frequently events such as scroll and layout can trigger a re-render.
This determines the config defaults and it's what is shown by the Settings view.
This differs from the traditional DOM API because value is usually set as PCDATA children.
This directly kills the servers without removing the RemoteConnections so that restarting Nuclide preserves the existing workspace state.
This does NOT verify the signature.
This does influence the API, so keep that in mind when it seems a little trickier to do something compared to a fully synchronous system.
This doesn't accept stack item `id`s, which implies that all existing items are destroyed, and then potentially recreated according to `routeStack`.
This doesn't happen in normal use but it's useful to be able to truncate the stream for testing.
This doesn't work if there are strings/comments that contain `:`.
This effectively defers execution of previously queued tasks until the promise resolves, at which point we allow the new queue to be popped, which happens once it is fully processed.
This element is in an array.
This element was passed in a valid location.
This enables Relay to synthesize a complete query to fetch the data necessary to render your app.
This enables consumers to force hide/show without first asking for the visibility state.
This enforcement intentionally transcends traverseFragmentReferences boundaries.
This ensures that the hackery done here doesn't break future Nuclide compatibility with Atom, or tooling like flow and eslint.
This ensures that this logic can operate on stateless trees without any backing instance.
This ensures that users of atom-script can pipe output to head, etc., without error.
This ensures that we will begin flushing on the next task the task throws an error.
This ensures the context menu option only appears in supported projects.
This ensures we get package data in a consistent, stable format.
This error was fatal
This event fires after `onKeyPress` and `onCompositionEnd`, but before `onInput`.
This event fires at a time when it's possible to change the element's value without seeing a flicker.
This event is fired immediately once the layout has been calculated, but the new layout may not yet be reflected on the screen at the time the event is received, especially if a layout animation is in progress.
This event plugin is based on the native `textInput` event available in Chrome, Safari, Opera, and IE.
This event will not fire on an `touchEnd/mouseUp` event, only move events while the user is depressing the mouse/touch.
This example creates a `View` that wraps two colored boxes and custom component in a row with padding.
This excludes situation where we have two plugins with same name.
This exists as its own class to make it possible to reuse instances when multiple callers observe on text editors with the same grammar scopes.
This exposes the native ToastAndroid module as a JS module.
This extra module enables adding spies during testing.
This factory method returns the remote module with the client object 'closed over,' and used to make the RPC calls.
This falls back to returning the start of the editor.
This feature is deprecated and unavailable in open source.
This feature is exclusively for expanding to a node deep in a tree.
This fetches the 'default' connection configuration supplied to the user regardless of any connection profiles they might have saved.
This field is only used to for a sticky value in the status bar, and is not to be sent.
This file automatically generated from win32/build/confutils.js
This file contains a set of custom matchers for jasmine testing, which can be used to get more detailed / useful diffs on various reults.
This file contains the tokenizer/parser.
This file defines the main parser interface.
This file may not exist.
This file must be written in ES5.
This file provided by Facebook is for non-commercial testing and evaluation purposes only.
This file provides methods to do this.
This fills out the data for genericTransform.
This finds listeners by a given phase.
This for-in loop skips the holes of the sparse array.
This formats requires based on the left hand side of the require, unless it is a simple require expression in which case there is no left hand side.
This fragment should be added when some/all implementors of the node's type also implement `Node` but a `Node` fragment is not already present.
This fucks up the positions but without it, babel won't parse the text as an expression
This function allows that to be increased.
This function assumes that the nuclide server has been started in insecure mode, e.g. with using the integration-test-helpers.startNuclideServer function.
This function assumes the string has already been percent encoded
This function bypasses the SSH authentication that the server normally uses.
This function can be used to generate a unique id for fragments constructed at runtime and is guaranteed not to conflict with statically created ids.
This function computes a percentage in terms of the total loading time of a specific event.
This function drops the highest order bit in a signed number, maintaining the sign bit.
This function exhibits some of the quirky behavior of Node APIs that accept a variable number of arguments in the middle of the parameter list rather than at the end.
This function facilitates waiting for that to happen.
This function generates the definitions if the they don't exist, and caches the proxy module if it has already been generated before.
This function is called on long press.
This function is called on press.
This function is like `arrayIncludes` except that it accepts a comparator.
This function is like `copyObject` except that it accepts a function to customize copied values.
This function is probably the single most critical path for performance optimization.
This function is to try to parse a MethodDefinition as defined in 14.3.
This function is used for the DH key-exchange protocol.
This function is used recursively from IndexedSourceMapConsumer.prototype.sourceContentFor.
This function is used to prevent us from adding any id that already exist in the range.
This function is used to raise exceptions on parse errors.
This function is used to rule out sources where no transform applies.
This function is useful for accumulating several hrtime intervals into a counter.
This function returns HgRepositoryDescription filled with a repoPath and originURL iff it finds that the given directory is within an Hg repository.
This function returns a human usable string.
This function should not be called directly, but rather added as a Jasmine custom matcher.
This function shouldn't be used, really, but it's pretty convenient sometimes, when you just want to work with a regex.
This function shows up in stack traces - make the name distinct.
This function takes in a file path, and computes all directories that would be considered a parent of it, i.e., the file path is contained by all of these directories.
This function terminates when one of the following is true:
This function tries to parse a single expression at a given offset in a string.
This function will call the getter on every array index of the object.
This function will not work for those who use that option.
This function will perform any checks over the JS source that doesn't require injecting in source code.
This functions purpose is to give a reasonable API.
This generates a 50 character boundary similar to those used by Firefox.
This generates a configure script for win32 build
This gesture is to an overswiped region or does not have enough velocity to complete If we are currently mid-transition, then this gesture was a pending gesture.
This gets all concatenated module descriptors in the release mode.
This gets us out of timeout issues and allows us to default to Connection:keep-alive.
This gives another reason to use the configuration object sparingly - it is expensive to rebuild the entire tree.
This guarantees only one diff view will be opened per URI.
This hack adds a delay to avoid this scenario.
This hack is necessary because drawer layout provides an imperative API with open and close methods.
This handles more types than `getPropType`.
This handles strings, numbers, booleans, basic objects, and Arrays.
This happens at the end of a transition started by transitionTo, and when the spring catches up to a pending gesture
This happens for UnimplementedView.
This happens for each frame of either a gesture or a transition.
This happens for errors like bad function args.
This happens if the stream completes since we opened a new buffer when the previous record ended.
This happens when Incremental is disabled and _onOffscreenRenderDone is called faster than layout can happen.
This hard cutoff should work for sane code.
This has a complexity linear to the value of the code.
This has a few false positives w/r/t empty components.
This has a function 'show' which takes the following parameters:  1.
This has the advantage that Git will take care of using stored credentials and any additional negotiation that needs to take place.
This has the same purpose as `omittedCloseTags` except that `menuitem` should still have its closing tag.
This has to be object, not boolean, otherwise its value doesn't update properly.
This has to happen immediately otherwise we could crash, e.g. if the data array has gotten shorter.
This helper class stores information about text content of a target node, allowing comparison of content before and after a given event.
This helps determine if we should show the datatip when toggling it via command.
This helps determine if we should show the type hint when toggling it via command.
This helps to capture the propType error at run-time, where as `NavigationTypeDefinition` capture the flow type check errors at build time.
This hook exists purely for testing purposes.
This hook is a the first initialization code that happens before any jasmine test case is executed.
This implementation assumes that characters are encoded in ISO 10646.
This implementation relies on the "phabdiff" template being available as defined in: https://bitbucket.org/facebook/hg-experimental/src/fbf23b3f96bade5986121a7c57d7400585d75f54/phabdiff.py.
This implements "is array index" which the ECMAString spec defines as:
This implements `PooledClass`, so you should never need to instantiate this.
This index will be parsed back out below.
This indicates that this server command should be filled in when this profile is used.
This influences support for strict mode, the set of reserved words, support for getters and setters and other features.
This inheritance gives us the pause/resume/pipe behavior that is desired.
This invalidates the errors in the current file.
This is PREFIX.
This is RegExp
This is a basic end-to-end test, designed to demonstrate the various capabilities of a Relay-compliant GraphQL server.
This is a bit tricky.
This is a brutally ugly hack to make sure that our error handler is attached before any userland ones.
This is a catch all that can render any kind of tag.
This is a clear syntax error, so we should get an error on save.
This is a command-line utility to transpile a .js file in the same way that Atom would.
This is a controlled component that requires an `onValueChange` callback that updates the `value` prop in order for the component to reflect user actions.
This is a controlled component, so you must hook in to the `onDateChange` callback and update the `date` prop in order for the component to update, otherwise the user's change will be reverted immediately to reflect `props.date` as the source of truth.
This is a counter that will be incremented after every successful save request.
This is a crude lookahead trick to try and notice that we're parsing the argument patterns for a fat-arrow function before we actually hit the arrow token.
This is a diviation from the spec.
This is a hack to force an ObjectPattern node to be printed on one line
This is a helper function for getting values from parameter/options objects.
This is a heuristic to improve performance.
This is a hook provided to support rendering React components while ensuring that the apparent scroll position of its `container` does not change.
This is a little weird because state changes are triggering commands that trigger state changes.
This is a map from identifier to literal that can be imported.
This is a map from identifier to path that can be imported.
This is a map of common aliases.
This is a non-standard method that Atom adds to Jasmine via spec-helper.coffee.
This is a precision specifier.
This is a regression test.
This is a shallow copy.
This is a special performance property exposed by RCTView and is useful for scrolling content when there are many subviews, most of which are offscreen.
This is a special performance property exposed by RCTView and useful for scrolling content when there are many subviews, most of which are offscreen.
This is a special property that Atom's view registry knows to look for.
This is a stateless functional component.
This is a strict positional notation, most significant digit first.
This is a tag to indicate that the use of these method names is ok, since it's used with createClass.
This is a tarball we probably downloaded from the internet.
This is a temporary workaround that allow calculating important characters on the fly rather than relying on the index.
This is a transitional API and not recommended for general use.
This is a trick taken from Esprima.
This is a unified interface for event plugins to be installed and configured.
This is a useful default which helps finding memory leaks.
This is a very rudimentary check Complete checks are made in the 'describe' below
This is a very simple program that can be used to test nuclide-debugger-node.
This is a very strange case in the AST where we are in a shorthand property but key and value do not have the same type.
This is a very useful default that happens to satisfy many common user experiences.
This is a way to detect if Component is a stateless arrow function component, which is not newable.
This is a web interface for the HTML to JSX converter contained in `html-jsx-lib.js`.
This is a whole-line replace.
This is a workaround that should be removed when Atom 2.0 comes out.
This is actually variadic, but we only support one or two other observables.
This is added to `pressRetentionOffset` when moving off of the button.
This is also accessible via `React.DOM`.
This is also our approach for IE handling, for the reason above.
This is an API that works both on iOS and Android and can show static alerts.
This is an advanced optimization that is not needed in the general case.
This is an all or nothing operation.
This is an array of bottom offsets for the lines that make up a drawn line.
This is an implementation of binary search which will always try and return the index of the closest element if there is no exact hit.
This is an implementation of binary search which will always try and return the next lowest value checked if there is no exact hit.
This is an indication of a bug in the state machine.
This is an object that lives in the main process that delegates calls to the FileSearch in the forked process.
This is an undocumented way to reach the Electron BrowserWindow.
This is async.
This is autogenerated with esprima tools, see: https://github.com/ariya/esprima/blob/master/esprima.js
This is based on the GraphQL spec for what constitutes a valid field name.
This is based on the protocol description at: https://github.com/the-lambda-church/merlin/blob/master/doc/dev/PROTOCOL.md https://github.com/the-lambda-church/merlin/tree/master/src/frontend
This is because mappings between original and generated line/col pairs are single points, and there is an implicit region between each of them, so a miss just means that you aren't on the very start of a region.
This is better than having plugins be ordered in the same order that they are injected because that ordering would be influenced by the packaging order.
This is bound to the instance
This is breaking encapsulation of the React package.
This is cached, and also looks for line-wide styles.
This is called after we execute any command we receive from native but before we hand control back to native.
This is called from the native side.
This is called when the user changes the date or time in the UI.
This is called with the following parameters: - `itemValue`: the `value` prop of the item that was selected - `itemPosition`: the index of the selected item in this picker
This is coming in Atom 1.4.0 - https://github.com/atom/atom/issues/9974
This is coordinated outside this component so the parent can syncronize this re-render with managing the placeholder sizing.
This is currently used to help focus on child textviews, but can also be used to quickly scroll to any element we want to focus.
This is defined as the width of a thin line on the platform.
This is done by swiping from the left to the right or from the top to the bottom.
This is done to follow the internal behavior of `fetchWithRetries`.
This is done when closing unnamed editors and when closing remote directories.
This is done without actually changing the view hierarchy, and in general is easy to add to an app without weird side-effects.
This is enabled by default.
This is equivalent to the AST produced by `babel-relay-plugin` and is intended for use in serializing RelayQuery nodes.
This is especially important since we create Watchman watches on the temp directories.
This is essential when multiple graceful-fs instances are in play at the same time.
This is essentially a heuristic for "mouse cursor is to the left or right of text content".
This is essentially the state of our panel.
This is exactly how markdown.pl works.
This is filled in for unions of object types during validation.
This is fine for the most cases, but not for the subscription handling, as the subscription is notifying us that something has changed and if a fetch is already in progress then it is racing with the change.
This is fired during the first correctMkdir call, after the stat has finished but before the chownr has finished Buggy old code will fail and return a cached value before initial call is done
This is for `asap.js` only.
This is for demo purposes only, and rate limited.
This is hard-coded to 'localDirectory' in `getFilesFromCommand`, which is what we want.
This is implemented by various UI views, but is not declared anywhere as an official interface.
This is intended as a generic filter module and therefore contains no special logic for handling requisite or generated fields.
This is intended to be used only in DEV and could be replaced by a static type checker for languages that support it.
This is intentionally an invariant that gets caught.
This is intentionally serial.
This is invoked after the DOM representation of a component has been created or updated.
This is irrelevant for commands that do etag / last-modified caching, but ls and view also have a timed cache, so this keeps the user from thinking that it didn't work when it did.
This is irritatingly implicit, but significantly more concise than alternatives.
This is just a thin wrapper around an RxJS Subject.
This is just for unit tests.
This is just the literal transformer inlined ...
This is kind of sad but the babel-core parser doesn't seem to do any error recovery.
This is known as bubbling, and occurs only if event propagation isn't prevented.
This is like a hard break except duplicates will be preserved.
This is like scope break but is replaced with a space if not broken.
This is likely to the be the same as the directory the PathSet was created from.
This is meant to be subclassed, of which instances are supplied to `RelayRootContainer`.
This is meant to collect and log performance data in production, which means it needs to have minimal overhead.
This is more than default timeout of 5 seconds.
This is mostly exposed for testing purposes since, unlike `trackActions`, it's side-effect free.
This is much lower-level than asyncExecute.
This is necessary because safari throws when a user disables cookies/localstorage and you attempt to access it.
This is necessary because the "source" or "." program in bash on OS X closes its file argument before reading from it, meaning that you get exactly 1 write, which will work most of the time, and will always raise an EPIPE.
This is necessary for `node`s that do not have an `id`, which would cause the generated ID here to not match the ID generated in `_writeLink`.
This is necessary in case native updates the text and JS decides that the update should be ignored and we should stick with the value that we have in JS.
This is necessary to avoid http-parser leaks.
This is needed because words with escape sequences must not be interpreted as keywords.
This is needed for elevation shadow
This is needed in order to move 'visually' through bi-directional text -- i.e., pressing left should make the cursor go left, even when in RTL text.
This is needed to prevent middle-click pasting on linux when tabs are clicked.
This is needed, because require callis in polyfills are not processed as other files.
This is never allowed, and only causes problems
This is nonsensical, but should not be transformed.
This is not a drop-in replacement for `ListView` - many features are not supported, including section headers, dataSources, horizontal layout, etc.
This is not an official DOM interface.
This is not called by default due to perf overhead but it's useful if you want to find traces which spend too much time in JSON.
This is not complete: see https://www.npmjs.com/package/request for details.
This is not fully correct, since some scripts/fonts/browsers also treat other configurations of code points as a group.
This is not ideal, but at least the compilation will succeed...
This is not optimal but fast enough that we don't really need to care right now.
This is not part of the official Atom 1.0 API, but it really should be.
This is not part of the official Atom 1.0 API.
This is not technically correct, as didSearchPaths is also supposed to count files for which no matches were found.
This is not the complete set of editor methods.
This is not to be confused with a return value of `null`, which may result from the lack of a node.
This is now being replaced with an opaque data structure.
This is nuanced and is necessary.
This is obviously a huge hack.
This is okay though because the state will be the same, and the render will be cheap.
This is one of the primary reason a "web" app doesn't feel "native".
This is only for side-effects.
This is only needed for iOS, which puts the constants in the ViewManager namespace instead of UIManager, unlike Android.
This is only to have a better contract semantic, i.e. another safety net to catch a logic error.
This is only used by garbage collection.
This is only used for the onToken callback and the external tokenizer.
This is only used to make this work with a dynamic instanceof check.
This is only visible while scrolling, pages are still edge-to-edge.
This is overridden by BlankStylePropertiesSection.
This is part of jsdifflib v1.0.
This is particularly useful to know when a touch has just started or ended.
This is preserved between calls to `flush` so that it can be resumed if a task throws an exception.
This is primarily useful idiomatically for overridable function endpoints which always need to be callable, since JS lacks a null-call idiom ala Cocoa.
This is probably bad practice.
This is probably confusing for Flow because it cannot tell which properties are defined during initialization since this is not the constructor.
This is pulled out into its own function rather than using localeCompare directly in case we every choose another sorting algorithm.
This is really to solve DER cases, but whatever for now
This is recursively awful.
This is required as Atom's builtin coffeescript package need to show coffeescript stacktrace by customize Error.prepareStackTrace.
This is sane, and allowed by the spec.
This is separated into its own decorator so that only those who want to use the holding functionality have to and others can just use an emitter.
This is simpler than registering handlers using emitter events directly, as there's less messy bookkeeping regarding lifetimes of the unregister Disposable objects.
This is something done with the help of the children-derived fields.
This is something of an integration test: we dig into the internals a little bit in our Session class so this test ensures we won't be surprised if it changes.
This is special cased so that the bundled examples work out of the box.
This is still better than before.
This is stronger than any kind of break, a break will not happen if a noBreak is within the break's contiguous chain of markers.
This is supported only by Chrome for now.
This is temporarily available for custom components that are not string representations.
This is the Disposable that represents adding all of this object's menu items to Atom's own ContextMenuManager.
This is the abstract API for an update queue.
This is the behavior as of Mar 3, 2015.
This is the collection of transforms that affect requires.
This is the core prime.
This is the default case for all projects created using 'react-native init'.
This is the default.
This is the error handler that is called when we encounter an exception when loading a module.
This is the first call to updateWidth, so the resizers need to be created.
This is the format commonly used in other libraries and for test vectors, and is equivalent to the hex dump of the key in little-endian binary format.
This is the high-level entry point for sending queries to the GraphQL endpoint.
This is the job of DebuggerProxyClient.
This is the length with which reprint will try to keep each line within.
This is the main entry point into the generic function transforming.
This is the main insertion point for starting nuclide-server.
This is the normal mode, where it connects to the react native packager
This is the object that user code is usually dealing with.
This is the only place were we actually don't know the mapping ahead of time.
This is the only way for the debounced function to be called immediately for each test.
This is the only work that occurs in the main thread.
This is the port that the V8 debugger usually listens on.
This is the ratio that is used to calculate the absolute font size, so any elements that heavily depend on that should use this to do calculations.
This is the set of built in modules that do not need to be required.
This is the set of built in types that do not need to be imported.
This is the set of modules that are "built-in" and never need to be required.
This is the set of types that are "built-in" and never need to be imported.
This is the total length of the segment including the deleted edges.
This is the type that will be the root of our mutations, and the entry point into performing writes in our schema.
This is the type that will be the root of our query, and the entry point into our schema.
This is the versioning of Nuclide client-server protocol.
This is to force React to reuse nodes when scrolling is performed, rather then delete one and create another.
This is to squash any breaks from the body.
This is to work around flow's missing support of enums.
This is tricky because listeners can be invoked with varargs.
This is typically caused by a large rebase or a Watchman re-crawl.
This is undocumented, but Nuclide uses it in the AtomTextEditor wrapper.
This is used by `ReactDOMComponent` to mount, update, and unmount child components.
This is used by a bazillion of npm modules we don't control so we don't have other choice than defining it as an env variable here.
This is used by delete mutations to ensure both the current and past edges are no longer accessible.
This is used by delete mutations.
This is used by the `RelayQueryTransform` subclass to implement mapping and filtering behavior, but purely-visitor subclases do not need to follow this convention.
This is used for changes that span multiple lines, or change the way lines are divided into visual lines.
This is used for dispatching mouse events in the text editor.
This is used for routes, containers, and mutations.
This is used to auto-alias fields in generated queries, so that developers composing multiple components together don't have to worry about collisions between components requesting the same fields.
This is used to conserve memory by avoiding array allocations, and thus sacrifices API cleanness.
This is used to enforce the order in which `ReactUpdates` updates dirty components.
This is used to ensure the scrollable area is big enough.
This is used to help find tests that are not terminating on their own.
This is used to keep track of cells that are in the process of rendering.
This is used to: - Determine if the scroll view has been scrolled and therefore should refuse to give up its responder lock.
This is useful because there is no way to synchronously read the value because it might be driven natively.
This is useful for creating resizable rounded buttons, shadows, and other resizable assets.
This is useful for mocking a module that the module under test requires.
This is useful for renaming files.
This is useful in cases which are not supported by the Android implementation of rounded corners: - Certain resize modes, such as 'contain' - Animated GIFs  A typical way to use this prop is with images displayed on a solid background and setting the `overlayColor` to the same color as the background.
This is useful when performing operations that could remove dom nodes and place them back in, resulting in focus being lost.
This is useful when using a semi transparent status bar color.
This is using RK4.
This is very different than taking all of the recently moved touches and storing their centroid as `dx/dy`.
This is weird because we want to remove the module but not it's node_modules folder allowing for this allows us to not worry about the order of operations
This is woefully incomplete.
This isn't a perfect solution, since it can still leave diagnostics up in other files, but this is a corner case and doing this is still better than doing nothing.
This isn't ideal and should be fixed but will do for now...
This isn't ideal but realistically iterating through even a few hundred editors shouldn't be a real problem.
This isn't quite as efficient as Q's implementation of denodeify, but it's considerably less code.
This isn't strictly necessary, but keeps the cache as small as possible.
This isn't useful in our test code
This just makes things easier to debug for us.
This lets us to test the null cases all at once.
This list is limited to the properties that will perform best when animated off the JS thread.
This list is not complete.
This list of root files almost always has .git in it.
This little function builds a map of line number in the file to line number in the patch file
This loads the CLI for jasmine-node.
This local field is used by Babel/Acorn.
This logic can technically be fooled if the node has parentheses but there are comments intervening between the parentheses and the node.
This logic protects us from incorrect indices passed from above, and allows us to passively account for profiles being deleted.
This logic requires a kind of processing of time "clusters" of touch events so that two touch moves that essentially occur in parallel but move every other frame respectively, are considered part of the same movement.
This looks DOM specific but these are actually isomorphic helpers since they are just generating DOM strings.
This loses some information about the filesystem, but creates tarballs that are supported by more versions of tar, especially old non-spec-compliant copies of gnutar.
This makes it possible for get-def to operate on the unsaved content in the user's editor rather than what is saved on disk.
This makes it's proxies unsuable, and calls the `dispose` method on the remote object.
This makes sure that own properties are retained, so that decorations and such are not lost along the way.
This makes sure that we're using the plugins installed in the react-native package.
This makes the node inspector not load all the source files on startup.
This makes the node inspector not load all the source files on startup:
This makes the progress smoother.
This map is a disambiguator.
This marker adds some UI to the gutter.
This marker underlines text.
This matches the Backbone example, which displays all todos on an invalid route.
This matches the property of native CompositionEventInterface.
This matches the semantics of the native select event.
This matters when telling the scroll view to scroll to where the keyboard is headed - the scroll responder better have been notified of the keyboard destination before being instructed to scroll to where the keyboard will be.
This may add duplicates, but they will eventually be flattened.
This may be called after this package has been deactivated and the SearchResultManager has been disposed.
This may be done in the worker thread.
This may change the aspect ratio of the image, distorting it.
This may get expensive in the future as the module map becomes smarter.
This may have side effects, but any external subscriptions or data created by this method must be cleaned up in `componentWillUnmount`.
This may make flow types annoying though.
This may not always be desirable.
This may not always be true forever.
This may not be an interface due to "instanceof WebInspector.RemoteObject" checks in the code.
This may only occur in the main thread and is the responsibility of ReactEventListener, which is injected and can therefore support pluggable event sources.
This means character offsets will differ between the two APIs.
This means its state is no longer 'ignored', as it was listed in the cache.
This means its state is no longer 'modified', as it was listed in the cache.
This means that any field below `like_sentence` may change as a result of feedback_like.
This means that any state that affects the height, such as tap to expand, should be stored outside the row component to maintain continuity.
This means that if a user opens an editor for a file in a Buck project, types in a build target, focuses an editor for a file that is not part of a Buck project, and hits "Build," the toolbar will build the target in the project that corresponds to the editor that previously had focus.
This means that in principle you could use this method to preload images, however it is not optimized for that purpose, and may in future be implemented in a way that does not fully load/download the image data.
This means that it is extremely difficult to have them upgrade the version and because there's only one global version installed, it is very prone to breaking changes.
This means that the node does not have to be contained by a document in order to be considered valid.
This means that the server exists, but it is not responding, typically because it is busy doing other work.
This means that we need to avoid the state when same node node is contained in the .children map of several other nodes.
This means the group will be presented to the user as one unit, rather than pieces popping in sequentially.
This means the production the parser parses is only used as an expression.
This means the production the parser parses is used as a part of a potential pattern.
This means the values in this map must be absolute paths.
This means we need to wrap the appropriate functions so they do not include the extra information added by Chromium's chatty logger.
This means, of course, that it'll only work if you already have a tar implementation, and some of them will not properly unpack the fixtures anyway.
This meant that empty fields, would be stripped instead of being used to produce an intersection with the tracked query.
This method `__method` is protected.
This method attempts to mirror the text the given keystroke would have if displayed in a system menu.
This method auto-registers the "-V, --version" flag which will print the version number when passed.
This method can fail if the image cannot be found, or fails to download.
This method cannot throw.
This method creates the baseline options instance
This method has side effects and is not idempotent.
This method has side effects because events get registered.
This method is designed to be overridden by subclasses that need to handle missing properties, etc.
This method is invoked before `getInitialState` and therefore cannot rely on `this.state` or use `this.setState`.
This method is like `_.clone` except that it recursively clones `value`.
This method is like `_.isArrayLike` except that it also checks if `value` is an object.
This method is meant to be triggered by the context-menu click.
This method is part of the EmitterMixin used by Atom's local Directory, but not documented as part of the API - https://atom.io/docs/api/latest/Directory, However, it appears to be called in project.coffee by Atom.
This method is required by the service framework.
This method may return `null` if the call to `hg diff` fails.
This method must be invoked after this._items has been modified.
This method needs to be present for TabView.
This method returns the first argument provided to it.
This method should be used as the callback to onFocus in a TextInputs' parent view.
This method takes the same arguments that `Array.prototype.forEach` takes.
This might be better in normalize-package-data if it had access to the file path.
This might need to be done one level higher within main.js.
This mimics the output that `arc lint` can provide.
This mixin provides safe versions of InteractionManager start/end methods that ensures `clearInteractionHandle` is always called once per start, even if the component is unmounted.
This mock relieves their tests from depending on the real ErrorUtils module.
This module calls into get-uid-gid.js, which sets the uid and gid to the supplied argument, in order to find out their numeric value.
This module contains internal Relay modules that we expose for development tools.
This module doesn't export anything
This module helps support a hack to easily introduce new lines into the AST.
This module monkey-patches Atom's babel compiler so that we can apply custom transforms on Nuclide code only.
This module only has the hooks: see ReactDefaultPerf for the analysis tool.
This must be a "directory"
This must be a static image resource inside the app.
This must be constructed after the query parameters have been parsed.
This must be done after setting the new `this._localPath`.
This must be done before setting the new `this._localPath`.
This needs to be the canonical type definition so that we can use these in the service framework.
This never changes.
This never happens, but you can't be sure without tests
This new dialog will be prefilled with the info from the default connection profile.
This node is not intended to have any features besides containing text content.
This node is used like a Builder.
This node isn't populated in the cache, so presumably none of its descendants are.
This node might be from another React instance, so we make sure not to examine the node cache here
This nomenclature is not completely final.
This number seems to be a good enough number to avoid any memory leak while not slowing down initial builds.
This object exists in other packages outside of any model, so objects vended early must still always manipulate the latest model's state.
This object is reused in hasOpeningParen and hasClosingParen to avoid having to allocate a temporary object.
This object is used as prototype for any node created by a builder.
This object must be spread into the container using the spread attribute operator.
This occurs on startup with the loader breakpoint.
This often requires the cursor offset to move more than one unit, in order to visually move one unit.
This one is used to ensure that `someSymbol instanceof Symbol` always return false
This one works, and the last quote is simply ignored
This one works, but since the filename is truncated once a space is found the extraction will not happen because the file has no .zip extension
This only exists because _pendingState is internal.
This only has an effect when the `usePreviewTabs` setting is enabled in the "tabs" package.
This only really matters for multiline Block comments, but it doesn't hurt for Line comments.
This opens the view and focuses the search box.
This optimistic response is used to pre-emptively update the client cache to simulate an instantaneous response.
This option is here so that it's accessible and defaults to false when `ReactDOMComponent` and `ReactTextComponent` checks it in `mountComponent`.`
This order of things is important.
This output is in the form of the REVISION_FILE_CHANGES_TEMPLATE in hg-revision-state-helpers.
This package creates, queries and decomposes NuclideUris.
This package only expects one gutter UI.
This parameter is needed when the two source maps aren't in the same directory, and the source map to be applied contains relative source paths.
This path is bogus.
This path may be a symlink.
This pattern is used for parsing the output of grep.
This pattetn is also followed with atom's TextEditor.
This performs the same function as the `cloneWithRows` function but here you also specify what your `sectionIdentities` are.
This pipes all of our console logging functions to native logging so that JavaScript errors in required modules show up in Xcode via NSLog.
This plugin creates an `onChange` event that normalizes change events across form elements.
This plugin creates an `onSelect` event that normalizes select events across form elements.
This plugin is also responsible for emitting `composition` events, thus allowing us to share composition fallback code for both `beforeInput` and `composition` event types.
This prevents logging too much when using transferPropsTo.
This prevents the possibility of an infinite loop if onpopulate were to call expand.
This prevents zombie buck/java processes from hanging the tests
This primes the cache for the new variables and notifies the caller of changes via the callback.
This probably breaks for non-sibling dirs, but that is not a problem as buildconf only checks for pecl as either a child or a sibling
This probably shouldn't be used publicly.
This problem does not impact ASAP because Safari 6.0 supports mutation observers, so that implementation is used instead.
This prop will overwrite that config.
This property is only present if an `error` has occurred.
This property will be overridden as true by individual Def instances when they are finalized.
This property will be used as the internal size variable to disallow writing and to issue warnings for writings in development.
This provides a merging strategy that is not available to deep properties which is confusing.
This provides improved Objective-C indentation by aligning colons.
This registry keeps track of wrapper classes around native tags.
This relative positioning is to work around the issue that `position: 'head'` doesn't work for overlay decorators are rendered on the bottom right of the given range.
This removes all but the first cursor.
This removes the unwanted click events.
This removes the unwanted keypress events.
This removes trailing whitespace and extra new lines.
This replaces the "persistent-flag" parts of S5.3 step 3
This represents 'moving the cursor to previous line':
This request should fail, but cleanup should occur.
This requires Atom 1.6 or later because it relies on this fix: https://github.com/atom/atom/pull/10486.
This resizer is associated with the column to its right.
This resolves all markers.
This returns a list of all the contiguous runs of markers within this set of lines.
This row doesn't have a breakpoint: We want to show Add Breakpoint and Add and Edit Breakpoint.
This row has a breakpoint, we want to show edit and remove breakpoint, and either disable or enable.
This rule enforces a naming standard for external modules.
This rule prevents requiring Node or Atom builtin modules outside of the top-level scope.
This runs AFTER install or link are completed.
This runs as long as the editor is focused.
This script bumps a new version for open source releases.
This script expects at least one argument, which is the path to the JavaScript file to run as an Atom test.
This script expects to be passed a directory from which `apm test --one` should be run.
This script publishes a new version of react-native to NPM.
This second call should not kick off a second `hg diff` call, because the first one should be still running.
This seems like it is likely a bug in Atom.
This seems to be tricky given how the DOM of a TextEditor works today.
This sets up genericTransform so that it can be queried above.
This setting is needed for backwards compatibility with Devtools CodeSchool extension.
This should always be ignored.
This should be called when the image renderer is changed to tell the component to re-render its assets.
This should be deprecated.
This should be kept the same as the one in ContentSearchUtils.cpp.
This should be merged into headers.
This should be ok because it will reuse that last suggestion until the mouse moves off of it.
This should be removed once Closure provides standard externs for Map et al.
This should be used for very hot functions.
This should be used to clean up children when this component is unmounted.
This should be used to execute Flow commands that do not rely on a Flow server.
This should contain pixel information such as width, height and resolution to know what kind of buffer needs to be allocated.
This should correspond to the spec/ directory with a fixtures/ subdirectory.
This should match resultList.length and markupList.length when we're done.
This should match the paddings in the CSS plus room for the scrollbar.
This should never happen because the server must be started with stderr redirected to a log file.
This should never happen with proper flags, but ignore them to be safe.
This should normally be set to the same value as the `contentInset`.
This should not be named `constructor` since this may not be the function that created the element, and it may not even be a constructor.
This should not happen, but we hide previous popup to be on the safe side.
This should not happen.
This should not happen: `hg log` does not error even if it does not recognize the template.
This should only add '/A/B/C/'.
This should only apply to actual code, not accessing undeclared types.
This should only be called from native code by sending the didUpdateDimensions event.
This should only be for declared types that are not actual modules.
This should only be used to update DOM properties in `DOMProperty`.
This should only remove '/A/B/C'.
This should probably use disjoint unions.
This should remove whitespace and allow us to have a consistent formatting of all requires.
This shouldn't affect performance though, since LinterAdapter requires this anyway.
This shouldn't be used for the `file-tree` as it's replaced by the `FileTreeContextMenu` API.
This shouldn't happen very often, though, since usually all providers will get registered at startup.
This shouldn't happen, but let's not break things if the API starts returning different things.
This shows at most 3 iterations
This simulates the case where: 1.
This situation also defers the determination of all the expressions nested in the pair.
This skips testing argument types because type metadata for scalar arguments may be omitted by the Babel plugin.
This source code is licensed under the BSD-style license found in the LICENSE file in the root directory of this source tree.
This source code is licensed under the license found in the LICENSE file in the root directory of this source tree.
This source map could also be indexed, but doesn't have to be.
This specific case is a silent failure in cp, install, tar, and most other unix tools that manage permissions.
This splits on whitespace.
This squashes all duplicates that should not be kept.
This squashes all no break markers and any nearby breaks.
This step must come before calling `unloadPackage`.
This stream is shared so that only one client is created when there is more than one subscriber.
This stream won't complete unless the connection closes.
This string is not user-facing.
This style is good against a black content background.
This style is good against a white content background.
This suffices in most situations outside of unit tests, since interface conformance is checked whenever new instances are created using builder functions.
This supertype is shared/abused by both def/babel.js and def/esprima.js.
This tag allow us to uniquely identify this as a React Element
This takes a config object with the following properties:  isCustomAttribute: function that given an attribute name will return true if it can be inserted into the DOM verbatim.
This takes an object and a property name instead of a value to allow us to define the arguments for use by chain before the property exists yet.
This takes in a require node and reprints it.
This target will never produce compilation flags, so make sure to ignore it.
This task is enqueued with a scheduler that defers the work
This task is enqueued with no scheduler
This test can't actually perform a search because path-search uses watchman and we don't have a good way to mock dependencies.
This test ensures that the broad matching is not done when the matched module is not a direct child of the module doing the requiring.
This test for a "thenable" appears to be consistent with the ES6 spec.
This test hinges on these two calls happening within 50 ms of each other.
This test merely checks if the public API exists.
This translates a scope marker into the appropriate marker based on if the scope was broken or not.
This traverses a node to find the first identifier in nested expressions.
This traverses an entire ast and determines which trailing comments are duplicates of other leading comments.
This type represents a Transformer function, which takes in a value, and either serializes or deserializes it.
This type should not be saved -- it contains the user's password.
This unlinks it from tracking this.state.panX
This updates the relevant part of the line's DOM structure.
This url style is the one Atom uses for the welcome and settings pages.
This utility unwraps contiguous leading and trailing markers from lines and then inserts pre and post before adding the markers back.
This value will be replaced with the value form the config.
This value, if given, is stored in every node, whether `locations` is on or off.
This variant does not make sure that the private key is valid.
This verifies that CircularBuffer implements Iterable correctly by demonstrating that it works with for/of.
This verifies that the server-side stuff still works.
This version is suitable for Node.js.
This version of the code is stale.
This view assumes it's always inside the main split view element, not a sidebar.
This view contains the ConnectionDetailsForm on the left side, and a NuclideListSelector on the right side that displays 0 or more connection 'profiles'.
This was factored out into this ASAP package.
This was fixed in io.js version 1.5.0 As of 2015-07-20, it is still unfixed in node: https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/25657
This was heavily benchmarked.
This was the last one, and no stats were needed
This watchman subscription is used to determine when and which files to fetch new statuses for.
This way the intermediate state isn't to go to 0 and trigger this expensive recursive detaching to then re-attach everything on the very next operation.
This way you can provide both, but tell Nuclide to ignore the `linter` provider so that duplicate results do not appear.
This way, another package could require nuclide-logging during activation without worrying about introducing a significant startup cost.
This way, back-pressure is actually determined by the reading side, since _read has to be called to start processing a new chunk.
This way, enabling the preference by default should still work fine for non-Differential users.
This way, it might trigger a nextTick recursion warning, but that's not so bad.
This way, when a node is scrolled out of the view, another is added with just the same index.
This will affect runs, whereas before we were careful to not affect runs of markers.
This will also help to normalize flags and to not to insert duplicates.
This will always throw an exception, but that's irrelevant to this test.
This will assert below
This will be a proper iterable 'Map' in engines that support it, or a fakey-fake PseudoMap in older versions.
This will be added to the SourceMapGenerator in the sourcesContent field.
This will be called when we need to handle an action on a sub-state.
This will be non-null if the user has entered distraction-free mode without toggling it off, but has manually opened one or more of the providers.
This will be set to an array of strings when copying, so that, when pasting, we know what kind of selections the copied text was made out of.
This will be un-marked in unmarkExtraneous, where we mark as not-extraneous everything that is required in some way from the root object.
This will behave strangely in the face of multiple cursors.
This will get a list of all flow types that are declared within root's AST
This will get a list of all identifiers that are declared within root's AST
This will get a list of all identifiers that are not from a declaration.
This will get a list of all identifiers that are used but undeclared.
This will get a list of all types that are not from a declaration.
This will get a list of all types that are used but undeclared.
This will get a list of identifiers for JSXElements in the AST
This will hit the cache.
This will log a single deprecation notice per function and forward the call on to the new API.
This will make our error show up in all files.
This will make sure we have a repository stack active whenever we have a mercurial repository added to the project.
This will make tests way more readable.
This will never resolve.
This will not invoke `shouldComponentUpdate`, but it will invoke `componentWillUpdate` and `componentDidUpdate`.
This will only be an issue if the system cannot find `pythonExecutable`.
This will remove empty strings but that's OK.
This will report any errors encountered before ExceptionsManager is configured.
This will return a GraphQLFieldConfig for our ship mutation.
This will schedule next retry or return false
This will scroll viewport and trigger its refresh.
This will show a warning if data has already been added to the instance.
This will sort by: - errors before warnings - local before remote - Remote machine name/port - full path
This will speed things up and remove lag.
This will stop any animations running on the value and update all the bound properties.
This will test the various cases for the root node in `restoreFragmentDataFromCache`.
This will throw if it's invalid anyway
This will throw if package.json does not exist
This will throw later in _renderValidatedComponent, but add an early warning now to help debugging
This will throw.
This will traverse through all node_modules folders, resolving the dependencies object to the object corresponding to the package that meets that dep, or just the version/range if unmet.
This will undo the transform `getRawPosition` makes to position.
This will usually be snapped to a 4 milisecond delay, but once we're flushing, there's no delay between events.
This will walk up the DOM if a node's siblings have been exhausted.
This will work in simple cases, anyway.
This won't be valid JSON, but since we are using a real JS parser we need to make sure that this sort of input doesn't do really weird stuff.
This won't remove the comment, it'll leave an empty comment block.
This works except for the last case of open into the current file.
This works well thanks to a neat trick defined on the sourcemap spec that makes use of of the `sections` field to combine sourcemaps by adding an offset.
This would be a good time to rethrow if any of the event handlers threw.
This would feel broken - better deactivate the working sets.
This would probably be pretty rare, though.
This wraps each word onto its own line.
Those are errors in deserializing a stream of changes.
Those are needed for Travis or not configured git environment
Though groups can be nested, the most useful to hide is almost certainly the topmost, so that's what we do.
Though once we start supporting ordinary .cpp files, then we likely need to be even more careful about choosing the architecture flavor.
Though this field can have subselections, there is no way we can infer this from `address: null`.
Throttle the progress reporter to 1 time each sec
Throughout this file we use Object.defineProperty to prevent redefinition of exported properties.
Throw all the other errors in a setTimeout, which will throw each error one at a time
Throw an exception
Throw an exception because of the token.
Throw away obsolete uncommitted text.
Throw those out.
Throws EEXIST error if the directory already exists.
Throws ENOENT if the path given is nested in a non-existing directory.
Throws if a named type referenced in an RPC interface is not defined.
Throws if no updates are currently being performed.
Throws if the input is not valid xml.
Throws if the message is malformatted.
Throws the supplied error in a new execution loop.
Thus we have to make sure the key only gets set for valid values.
Thus we need to do this adjustment.
Thus we need to figure out the ranges the segments occur in.
Thus we won't ever have a problem locating the value that we need to replace.
Thus, `textInput` is the best available event to identify the characters that have actually been inserted into the target node.
Thus, for all IE versions, we use the old IE API to create our selections.
Thus, it must be an identifier.
Thus, it uses the
Thus, the script id of the event is not know by Node Inspector, but the break even must not be ignored.
Thus, when possible, initialize the data lazily.
Tilde ranges.
Time to dust off the old binary search robes and wizard hat.
Timeline panel
Timeouts occur quite frequently when the network is unstable.
Timer for updating the native module values at the end of the frame.
Timestamp Name          ID   When Generated ------------------------------------------------------------ Originate Timestamp     T1   time request sent by client Receive Timestamp       T2   time request received by server Transmit Timestamp      T3   time reply sent by server Destination Timestamp   T4   time reply received by client
Timezone offset in minutes.
Timing's requestTime is a baseline in seconds, rest of the numbers there are ticks in millis.
Title color.
Title for the custom pane item being created.
To "stop" an application when a view should be destroyed, call `AppRegistry.unmountApplicationComponentAtRootTag` with the tag that was pass into `runApplication`.
To accomplish this, provide route objects to the navigator to identify each scene, and also a `renderScene` function that the navigator can use to render the scene for a given route.
To add a View as an Atom workspace pane, we return `DiffViewElement` which extends `HTMLElement`.
To allow " " to not assume the default value
To avoid a cyclic dependency, we create the final class in this module
To be discussed, but that's the implementation now
To cancel, call clearInterval on the returned interval handler.
To change the animation or gesture properties of the scene, provide a `configureScene` prop to get the config object for a given route.
To change this behavior this comparator return -1 in the case events startTime's are equal, so both events got placed into the result array.
To create a new one, you must pass an object with the following properties:  - file: The filename of the generated source.
To create a new type of `ReactClass`, pass a specification of your new class to `React.createClass`.
To create a new type of component that handles interaction using the `Touchable` mixin, do the following:  - Initialize the `Touchable` state.
To create an empty directory as leaf pass a name with '/' suffix.
To deal with the above - we do the following hack: If an open occurs and it is not within an activate/activePaneStopChanging pair, and the top matches the newly opened editor, then we have the last case of 'open within the current file'.
To do that, we need a hook into the service framework so we can learn when a given service instance is gone.
To enable debugging, we need to set our pattern or append it to any existing pre-configured pattern to avoid disabling logging for other packages
To ensure no conflicts with other potential React instances on the page
To execute code outside of any domain, the following dance is necessary.
To extract it current and last mapping is used.
To get around this without having to rewrite the whole thing in one go, we just use the store API directly.
To get that we add dummy leading spaces to those rows.
To get the entire config object, use `atom.config.get`.
To get the length of the sequence, call `Reader.length`.
To have the roots colored consistently we manually add all parents of all of the modified nodes up till the root
To help development we can get better devtools integration by simulating a real browser event.
To improve this, find a way to disable the `UIScrollView` after a touch has already started.
To learn how to use the Navigation API, take a look at the following example files:
To learn more about React, visit: https://facebook.github.io/react
To learn more about Relay containers, visit: https://facebook.github.io/relay/docs/guides-containers.html
To learn more about Relay root containers, visit: https://facebook.github.io/relay/docs/guides-root-container.html
To learn more about Relay routes, visit: https://facebook.github.io/relay/docs/guides-routes.html
To learn more about Relay.QL, visit: https://facebook.github.io/relay/docs/api-reference-relay-ql.html
To learn more about writing GraphQL schemas for Relay, visit: https://github.com/graphql/graphql-relay-js
To listen to changes on all key paths, use `atom.config.onDidChange`.
To maintain consistency, we validate that any new mapping being added falls in to one of these categories.
To make it easier for developers it uses some logic to identify with which version to publish the package.
To make sure we actually installed the local version of react-native, we will create a temp file inside the template and check that it exists after `react-native init
To make sure we only have one copy of sessionId, we store it as a property of `global` object with SESSION_ID_KEY as key.
To make sure we only have one instance of log4js logger initialized globally, we save the logger to `global` object.
To make this really solid, we should also probably trigger the linter for the active text editor.
To not mess with JSON output
To observe changes on the entire config, use `atom.config.observe`.
To override this default behavior, override `touchableLongPressCancelsPress` to return false.
To override, use `Relay.injectNetworkLayer`.
To port this to other platforms, provide an alternate code path for defining the md5_hash_hex function.
To prevent memory excaustion, the task queue will periodically truncate already-completed tasks.
To prevent memory exhaustion, the task queue will periodically truncate already-completed tasks.
To publish a new version, just release a valid semver tag.
To recognize this format: 1.
To request a high priority event, we induce a mutation observer by toggling the text of a text node between "1" and "-1".
To return the position we are searching for, we must first find the mapping for the given position and then return the opposite position it points to.
To simulate this we render the gradient twice as large and add double color stops.
To solve this problem, we patch the errors in loggingEvent.data and convert it to an Object with 'name', 'message', 'stack' and 'stackTrace' as fields.
To test against the in-memory cache, we create a folder manually and request the versions
To use the validator call the validate function with an instance object and an optional schema object.
To work around this, we special-case evaluation at the current stack depth.
To workaround this, we reach into the internals of the ViewRegistry and update the entry in the map manually.
Toggle Breakpoints
Toggle state similarly to user click.
Toggle strict mode.
Toggle with Inspector.
Toggles the Codewalk description between being shown and hidden.
Toggles the existence of a value in a set.
Token to look for to determine if an error occurred.
Token-specific context update code
Tokens ahead
Tolerate 1-pixel error due to double-to-integer rounding errors.
Too easy to EPERM.
Top level file pragmas that must not exist for the meta transform to be applied.
Top overlap
Top-level should never reach here.
Touchable mixin.
Touchable states.
Trace is a subtype of LinterTrace, so copying works but aliasing does not.
Track a set of values against a named event.
Track an analytics event and send it off immediately.
Track dismiss gesture
Track each event in a stream of TrackingEvents.
Track the current IME composition fallback object, if any.
Track the files that we have seen updates for.
Track the input node that has focus.
Track the last registered view ID in case no user selection is ever made.
Track timings of all function calls, method calls, and object creations.
Track whether a listener exists for this plugin.
Track whether we've ever handled a keypress on the space key.
Tracked nodes are returned if either a child field was tracked or missing fields were split into a new query.
Tracker uses tracked children and keeps requisite fields
Tracking directory status isn't straightforward, as Hg only tracks files.
Tracks requests for expression evaluation, keyed by the expression body.
Tracks the maximum line length so that the horizontal scrollbar can be kept static when scrolling.
Tracks velocity state to create fluid motions as the `toValue` updates, and can be chained together.
Tracks when resetInput has punted to just putting a short string into the textarea instead of the full selection.
Tracks which cursorActivity handlers have been called already
Traditional
Trailing optional means all optional parameters that have only optional parameters after them.
Transaction can be committed or rolled back.
Transaction can be recommitted or rolled back.
Transaction has been created but an optimistic update has not been applied.
Transaction hasn't yet been sent to the server.
Transaction was committed but another transaction with the same collision key is pending, so the transaction has been queued to send to the server.
Transaction was queued for commit but another transaction with the same collision queue failed to commit.
Transaction was sent to the server for comitting and a response is awaited.
Transaction was sent to the server for comitting but was failed.
Transactional plugin API: - A module that has an `initialize` method that returns any precomputation.
Transform Relay.QL`...`.
Transform `git` bit numbers to `StatusCodeNumber` format.
Transform cannot find this call site.
Transform dot notation to bracket notation
Transform filePath's to absolute paths.
Transform lines into file matches.
Transform that operates on the raw string output.
Transform the matched element range to the hint range.
Transform the messages into actions and merge them into the action stream.
Transform the state based on the given action and return the result.
Transforms a TemplateLiteral node into a RelayQLDefinition, which is then transformed into a Babel AST via RelayQLPrinter.
Transition back and unmount the current scene.
Transition to an existing scene without unmounting
Translate PickerIOS prop and children into stuff that RCTPickerIOS understands.
Translate SPDY v3 headers to HTTP headers.
Translate native top level events into event types.
Translate prop and children into stuff that the native picker understands.
Translates Chrome dev tools JSON messages to/from dbgp.
Translates a 255 RGB value to a 0-5 ANSI RGV value, then returns the single ANSI color code to use.
Translates this object's internal representation of a menu item to Atom's representation.
Translating matVar by opVar
Translation from modifier key to the associated property in the event.
Transmit timestamp
Traps a top-level event by using event capturing.
Traps top-level events by using event bubbling.
Traverse `node` splitting off deferred query fragments into separate queries.
Traverse a language definition with Depth First Search
Traverse a node ID, calling the supplied `cb` for each ancestor ID.
Traverse connection edges, reusing existing edges if they exist
Traverse from `start` to `stop` one depth at a time.
Traverse prototype chain until we find the owner.
Traverse the path until we see the first logical expression.
Traverse until we hit another separator or we reach the end of `destinationID`.
Traverse upwards looking for context.
Traverses a query and payload in parallel, writing the results into the store.
Traverses an input query, updating the passed in `SplitQueries` state object to contain a nested structure representing the required and deferred portions of the input query.
Traverses the ID hierarchy and invokes the supplied `cb` on any IDs that should would receive a `mouseEnter` or `mouseLeave` event.
Traverses up the ancestors of the supplied node to find a node that is a DOM representation of a React component rendered by this copy of React.
Traversing the AST is an error-prone process and it's hard to be sure we've handled all the cases.
Treat `mockQuerySet.bar` as deferred.
Treat all other whitespace like ' '.
Treat all queries as deferred.
Treat as failure.
Treat undefined as null
Treated specially to make sure line objects move the way they are supposed to.
Tree outline should be marked as edited as well as the tree element to prevent search from starting.
Tries to find a URL that contains more information about the revision.
Tries to find a line with a stateAfter, so that it can start with a valid state.
Tries to rebase an array of history events given a change in the document.
Trigger a websocket reconnect.
Trigger autocompletion.
Trigger error.
Trigger first state change after onLayout fires
Trigger mock 'file add' and 'file remove' events, and check that they result in changes to the pathSet.
Trigger the memory usage check but do not wait for it.
Trigger this event next time we switch to an editor with this buffer.
Trim absolute bower path from json
Trim and add an extra new line
Trim dashes
Trim leading and trailing whitespace to prevent bad filenames.
Trim leading whitespace.
Trim spaces
Trim the `dirName` off the `filePath` since that's shown by the group
Trim the new sides of the new root.
Trim trailing and leading spaces
Trim trailing slashes
Trim trailing whitespace, if the end location is not already the same as the start location.
Trim values
Trivial case: no characters to skip.
Trivial, but provided for completeness.
True - descend, False - don't.
True if Object.defineProperty works as expected.
True if the error was already emitted and should not be thrown again
True if the supplied DOM node has a direct React-rendered child that is not a React root element.
True when shift is held down.
Truncate HTML string and keep tag safe.
Truncate `str` into total width `max` If `str` is shorter than `max`,  will return `str` unaltered.
Truncate long types for readability
Truncate them.
Try `accumulate` for something cleaner.
Try again on failure, for up to 1 second.
Try block comments
Try executing a function n times recursively.
Try finding flags for a related source file.
Try finding line comments
Try locating the manifest tool
Try running search commands, falling through to the next if there is an error.
Try to detect the user choosing select-all
Try to extract the actual "matched" text.
Try to generate a proxy from the file.
Try to get extractor from mime type
Try to match dirty file changes in the selected directory, Then lookup for changes in the project directory.
Try to open the given `url` with any of the installed apps.
Try to parse the output of grep.
Try to remove any existing exception breakpoint.
Try to remove the temp file if renaming failed.
Try to return a field with matching arguments, but still return a field if the arguments do not match.
Try to skip some text, based on the error message, and then continue
Try to unlink, but ignore errors.
Trying to access random objects can cause a crash due to insonsistent state of internal properties of wrappers.
Trying to get currentState when mounting App component will likely to have the initial value here.
Trying to go above the root is a no-op.
Trys to print the value out in the best way possible given the different types.
Tuned to spread 3 attempts over about a minute.
Tunnel HTTPS by default.
Turn a Provider into a plain "spec" object consumed by QuickSelectionComponent.
Turn mouse into crosshair when Alt is held on Mac.
Turn off the Microsoft logo on Windows
Turns an array-like object into a real array.
Turns columns into rows and rows into columns.
Turns out that on Windows dimmed gray text becomes invisible in cmd.exe, see https://github.com/chalk/chalk/issues/58 If we're on Windows and we're dealing with a gray color, temporarily make 'dim' a noop.
Turns rgb 0-5 values into a single ANSI color code to use.
Two elements created in two different places should be considered equal for testing purposes and therefore we hide it from enumeration.
Two possible strategies.
Two snapshots live in different workers isolated from each other.
Type Annotations
Type Annotations for Facebook Flow, typically stripped out or transformed away before printing.
Type Definition
Type Reference
Type aliases.
Type consumed by the side bar service's `registerView` function.
Type declarations for Atom's extensions to Jasmine v1.3 https://github.com/atom/atom/blob/master/spec/spec-helper.coffee
Type declarations for Jasmine v1.3 https://jasmine.github.io/1.3/introduction.html
Type imports will still be generated for these modules unless they are also provided in 'builtInTypes'.
Type must be one of "text", "gutter", "class", "widget"
Type names may either be simple Identifiers, or they may be qualified identifiers.
Type of HTTP method: 'GET', 'POST', 'PUT', etc.
Types are exported only once they have been finalized.
Types for the old `flow status` output -- v0.22 and below
Types longer than this will be truncated.
Types of raw signals from the browser caught at the top level.
Types that Relay framework users may find useful.
Typical interface guidelines recommend touch targets that are at least 30 - 40 points/density-independent pixels.
Typically only used internally, but could be used by a custom Animation class.
Typically only used internally.
Typically this is true for all but the "bool" type.
Typically this is used to append Bash "complete_TYPE" functions for custom option types.
UNC paths are always absolute
UNIX GREP TESTS
URL is probably better than nothing.
UTF-16 Decoding
UTF-16 represents each of Surrogate Pair by 2-bytes
UTIL FUNCTIONS //
Uint8Array automatically masks with 0xff
Ultimately, Buck should queue things up, but for now, Nuclide should.
Ultimately, we should have a dropdown to let the user specify the Buck project when it is ambiguous.
Unable to implement the favicon check due to the WebKit limitations.
Unable to test private variable `resolver`
Unbalanced brackets mean we've reached the start of a method call.
Unbox argument
Unbox argument.
Unclear what the contract of this is, but we will not be using it.
Uncomment Javadoc generation
Underlying request is cacheable
Undocumented API.
Undocumented Methods
Undocumented class
Undocumented properties
Undoing moves events from done to undone, redoing moves them in the other direction.
Unfinished key sequence
Unfortunately we can't elegantly reuse isFunction and isString, here, because this code is executed while defining those types.
Unfortunately we have to support ES3 and cannot have `Map.prototype.size` be a getter method but just a regular method.
Unfortunately, Atom does not give us a way to exclude the 'Inspect Element' item from a custom context menu.
Unfortunately, TestUtils does not seem to turn a click into a change event for a checkbox.
Unfortunately, `hg log -Tjson` is not Observable-friendly because it will not parse as JSON until all of the data has been printed to stdout.
Unfortunately, due to historical reasons, the `state` has been exposed as public members of the navigator, therefore we'd keep private state as private members.
Unfortunately, page-title-set never seems to fire, so we listen for frame loads and update the title based on those instead.
Unfortunately, the analogous change was rejected in Node v0.12.x: https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/8997.
Unfortunately, the current set up puts the style properties on the top level props object.
Unfortunately, there is no way to register for resize events on a DOM element: it is only possible to listen for resize events on a window.
Unfortunately, this does not seem to kill Atom appropriately when the output of atom-script is piped to another process.
Unfortunately, we can't interrupt the user action, but we can at least reopen the buffer.
Unhandled 'error' event
Unhandled types below.
Unhide children item.
Unhide header items.
Unicode character for a right-pointing triangle.
Unicode data
Unicode strings/chars.
UnicodeEscapeSequence
Uninstall extraneous
Uninstall nodes
Uninstall them
Union types break the layout chain.
Uniquify targets
Unit can be "page" or "line".
Unit tests should use this method to expect and silence console logs.
Unknown commands are simply ignored.
Unknown export declaration.
Unknown option `flag`.
Unknown, will loop the values.
Unless required by applicable law or agreed to in writing, software distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" BASIS, WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, either express or implied.
Unless the array is empty, in which case we default to 1
Unless you have a specific reason you should use asyncExecute instead.
Unless you know exactly what you are doing, you should not use this variant, please use 'curve25519' instead.
Unlike `setVariables`, this forces data to be fetched and written for the supplied variables.
Unlike `writePayload`, the payload is not transformed first.
Unmark the component as having rendered to null: it renders to something now.
Unmarshal and object using the appropriate unmarshal function.
Unmock timer functions.
Unmount children that are no longer present.
Unmount the ConnectionDialog and clean up the host element.
Unmounts a component and removes it from the DOM.
Unmounts a rendered child.
Unmounts all rendered children.
Unmounts and destroys the React component rendered in the `container`.
Unowned projects shouldn't invoke Buck again.
Unpack JSON
Unpack sign, exponent, fraction
Unpack to disk so case-insensitive filesystems are consistent
Unpipe a stream from all destinations.
Unregister for all remote notifications received via Apple Push Notification service.
Unresolvable or dynamic expressions are ignored.
Unrolls an array comparison specially for matrices.
Unset styles on `lastProp` but not on `nextProp`.
Unset working flag when done
Unsign crc32 hash so we do not base62 encode a negative number.
Unsubscribe before the process is "created".
Unsubscribe from removedRepos.
Unsubscribe from the old `this._localPath`.
Unterminated `patternNode` is the same as containing every descendant sub-field, so `subjectNode` must be in the intersection.
Until it is fixed, mocking the entire node module makes the problem go away.
Until then, collect all events.
Until then, let's just try really hard to minimize the number of things we do that the component can see.
Until there are no more parents and the new root is returned  As the change bubbles up, and in addition to the change from the new child assignment, an optional predicate is also being applied to each newly created parent to support more complex change patterns.
Update _fileToProviders.
Update _providerToFileToMessages.
Update `lastIndex` before `_mountIndex` gets unset by unmounting.
Update `savedContents` on buffer save requests.
Update a component using a new element.
Update a connection with newly fetched edges.
Update a node or a branch under any of the roots it was found at
Update active repository stack, if needed.
Update current marker set
Update expand all button.
Update location
Update previous button.
Update references in other language definitions
Update server info that is needed for setting up client.
Update styles that changed since `lastProp`.
Update the DiagnosticCount for the updater.
Update the StatusBar component background color one frame after creating the status bar background View to avoid a white flicker that happens because the StatusBar background becomes transparent before the status bar View from this component has rendered.
Update the actions whenever the build system changes.
Update the active file, if changed.
Update the attributes on the current element.
Update the configuration for the file-tree.
Update the current prop values.
Update the display with the current set of breakpoints for this editor.
Update the expanded Flex scale whenever the user starts dragging a handle.
Update the file change state comparing the dirty filesystem status to a selected commit.
Update the height of a line, propagating the height change upwards to parent nodes.
Update the messages from the given provider.
Update the props for the item.
Update the props that have changed using the merged values from the props stack.
Update the provided container's expanded flex scale to its current flex scale.
Update the range to include only what was matched
Update the scroll position of the list view to ensure the selected item is visible.
Update the source and position after all transforms are done.
Update the statuses individually.
Update the tasks to match the active build system.
Update the tasks...
Update the text buffer with the initial contents of the store.
Update the text in the datagrid that we typed
Update the width of the gutter according to the new contents.
Update view hierarchy
Update visible rows.
Updated line heights might result in the drawn area not actually covering the viewport.
Updates a DOM node with new property values.
Updates a component's children by processing a series of updates.
Updates a native DOM component after it has already been allocated and attached to the DOM.
Updates a single child in the map of children.
Updates a single range in the selection.
Updates are not recorded for newly created records.
Updates bookkeeping about the number of subscribers on each record.
Updates the component's currently mounted DOM representation.
Updates the current location if the editors match.
Updates the diff information for the given paths, and updates the cache.
Updates the display.view data structure for a given change to the document.
Updates the line diff state on active file state change.
Updates the map from the client id to the server id for optimistically added nodes.
Updates the native status bar with the props from the stack.
Updates the parent with the latest layout.
Updates the rendered children and returns a new set of children.
Updates the rendered children with new children.
Updates the root repositories to match the provided directories.
Updates the roots, maintains their sibling relationships and fires the change event.
Updates the top-level record which existed in node data and creates the linked record.
Updates the viewer by changing the height of the comments and code so that they fit within the height of the window.
Updates the widths of the table, including the positions of the column resizers.
Updates this component by updating the text content.
Updating children of a component may trigger recursive updates.
Updating the indices that we're deleting and that's all.
Updating with computed style.
Upstream version of event listener.
Use "inherit" for "stdio" so jasmine-node inherits our TTY, and can properly determine whether to show colors or not.
Use ANSI-C quoting syntax.
Use Babel to generate code from the AST.
Use BeforeDockSideChanged to do something before all the UI bits are updated, DockSideChanged to update UI, and AfterDockSideChanged to perform actions after frontend is docked/undocked in the browser.
Use Late Binding here to solve the circular dependency.
Use RocksDB if available, then SQLite, then file storage.
Use `Linking` instead.
Use `Navigator` to transition between different scenes in your app.
Use `ProgressViewIOS` to render a UIProgressView on iOS.
Use `RefreshControl` instead.
Use `SegmentedControlIOS` to render a UISegmentedControl iOS.
Use `StatusBar` instead.
Use `Vibration` instead.
Use `any` because we already check `isConnection` before validating.
Use `indefinite mode` to indicate an initializing period, Prefer using the `LoadingSpinner` component for surfacing non-deterministic progress.
Use `renderComponent` in `beforeEach` to return the component so the test methods have a chance to modify the default props.
Use `resolve` to strip trailing slashes because renaming a file to a name with a trailing slash is an error.
Use `setImmediate` because warnings often happen during render, but state cannot be set while rendering.
Use `setPage` method to update the page, and `onPageSelected` to monitor page changes
Use `spawn` here to process the, possibly huge, output of the file listing.
Use `this._path` on the instance 3.
Use a PromisePool if you have a sequence of async operations that need to be run in parallel and you also want control the number of concurrent executions.
Use a PromiseQueue if you have a sequence of async operations that need to use a shared resource serially.
Use a TextEditor instead of a path so that: - If there are multiple editors for a file, we always jump to outline item locations in the correct editor.
Use a big enough value that exceeds the max recording time.
Use a class that inherit the GitResolver to see if it uses late binding when clearing the cache
Use a class that inherit the SvnResolver to see if it uses late binding when clearing the cache
Use a closure to provide a true imperative API for synchronous stores.
Use a consistent null 'falsy' value for the empty string, undefined, etc.
Use a generous timeout for doing a Buck build in CI.
Use a local so Flow can refine the type.
Use a regex and not the "semver" module so the result here is the same as from python code.
Use a temporary span container for the HTML.
Use an extremely generous timeout when running a method of BuckProject that runs Buck because we have seen tests time out in CI with a timeout of 20s.
Use an object with optional keys to mimic the union.
Use an ssh tunnel if server is not secure
Use annotation onFocus and onBlur instead.
Use commands here to trigger package activation.
Use console.log, not the outfd config.
Use container size to avoid changes of table width caused by change of column widths.
Use defaults if times not passed
Use dummy image instead of default browsers image.
Use fakeSetTimeout, fakeClearTimeout, fakeSetInterval and fakeClearInterval to mock Node.js's Timer utils, and using advanceClock to advance the fake timer to trigger timed callback.
Use findOrCreate instead.
Use fragment because all inline violations are caugh at transform time.
Use fromIndex when we move back
Use hackDummyRequestFilePath if possible.
Use hasOwn because a branch/tag could have a name like "hasOwnProperty"
Use https if we have key, cert, and ca
Use https:// rather than git:// if on a proxy
Use it with multiline set to true to be able to fill the lines.
Use markdown-preview to generate the HTML.
Use mv as fs.rename doesn't work across partitions.
Use null to represent the set containing everything.
Use of this source code is governed by a BSD-style license that can be found in the LICENSE file.
Use offsetHeight instead of clientHeight to avoid being affected by horizontal scroll.
Use replay/connect on exit for the final concat.
Use single quote strings even when we are given double quotes
Use single quote syntax.
Use spec-helper.coffee utils to test the the heartbeat interval.
Use the Number constructor to forget the fixed precision, so 1.100000 will print as 1.1.
Use the `click` event to detect changes to checkbox and radio inputs.
Use the `path` argument to this function 2.
Use the capture phase since resize handles stop propagation of the event during the bubbling phase.
Use the cross-platform Slider as a drop-in replacement with the same API.
Use the default value.
Use the dummy copy instead of just returning to be more constant time.
Use the fastest means possible to execute a task in its own turn, with priority over other events including IO, animation, reflow, and redraw events in browsers.
Use the fastest means possible to execute a task in its own turn, with priority over other events including network IO events in Node.js.
Use the filePath as the event name.
Use the first export statement location
Use the first range from the diagnostic as the range for Linter.
Use the force.
Use the globalAgent
Use the index of each profile as its id.
Use the left/right/detailsCalloutView props instead.
Use the name "MapPolyfill" so that we don't get confusing error messages about "Using Map instead of Map".
Use the name "SetPolyfill" so that we don't get confusing error messages about "Using Set instead of Set".
Use the one from WillShow and do not assign.
Use the other root
Use the port from config setting if set, otherwise generate a random port.
Use the pre-built, native module if available.
Use the predicate function to update one or more of the roots in the file tree
Use the same callback both for applyItemCallback and acceptItemCallback.
Use the same protocol as the registry.
Use this as an opportunity to `return false` when you're certain that the transition to the new props/state/context will not require a component update.
Use this as an opportunity to deallocate any external resources.
Use this as an opportunity to operate on the DOM when the component has been updated.
Use this as an opportunity to perform preparation before an update occurs.
Use this as an opportunity to react to a prop transition by updating the state using `this.setState`.
Use this for features that should work despite gatekeepers not being available.
Use this for the top level methods that result in large amounts of computation/mutations that would need to be safety checked.
Use this function to simulate keyboard shortcuts or special keys, e.g. cmd-v, escape, or tab.
Use this if you need multiple line breaks to be preserved.
Use this inside `PanelComponent` rather than just file-tree so any scrollable panels created with this component are styled accordingly.
Use this instead of implementing the logic in JS to avoid flicker.
Use this to make it so that the first screen worth of data appears at one time instead of over the course of multiple frames.
Use this to perform an action on all text editors of the given grammar set.
Use this to perform an action on every text editor with its latest grammar.
Use this to provide a suggestion for single-word matches.
Use this to provide a suggestion if it can have non-contiguous ranges.
Use this to wrap methods you want to measure.
Use to disable incremental rendering when not wanted, e.g. to speed up initial render.
Use toIndex animation when we move forwards.
Use user supplied template.rc if it exists
Use void here to explictly disallow async function in react component.
Use webcrypto if available
Use which to retrieve the full command, which puts the extension in the end
Use with sequence
Used as a reference to the global object.
Used as references for various `Number` constants.
Used as scratch variables to communicate multiple values without consing up tons of objects.
Used as the `TypeError` message for "Functions" methods.
Used as the size to enable large array optimizations.
Used both to provide a JSON-safe object in .getHistory, and, when detaching a document, to split the history in two
Used by Esprima.
Used by `GraphQLQueryRunner` to enqueue new queries.
Used by replaceSelections to allow moving the selection to the start or around the replaced test.
Used by tests.
Used by the high-level `createTransaction` API, but also enables us to run legacy and low-level mutations.
Used by the reveal active file functionality.
Used for analytics.
Used for built-in method references.
Used for checking whether or not there is a trailing semi-colon
Used for cursor motion and such.
Used for example by "svn checkout" and "svn export"
Used for horizontal relative motion.
Used for intermediate scroll updates.
Used for lines that aren't currently visible.
Used for marking async begin/end events for row rendering.
Used for measuring wheel scrolling granularity
Used for native method references.
Used for performance optimization.
Used for setting prototype methods that IE8 chokes on.
Used for sniffing in tests.
Used for testing.
Used for the algorithm that adjusts markers for a change in the document.
Used for un/re-doing changes from the history.
Used in combination with `snapToAlignment`.
Used in run-ci-e2e-test.js and executed in Travis and Circle CI.
Used internally by fetch
Used internally by packager.
Used mostly as an implementation detail internal to `GraphQLRange`.
Used mostly to find indentation.
Used printValue to get the string otherwise there was issues with template strings.
Used to 'clip' out readOnly ranges when making a change.
Used to add methods to editor and doc instances, wrapping them in operations.
Used to be accepted by normalizeColor
Used to cancel the message later.
Used to cheaply estimate the coordinates for a position.
Used to check objects for own properties.
Used to compose unicode capture groups.
Used to compose unicode character classes.
Used to compose unicode regexes.
Used to convert symbols to primitives and strings.
Used to count lines.
Used to create React components that directly wrap native component implementations.
Used to create `Animated.View`, etc.
Used to create a custom walker.
Used to detect bad signed hexadecimal string values.
Used to detect binary string values.
Used to detect if a method is native.
Used to detect maps, sets, and weakmaps.
Used to detect need to update scrollbar
Used to detect octal string values.
Used to detect unsigned integer values.
Used to determine if values are of the language type `Object`.
Used to display paths in a friendly way.
Used to ensure that the line number gutter is still the right size for the current document size.
Used to ensure the version we serialized is the same version we are deserializing.
Used to force a redraw
Used to identify `toStringTag` values supported by `_.clone`.
Used to indicate that some work is ongoing while the given asynchronous function executes.
Used to invalidate the layout so the parent knows it needs to compensate for the height in the placeholder size.
Used to iterate over a part of the tree.
Used to locate the item in end-to-end tests.
Used to locate this view in UI automation tests.
Used to locate this view in end-to-end tests.
Used to log perf events for async row rendering.
Used to manually set the starting scroll offset.
Used to match `RegExp` flags from their coerced string values.
Used to match leading and trailing whitespace.
Used to modify several properties at once and skip unnecessary construction of intermediate instances.
Used to position while dragging
Used to read escaped characters
Used to render the associated keybinding.
Used to resolve the decompiled source of functions.
Used to restore the item to the correct size when you show its pane.
Used to scroll to a specific position
Used to set the toolbar direction to RTL.
Used to signal to callers of `readWord1` whether the word contained any escape sequences.
Used to signify the start of a potential arrow function
Used to stand-in for `undefined` hash values.
Used to start an HHVM instance running the given script in debug mode.
Used to start the HHVM instance that the dummy connection connects to so we can evaluate expressions in the REPL.
Used to store ancestor hierarchy in top level callback
Used to store breadth-first search state in findComponentRoot.
Used to store marked span information in the history.
Used to style and layout the `MapView`.
Used to style and layout the `Slider`.
Used to track when changes can be merged into a single undo event
Used to track when rendering is in progress so the parent can avoid wastedful re-renders that are just going to be invalidated once the cell finishes.
Used to track whether anything happened since the context menu was opened.
Used to truncate the text with an ellipsis after computing the text layout, including line wrapping, such that the total number of lines does not exceed this number.
Used when measurement is needed for a line that's not in the viewport.
Useful for compensating things like the start of a pan gesture.
Useful for debugging
Useful for debugging observable code.
Useful for less-flexible providers like clang-format.
Useful for overriding the default view of a quick-open result.
Useful for parsing mixed-language formats that embed JavaScript expressions.
Useful for simple use-cases where you don't want to deal with listening to events and updating the value prop to keep the controlled state in sync.
Useful for trimming whitespace from the end of a source node, etc.
Useful for warning in `render`, `unmountComponentAtNode`, etc.
Useful method to split an array into groups of the same number of elements.
Useful when BUCK targets or headers change, since those are heavily cached for performance.
Useful when paired with the `accumulate` module.
Useful when searching for a mapping with a stubbed out mapping.
User agent shadow root, keep climbing up.
User agent.
User clicked on a new directory or the user isn't using the "Preview Tabs" feature of the `tabs` package, so don't toggle the node's state any further yet.
User code or addons can define them.
User has made a change then tabbed, wiping all the original treeElements.
User is entering float value, do not suggest anything.
User is trying to submit connection details.
User just tabbed through without changes.
User manually opens something
Users can temporarily prevent apps from receiving remote notifications through the Notifications section of the Settings app.
Users may not have xcrun installed, particularly if they are using Buck for non-iOS projects.
Users shouldn't use this in the future.
Users that need a persisted event should invoke `persist`.
Uses "command" matrices, which are reusable.
Uses a copy-on-write scheme for the positions, to avoid having to reallocate them all on every rebase, but also avoid problems with shared position objects being unsafely updated.
Uses easing functions
Uses props from `this.props` and state from `this.state` to render the structure of the component.
Uses the .containsSelection child-derived property to efficiently build the list of the currently selected nodes
Uses the data we get back from the server to overwrite data in the cache.
Uses the old format that flow autocomplete used to use.
Uses the xml2js package.
Using Object.keys here, or else the vanilla for-in loop makes IE8 go into an infinite loop, because it iterates over the newly added props too.
Using `ps x` on OSX we can find out which editor is currently running.
Using `style` or not is an implementation detail of the platform.
Using `unshift` here ensures that parent edges are processed before children.
Using a different port so that you can publish the website and keeping the server up at the same time.
Using a local variable here to allow better type refinement.
Using a setter is necessary to circumvent timing issues when using the dispatcher.
Using default flags typically results in poor diagnostics, so let the caller know.
Using the `...` operator causes null/undefined errors, and `Object.assign` bypasses type checking.
Using the following algorithm: https://github.com/mozilla/sweet.js/wiki/design
Using this ID scheme, the nearest common ancestor ID is the longest common prefix of the two IDs that immediately preceded a "marker" in both strings.
Usually the current owner is the offender, but if it accepts children as a property, it may be the creator of the child that's responsible for assigning it a key.
Usually the mixer will want to unhighlight the `VisualRect`.
Usually the spelling is the same as the word that was clicked.
Utilities used by GraphQLStore for storing ranges  GraphQLStore stores all of the parts of a range in a single GraphQLRange object.
Utility class to provide the component owner hierarchy to native code for debugging purposes.
Utility for applying a change to a line by handle or number, returning the number and optionally registering the line as changed.
Utility for debugging.
Utility for getTokenAt and getLineTokens
Utility for getting refreshed connections.
Utility function that returns a wrapper logger for input category.
Utility that builds the style for the card in the cards list.
Utility that builds the style for the card in the cards stack.
Utility that builds the style for the navigation header.
Utility to build a tree of nodes.
Utility to generate locally scoped auto-incrementing IDs.
Utility to make it easier to register a file extension with a grammar, overwriting existing registrations or adding duplicates.
Utilize the given middleware `handle` to the given `route`, defaulting to _/_.
V8 debugger protocol does not support manual release
V8 debugger protocol does not support object groups
Valid continuation commands
Valid events are:  - `notification` : Fired when a remote notification is received.
Valid key names are a single, lowercased letter, i.e. "n".
Valid keys.
Validate credentials
Validate dispose method has a reasonable signature
Validate inputs
Validate presence of correct fields.
Validate response data.
Validate server response
Validate the form inputs.
Validates a type which is not directly a return type.
Validates a type which must be a return type.
Validates edge to ensure it has all the fields needed to be store properly.
Validates that a type does not directly contain any types which are known to directly or indirectly contain it.
Validates the options given as input to transform.
Validates the transition as well.
Validation function for `value` and `defaultValue`.
Validation problems are reported via `console.error`.
Valides the options used to construct a module map.
Valides the options used to get requires out of a module map.
Value can be zero
Value if present, subject to encoding if present
Value matching value of one of the items.
Values are continually appended onto it.
Values of this mapping must be objects that contain `registrationName` or `phasedRegistrationNames`.
Values which have either 00 or 11 as the high order bits qualify.
Vararg function that assumes that all elements except the last are numbers, as the last argument is a callback function.
Variable has the applied value, not initial value.
Variables for tracking where and when a key was pressed, and the time before it had an effect.
Variadic argument with `name` is not the last argument as required.
Various changes have been made
Vectors from the intersection point to vertices of the quad
Vectors reduce boilerplate.
Velocity is based on seconds instead of milliseconds
Velocity makes it move
Velocity to start at when transitioning without gesture
Velocity to transition with when the gesture release was "not moving"
Verifies an EdDSA signature of a message with the public key.
Verifies that a Promise fails with an Error with specific expectations.
Verifies this is an Android project
Verifies whether the server supports shallow cloning.
Verify HMAC against shared secret.
Verify RSA/DSA signature against public key.
Verify a file's signature.
Verify adjacent ids across a msec boundary are 1 time unit apart
Verify clock regression bumps clockseq
Verify empty tail component for completed response.
Verify explicit options produce expected id
Verify mercurialness.
Verify method is GET
Verify name and url
Verify ordering of v1 ids created using default behavior
Verify ordering of v1 ids created with explicit times
Verify parameters of the clone call.
Verify required header attributes
Verify that RCTSnapshot is part of the UIManager since it is only loaded if you have linked against RCTTest like in tests, otherwise we will have a warning printed out
Verify that a --log-file argument has been specified.
Verify that disposing the Disposable stops updates to the pathSet.
Verify that our own "shouldCompile" is matching Atom.
Verify that the remote could be parsed and that a protocol is set This case is unlikely, but let's still cover it.
Verify that the root exists.
Verify that the selection does not partially select any atomic marked ranges.
Verify that there is an actual destination to break or continue to.
Verify that we can't get another message without completing previous one.
Verify the expected results were returned by delegating to the HackService, and that local file paths are converted to NuclideUris.
Verify the expected results were returned by delegating to the HackService.
Verify throw if too many ids created
Verify whether the server supports shallow cloning
Version a new file under Hg.
Version has a -pre, but it's not one of the ones we like.
Version number getter.
Version of ServerConnectionConfiguration that uses string instead of Buffer for fields so it can be translated directly to/from JSON.
Vertical forms
Vertices of the quad with transform matrix applied
Very basic readline/emacs-style bindings, which are standard on Mac.
Very hacky.
Very handy helper to map input ranges to output ranges with an easing function and custom behavior outside of the ranges.
Vibration patterns are currently unsupported.
Video Text Tracks.
Video formats
View events
View for setting up a new debugging session.
Views that are only used to layout their children or otherwise don't draw anything may be automatically removed from the native hierarchy as an optimization.
Visibility Comparing to another cursor Utilities
Visit all the children of the given `node` and merge their results.
Visitor methods return false to indicate that they have handled their own traversal needs, and we should not complain if this.needToCallTraverse is still true.
Visitors: Ensure that only one read is ever in flight for a given root/node.
Visual Studio is the default toolset.
Visually groups Buttons passed in as children.
WARNING: EXPERIMENTAL.
WARNING: These callbacks will fire even if a keyboard is displayed in a different navigation pane.
WARNING: This file is not the entry point in releases.
WARNING: This is an optimized version that fails on hasOwnProperty checks and non objects.
WARNING: This method returns internal data without copying, for performance.
WARNING: This method will not be used in production mode as in that mode we replace wrapper component View with generated native wrapper RCTView.
WEBPACK VAR INJECTION
WHATWG crypto-based RNG - http://wiki.whatwg.org/wiki/Crypto
WINDOW-WIDE EVENTS These must be handled carefully, because naively registering a handler for each editor will cause the editors to never be garbage collected.
Wait 1 second
Wait for 'resume' event from Bridge.js to guarantee we've passed the loader breakpoint.
Wait for `scribe_cat_mock` to flush data into disk.
Wait for a primary to be selected
Wait for a primary to be selected.
Wait for all source control providers to register.
Wait for our watch to have seen all of the Counters.
Wait for some time to make sure that inspected page is running the infinite loop.
Wait for the client to restore subscriptions.
Wait for the connection to exist on the server.
Wait for the counter1 Observable to complete.
Wait for the current last know promise to resolve, or a next run have started.
Wait for the promise to call the next chain That isn't synchrnously guranteed because it happens on `process.nextTick`.
Wait for watchman to watch the directory.
Wait for writeStream to cleanup after itself...
Wait until all files have been read and resolve with the decomposed endpoints
Wait until all links have been read and resolve with the decomposed endpoints
Wait until all scripts are added to the debugger.
Wait until all secondaries are healthy
Wait until all secondaries are not healthy
Wait until an `EventPluginOrder` is injected.
Wait until the JS environment has been initialized before requiring them.
Wait using `setTimeout` and not `process.nextTick` or `setImmediate` because those queue tasks in the current and next turn of the event loop respectively.
Waits for current throttler invocations, if any.
Waits for dbgp init connection message for each connection.
Waits for script pause, checks expectations, and invokes the callback.
Waits for the specified file to become the active text editor.
Waits until all the scripts are parsed and invokes the callback.
Walk down to populate each ancestor's children, to fill in the tree and the cache.
Walk over the tree of JS snippets in this node and its children.
Walk over the tree of SourceNodes.
Walk the down the tree, gathering dependants of the package
Walk the down the tree, gathering dependants of the packages
Walk the node structure and identify styles with inherited properties.
Walk through the file-system "database" of installed packages, and create a data object related to the installed versions of each package.
Walk up the parent pointers from the desired node
Walk up the tree finding all resizable descendants.
Walks over the tree and concatenates all the various snippets together to one string.
Want to be able to visit Property Nodes.
Warm-up data for drag'n'drop
Warn but don't crash if resolved with the wrong fragment.
Warn if HOME is not SET
Warn if the element doesn't have an explicit key assigned to it.
Warn if the package meta version is different than the resolved one
Warn if there's no key explicitly set on dynamic arrays of children or object keys are not valid.
Warning instead of Error
Warning is float right block, it goes first.
Warning, this may be called several times for a single keyboard opening.
Warning: Some of these properties may not be supported in all releases.
Warnings help guard against subtle yet significant issues that can impact the quality of the app.
Wasn't a variable length
Watch the config to manage toggling features
Watchman doesn't support rename event, if needed, will need to be fuzzily implemented.
We accept any tag to be rendered but since this gets injected into arbitrary HTML, we want to make sure that it's a safe tag.
We add the code from "lastMapping" to "mapping": First check if there is a new line in between.
We add the generated code until the first mapping to the SourceNode without any mapping.
We add the length of the term so we can be ranked alongside the scores generated by `scoreCommonSubsequence` which also factors in the length.
We allow actual time window to be arbitrarily small but don't want the UI window to be too small.
We allow an optional additional field, providerName, to indicate the display name of the linter.
We allow auto-mocks to proceed as if they're returning null.
We allow headers from the older spec drafts if strict parsing isn't specified in options.
We already printed in xcode, so only log here if using a js debugger
We also implement a workaround for non-visible tags disappearing into thin air on IE8, this only happens if there is no visible text in-front of the non-visible tags.
We also need to add the nested form for API compatibility.
We also need to allow remote nuclide files.
We also need to get node version of the debugged process, therefore the dummy request is `evaluate 'process.version'`
We also need to ignore callbacks in componentWillMount.
We also want to style the changeset differently if it is clickable.
We always kill to empty here.
We always want it to match that of the bottom panel.
We always want the second context for the service worker targets.
We append correct sourceURL to script for consistency only.
We are building an index here to search for the longest url prefix match faster.
We are calling _loadNodeAttributes asynchronously, it is ok if node is not found.
We are ending a word so there can be whitespace.
We are explicit about breaks because we generally want the algorithm to condense lines for us.
We are guaranteed to have a single remaining string after this.
We are happy to update UI if user is not editing.
We are in a build directory where this script lives in deps/npm/node_modules/node-gyp/lib
We are in a node install directory where this script lives in lib/node_modules/npm/node_modules/node-gyp/lib or node_modules/npm/node_modules/node-gyp/lib depending on the platform
We are in no hurry.
We are looking for the longest pathPrefix match.
We are not inside a char nor string literal.
We are not small enough yet, return false so the caller knows.
We are out of luck if disk doesn't have the node either.
We are over limit so we'll add it to the queue.
We are passed an array of timerIDs, and
We are skipping the edges from non-page-owned nodes to page-owned nodes.
We are starting a word so there can be whitespace.
We are using a fixed time step and a maximum number of iterations.
We assume an 'any' and 'mixed' types require no marshalling.
We avoid the cracks by checking slightly above and slightly below the mouse and seeing if we hit the same element each time.
We cache scroll values so that application code can access them without triggering reflows.
We can at least abort if the line isn't long enough.
We can concat the two segments when there is no gap.
We can construct the hash from it and avoid memory leaks from the IE cloneNode bug.
We can delete multiple nodes as long as no root node is selected
We can do this check in this style because we are traversing the tree in pre-order.
We can exploit this fact by caching the parsed variable length fields of each segment, allowing us to avoid a second parse if we encounter the same segment again.
We can help them out when they expect file:// URIs to behave like it would if they were running a local HTTP server.
We can just use `flow status` if the contents are unchanged.
We can make a "ref query" at this point, so stop wrapping.
We can put this in the class definition once we have computed props transform.
We can safely remove these options.
We can subscribe to updates for this.
We can't add displayedDisposable directly because its value may change.
We can't build on the child-derived properties to maintain vcs statuses in the entire tree, since the reported VCS status may be for a node that is not yet present in the fetched tree, and so it it can't affect its parents statuses.
We can't hang onto stmtPath outside of this function, because it's just a reference to a mutable FastPath object, so we have to go ahead and print it here.
We can't just use HGPLAIN because we have not found a way to get colored output when we do.
We can't let that create a file with the initial working directory path.
We can't make these lazy as Map checks the global.Map to see if it's available but in our case it'll be a lazy getter.
We can't produce one of these solely with `Relay.QL`, so we use a node from `Relay.QL` as a basis and attach the appropriate args and ref params.
We can't pull in nuclide-find-references as a dependency, unfortunately.
We can't use arrow function here as it will bind `this` to the context of enclosing function which is trackTiming, whereas what needed is context of originalMethod.
We cannot initialize it here as localized strings are not loaded yet.
We cannot perform a single traversal for the entire collection of events because each event may have a different target.
We cannot use pure touch, because Windows
We cannot use value of natively driven nodes this way as the value we have access from JS may not be up to date
We check and warn about this sceanrio over in validate-tree.
We check the existence of the report file to be sure.
We check to find a matching directory in one of the project roots 3.
We choose a length that should be long enough to uniquely identify a ChangeSet with an Hg repo, while also being compact enough to display efficiently in a UI.
We consider all functions equal
We could derive the token from the json text and the range, but since hyperclick provides it we may as well use it.
We could make shallow copies here but are opting not to for performance.
We could send backtrace in such case, but that isn't working well now.
We could use the golang.org/cl/ handler here, but avoid some redirect latency and go right there, since one is easy.
We create an overlay to always display the resize cursor while the user is resizing the panel, even if their mouse leaves the handle.
We create extra timeline grid here to reuse its event dividers.
We currently don't have a way to track moves here but if we use iterators instead of for..in we can zip the iterators and check if an item has moved.
We deal with groups in the next pass
We decided not to allow and simply throw an error.
We define a connection between a faction and its ships.
We define multiple components in test files
We define our basic ship type.
We define our faction type, which implements the node interface.
We delete this global property so the window mouse listener gets recreated.
We deserialize them as regular TextBuffers since at this point in the Atom lifecycle, there is no remote connection that can be associated with the NuclideTextBuffer.
We did not find the exact element, and there is no next-closest element than the one we are searching for, so we return -1.
We did not find the exact element, and there is no next-closest element which is less than the one we are searching for, so we return null.
We did not find the exact element, but we can return the index of the next-closest element.
We did not find the exact element, but we can return the next closest element that is less than that element.
We didn't find the version in the doc.
We didn't force the installation
We dispatch a timeout with a specified delay of 0 for engines that can reliably accommodate that request.
We distinguish between them based on message type.
We do a partial read in this case to try to make the best out of a sorry situation.
We do a require here instead of just importing at the top of the file because the describe block below needs to mock things, and has to use uncachedRequire.
We do allow records for unrelated threads to arrive out-of-order, so there's a chance we're getting records from the past.
We do not cache the result of this check because we have unit tests that temporarily redefine the value of process.platform.
We do not count brackets we encounter inside string/char literals.
We do not handle killing the debugger.
We do not show "scroll beyond end of file" span for one line documents, so we need to check if "document has one line" changed.
We do not support content retrieval for WebSockets at the moment.
We do not want to emit a warning for this, though, as this will already be reported as resource loading failure.
We don't care to do this
We don't control this item's serialization so no use in storing the size on it.
We don't currently support accessors nor proxies.
We don't have `all` collection in NodeJS
We don't have a way of changing the path on the dev server after a connection is made so this shouldn't change over time.
We don't have actual page title here.
We don't know the real source of linked packages Instead we read its dependencies
We don't know where we are, try working it out from the location of the node binary
We don't know whether the change to the dirstate is at the middle or end of a Mercurial action.
We don't need global templates when cloning.
We don't need to add it if it's already there, or this is the very first regex part.
We don't need to call the someFunction anymore or wait any longer.
We don't need to dispose of the contextDisposable when the provider is disabled - it needs to be handled by the provider itself.
We don't need to dispose of the menuItemDescriptions when the provider is disabled - it needs to be handled by the provider itself.
We don't need to rebuild the crumbs, but we need to adjust sizes to reflect the new focused or root node.
We don't need to remove spy_fileA_subscription -- it shouldn't be called anyway.
We don't send undefined values over JSON.
We don't sort by project relative path as that will interleave diagnostics from different projects.
We don't support symbols so they won't be transferred.
We don't use for-in here because it couldn't be optimized.
We don't want any responder events bubbling out of the modal.
We don't want default browser shortcut to be executed, so pretend to handle this event.
We don't want exception behavior to differ between dev and prod.
We don't want that.
We don't want the user to see this, so destroy it as soon as possible.
We don't want to be precise, but rather pick something least affected by animationtransforms, so that we don't change scale too often.
We don't want to cache moving targets like branches
We don't want to do any synchronous 'hg status' calls.
We don't want to enqueue any updates if any cells are in the middle of an incremental render, because it would just be wasted work.
We don't want to see default details.
We don't want to warn there because we already warned for the corresponding lifecycle method.
We enable /opt:icf only with the debug pack, so /Gw only makes sense there, too.
We exclude the path to the file to compile from compilation database generated by Buck.
We expect an error if the bookmark file doesn't exist.
We expect the element creation to succeed and there will likely be errors in render.
We expect these times to be measured at least as 70ms.
We expect what plugins doesn't have equal methods, events or types, otherwise we throw an error, because this is unsolvable situation.
We explicitly check for the existence of an owner since it's possible for an element created outside a composite to be deeply mutated and reused.
We fall back to timers in workers in most engines, and in foreground contexts in the following browsers.
We feature detect to determine the best RNG source, normalizing to a function that returns 128-bits of randomness, since that's what's usually required
We find the exact element we are looking for.
We first parse the directory of the asset 2.
We force tree update so that it processes dom events and is up to date.
We found a component instance.
We generally want to terminate all variable declarations with a semicolon, except when they are children of for loops.
We generate random numbers for React root IDs and if there's a collision the events and DOM update system will get confused.
We get the node interface and field from the Relay library.
We have a method named auth, which is completely different from the http.request auth option.
We have already handled mixins in a special case above.
We have already missed the change events from the disconnect time, watchman could have died, so the last clock result is not valid.
We have found a match.
We have found either the exact element, or the next-closest element than the one we are searching for.
We have installed package with the same name 2.
We have no evidence that its status is out of date, so it should remain 'ignored' in the cache.
We have no evidence that its status is out of date, so it should remain 'modified' in the cache.
We have processed all mappings.
We have read data for this `dataID` from disk, but we still don't have data for the relevant field.
We have to be particularly careful of recursion with this mode because a root node can represent itself AND an ancestor.
We have to break on the first error to avoid infinite loops.
We have to cast here because the test case purposely subverts the type system.
We have to check in order to avoid consecutive spaces when the scope is not broken.
We have to create the listener before setting the state so it can pick up the changes from `setState`.
We have to destroy panes themselves, not merely the pane items, in order to trigger the callbacks that ArcanistDiagnosticsProvider registers on atom.workspace.onWillDestroyPaneItem.
We have to do this assignment b/c Flow doesn't think "symbol" is something typeof would return.
We have to make sure that we've also supplied enough views to satisfy our request to adjust the `requestedTopOfStack`.
We have to set these values before destroying the text editor because they depend on it.
We have to suppress default finish emitting, because ordinarily it would happen as soon as `end` is called on us and all of the data has been written to our target stream.
We have to use our parent class directly because we suppress `finish` events fired via our own emit method.
We have two types of multine line method calls.
We hide the horizontal overflow in the PanelComponent because the presence of the scrollbar throws off our height calculations.
We include this code here in anticipation of the Node/io.js merger.
We initialize the default updater but the real one gets injected by the renderer.
We jump through these hoops because there can be many thousands of mappings, and parsing them is expensive, so we only want to do it if we must.
We just skip all the descriptor links when calculating distances.
We just use `POSITIVE_INFINITY` here to conform to the AppState type defintion.
We keep a whitelist for those special cased tags.
We keep track of past indices to ensure we can delete them completely.
We know that `field` exists because we have just checked it above.
We know that it's not enough to fill up a whole block, because otherwise it would have been emitted above, but there may be some offset.
We know that we reached the popup, but we might have moved over other elements.
We know that we're about to delete this one, and also what the next least recently used key will be, so just go ahead and set it now.
We know there is no more after cursor100 since that is the last edge
We know there is no more before cursor1 since that is the first edge
We know they are different because the previous case would have triggered otherwise.
We know they exist, since readdir returned them.
We know two is also an array because the constructors are equal
We listen for bubbled touch events on the document object.
We maintain an internal array for all the entries.
We maintain indices in objects for fast look ups.
We maintain this state in a "context" object that gets passed around.
We make `this` look like an actual native component class.
We make a best effort to throw an exception when given a format string we don't understand, rather than ignoring it, so that we won't break existing programs if/when we go implement the rest of this.
We massage the output to ensure that every argument has an entry in the output.
We may as well declare these outside of Activation because most of them really are nullable.
We may call cancel multiple times so let's make sure it's idempotent.
We may get here on the first dock side change while loading without BeforeDockSideChange.
We may receive an `observedTopOfStack` without ever requesting it - native can instigate pops of its own with the backswipe gesture.
We may revisit and try to do something more clever later.
We may want to extend this logic for similar errors in top-level render calls, so I'm abstracting it away into a function to minimize refactoring in the future
We may want to figure out which other paths we want to invalidate if it turns out that linters regularly return messages for other files.
We may want to make date formatting customizable via props.
We missed the requestWillBeSent.
We mock out the method here to get the expected behavior.
We must fill this in.
We must loop through each event and perform the traversal for each one.
We must optimistically mark mod as initialized before running the factory to keep any require cycles inside the factory from causing an infinite require loop.
We must pass in the updated filenames to catch the case when a cached status turns to 'clean'.
We must track the order they appear in so transforms are applied in the correct order.
We navigate to a file if it's already open, instead of opening it in a new tab.
We need JSON start.
We need a cast to `any` here because this test purposefully sends data that Flow does not allow.
We need native-key-bindings so that delete works and we need _onKeyUp so that escape and enter work
We need the view attached to the DOM for the mouse events to work.
We need this in array formats.
We need this level of indirection to ensure that if fakeAsyncExec is rebound, the new one gets executed.
We need to check all keys in case some are required but missing from props.
We need to collect RegExp flags and append they to description, or open issue in NodeJS same as 'RegExp text serialized without flags'
We need to create a new Pane and then wrap it and the existing PaneAxis in a new PaneAxis.
We need to create iframe again each time because contentDocument is deleted when iframe is removed from its parent.
We need to create this custom HTML element so we can hook into the view registry.
We need to do both for both the gutter UI and the diagnostics table to get updated.
We need to escape once for the string literal here, and once for the RegExp compilation.
We need to exclude those.
We need to figure out a way to handle this across the board.
We need to fix this case.
We need to implement onDidRename and onDidDelete in RemoteDirectory first.
We need to invoke _sort for the management of this._disposable and atom.contextMenu.add.
We need to make sure all properties of the original fn are copied over.
We need to make sure we don't end up in a deadlock where the first reconnection attempt blocks subsequent ones.
We need to move the mouse once, so Hyperclick knows where it is.
We need to reallocate debug context - restart frame and step into.
We need to register types cache and search in it for conflicts.
We need to reject the previous promise, so it doesn't get leaked.
We need to remember the position of "remainingLines"
We need to reset cache because tests are reusing temp directories
We need to send this information to handleHttpResponse.
We need to turn these into URIs.
We need to update isRunning flag before we continue with debugging.
We need to use spawn directly to get access to the ChildProcess object.
We never resolve Mirror by its handle so to avoid memory leaks caused by Mirrors in the cache we disable it.
We now have to re-walk the contents of the would-be class to re-translate any characters that were passed through as-is
We offset those back to the first line.
We only care about global hotkeys, not about random text
We only do this simple test to make sure it's delegating to the connection.
We only handle completions in which non-placeholder and placeholder chunks alternate, starting with non-placeholder chunk.
We only need an additional one if there was an update, otherwise we just ended with a scopeBreak.
We only save the relevant properties to prevent retaining a reference to the event.
We only should remove it from the list of the disposables we maintain.
We only show text nodes inline in elements if the element only has a single child, and that child is a text node.
We only support unencrypted keys.
We only want to blacklist this root if the Flow processes actually failed, rather than being killed manually.
We only want to ever record a key latency time once, and so we reset it.
We pass the current contents of the buffer to Flow via stdin.
We put it on an external backing store so that we can freeze the whole object.
We reached the end of the list before the expected number of results
We recommend creating one `RelayEnvironment` instance per user: client apps may share a single instance, server apps may create one instance per HTTP request.
We relativize the paths to mimic hg's behavior.
We release all dispatched `SyntheticEvent`s after each event loop, adding them back into the pool.
We replace location rather than set so as not to create a history for code navigation.
We restrict the label to a string to ensure this component is pure.
We return an event with a bunch of fields including: url, title, loading, canGoBack, canGoForward
We run all of our assertions twice: once for finish, once for close There are 6 assertions, two fixed, plus 4 lines in the file.
We save the last `MouseEvent` so the user can trigger Hyperclick by pressing the key without moving the mouse again.
We set children in the constructor.
We set this to true at first, because any actions that shouldn't happen until "later" should generally also not happen before the first write call.
We set this to true at first, becuase any actions that shouldn't happen until "later" should generally also not happen before the first write call.
We should also find a way to make this work for Git.
We should consider dropping this API.
We should get the modified status of all files in the repo that is under the HgRepositoryClient's project directory, because when Hg modifies the repo, it doesn't necessarily only modify files that were previously modified.
We should have accessibility support here too even though hovering doesn't work.
We should never depend on the order of registration of the `onDidChangePaths` event, which also dispose consumed service's resources.
We should never have UNCACHED status, since we remove frames with UNCACHED application cache status from the tree.
We should not render these
We should only update the revision state when the repository is active.
We should replace this with functionality exported by graphql.
We should restore all the providers that we have previously hidden.
We should show a better message but properly doing so probably requires refactoring how we load the panel and communicate with the bridge.
We should stop to avoid infinite recursion, since Babel traverses replaced path, and again would hit our transform.
We should subscribe to the position here.
We should update SSP on main frame navigation only.
We simply start parsing an expression, and afterwards, if the next token is a colon and the expression was a simple Identifier node, we switch to interpreting it as a label.
We skip installing decEndpoint, if: 1.
We special case these because, practically speaking, they're probably the only ones that will ever be used.
We stat first, because we can't rely on ENOTEMPTY from Windows.
We store the last suggestion since we must await it immediately anyway.
We store the original promise that we use to retrieve the last suggestion so callers can also await it to know when it's available.
We subscribe to its resize events and use that as a proxy for the panel being resized and update the width of the FixedDataTable accordingly.
We support ES6 inheriting from React.Component, the module pattern, and stateless components, but not ES6 classes that don't extend
We support HgRepositoryClient and GitRepositoryAsync objects.
We test this separately because we traverse pageInfo as though it were a linked field.
We then build a map of all assets and their scales in this directory 4.
We then measure the offsets of the keyboard, and compensate both for the scroll view's "contentInset".
We track the timing above, but we still want to know the number of popups that are shown.
We try to match it up with something in the root call mapping first.
We try to merge the keys of the return values of all the mixed in functions.
We use `self` instead of `window` for `WebWorker` support.
We use `stopTogether: false` here because otherwise tracking will break because the second animation will get stopped before it can update.
We use a map rather than an array because indices can become negative when prepending.
We use a regex to parse the "name-value-pair" part of S5.2
We use concatMap instead of flatMap to ensure that the order doesn't change, in case one event takes especially long to marshal.
We use requireInject to get a fresh copy of the npm singleton each time we require it.
We use the element instead of the public this.props because the post processing cannot determine a ref.
We use this to accurately detect changes on disk - conflicts should not be reported if any saves finished while fetching the updated contents.
We use try/finally and a threw flag to avoid messing up stack traces when we catch and release errors.
We used to allow keyed objects to serve as a collection of ReactElements, or nested sets.
We validate only after retrieving the data, to give our `invariant` checks below a chance to fail fast.
We wait what request will be sent by one of functions in `callers` list.
We want a new line separating cases if they had a consequent.
We want to avoid storing pending events if this event was generated by the same buffer as the current editor, to avoid duplicating events when multiple panes have the same file open.
We want to get ranked higher than the snippets provider.
We want to get rid of owner and replace string `ref`s with arrow functions, and as long as `this` and owner are the same, there will be no change in behavior.
We want to group the metrics for a given flush together so we can look at the components that rendered and the DOM operations that actually happened to determine the amount of "wasted work" performed.
We want to ignore the watchman updates caused by these modifications, so we do two things: 1.
We want to invalidate aggressively because an incorrect fix application is far worse than a failed application.
We want to keep track of past edges as well.
We want to know when currentFocusElement loses focus to nowhere.
We want to map to most recent edge.
We want to observe changes in the saved connection profiles during the lifetime of this connection dialog, because the user can add/delete a profile from a connection dialog.
We want to override the extra space within the first node of a class body, so we do one hard break and then throw in a no break.
We want to represent the fact that it's not part of the tracked contents, so we manually add an exception for it via the _isPathWithinHgRepo check.
We want to trim stack trace to display user caller function.
We want to trim the last line when checking the length in case it causes the break.
We warn in this case but don't throw.
We were unable to determine the required version of this dependency from the package.json file, but we now know its actual version, so treat that version as the required version to avoid marking the dependency as invalid below.
We will allow the scroll view to give up its lock iff it acquired the lock during an animation.
We will create a GraphQL schema that describes the major factions and ships in the original Star Wars trilogy.
We will simply ignore them.
We will want to customize this soon
We work around this by piping into a pass through stream that has unlimited buffering.
We work around this here.
We wrap tasks with recyclable task objects.
We'll add the real item first and then remove the old one so that we don't risk dropping down to zero items.
We'll just create it.
We'll just report that the repository state changed, which should trigger a full client refresh.
We'll need a version of findHgRepository which is aware of remote paths.
We'll normalize this here so that /bla/ passes PropTypes.object.
We'll override a few rules and then enable some React specific ones.
We're already fetching or have all the elements so noop
We're assuming that snapshots can only be added.
We're done.
We're including it because of https://github.com/npm/npm/issues/12012
We're probably calling from enqueueCallback.
We're running in a browser.
We're specifically looking for exports.
We're stricter than the default config, mostly.
We're too late and there's a new generation of tiles being loaded.
We're using a lockfile with an artificially old date, so make it use that instead of ctime.
We're using the "flipnegate" flag here, which tells minimatch to set the "negate" for our information, but still report whether the core pattern was a hit or a miss.
We've captured a click outside the popup
We've reached a new message so the other one must be done.
Web extensions
WebInspector classes are not es6 classes, but babel forces a super call.
WebInspector.Searchable implementation
WebInspector.SourceMap indirectly needs this in order to load inline source maps.
WebKit Web Facing API
WebSocket inherits from EventEmitter, and doesn't dispose the listeners on close.
Webkit browsers on OS X abort momentum scrolls when the target of the scroll event is removed from the scrollable element.
Webkit offers a very useful `textInput` event that can be used to directly represent `beforeInput`.
Webkit seems to refuse to render text nodes longer than 57444 characters
Weight of CSS properties based on their usage from https://www.chromestatus.com/metrics/css/popularity
Welcome to Relay.
Well, we weren't given a shasum, so at least sha what we have in case we want to compare it to something else later
Were React allowed to delete and creates nodes at its will it would have caused an abrupt stop in the scrolling process.
Were this schema executing on the server side, you could write a resolve method that fetches live data from a database.
What these nodes do is not well defined.
What we can do to mitigate use getters and setters in development to disallow and issue a warning for changing the `size` property.
What we really need to do is identify the currently running app and only show its messages.
What we're testing here is that updates use the parent module's path to install from.
Wheel target shouldn't be removed from DOM to preserve native kinetic scrolling.
When Atom is killed, clang_server.py should be killed, too.
When DevTools are opening in the inspect element mode, the first target comes in much later than the InspectorFrontendAPI.enterInspectElementMode event.
When `accessible` is true, the system will invoke this function when the user performs the magic tap gesture.
When `accessible` is true, the system will try to invoke this function when the user performs accessibility tap gesture.
When `compareCommitId` is null, the `HEAD` commit contents is compared to the filesystem, otherwise it compares that commit to filesystem.
When `len` is given, this will return `null` unless the integer has exactly `len` digits.
When `locations` is on, you can pass this to record the source file in every node's `loc` object.
When `snapToInterval` is set, `snapToAlignment` will define the relationship of the snapping to the scroll view.
When a StatusBar is unmounted, remove itself from the stack and update the native bar with the next props.
When a buffer is deserialized, it is looked up in the buffer cache by this key.
When a component's children are updated, a series of update configuration objects are created in order to batch and serialize the required changes.
When a key in this map is used in a way that would cause it to be required, the value is the module that is required rather than the key.
When a new item is added to this object, we must remove all of the items that we previously added to the ContextMenuManager and then re-add them based on the new ordering of priorities that results from the new item.
When a node has grown, check whether it should be split.
When a request is sent to the server, mutations can optionally construct an optimistic response that has the same shape as the server response payload.
When a root call is not fetched since it only contained empty fragments, we shouldn't throw.
When a route is added to a stack, the stack creates a key for this route.
When a text editor that we were observing is destroyed, we need to do clean-up even if its grammar hasn't changed.
When a top-level event is fired, this method is expected to extract synthetic events that will in turn be queued and dispatched.
When an 'electric' character is inserted, immediately trigger a reindent
When an aspect of a line changes, a string is added to lineView.changes.
When an event has just come in that is likely to add or change something in the input textarea, we poll faster, to ensure that the change appears on the screen quickly.
When an operation has its scrollToPos property set, and another scroll action is applied before the end of the operation, this 'simulates' scrolling that position into view in a cheap way, so that the effect of intermediate scroll commands is not ignored.
When another view is shown, the active view's React element is unmounted.
When called from a file in a spec/ directory that has a subdirectory named fixtures/, it copies the specified subdirectory of fixtures into a temp directory.
When cloning on Windows it's possible carrets are used
When closing a project path, we remove all stack entries contained in that path which are not also contained in a project path which is remaining open.
When closing editors, convert all locations for that editor to URI locations.
When constructed, RemoteDirectorySearcher must be passed a function that it can use to get a 'FindInProjectService' for a given remote path.
When doing a forwards/backwards nav-stack move, ignore all events until the move is complete.
When done, call onFetchSuccess
When enabled, a return at the top level is not considered an error.
When enabled, hashbang directive in the beginning of file is allowed and treated as a line comment.
When enabled, import/export statements are not constrained to appearing at the top of the program.
When events start coming in, we need to reset user-friendly 0 - 1000ms calculator.
When false, once tracking starts, won't try to drag if the touch moves.
When false, tapping outside of the focused text input when the keyboard is up dismisses the keyboard.
When false, the content does not scroll.
When focusing and collapsing we modify lots of nodes in the tree.
When focusing, we keep just the members of the callstack.
When focusing, we keep the entire callstack up to this ancestor.
When headers are not properly owned, we should look for source files in the same directory.
When implementing your own store, this SHOULD retain the order too
When in attach mode we are guaranteed that the two ports are not equal.
When including a file with a negated rule, it's relevant if a directory partially matches, since it may then match a file within it.
When it comes to ES6 classes and HTML5 custom elements, "constructors don't really work yet":
When it ends, see if any dragging actually happen, and treat as a click if it didn't.
When lineWrapping is on, there might be more than one height.
When lines outside of the viewport are measured, they are drawn in this.
When modifying some of the properties a new instance needs to be created with all of the properties identical except for those being modified.
When mounted, // `component` will be the component.
When mounting, calls to `setState` by `componentWillMount` will set `this._pendingStateQueue` without triggering a re-render.
When moving two touches in opposite directions, the cumulative distance is zero in each dimension.
When new test runners are added, the dropdown in the UI needs to update.
When node is a comment, we set node.loc.indent to node.loc.start.column so that, when/if we print the comment by itself, we can strip that much whitespace from the left margin of the comment.
When not focused on a crumb we can be biased and collapse less important crumbs that the user might not care much about.
When opening a new editor, convert all Uri locations on the stack to editor locations.
When outside is true, that means the coordinates lie outside the line's vertical range.
When pasing N lines into N selections, insert one line per selection
When popping, removes the rest of the routes past the current index.
When possible, the class strives not to recompute the derived fields, but reuses the previous values.
When pushing, removes the rest of the routes past the current index.
When records are collected after calls to `scheduleCollection` or `scheduleCollectionFromNode`, records are collected in steps, with a maximum of `stepLength` records traversed in a step.
When refs are used, they should only be done to control data that is not handled by React's data flow.
When required the import WILL be relativized.
When required the import will NOT be relativized.
When running REPL, main application file is null and node inspector returns an empty string to the front-end.
When running a test where a Promise is expected to fail, it is important to verify that it failed in the expected way to avoid false positives in test results.
When running as root, or if other types of errors are encountered, then it's strict.
When set, causes the scroll view to stop at multiples of the value of `snapToInterval`.
When strict match is enabled give priority to non-pre-releases We do this by filtering every pre-release version
When that happens it will enqueue the operation and retry it.
When the Electron app is running in "server mode"
When the ScrollView is at `scrollY: 0`, swiping down triggers an `onRefresh` event.
When the active pane isn't a text editor, e.g. diff view, preferences, ..etc., We don't show a connection status bar.
When the commit mode changes, load the appropriate commit message.
When the cursor moves the next time we do a toggle we should show the new datatip
When the image has rounded corners, specifying an overlayColor will cause the remaining space in the corners to be filled with a solid color.
When the image is resized, the corners of the size specified by capInsets will stay a fixed size, but the center content and borders of the image will be stretched.
When the message is an array with multiple elements, the second element onwards comprise the trace for the error.
When the number of subscriptions reach 0, the file is unwatched.
When the popup is shown, we want to dispose it if the user manages to move the cursor off of the gutter glyph without moving it onto the popup.
When the pretty printer encounters a string instead of an AST node, it just prints the string.
When the process exits, we want to remove the reference to the process.
When the scroll view is disabled, this defines how far your touch may move off of the button, before deactivating the button.
When the user chooses password-based authentication, we specify the config as follows so that it tries simple password auth and failing that it falls through to the keyboard interactive path
When the window loses focus, we want to show the editor as blurred
When the window resizes, we need to refresh active editors.
When there are more than three length categories, an outer switch first dispatches on the lengths, to save on comparisons.
When there is no exact match, BasicSourceMapConsumer.prototype._findMapping returns the index of the closest mapping less than the needle.
When these are undefined, the vertical/horizontal position does not need to be adjusted.
When this child view is at `scrollY: 0`, swiping down triggers an `onRefresh` event.
When this happens, the Promise returned by this method will resolve to that non-null value.
When this happens, the help text has already been printed to stdout.
When this is the case, this prop will fill the rest of the scrollview with a color to avoid setting a background and creating unnecessary overdraw.
When this object is garbage collected the subject should be too.
When this option has the value "never", reserved words and keywords can also not be used as property names.
When this option is provided, it validates the hash value itself.
When this transform is fully supported we can rename it.
When translucent is set to true, the app will draw under the status bar.
When traversing a specific connection edge only look at `edges`
When traversing connection metadata fields, edges/page_info are only kept if there are range extension calls.
When true, gestures can drive zoom past min/max and the zoom will animate to the min/max value at gesture end, otherwise the zoom will not exceed the limits.
When true, indicates that the view is an accessibility element.
When true, indicates the image is an accessibility element.
When true, no visual change is made when text is pressed down.
When true, shows a horizontal scroll indicator.
When true, shows a vertical scroll indicator.
When true, the ScrollView will try to lock to only vertical or horizontal scrolling while dragging.
When true, the scroll view bounces horizontally when it reaches the end even if the content is smaller than the scroll view itself.
When true, the scroll view bounces vertically when it reaches the end even if the content is smaller than the scroll view itself.
When true, the scroll view bounces when it reaches the end of the content if the content is larger then the scroll view along the axis of the scroll direction.
When true, the scroll view scrolls to top when the status bar is tapped.
When true, the scroll view stops on multiples of the scroll view's size when scrolling.
When true, the scroll view will not catch taps, and the keyboard will not dismiss automatically.
When true, the scroll view's children are arranged horizontally in a row instead of vertically in a column.
When two touches move in parallel five pixels in the same direction, the cumulative distance is five, not ten.
When un/re-doing restores text containing marked spans, those that have been explicitly cleared should not be restored.
When unmounted, `component` will // be null.
When updating an existing node with innerHTML whitespace in root TextNodes is also collapsed.
When we have an estimated pixels/delta value, we just handle horizontal scrolling entirely here.
When we have enough space, no page size override is required.
When we move forward in the navigation stack, we perform a right-to-center transition on the new navigation item and a center-to-left transition on the current navigation item.
When we open a file for the first time, make sure we pass 'clean' to getDiagnostics to reset any server state for the file.
When we print trailing comments as leading comments, we don't want to bring any trailing spaces along.
When we reached the correct line, we add code until we reach the correct column too.
When we're done saving bundle output and the assets, we're done.
When you call detach, it removes the element from the parent list of children.
When/if this matters, use `semver`.
Whenever the active pane item changes, we check to see if there are any pending events for the newly-focused TextEditor.
Where to show the bar that displays your current selected hue.
Where to show the little circle that displays your current selected color.
Where values can be any JavaScript value.
Whether `edges` fields are expected to have `source` fields.
Whether function has TargetFunction internal property.
Whether or not to initially select the base name of the path.
Whether or not we are making a navigator request to push/pop.
Whether splits are allowed on the pane item.
Whether the pin drop should be animated or not
Whether the pin should be draggable or not
Whether the pull to refresh functionality is enabled
Whether the pull to refresh functionality is enabled.
Whether the selection needs to be redrawn
Whether the view should be indicating an active refresh
Whether the view should be indicating an active refresh.
Whether this CircularBuffer has reached its capacity.
Whether this is width or height depends on the orientation of this panel.
Whether this provider can render in a dedicated tab.
Whether this type of option takes an argument on process.argv.
Whether this view should be rendered as a bitmap before compositing.
Whether to reset the input textarea
Whether to throw on unknown options.
Which of the authentication methods in `SupportedMethods` to use.
Whichever timer succeeds will cancel both timers and execute the callback.
While `isCollapsed` is available on the Selection object and `collapsed` is available on the Range object, IE11 sometimes gets them wrong.
While browsers typically do this as necessary, jsdom doesn't.
While processing a navigation stack move we don't update the nav stack.
While rebasing, the common ancestor of `HEAD` and `BASE` may be not applicable, but that's defined once the rebase is done.
While rendering inherited stylesheet, reverse meaning of this property.
While restore opened files, the remote port might have been changed if the server restarted after upgrade or user killed it.
While source maps are intended to be compressed and deduplicated, the TypeScript compiler sometimes generates source maps with duplicates in them.
While the APIs remain compatible with Navigator, it is built with good intention by using the new Navigation API such as `NavigationAnimatedView`...etc.
While the output is causally related to the input, it's not a necessarily symmetric or synchronous transformation.
While this class is private it will create objects that will be passed around publicily.
While this isn't a technically possible situation, the parser doesn't care.
While traversing the tree, a scope chain is built and passed to the visitor.
While user keyboard layout determines the actual meaning of each `keyCode` value, almost all function keys have a universal value.
Whitespace-only lines don't tell us much about the likely tab width of this code.
Whoever instantiates a transaction can provide enforcers of the invariants at creation time.
Why not, ay.
Will attempt to reconnect.
Will be automatically unsubscribed here.
Will be called regardless of whether the user confirms.
Will be called with the new route of each scene after the transition is complete or after the initial mounting
Will be non-null for class-like containers only.
Will be non-null for functions and methods only.
Will be non-null for variables/typedefs only.
Will be overridden after an instance lazily calls scanScope.
Will be used to validate and trace mixins.
Will catch circular structures.
Will check for reserved words when necessary.
Will close all the open connections, we don't care
Will contain the actual code, positioned to cover the viewport.
Will contain the gutters, if any.
Will do that if anyone whines about this irl.
Will emit the target route upon mounting and before each nav transition
Will fill in all missing node type properties with the defaults.
Will later move into MultiChildComponents.
Will perform a transition between touchable states, and identify any highlighting or unhighlighting that must be performed for this particular transition.
Will reject quickly if the connection looks unhealthy.
Will return a named type if and only if the alias resolves to a builtin type, or an interface.
Will set `this.props`, `this.state` and `this.context`.
Will trigger an update immediately if no other async call is active.
Will trigger the complete reconstruction of the entire tree branch
Win8 apps: Allow all html to be inserted
Windows UNC path
Windows URIs usually parse all wrong, so we just take matters into our own hands, in this case.
Windows disk path
Windows expects an absolute path
Windows, by contrast, gives the generic EPERM of a folder already exists.
Wire up auto-binding
Wire up the batched bridge on the global object so that we can call into it.
With a top-level Navigator, you have more control over how to present the modal scene over the rest of your app by using the configureScene property.
With no query, load latest movies
With that in mind you can use the ScrollView's contentContainerStyle prop to style the items.
With the "9", that bumps the length up to 10.
With the notable exception of surrogate pairs, each wchar represents the corresponding unicode code point.
With the way `ReactNativeEventEmitter` dispatches touches as individual events, multiple touches generate two 'move' events, each of them triggering `onResponderMove`.
With this parameter, it is possible to force a certain timezone offset.
Within a range, each contiguous group of edges is modeled using a `GraphQLSegment`, but this is an implementation detail that `GraphQLRange` hides from its callers.
Without a file name, the source map is not used.
Without prefix, nothing will ever work
Without the `TouchableWithoutFeedback`, taps on this inspector pane would change the inspected element to whatever is under the inspector
Without the alias check these queries would be considered empty.
Without this, controlled components don't work properly in conjunction with event bubbling because the component is rerendered and the value reverted before all the event handlers can run.
Work around bug in node v0.10.0 where the CryptoStream gets stuck and never starts reading again.
Work around flow refinements.
Work around nonsense dimensions being reported for stretches of right-to-left text.
Work around problem with bounding client rects on ranges being returned incorrectly when zoomed on IE10 and below.
Work out how much base64 we used, then drop all non-base64 chars from the beginning up to this point in the the string.
Workaround closure compiler bug.
Workaround for browserify.
Workaround for flow bug t7737108
Workaround for node 0.8
Workaround require cycle from requireNativeComponent
Workarounds to enable setTimeout, as suggested by: https://discuss.atom.io/t/solved-settimeout-not-working-firing-in-specs-tests/11427/17
Worker will timeout if one of the callers timeout.
Workers call into this with no frames available.
Workers don't share same V8 heap now so there is no need to complicate stuff with the context id like we do to discriminate between scripts from different pages.
WorkingSet is an implementation of a filter for files and directories.
Works around a throw-scroll bug in OS X Webkit
Works for Android only.
Works in node as of 0.6.2 or so.
Works on Unix and Mac OS X.
Works on buffers...
Works on strings...
Works with buffers and strings...
Worst case scenario is requiring restarting Nuclide after changing the hh_client path.
Would be nice to make a specialized implementation
Wrap `componentDidUpdate` to notify Atom of changes.
Wrap a `key` value explicitly provided by the user to distinguish it from implicitly-generated keys generated by a component's index in its parent.
Wrap a keyed object in an opaque proxy that warns you if you access any of its properties.
Wrap help description normally.
Wrap help text in helpCol..maxCol bounds.
Wrap in an IIFE to avoid unwanted function hoisting.
Wrap the "checkFile" error.
Wrap the data in an object, because if `data` is a primitive data type, finding it in an array would return the first matching item, not necessarily the same inserted item.
Wrap the gadget so it has Atom-specific stuff.
Wrap the ref query node with a reference to the required query that is its context.
Wrap the remoteModule construction in a function that takes a ClientComponent object as an argument.
Wrap them here.
Wrapped in a function rather than a module constant to facilitate testing.
Wrapper around BufferedProcess that runs the command using unix `script` command.
Wrapper around `WebInspector.Object` to act like `atom.Emitter`.
Wrapper around `buildRQL.Fragment` with contextual error messages.
Wrapper around android native recycler view.
Wrapper around buildLineContent which will reuse the structure in display.externalMeasured when possible.
Wrapper around the Android native module.
Wrapper for Chrome Devtools frontend view.
Wrapper on-top of `optimist` in order to properly support boolean flags and have a slightly less akward API.
Wrapper to help mocking during tests.
Wrappers are extremely simple - they only require implementing two methods.
Wraps `descriptor` in a new top-level ref query.
Wraps a function in an operation.
Wraps and hides input textarea
Wraps everything that needs to exist inside the vertically-padded coordinate system
Wraps scriptSafeSpawn with an Observable that lets you listen to the stdout and stderr of the spawned process.
Wraps the supplied function with one that provides the `attachHandler` and `detachHandler` methods.
Writable ctor is applied to Duplexes, though they're not instanceof Writable, they're instanceof Readable.
Write a json response text with an optional status code.
Write a string to a Scribe category.
Write a text or convert to text response with an optional status code.
Write an ANSI color code, ensuring that the same code doesn't get rewritten.
Write data for the edge, using `nodeID` as the id for direct descendant `node` fields.
Write everything written to the stream to a temp file.
Write full data for 3 of 5 records, nothing for edges 4-5
Write full data for all 3 items
Write out the in-memory buffer.
Write per-project conf file
Write response message to ipc for sync message.
Write the file to a temp file first and then move it so the write to the cache is atomic.
Write the head of the configure script
Write the results of a query into the base record store.
Write the results of an update into the base record store.
Write these indices to the end of the array.
WriteBatch Clean up test database
Writes a GraphMode payload into a Relay store.
Writes a plural linked field such as `actors`.
Writes data for connection fields such as `news_feed` or `friends`.
Writes the node data for the given field to the store and prepends/appends the node to the given connection.
Writes the value for a 'scalar' field such as `id` or `name`.
Writing to the final column wraps the line We have to use stdout here, because Node's magic SIGWINCH handler only updates process.stdout, not process.stderr
XDebug's eval returns xml without a `fullname` attribute.
XHP class name, usages omit the leading ':'.
XPath indices start with 1.
XPath treats CDATA as text nodes.
XXX - default Optional.
XXX If --json is set, then look up the data from the package.json
XXX It would be good to set a maximum BufferEntry filesize, since it eats up memory.
XXX Make this work in node.
XXX Remove this.
XXX This function is beastly.
XXX This is different on 0.10, because SSL is strict by default
XXX This should be more like how -C works, so you can explicitly set a root dir, and also explicitly set a pathname in the tarball to use.
XXX check whether some manifest was originally supplied, otherwise keep using the default.
XXX enable PGO in phpize mode
XXX fix comment handling
XXX hard links are just files.
XXX https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/3555 Remove when node 0.8 is deprecated.
XXX remove this slice.
XXX review this.
XXX something better were to write here
XXX this should match ls --parseable and install --parseable look up the data from package.json, format it the same way.
XXX: It's lame that node doesn't expose this API out-of-the-box.
XXX: Not sure how old this node bug is.
XXX: file:// URIs and absolute paths lead to unexpected behavior for many users.
XXX: if anyone complains about this, either fix it or tell them to grow up and stop complaining.
Yeah, technically it's Corellian.
Yellow/warning if the class skipped tests.
YellowBox renders warnings at the bottom of the app being developed.
Yes, Virginia, circular definitions are permitted.
Yes, it is deeply ugly to write APIs this way, but that still doesn't mean that the Readable class should behave improperly, as streams are designed to be sync/async agnostic.
Yes, this will be wrong 1/1000 times on platforms with subsecond stat precision, but that's acceptable in exchange for not mistakenly removing locks on most other systems.
You "connect" to it.
You can choose any rendered node you like.
You can do this by implementing a custom ProcessOutputHandler.
You can generate new channels where WebSocket features live using the rails generate channel command.
You can omit it if you prefer to register the command // manually.
You can optionally configure a limit to set the maximum number of async operations at a time.
You can override this with the `stopTogether` flag.
You can provide an optional callback that will be executed when the call to setState is actually completed.
You can provide custom extraction and `hasChanged` functions for section headers and rows.
You can set style properties like `padding` or `backgroundColor` for each child.
You can use it to generate grids, rows, pages...
You can use the options object to pass in extra constraints.
You can't really "read" from a socket.
You cannot just pass `console.error` as a failure callback - it's not properly bound.
You don't really gain a lot from having a large number of commands spawned at once, so it isn't super important for this number to be large.
You don't want to commit any code that uses this helper, but it is useful when developing tests.
You hook your `ResponderEventPlugin` events into `Touchable`.
You may also use string shortcuts `"normal"` and `"fast"` which match the underlying iOS settings for `UIScrollViewDecelerationRateNormal` and `UIScrollViewDecelerationRateFast` respectively.
You may call 'push' zero or more times.
You may obtain a copy of the License at
You may obtain a copy of the License at  http://www.apache.org/licenses/LICENSE-2.0  Unless required by applicable law or agreed to in writing, software distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" BASIS, WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, either express or implied.
You may pass an object with the following properties:  - file: The filename of the generated source.
You may want to call this when you know that some deeper aspect of the component's state has changed but `setState` was not called.
You may want to put this in your afterEach.
You must provide a renderRow function.
You must provide both or neither methods, one must not exist without the other.
You overwrite the "get" Symbol in your subclass.
You overwrite the "set" Symbol in your subclass.
You probably don't want to call this - use removeItem or multiRemove to clear only your own keys instead.
You should also wrap the native component in a hand-written component with full propTypes definitions and other documentation - pass the hand-written component in as `componentInterface` to verify all the native props are documented via `propTypes`.
You should call this method in rare circumstances only, such as when a new version of the app removes support for all types of remote notifications.
You should not use this outside of the ReactDOM controlled form components.
You should treat `this.state` as immutable.
You specify the mutation, the inputs, and the query.
You will never need to instantiate `PushNotificationIOS` yourself.
You will not notice a difference between values set between 1-16 as the JS run loop is synced to the screen refresh rate.
You would typically create a single instance of a `Transaction` for reuse multiple times, that potentially is used to wrap several different methods.
Your testing code goes here....
Zero by itself with no other piece of number.
Zero length arguments are considered not equal.
Zero means no scale.
Zero message
Zero out remaining bytes if string was short
Zero out saved percentage sizes, and they will be restored to defaults.
Zero overhead in production.
Zero score for a match that contains the token without case-sensitive matching.
Zero width and height mean default size.
Zero-byte entry.
Zero-length keys should get filtered out.
__DEV__-only mapping from reactRootID to root elements.
__proto__ is used because we must return a function, but there is no way to create a function with a different prototype.
__typename: 'FriendsConnection',
__typename: 'FriendsEdge',
__typename: 'Page',
__typename: 'Screenname',
__typename: 'User',
__webpack_public_path__
_transform does all the work.
_updateSize is only ever bound within these.
`-c 1` tells HHVM to send stdout to the normal destination, as well as forward it to nuclide.
`.length` getter operation implementation.
`AlertIOS.prompt` allows you to prompt the user for input inside of an alert popup.
`Animated.ValueXY` is handy for 2D animations, like panning, and there are other helpful additions like `setOffset` and `getLayout` to aid with typical interaction patterns, like drag-and-drop.
`Animated.Value` can also bind to props other than style, and can be interpolated as well.
`AppRegistry` is the JS entry point to running all React Native apps.
`AppRegistry` should be `require`d early in the `require` sequence to make sure the JS execution environment is setup before other modules are `require`d.
`AppStateIOS` can tell you if the app is in the foreground or background, and notify you when the state changes.
`AppState` can tell you if the app is in the foreground or background, and notify you when the state changes.
`CameraRoll` provides access to the local camera roll / gallery.
`Clipboard` gives you an interface for setting and getting content from Clipboard on both iOS and Android
`Definitions` encodes all of the information in a service defintion file that is required to generate a remote proxy.
`IntentAndroid` gives you a general interface to handle external links.
`LinkingIOS` gives you a general interface to interact with both incoming and outgoing app links.
`Linking` gives you a general interface to interact with both incoming and outgoing app links.
`Map` is not actually immutable, but use the immutable paradigm to keep updating consistent for all values in `state`.
`NativeMethodsMixin` will look for this when invoking `setNativeProps`.
`Option` is missing an argument, but received `flag` or nothing.
`PanResponder` reconciles several touches into a single gesture.
`PathArray` constructor.
`PooledClass` looks for `destructor` on each instance it releases.
`PooledClass` looks for this, and will invoke this before allowing this instance to be reused.
`PooledClass` looks for this.
`ReactBrowserEventEmitter` is used to attach top-level event listeners.
`RecentFileService` listens for `onWorkspaceDidStopChangingActivePaneItem`, which debounces calls to `onDidChangeActivePaneItem`.
`RelayQueryNode` provides access to information such as the field name, generated alias, sub-fields, and call values.
`ResponderEventPlugin` must occur before `SimpleEventPlugin` so that preventing default on events is convenient in `SimpleEventPlugin` handlers.
`Selection.isCollapsed` is available natively, but IE sometimes gets this value wrong.
`Session` is particular about what order everything is closed in, so we manage it carefully here.
`Set` maintains items in insertion order, so the ordering is determinate on each render.
`Simulate` does not currently support mouseEnter: https://github.com/facebook/react/issues/1297.
`TestRunnerPanel` expects an Array so it can render the test runners in a dropdown and maintain a selected index.
`Touchable.Mixin` self callbacks.
`Touchable` will measure time/geometry and tells you when to give feedback to the user.
`Touchable`: Taps done right.
`View`, `Text`, and `Image` are already provided, and you can create custom ones with `createAnimatedComponent`.
`__generatedMappings` and `__originalMappings` are arrays that hold the parsed mapping coordinates from the source map's "mappings" attribute.
`__typename` property is typed as `string`
`_generatedMappings` is ordered by the generated positions.
`_originalMappings` is ordered by the original positions.
`_renderHeader` is always called before `_renderCard`.
`_repositoryRemoved` could probably be inlined here.
`_rowHasChanged` understands the shape of the row data and knows how to efficiently compare it.
``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
`address` will be encountered twice, both occurrences must be tracked
`advanceClock` relies on Date.now exclusively.
`babel.transform` will attempt to resolve all base plugins relative to the file it's compiling.
`basePath` should be the directory where the .hhconfig file is located.
`beforeInput` is spec'd but not implemented in any browsers, and the `input` event does not provide any useful information about what has actually been added, contrary to the spec.
`binop`, when present, specifies that this operator is a binary operator, and will refer to its precedence.
`body` only exists on `Comment` which does not match the record type
`body` subfield
`buck query` does not include entries in the JSON for params that did not match anything.
`buffer` is defined in the parent scope and used in a closure it exists for the life of the Request.
`buffer` is defined in the parent scope and used in a closure it exists for the life of the request.
`callback` is invoked with the final value after stopping the animation, which is useful for updating state to match the animation position with layout.
`callback` will be invoked with a `permissions` object:  - `alert` :boolean - `badge` :boolean - `sound` :boolean
`charCode` is the result of a KeyPress event and represents the value of the actual printable character.
`charCode` represents the actual "character code" and is safe to use with `String.fromCharCode`.
`clock_seq_low`
`close` is invoked when the wrapped process is completed, or has failed.
`close` restores the previous value.
`componentWillMount` is the closest thing to a  standard "constructor" for React components.
`connectionName` Name of the connection field from which the edge is being deleted.
`connectionName` Name of the connection field into which the edge is being inserted.
`cur` is used to keep the node that we are currently adding statements to.
`data-name` is support for selectors in the "file-icons" package.
`data-name` is support for the "file-icons" package.
`debounce` calls `Date.now` to determine whether to call callbacks.
`deletedIDFieldName` can also be a path from the response root to the deleted node.
`diagnostics` is likely to be inaccurate if this was the case.
`diffModel` is acting as the action creator for commit view and needs to be passed so methods can be called on it.
`ecmaVersion` indicates the ECMAScript version to parse.
`edgeName` Name of the top-level field in the fat query that corresponds to the newly inserted edge.
`edges` have not been fetched, should be kept
`enabled` may be `undefined` if `atom.config.get` is called before the the default config is built.
`encoding` is equivalent to `enctype`, IE8 lacks an `enctype` setter.
`enqueue` takes a Task object with either a simple `run` callback, or a `gen` function that returns a `Promise` and puts it in the queue.
`equals` takes another object, presumably of similar type, and returns true if the it is equal.
`filter` Promise utility that allows filtering an array with an async Promise function.
`findReferences` will only be called if `isEditorSupported` previously returned true for the given TextEditor.
`finishOp` simply skips the amount of characters it is given as second argument, and returns a token of the type given by its first argument.
`flow server` will start a server in the foreground.
`flush` will attempt to exhaust the event queue before yielding to the browser's own event loop.
`foo` resolver is re-used, `bar` is added
`forEachCachedNode` iterates over the root, but it should remain selected.
`friends` connection
`friends` connection, reusing client id.
`friends` is null, should not refetch it.
`getKeyForClientData` should be called on every field.
`global` is a provision of Browserify, Mr, Mrs, or Mop.
`hg sl` is likely user-defined.
`hg` already comes from `HgRepositoryClient` in `StatusCodeNumber` format.
`hh_client` doesn't currently support `onTheFly` diagnosis.
`id` should always be fetched, but should work correctly regardless
`index` specifies the route in the stack that should be replaced.
`init` is called in `AppRegistry.runApplication`, so you shouldn't have to worry about it.
`initialRoute` must be a route in the `initialRouteStack` if both props are provided.
`input` should be the code string that the offset refers into.
`isLoop` marks a keyword as starting a loop, which is important to know when parsing a label, in order to allow or disallow continue jumps to that label.
`keyCode` is the result of a KeyDown/Up event and represents the value of physical keyboard key.
`key` is set to force React to treat this as a new element when the `value` attr should be removed.
`left` is the left-hand side of the operator.
`minPrec` provides context that allows the function to stop and defer further parser to one of its callers when it encounters an operator that has a lower precedence than the set it is parsing.
`min` is implicitly set to `0`.
`name` added range not updated, only the node changed
`nextIndex` will increment for each child in `nextChildren`, but `lastIndex` will be the last index visited in `prevChildren`.
`node`s within a connection are a special case as the ID used here must match the one generated prior to storing the parent `edge`.
`null` and `undefined` values are not allowed.
`observedTopOfStack` merely represents what we've observed and this first `setState` is only executed to update debugging overlays/navigation bar.
`onCompleted`: Not called.
`onError`: Currently not called.
`onInsertedSemicolon` can be a callback that will be called when a semicolon is automatically inserted.
`onMoreTasks` is invoked when `PromiseTask`s resolve if there are more tasks to process.
`onMoreTasks` will be called after each `PromiseTask` resolves if there are tasks ready to run at that point.
`onStartShouldSetResponder` is used when the next move/end will trigger some UI movement/action, but when you want to yield priority to views nested inside of the view.
`onTrailingComma` is similar to `onInsertedSemicolon`, but for trailing commas.
`otherParam` is not passed to the root fragment since the variable is not defined in the component's `initialVariables`.
`parentID` ID of the parent record containing the connection which may have metadata that needs to be re-fetched.
`parentName` Name of the top-level field in the fat query that corresponds to the parent record.
`pathToConnection` is a path from `parentName` to `connectionName`.
`pendingSearchPromises` is used to temporally cache search result promises.
`prefix` and `postfix` mark the operator as a prefix or postfix unary operator.
`prepareVariables` output is used to prime the cache...
`projectPath` is a path to a local directory.
`propValue` being instance of, say, date/regexp, pass the 'object' check, but we can offer a more precise error message here rather than 'of type `object`'.
`queuedRecords` is unchanged
`records` is unchanged
`requestFlush` is an implementation-specific method that attempts to kick off a `flush` event as quickly as possible.
`requestFlush` is implemented using a strategy based on data collected from every available SauceLabs Selenium web driver worker at time of writing.
`requestFlush` requests that the high priority event queue be flushed as soon as possible.
`requestFlush` will only be called recursively from `asap.js`, to resume flushing after an error is thrown into a domain.
`require` calls int  the require polyfill itself are not analyzed and replaced so that they use numeric module IDs.
`require` calls will resolve as if made by a file that is a sibling to this module's `lib/main.js`.
`runTests` needs to be called with no arguments.
`screenPositionForMouseEvent.column` cannot exceed the current line length.
`script` ensures terminal-like environment and commands we run give colored output.
`sectionIdentities` is an array of identifiers for  sections.
`setImmediate` is slower that `process.nextTick`, but `process.nextTick` cannot handle recursion.
`setTimeout` does not call the passed callback if the delay is less than approximately 7 in web workers in Firefox 8 through 18, and sometimes not even then.
`size` should be a getter on `Map.prototype`.
`some` Promise utility that allows `some` an array with an async Promise some function.
`source` added
`source` added to edge
`stats` contains a `mode` property, a number which can be used to determine whether this file is executable.
`stdout` would be empty if there is no such command.
`style` should be one of 'default', 'cancel' or 'destructive'.
`this._previousEvaluationSubscriptions` can change at any time and are a distinct subset of `this._disposables`.
`this._rangeDecoration` is guaranteed to exist iff `this._marker` exists.
`time_high_and_version`
`topLevelComments.count` is already fetched and should be diffed out, `edges` is not fetched and should be retained
`topLevelComments.count` is not fetched and should be retained, `edges` is fetched and should be diffed out
`topLevelComments.totalCount` is not fetched and should be retained
`topLevelTarget` is probably a window object.
`trackTiming` rounds .001ms resolution timestamps whereas `setTimeout` uses 1ms precision.
`traverseChildren` should be called on every field with children.
`true` to parse the query param as an object.
`undo: 'skip'` disables the TextEditor's "undo system".
`updateDirectories` joins providers and directories, which don't know anything about each other.
`version` will be added here by ReactIsomorphic.
`which` is an alias for either `keyCode` or `charCode` depending on the type of the event.
a 409 is typical here.
a duplex stream is just a stream that is both readable and writable.
a file in the way
a flag to be able to tell if the onwrite cb is called immediately, or on a later tick.
a flag to see when we're in the middle of a write.
a listener might have stopped us in _onUpdate
a noop _transform function
a passthrough stream.
a real array
a right bracket shall lose its special meaning and represent itself in a bracket expression if it occurs first in the list.
a slice, we need something to copy in to
a source data buffer
a tar reader is actually a filter, not just a readable stream.
a transform stream is a readable/writable stream where you do something with the data.
a tutorial.
a union type
a very common use-case of npm's, but not so common elsewhere.
abort out of the list early if we hit a cycle
abstract method.
accept either a plain-jane object, or a config object with a "get" method.
accept parent modules recursively up until all siblings are accepted
acceptSuggestion will be always called after call to applySuggestion with isIntermediateSuggestion being equal to false.
accessing global.localStorage can trigger a DOMException in sandboxed iframes
according to the spec, return null if no response has been received
actor has an ID and is refetchable
actor has an ID and is refetchable, but the type of actor is unknown.
actor is refetchable by ID
actually close the project
actually exit.
actually not a matter of opinion or taste.
actually, that's a lie, because babel6 omits _extends and createRawReactElement
adapted from https://github.com/atom/underscore-plus/blob/master/spec/underscore-plus-spec.coffee
adapted from https://github.com/atom/underscore-plus/blob/master/src/underscore-plus.coffee
add content length
add custom disposition as third element or keep it two elements if not
add executable arguments to spawn
add headers
add optional properties to make validation successful
add original filename for better debuggability
add parameters to the new scope
add the `color` if not set
add the new bytes to the char buffer
add the node to every connection for this field
add the store type, to make humans happy:
add the user-defined options to the config
add to cache, then cp to the cwd
add to line
addEventListener expects its callback to take an Event.
added field
added more in the interim.
adding leading whitespaces according to detected codestyle
adding new elements, so going forward
additional restrictions imposed by json
address has no id and receives a generated client id
address is not refetchable, has client ID
adds the utimes syscall, but remove another stat.
adler32 is not cryptographically strong, and is only used to sanity check that markup generated on the server matches the markup generated on the client.
again, to make sure unlinking works properlyt
alias because "alert" is an ambiguous name
alias include/columns, prefer columns if supplied
align to multiples of 8 bytes
all bobbles return to zero
all nodes are unreferenced and should be removed
all other fields are null-padding text or a number.
all that streamy business can't handle numbers
all the props have been set, so we're completely done.
all the rest of the stuff, copy over from the source.
all the rest we skip, but still set the _entry member, so that we can skip over their data appropriately.
all the smarts are in the couch.
allow "loose" semver 1.0 versions in non-strict mode enforce strict semver 2.0 compliance in strict mode
allow 'error' prefix
allow `--no-blah` to set 'blah' to null if null is allowed
allow explicit disabling of proxy in environment via CLI
allow filename as single option
allow for some time for each lock acquisition and release.
allow it to be empty array
allow null glob expansion
allow proxy to be disabled explicitly
allow to opt out of linking binaries.
allow trailing comma
allow unknown things to be arrays if specified multiple times.
allow users to override npm's insistence on not prompting for passphrases, but default to just failing when credentials aren't available
almost everything passes through here.
already emitting newline events
already gone
already have the tardata on the root object just merge in existing stuff
already installed
already replaced the hyphen ranges turn into a set of JUST comparators.
already resolved, call callback async
already scheduled, active hold, or nothing to do
also NUM_EAST
also NUM_NORTH
also NUM_NORTH_EAST
also NUM_NORTH_WEST
also NUM_SOUTH
also NUM_SOUTH_EAST
also NUM_SOUTH_WEST
also NUM_WEST
also install missing dependencies.
also throw some unicode in there, just for good measure.
also, that means that the chunk and cb are currently being processed, so move the buffer counter past them.
always fetch the origin, even right after mirroring, because this way permissions will get set correctly
always ini files.
always overwrite
always remove trailing comma in one-lined arrays
always return object
always returns true in newer browsers as per the standard.
always set permissions on the cached remote
always subscribe to the root ID
always want to follow redirects for fetch
am2 avoids a big mult-and-extract completely.
an IP address
an error right away is a bad sign.
an explicit type
an object describing the capabilities of the inspected runtime.
and Contributors, All Rights Reserved.
and add the remaining lines without any mapping
and an array of objects is returned, each with the following properties:  - line: The line number in the generated source, or null.
and an object is returned with the following properties:  - line: The line number in the generated source, or null.
and an object is returned with the following properties:  - source: The original source file, or null.
and finally change dismissable to false and type to 'WARNING'.
and interpolate pixel distance
and other Node contributors.
and overlapping ranges
and therefore doesn't parse.
and try removing it and make sure that succeeds
and we are only interested in console evaluation.
animate back open if released early
animate back to center or off screen
annotate the node
annotation id
any error other than ENOTDIR means it's not readable, or doesn't exist.
any proprietary headers.
any strings here are unmet things.
apm/npm and internal releases don't package the base `.flowconfig`, so we use this to figure if we're packaged or not.
append all the suffixes
append shouldn't affect 'first' call
append/prepend the item to the range.
apply any `formatters` transformations
are code, and indexes 1-2, 3-4, 5-6, etc.
are string literals and comments.
args is a list of folders.
arr has the most read first
array element refinements not yet enabled in Flow
array indexes
array of scalars
array or object
array or object members
array, check boundary
arrayOf checks
arrays are lists of types.
arrays are objects, NodeLists are functions in Safari
as if it were a sibling to this file.
as soon as we resolve a package start the loop again
ascending for time: a CMP b
ascii range
askToReload
assignment operators
assume it's an Object
assuming that range calls will only have a single argument
assumption: T is Observable
async is default
async state changes with arbitrary logic
asyncExecute will not resolve the promise until the process exits, which in this case is never.
at least one of the found-day-of-month, found-month, found- year, or found-time flags is not set,
at this point the configs are all set.
at this point, n is the parts, and we know it's not a comma set with a single entry.
at this point, no one needed a drain, so we just ran out of data on the next readable event, start it over again.
at this point, we don't know if it's a dir or not.
at this point, we know that the specified man page exists
atime and ctime are octal numeric values 3.
atime and ctime have ' ' in their last byte
attributeNamespace propertyName: Used on DOM node instances.
autoCapitalize and autoCorrect are supported in Mobile Safari for keyboard hints.
autoFocus is polyfilled/normalized by AutoFocusUtils autoFocus: HAS_BOOLEAN_VALUE,
autoSave allows WebKit/Blink to persist values of input fields on page reloads
autocompletion support 2.
avoid fetching duplicates
avoid flicker before next event
avoid picking up midnight commander from cygwin
awaiting a value for a non-bool config.
b is considered the new max if the comparator declares them equal, but they are not equal and b is in fact a nullish value.
back up so that we process this one again.
backwards compatibility.
base records are not modified
base records are updated: edge/node added
base store is unchanged
based on a header, extendedHeader, and globalHeader
basic format
basic support for a proxy server
basically just a no-op, since we got all the info we have from the _stat method
basically just a no-op, since we got all the info we need from the _stat method
basically just get replace the getter/setter with a regular value
basically just the most minimal sort of Transform stream.
batch up computations
because js doesn't support the 'dotall' regex modifier.
because optimistic payloads may not contain all fields, we loop over the data that is present and then have to recurse the query to find the matching fields.
because rootMarkup is retrieved from the DOM, various normalizations will have occurred which will not be present in `markup`.
before we confuse everything by switching the platform
begin channelling Boole and deMorgan...
begin or end will be NaN if they were provided as negative numbers and this iterable's size is unknown.
beginAsyncEvent/endAsyncEvent for starting and then ending a profile where the end can either occur on another thread or out of the current stack frame, eg await the returned cookie variable should be used as input into the endAsyncEvent call to end the profile
beginEvent/endEvent for starting and then ending a profile within the same call stack frame
beginning of the array/object, so we should remove trailing comma instead
beginning of the line
best effort.
best-effort.
bfs for the rest of objects
binary search in table of non-spacing characters
binary/unary operators
binary: 011111
binary: 100000
bind for use in tracker's on-change listener temporarily stop emitting, but don't drop
bins should always be executable.
bit of special logic to read the specified sort of ignore files, and a filter that prevents it from picking up anything excluded by those files.
bit string sequence
blocked by task 1 promise
blog is copied separately
blog is versionless, we always build it in root file
boolean when set
both scalar fields are updated
both values are arrays here
both values are objects here
bounce begins ...
bower EFOOBAR       Hello error
bower foobar        hello world
bower http://bower.io Package not found.
bower short-origin             generic message bower very-very-long-origin-string          generic message bower short-origin                          generic message
brace sets trump all else.
branches and tags are both symbolic labels that can be attached to different commits, so resolve the commit-ish to the current actual treeish the label corresponds to
breaks on ios7
broadcasts for created ids
broadcasts for updated ids
bubble phase
bubbling up.
buffer the incomplete character bytes we got
buffer until ready, or while handling another entry
build a translation table of field paths.
build list of modules for which we'll send HMR updates
build the global stuff.
build the obj out dir and use it as a key
build up a base-256 tuple from the least sig to the highest
builtin config file
bump the second edge
bumped when mode/overlay changes, used to invalidate highlighting info
bumping the edge
but if it fails again, then report the first error.
but note that everything is flipped for the "ltr" function.
but the reference is marked as deferred
by default, let ansi decide based on tty-ness.
ca option is only relevant if proxy or destination are https
cache and ls are easy, because the completion is what ls_ returns anyway.
cache not updated on optimistic range update
cache stats for top-level entries that fit the range entirely.
cache the resulting module object for next time
cached RAM Bundle
call drain immediately if there are no tasks
call internal read method
callback based API for a synchronous operation.
callbacks provided by client
callee is not the same
calling `this.props.onChange` or `this.props.onChangeText` may clean up the input itself.
can be either exactly the req, or a descendent
can match anything, as long as it's not this.
can only change the link path by clobbering For hard links, let's just assume that's always the case, since there's no good way to read them if we don't already know.
can only match patterns starting with ., even when options.dot is set.
can only reveal it if we find the file path
can only swallow ".foo" when explicitly asked.
can skip cli install for non sudo mode
can skip if `node` only has an `id` field
can't match this one without negative lookbehind.
cancel form submission
cannot swipe past first or last scene without overswiping
canonicalize the hostname, so that 'oogle.com' won't match 'google.com'
capture log messages
capture log messages with level
capture the memory
cast to ints.
cast to string
catch this mistake early:
caused by a VError
caused by a WError
caused by another VError, with annotation.
caused by another WError, with annotation.
caused by another error, with annotation
caused by another error, with no additional message
center - The image will be scaled down such that it is completely visible, if bigger than the area of the view.
certificate of certificate authority.
change to mixed case name
change to mixed-case name
changelogs should never be ignored.
char code values for comparison
characters per data chunk
characters that need to be escaped in RegExp.
check content shasums
check existing edges for missing fields
check for a builtin if provided.
check for a hook script, run if present.
check for a new version of pkg If no packages are specified, then run for all installed packages.
check for git
check for octal string first
check for the nvm.sh standard mirror env variables
check if component newly created
check if is a valid package.json file
check if prev token is a separator AND they're at the same level
check if the thing is a flag or not.
check if there's a command already.
check if we click arrow and expand if yes.
check if we're drained
check next gypi filename
check that this is what we expected.
check the protocol, and then see if it's git or not
check to see what framework is in use, if any
check whether this is array comprehension or regular array
checkout the repo
checks if a file to be extracted from the tarball is valid.
chown starting from the first dir created by mkdirp, or the root dir, if none had to be created, so that we know that we get all the children.
classList isn't in the defs of HTMLElement...
classic for
classy, since V8 prefers predictable objects.
clean up and get some utility properties
clean up everything.
cleanup and close stdin
cleanup event handlers once the pipe is broken
cleanup the extracted package and move on with the metadata
clear out dotted names from test environment
clear out the buffer, if there is one.
client certificate for https connection.
climb to the component root.
cloning null always returns null
close all the files associated with the project before closing
closing quotation mark
closure for web browsers
coast to a stop
coerces to literal Infinity
collect everything without pausing
collect in a single pass by default
collect the bytes as they come in.
color is for Safari mask-icon link
columnOffset
combine matching lines of each rows
comment or other unrecognized codestyle
comments, etc.
common functions
compare old object and new one, and change differences only
compare the 2 identity array and get the dirtied rows
comparison function for sorting lists of numeric tuples
compiler Directives and Region tags
complete against the npm commands
completely not allowed, even escaped.
complex case.
comprised of xranges, tildes, stars, and gtlt's at this point.
concurrency is optional, shift the args.
conditional field calls/values
config can be null in tests.
config is void during startup, signifying no config yet
config settings
connection metadata is merged into the queued store
connection nodes with an ID are refetchable
connections and edges must be refetched through the parent
console is retrieved with V8Window.getAttribute method which is slow.
construct Cookie header
construct headers objects
construct new options
construct query objects
construct utility properties
constructor will be called exactly once, future invocations will return the result of the constructor call.
constructorOpt
contain - The image will be resized such that it will be completely visible, contained within the frame of the View.
contains appended edge
contains prepended edge
content checksum
content comes after length.
content-type is 'application/json' -- metadata
context and single paged ids require getting children from the debuggee and converting them from dbgp to chrome format.
contextual keyword: 'partial'
contextual keyword: 'yield'
controls the foreground and background colors
convenience location creator
convenience method
convert all the md files on every request.
convert array messages to Error Objects with Traces
convert from long name to a single char.
convert the '/' into an escaped local file separator
convert to 0-based all around.
convert to IDN if any non-ASCII characters
convert to an old-style stream.
convert to serialized 'raw' cookies
convince addLocal that the checkout is a local dependency
copied from npm's lib/util/error-handler.js
copy the keys over in a well defined order because javascript objects serialize arbitrarily
copy, need to copy individual buffers
copy/slice everything
correct for occasional, weird Euler synonyms for 2d rotation
corresponding edge is deleted for every range this node appears in
could dig in, but really just wanna make tests pass, whatever.
could not parse the version string with semver
count buffered requests
count the number of elements in the range.
counterEvent registers the value to the profileName on the systrace timeline
cover - The image will be resized such that the entire area of the view is covered by the image, potentially clipping parts of the image.
covers: export default ...
crbug.com/433889
create a copy of the argv array with aliases mapped
create a new export function, used by both the main export and the .ctor export, contains common logic for dealing with arguments
create a new writer, and pipe the incoming entry into it.
create a range record
create an instance and run some tests
create an instance of DebugServer, and get its ws port.
create branch
create directory structure
create form-data object
create listener for each media event
create mock registry.
create normalized, 2d array matrix and normalized 1d array perspectiveMatrix with redefined 4th column
create the edge record
create the modules directory first
create the mutation and payload
create the root node
create the two objects needed to store the corked requests they are not a linked list, as no new elements are inserted in there
cross-browser compatiblity functions ////
ctags does not escape regexps properly.
ctags doesn't have a true limit API, so having too many results slows down Nuclide.
ctags line numbers start at 1
current is optionally the current stat, provided here so that subclasses can avoid statting the target more than necessary.
current searched package is the linked package on first call
currentContents
currently used by HMR
custom errors thrown in graphql-server may not have locations
custom filename takes precedence fs- and request- streams have path property
customCreate
cut off the protocol
dashdash - A light, featureful and explicit option parsing library for node.js.
data: file contents to write.
de-zalgo, just in case, but don't call again.
debounceIntervalMs
deep, once, only, part
default "config.defaults"
default "config.variables"
default as 3rd arg
default field diffing algorithm
default is 'extend'
default level
default options
default to empty string because `track` enforces string-only values
default to expose experimental APIs for now.
default to the ctx value, if there is one
default to the key
default value
default velocity
default warning function
default: true
default: use aws-sign2
defaultVersion should come from process.version so ought to be valid semver
deferred from S5.3 non-RFC: allow retention of expired cookies by choice
deferred part
define all public properties here
define delimiter
define like this to please codeintel/intellisense IDEs
define the `disabled` version
define the `enabled` version
define this here so it's available to all scripts.
delay end/close until then.
delegates dismiss action to parent
delete restores the original property definition
delete so no callers rely on this existing
delete the node
delete the second edge
deleteData leaves an empty `TextNode` which offsets the index of all children.
deleted edge in the input segment
deleted edge in the original segment
deleting the record calls onNext
deltaInMilliseconds defaults to 1.
dependencies
dependency is statically built-in to PHP
deprecated, put this inside the rect argument instead
deps go in the back
descending for length: b CMP a
describeOnly
description wins over value in display
description: Props.string,  // A required enum prop named "category".
destdir only is respected on Unix
destroy - closes for reading and writing.
details is an object containing:  - `alertBody` : The message displayed in the notification alert.
details is an object containing:  - `fireDate` : The date and time when the system should deliver the notification.
detect mode if not set manually
detect what it is.
detectIncompleteChar determines if there is an incomplete UTF-8 character at the end of the given buffer.
determine and set charLength / charReceived
determine how many bytes we have to check at the end of this buffer
determine how many remaining bytes this buffer has to offer for this char
determine if the variables match the supplied if/unless conditions
diagnostics for errors 3.
did-run-summary
did-run-test
didRecalcStyle handles style invalidations that occur before the recalc style event but we need to handle style recalc invalidations during recalc style here.
didn't get any data, stop spinning.
didn't get any hits.
didn't increment anything
diff non-`edges` fields such as `count`
different types of agents are in different pools
differentiate node-gyp's logs from npm's
dir1 is dir2's previous sibling
dir1 is foo.txt's parent
dir1 is the first child, should get selected
dir2 is dir1's next sibling
dir2 is the bottommost node
dir2 is the next sibling, should get selected
direct tracking
directory assistance
dirty if the section is new, row is new or _rowHasChanged is true
dirty if the sectionHeader is new or _sectionHasChanged is true
disable 'flex:1' when hiding a View
disable -T "thin" static archives by default
disable comments and negation in Minimatch.
disable cookies
disable default heading transform if we wrote to column.name
disable git integration tests on Travis.
disable reconnection
disable the pager extension so that 'hg sl' terminates.
dismiss keyboard
dismissable
dispose method is generated custom at the end
dispose of the old one before overwriting
do a bit of filtering at this point, so that we don't need to fetch versions for more than one thing, but also don't accidentally a whole project.
do it again, but more
do like the shell, and spit out the literal glob
do not complete to URLs
do not run any scripts
do not update state if the query is stale
do nothing, file was removed
do this in animation frame until componentDidMount actually runs after the component is laid out
doNotPauseOnExceptionsAndMuteConsole
doWrite is always async, defer these to save a bit of time as the hot path ends with doWrite
document.all is reported as undefined, but we still want to process it.
documentation comments
does not contain removed edge
does not refetch `feedback.topLevelComments.count` but keeps other range fields
does not refetch `feedback.topLevelComments.edges` but keeps `count`
does nothing
don't accept directories.
don't allow recursive copying
don't asyncMap these, because otherwise build script output gets interleaved and is impossible to read
don't bother doing a readdir in that case.
don't cache optimistic data
don't copy dev libraries with nodedir option
don't disable if there's no mention of the varname
don't do it more than once.
don't emit entry events for dirs, but still walk through and read them.
don't even try to do this for now
don't ever re-use connections that had server errors.
don't generate a warning if it's listed in dependencies
don't have that much.
don't have to worry about the last arg being implicitly boolean'ed, since the last block will catch that.
don't include anything that's always handled just fine in the normal header, or only meaningful in the context of nodetar
don't inherit the "defaults" from node's `process.config` object.
don't let it be called more than once
don't modify the actual publishConfig object, in case we have to set a login token or some other data.
don't much care about listening to the child's results just wanna make sure it hits the server we just set up.
don't need to do anything, since we're just proxying the data up from the _stream.
don't pre-fill search input if selection is longer than this
don't reassign to the original descriptor.
don't reset if already set
don't skip over falsy values in objectMode
don't slice `arguments`, it prevents v8 optimizations
don't try too hard to hold on to a remote
don't use readJson, because we don't want to do all the other tricky npm-specific stuff that's in there.
don't want this polluting the configuration
don't write mutation/subscription metadata fields
done with keys.
done: boolean Whether all data dependencies have been fulfilled.
dont add already expired items
double length of THUMBS
double quoted strings
double-quoted string
download SHASUMS.txt
draft-ietf-appsawg-json-pointer-08 has special array rules
dummy key into uriToHackLanguage for local projects.
e.g "8486:ab29d2698a47" or "ab29d2698a47"
e.g. "c:1439492655:58601:1:14195"
e.g. 'Apache Version 2'
e.g. 'Apache Version 2.0'
e.g. 'Attribution-NonCommercial'
e.g. 'BSD clause 3'
e.g. Id69c00d908d18151486007ec03da5495b34b05f5
e.g. for streaming directly from a remote server, w/ a known file a size, and not wanting to wait for incoming file to finish to get its size.
e.stack is customized.
e.stack is still customized.
e.stackTrace won't be availabe until e.stack is called.
e4655d250f2a3f64ef2d712f25dafa60652bb93e refs/heads/some-branch 0a7daf646d4fd743b6ef701d63bdbe20eee422de refs/tags/0.0.1
each character / char code is assumed to represent an UTF-16 wchar.
each item in the tree is a top-level thing that should be saved to the package.json file.
each item is now an array of lines.
easy, cheap case where it's a subset of one of the buffers
ecPublicKey
edge added but never referenced
edge deleted
edge deleted `commentID` is not modified
edges are never nodes, so this will not infinitely recurse
eg: /foo/bar/ or foo/bar/
either a fresh object, or a clone of the passed in obj
either not a dep, or explicitly bundled
either paused, or buffered
either specified a script locally, in which case, done, or a package, in which case, complete against its scripts
either we've reached the base or we've reached the root
either zeroes or a header
else absolute path
else fallthrough
else it must be a fragment
else passthrough
else we have a proper url to a .lib, just make sure it's the right arch
else: fixture for invalid code, nothing to update
emit 'readable' now to make sure it gets picked up.
emit prefinish if the only thing we're waiting for is _write cbs This is relevant for synchronous Transform streams
emit removeListener for all listeners on all events
emits a 'removeListener' event iff the listener was removed
empty babelrc Let's look for the .babelrc in the first project root.
empty or either doesn't have path or not an http response
empty path, must be postfix
empty patterns and comments match nothing.
empty query
empty string to avoid regexp issues
enable setTimeout: https://discuss.atom.io/t/solved-settimeout-not-working-firing-in-specs-tests/11427
end - Sends the FIN packet and closes writing.
end is inclusive.
end of GC frame
end of multiline comment
ending line error, so show it after the last char
ending without the eof null blocks is not allowed, however.
enforce the invariant that there be no empty maps or sets
enforce use of the "binding.gyp" file
ensure __dataID__
ensure no double-callbacks happen
ensure pack logic is applied https://github.com/npm/npm/issues/6400
ensure that .ignore files always show up at the top of the list that way, they can be read before proceeding to handle other entries in that same folder
ensure that similarly-named remotes don't collide
ensure that the target node version's dev files are installed
ensure the record exists and then update it
ensure there are no ".." in the path
ensures that any boolean values from `process.config` get stringified
entry: - module_id: NUL terminated utf8 string - module_offset: uint_32 offset into the module string - module_length: uint_32 length in bytes of the module
env configs
env_name is the optional name of an env var specifying the default path to search
epoch seconds
error indicates that nothing is installed here
error means no bundles
error with the same message should not match
errorStream
eslint babel/no-await-in-loop:0
eslint camelcase:0
eslint consistent-return: 0
eslint global-strict:0, no-extend-native:0, no-bitwise:0
eslint no-bitwise: 0
eslint no-bitwise:0,quotes:0,global-strict:0
eslint no-caller:0
eslint no-cond-assign:0
eslint no-console: 0
eslint no-fallthrough:0
eslint no-sync:0
eslint no-unused-vars: 0
eslint strict: 0
eslint strict:0
eslint-disable
eslint-disable babel/no-await-in-loop
eslint-disable block-scoped-var, no-undef
eslint-disable camelcase
eslint-disable consistent-this
eslint-disable dot-notation, no-dimensions-get-window
eslint-disable fb-www/object-create-only-one-param
eslint-disable fb-www/sprintf-like-args
eslint-disable fb-www/sprintf-like-args-uniqueness
eslint-disable fb-www/unsafe-html
eslint-disable global-strict
eslint-disable jasmine/no-disabled-tests, no-unused-vars
eslint-disable jsx-no-undef-with-namespace
eslint-disable max-len
eslint-disable no-bitwise
eslint-disable no-console
eslint-disable no-constant-condition
eslint-disable no-extend-native
eslint-disable no-extra-boolean-cast
eslint-disable no-new
eslint-disable no-path-concat
eslint-disable no-proto
eslint-disable no-shadow
eslint-disable no-undef
eslint-disable no-unused-expressions
eslint-disable no-unused-vars
eslint-disable no-unused-vars, no-eval
eslint-disable no-var
eslint-disable no-var, no-console
eslint-disable no-var, prefer-const
eslint-disable no-var, prefer-const, no-console
eslint-disable nuclide-internal/command-menu-items
eslint-disable nuclide-internal/license-header
eslint-disable prefer-const
eslint-disable prefer-object-spread/prefer-object-spread
eslint-disable space-after-keywords
eslint-disable space-infix-ops
eslint-disable strict
eslint-disable-line babel/no-await-in-loop
eslint-disable-line babel/no-await-in-loop Then try again.
eslint-disable-line consistent-return
eslint-disable-line consistent-this
eslint-disable-line handle-callback-err
eslint-disable-line jasmine/no-disabled-tests
eslint-disable-line max-len
eslint-disable-line no-bitwise
eslint-disable-line no-console
eslint-disable-line no-constant-condition
eslint-disable-line no-eval
eslint-disable-line no-new
eslint-disable-line no-path-concat
eslint-disable-line no-unused-vars
eslint-disable-line nuclide-internal/command-menu-items
eslint-disable-line yoda
eslint-enable
eslint-enable babel/no-await-in-loop
eslint-enable camelcase
eslint-enable consistent-this
eslint-enable fb-www/sprintf-like-args
eslint-enable fb-www/sprintf-like-args-uniqueness
eslint-enable jsx-no-undef-with-namespace
eslint-enable max-len
eslint-enable no-console
eslint-enable no-constant-condition
eslint-enable no-extend-native
eslint-enable no-new
eslint-enable no-path-concat
eslint-enable no-proto
eslint-enable no-shadow
eslint-enable no-undef
eslint-enable no-unused-expressions
eslint-enable nuclide-internal/command-menu-items
eslint-enable prefer-const
eslint-enable space-after-keywords
eslint-env browser
eslint-env node
event `didyo` should be fired after the full propagation cycle of the `yo` event.
events from the backend
eventually delete old debug info
every interval print what is on the screen
every time we dive into a deeper node_modules folder, the "family" list that gets passed along uses the previous "family" list as its __proto__.
everything is optional.
evict unreferenced nodes
evicting the record calls onNext
exact match, not exception
example in rfc5849
exclude anything that might be a URL, path, or private module Those things will always have a slash in them somewhere
executable sub-commands
execute `gyp` from the current target nodedir
execute a command and return the output as a string
execute code only when the state's not being updated by switching tab this avoids re-displaying the error, which comes after a certain delay
execute is-my-json-valid
exists can't check for broken symlinks, just absorb the error for cleanup
exit if a hold was acquired since the last execution
exitCode number The exit code returned by the process.
exp file found, stop looking
expand with the valid values of various config values.
expect data with any error codes
expect the supplied cb function to be called "n" times for each thing in the array.
expires at 110
expires at 130
expires at 50
expires at 75
expires at 80
explicit list of values
export default ...
export for use in jest
exported async module functions //// // nextTick implementation with browser-compatible fallback ////
exported async module functions //// // nextTick implementation with browser-compatible fallback //// capture the global reference to guard against fakeTimer mocks
expose both base data and convenience names
expose the command aliases for the bin file to use.
expose the module cache
exposed for testing
exposed for testing purposes only.
exposed only for testing purposes
express and others respect the NODE_ENV value.
extended headers that apply to the next entry
extended headers that apply to the rest of the tarball
extendedHeader only applies to one entry, so once we start an entry, it's over.
extensionServer is a closure variable defined by the glue below -- make sure we fail if it's not there.
external reference
extsprintf.js: extended POSIX-style sprintf
fails on bash4 and bsdglob.
fake definition so we still return something at least
fall through
fallback for something weird
fallback to the default content type if `value` is not simple value
falls through
fallthrough
fallthrough all other fields are numeric or text
faster spring for faster test
fastest implementation
feed.edges.cursor
feedback is updated, but the edge is not added
fetch cookie in the Specified host
fetch the data and make sure it exists.
fetch the data modify to remove the version in question If no versions remaining, then DELETE else, PUT the modified data delete the tarball
fetch to tmp/random/package.tgz 2.
fetch url, clear lock, call cbs cache folders: 1.
fetching a URL: 1.
fetching a tarball from `api.github.com` returns a 415 error if json is not accepted
fetching the record calls onNext
field must end with cr
fields also currently exist here, but they are deprecated in favor of `loc`.
figure out what we should check out.
figure out where in that last word the point is.
figure out who we're supposed to be, if we're not pretending to be a specific user.
figure out wth body is
file exists.
file: has the file or directory name, stats: has the stats of the file/dir, isSymbolicLink: true if the entry is a symlink to another filesystem location.
filePath is already an absolute path.
fill the cache with the children of treeElement
fill up the cache
filled by since server callback
filter all the versions that match
filter can be used to remove entries from the stack.
filter out anything obvious
filter out everything that didn't compile properly.
filterTypes
finally, you may enter.
find a last separator after which we're inserting it
find differences
find either /section.n or /npm-section.n The glob is used in the glob.
find matching Option
find the header that declares the module pointer, so we can include it in internal_functions.c
find the max satisfying version.
find unmet deps by walking up the tree object.
finish up the class.
fire and forget.
first bobble is the selector
first byte MUST be either 80 or FF 80 for positive, FF for 2's comp
first check if its even installed
first check to see if this arg is a set of single-char shorthands
first create the dir for the node dev files
first difference found
first get the values from the normal header.
first list is a perfect match
first locker.
first make it locked, so that everyone has to wait
first time, return a 408
first write the data
first, build as much as possible that doesn't have a pattern
first, get a list of remote packages this user owns.
first, make sure that the hardlinks are actually hardlinks, or this won't work.
first, match against /foo/bar
fix for t7967420
fix render order error in safari IE8 will throw error when index out of list size.
fixture for valid input, update the expected output
flags.binary will be set if a binary data is received.
flags.masked will be set if the data was masked.
flatten leftStartPos
flatten pos
flatten startPos
flatten the version Array into a String
flatten version into String
flow pragma is optional...
flow seems a bit confused here.
flowtype requires the ternary
flush is taking an unexpected amount of time
foldl alias
foldr alias
follow all symlinked directories forever just proceed as if this is a non-globstar situation
followUserLocation defaults to true if showUserLocation is set
foo.txt is the previous visible descendant to dir2
foo: bar Content-Type: application/x-git-upload-pack-advertisement 1234: 5678
foo: bar Content-Type: none 1234: 5678
foo: barbaz Content-Type: application/x-git-upload-pack-advertisement 1234: 5678
foo`something`
for AIX we need to set up the path to the exp file which contains the symbols needed for linking.
for EMFILE handling
for debug builds, lib may have _debug appended, we want that first
for debugging
for easier testing
for flow: types are lost in closures
for handle the case where we left a class open.
for inserting document
for master branch don't throw and error
for non-scalar fields, the recordID is the parent
for now, not yet implemented.
for now, work with hex strings because they're easier in JS
for oddballs
for simple password-based authentication
for some mutations, deletions don't always occur so if there's no field in the payload, carry on
for speeding up hashing/fingerprint operations
for tar.gz or alternative paths
for the purposes of validation, if the node version is a prerelease, strip that.
for the search endpoint, the 'error' property can be an object
for v0.7 or later
for versions before node v0.8 when there weren't `fs.existsSync`
for windows only nt file system tunneling feature will make file creation time not updated
forRect is used by rectangular selections, and tries to estimate a character position even for coordinates beyond the right of the text.
force MSB set
force WebView to show loadingView on first load
force a default depth:
force back to text/plain
force lazy recomputation
force recalc
force regexp
force the 'make' target for non-Windows
force-tracking should track the original nodes again
forceExpanded
forward slash
found a match.
fragment doesn't exist.
fragment is the original node, unchanged and not deferred
fragment with children
fragment without children
friends.edges.node rewriting the same payload by default does not track anything
from CodeMirror distribution
from cosmic thingy
from is expected to vary
from node's lib/path.js
from read-package-json
from: https://github.com/kaielvin/jsbn-ec-point-compression
fromString with logging callback
fs.access always works on non-Windows OSes
fs.access first introduced in node 0.12 / io.js
fs.readFile
fun stuff: MS deprecated ANSI stdio and similar functions disable annoying warnings.
functions...
gap is capped at 10 characters
generate a .res file containing version information
generate a new agent for this setting if none yet exists
generate a unique filename
generate to releases/XX when branch name indicates that it is some sort of release
generate to root folder when commit is tagged as latest, i.e. stable and needs to be shown at the root of repo
generatePreview
get all events
get auth, if possible
get content length and fire away
get extensions
get in order of most recently used
get remainder save remainder for next loop
get rid of any ../../ shenanigans
get the 'arch', 'buildType', and 'nodeDir' vars from the config
get the batch of data that matches so far.
get the character that was split
get the data about this package
get the last error message by checking validate.error the following will print "data.hello is required"
get the list of entries.
get the list of packages by user
get the list of the packages that are specified in bower.json in that order its nice to maintain that order for users
get the number as a base-256 tuple
get the ones we tacked on, then the system-specific requirements
get the partial line and partial word, if the point isn't at the end.
get the root location
get the user-specified version to remove
getComponentForItem Optional function that returns a React Element.
getPath is nice for debugging tests
git must be called after npm.load because it uses config
git responds to env vars in some weird ways in post-receive hooks so don't carry those along.
github shorturls
github-style sub-commands with no sub-command
give it a weird buffer size to try to break in odd places
give this a kick just in case it needs it.
given point in the program is loosely based on sweet.js' approach.
gives Cookie header format
gives Set-Cookie header format
glob using simple filename wildcards returns an array of matches that are found in the filesystem
global Buffer: true
global EventListener
global Symbol
global Symbol: true
global WScript
global WebInspector
global __fbBatchedBridge, self, importScripts, postMessage, onmessage: true
global config file
global exports:true
global hasOwnProperty:true
global header should be skipped regardless, since it has no content.
global module:true
global on the server, window in the browser
global phantom:true
global search.
global setImmediate: false, setTimeout: false, console: false
global window
global window, require, define
globalconfig and globalignorefile defaults need to respond to the 'prefix' setting up to this point.
globals GLOBAL: true, window: true
globals MSApp
globals WScript
globals __REACT_DEVTOOLS_GLOBAL_HOOK__
globals can change throughout the course of a file parse operation.
globals expect: false
globals included because of `npm link` -- as far as the package requesting the link is concerned, the linked package is always installed globally
gnutar puts a LOT of nulls at the end.
go ahead and spin up the registry client.
go-to-definition with Hyperclick
goes to zero at both edges
goovy keyword
goovy/java type
got a match.
got an "options" object
grab truncated word
graceful-fs helps on getting an error when we run out of file descriptors.
gzipped files all start with 1f8b08
hack for check below, not included into result
hack to fix a circular dependency issue when used with browserify
had matches
half pixel because offset values are not rounded but ceiled
handle errors, and cache the information
handle injections
handle invalid prop values using a warning at first.
handle single-char shorthands glommed together, like npm ls -glp, but only if there is one dash, and only if all of the chars are single-char shorthands, and it's not a match to some other abbrev.
handle the case where we change protocol from https to http or vice versa
handle the case where we left a class open.
handle the file separately
handle trailing things that only matter at the very end.
has -headers.tar.gz
has a positive integer length property
has side effect
has some rando property
hasBooleanValue: Whether the property should be removed when set to a falsey value.
hasNumericValue: Whether the property must be numeric or parse as a numeric and should be removed when set to a falsey value.
hasOverloadedBooleanValue: Whether the property can be used as a flag as well as with a value.
hasPositiveNumericValue: Whether the property must be positive numeric or parse as a positive numeric and should be removed when set to a falsey value.
hasSelection will be the case when there is a lot of text in the textarea, in which case reading its value would be expensive.
hasSideEffects: Whether or not setting a value causes side effects such as triggering resources to be loaded or text selection changes.
hasSideshow: false
hasSideshow: true
hash of items by key
have the package, get the fields.
header files
header is padded to 512 bytes.
help recognize paste/cut edits in readInput
helper functions
here, we intercept npm validating the remote origin url on one of the clones we've done previously and return the original url that was requested
hidden class micro-optimization
hidden from traversal
hide folders if only 1 level would be shown, or if no results were found
high surrogate
high` inclusive.
highest, equal match
highlight hashtags
highlighting overlays, as added by addOverlay
host nuclide server is running on
host nuclide server is running on.
however, also support --bool true or --bool false
however, directories have to be re-tested against rules with a "/" appended, because "a/b/" will only match if "a/b" is a dir, and not otherwise.
however, don't suppress the throwing behavior for this.
however, if it's optional, then that's fine, so just delete it.
however, if we've ended, then there's no point, and if we're already reading, then it's unnecessary.
however, in this implementation, it's easier just to do the intuitive thing, and let brace-expansion actually come before parsing any extglob patterns, like the documentation seems to say.
however, it will not swallow /.x, unless options.dot is set.
however, might be stale
html colors
http://closure-library.googlecode.com/svn/trunk/closure/goog /string/string_test.html
http://closure-library.googlecode.com/svn/trunk/closure/goog/ string/string_test.html
http://code.google.com/p/v8/wiki/JavaScriptStackTraceApi
http://docs.amazonwebservices.com/general/latest/gr/signature-version-4.html
http://docs.aws.amazon.com/general/latest/gr/rande.html
http://h3manth.com/new/blog/2015/custom-elements-with-es6/
http://jsperf.com/copy-array-inline
http://jsperf.com/emptying-a-node
http://jsperf.com/hashing-strings
http://marijnhaverbeke.nl/git/acorn https://github.com/marijnh/acorn.git
http://norbertlindenberg.com/2012/05/ecmascript-supplementary-characters/ and: https://github.com/mathiasbynens/String.fromCodePoint/blob/master /fromcodepoint.js
http://stackoverflow.com/q/1480971/3191, but see below for Windows.
http://stackoverflow.com/questions/3561493 /is-there-a-regexp-escape-function-in-javascript
http://stackoverflow.com/questions/596467/how-do-i-convert-a-number-to-an-integer-in-javascript this rounds towards zero
http://webkit.org/b/41637 Web Inspector: Give Semantics to "Refresh" and "Delete" Buttons in ApplicationCache DataGrid
http://www.apache.org/licenses/LICENSE-2.0
https by default.
https if specified, fallback to http in any other case
https://atom.io/docs/api/latest/Config
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/CSS/flex
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/CSS/flex-direction
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/CSS/flex-wrap
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/JavaScript/Reference/Global_Objects/Array/find
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/JavaScript/Reference/Global_Objects/Array/findIndex
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/JavaScript/Reference/Global_Objects/Object/entries
https://developer.mozilla.org/en-US/docs/Web/JavaScript/Reference/Global_Objects/Object/values
https://gist.github.com/WebReflection/5593554
https://github.com/atom/atom/blob/v1.6.2/src/babel.js
https://github.com/atom/atom/releases/tag/v1.0.8  Note on periods: Using the extension "cats" will match the files "file.cats" and "cats".
https://github.com/atom/electron/blob/master/docs/api/web-view-tag.md
https://github.com/atom/markdown-preview/pull/335 drew my attention to it.
https://github.com/felixge/node-form-data/issues/38
https://github.com/floodyberry/poly1305-donna
https://github.com/form-data/form-data/issues/40
https://github.com/isaacs/minimatch/issues/5
https://github.com/isaacs/node-glob/issues/205
https://github.com/isaacs/node-graceful-fs/issues/4 Chown should not fail on einval or eperm if non-root.
https://github.com/isaacs/readable-stream/issues/16
https://github.com/joyent/node/blob/master/lib/util.js
https://github.com/joyent/node/issues/7819
https://github.com/kriskowal/q/issues/396 Timers are implemented universally.
https://github.com/mscdex/node-ncurses/blob/master/deps/ncurses/progs/clear.c
https://github.com/npm/nopt/issues/24
https://github.com/npm/nopt/issues/31
https://github.com/npm/nopt/issues/48
https://github.com/paulmillr/es6-shim/blob/master/test/string.js
https://github.com/tildeio/rsvp.js/blob/cddf7232546a9cf858524b75cde6f9edf72620a7/lib/rsvp/asap.js
https://github.com/tj/node-blocked/blob/master/index.js  The blocked module checks and reports every event loop block time over a given threshold.
https://github.com/websockets/ws/blob/master/doc/ws.md
iOS Alert does that in native.
iOS default is 30px from the left edge
iOS-Specific style to "tint" an image.
identifier name
identifier started
ie_uptoN means Internet Explorer version N or lower
if --target was given, then determine a target version to compile for
if ANY of the sets match ALL of its comparators, then pass
if a line has a search term, then skip it and the next line.
if a sub-query was split, then we must track the entire field, which will be a superset of the `trackedNode` from traversing any metadata fields.
if already at maxWidth don't bother testing
if an error exists for this mutation ID, remove the error on the previous client ID and 'move' the error on the new client ID
if an error happens while we don't use the socket anyway, meh, throw the socket away
if any errors were found, then complain and exit status 1
if anyone needs a drain, then we have to wait for that.
if code is running in a branch in CI, commit changes to gh-pages branch
if current commit is tagged "latest" we do a release to gh-pages root
if devtools is already started
if every destination was unpiped, either before entering this function, or in the while loop, then stop flowing.
if file is not a package dir, then don't do it.
if first is tab, then indent is tab
if first tag on this commit is non -rc then we are making a stable release '0.33.0'
if given the method property in options, set property explicitMethod to true extend the Request instance with any non-reserved properties remove any reserved functions from the options object set Request instance to be readable and writable call init
if i have a filter, the child should inherit it.
if ignored, skip _processing
if ignored, skip processing
if it can be installed, it can be packed.
if it didn't throw, but original parser did, this is an error in this library and should be reported
if it extends another schema, it must pass that schema as well
if it fails, whatever.
if it is there, then we'll need to change whatever differs
if it was the only version, then delete the whole package.
if it's a folder, a random not-installed thing, or not a scoped package, then link or install it first
if it's a folder, then read the package.json, tar it to the proper place, and add the cache tar
if it's a local folder, then run the prepublish there, first.
if it's a negative number, or greater than will fit, then use write256.
if it's a type change, then we need to clobber or error.
if it's an abbr for a shorthand, then use that
if it's an arg abbrev, and not a literal shorthand, then prefer the arg
if it's an exact known option, then don't go any further
if it's an exact known shortopt, same deal
if it's an unknown value, then parse false/true/null/numbers/dates
if it's got / chars in it, then assume that it's local.
if it's not a type change, then let the impl take care of it.
if it's not the expected size, then abort here.
if it's not there, great.
if it's past the high water mark, we can push in some more.
if it's the root, then there's no need to add its entries, or data, since they'll be added directly.
if lchmod/lchown do not exist, then make them no-ops
if lock can't be acquired, then fail 4.
if need cookie and cookie is not empty
if no --nodedir specified, ensure node dependencies are installed
if no --target was specified then use the current host node version
if no callback
if no content type.
if no json, then just trash it, but no scripts or whatever.
if no port provided use default one
if none anywhere, then use cwd.
if not specified where, then delete from the whole chain, scorched earth style
if not suppled column names, automatically determine columns from data keys
if not ustar, then everything after that is just padding.
if not, then this is rather simple
if not, use the default
if npm is called as "npmg" or "npm_g", then run in global mode.
if only one result, then just show that help section.
if our last write ended with an incomplete multibyte character
if possible, verify that Map also behaves the same way
if r is a valid choice, then use that.
if result is Promise object
if rowFrame missing, no following ones will exist so quit early
if so, add it to that, and mark this one for deletion
if so, re-walk the contents of the would-be class to re-translate any characters that were passed through as-is TODO: It would probably be faster to determine this without a try/catch and a new RegExp, but it's tricky to do safely.
if someone really wants to see them, they can listen to the "socket" events.
if source or dest is primitive, just replace
if that's what we already have, or if it's not on the args list, then dive into it.
if the 'project' config is not a filename, and we're not in global mode, then that means that it collided with either the default or effective userland config
if the current node matches the filter do nothing
if the dest has an error, then stop piping into it.
if the entry is a directory, then it will match with a trailing slash.
if the error is something other than ENOENT, then it's not.
if the field is an argument-less root call, determine the corresponding root record ID
if the file can be opened in readonly mode, then it's there.
if the file dependencies have change we need to invalidate the dependencies caches because the list of files we need to send to the client may have changed
if the filter doesn't pass, then just skip over this one.
if the link already exists and matches what we would do, we don't need to do anything
if the new tracker is a group, make sure any subtrackers get mixed in too
if the next line has a search term, then skip all 3 otherwise, set the line to null.
if the noProxy is a wildcard then return null
if the noProxy is not empty and the uri is found return null
if the object has a "prefix", then that's actually an extension of the path field.
if the path of the editor is not null AND is part of the currently selected root that would be removed AND is not part of any other open root, then close the file.
if the pkg and ver are in the cache, then just do a readJson and return.
if the queue gets too big, then pluck off whatever we can.
if the range has gotten bigger but has cursor info, we don't replace it
if the range has gotten bigger, we replace it
if the re is not "" at this point, then we need to make sure it doesn't match against an empty path part.
if the reader is waiting for a drain event from this specific writer, then it would cause it to never start flowing again.
if the repo is empty, remove it.
if the selection does not find anything up go down
if the stat fails, then that's super weird.
if the tab has already been shown once, always continue to show it so we preserve state between tab transitions
if the tagged version satisfies, then use that.
if the target.path was what we found in some version of parent, remove using that parent as the base
if the unlink fails, oh well.
if there are any ignore files in the list, then pause and add them.
if there are no more bytes in this buffer, just emit our char
if there is a .gitignore, then we're going to rename it to .npmignore in the output.
if there is no folder in common, then it will be much longer, and using a relative link is dumb.
if there were data event listeners added, then switch to old mode.
if there're new dependencies compare the full list of dependencies we used to have with the one we now have
if there's a "strip" argument, then strip off that many path components.
if there's a package.json in the current folder, then read the package name and version out of that.
if there's a specific owner uid/gid that we want, then set that
if there's an error, it's fine, as long as we got a node
if there's no node_modules folder, then walk up until we hopefully find one.
if there's nothing in the write buffer, then that means that nothing more will ever be provided
if there's something in the buffer waiting, then process it
if they specified a common name for the package that contains the library, tag some useful defaults on to the end of the path to be searched
if they're not, then fetch them from the registry.
if this closes the actual set, then we're done
if this fails, then it means we can't update this thing.
if this succeeds, then we're in business.
if this the module has no parents then the change cannot be hot loaded
if this tree location requested the same module then we KNOW it isn't compatible because if it were findRequirement would have found that version.
if true, a maybeReadMore has been scheduled
if true, add the dir part of the header_name to the include path
if we allow half-open state, or if the writable side ended, then we're ok.
if we are at h3, we want h2.
if we are at the end of the pattern, we should match files too
if we arrive here, ucs is not a combining or C0/C1 control character
if we can't wait, then just call it a failure
if we currently have less than the highWaterMark, then also read some
if we didn't call the onwrite immediately, then it means that we need to wait until it does.
if we don't have a registry connection, try to see if there's a cached copy that will be ok.
if we don't have the data for this static call already, return empty arrays with the corresponding diffCalls
if we don't know what it is, try json and fall back to ini if we know what it is, then it must be that.
if we get an error talking to the registry, but we have it from the cache, then just pretend we got it.
if we got a prefix, then prepend it to the path.
if we got an error we'll try to put back the original module back, succeed or fail though we want the original error that caused this
if we have the shasum already, just add it
if we haven't asked to stat everything, then just assume that everything in there exists, so we can avoid having to stat it a second time.
if we inspect a stateless component we can't use the getPublicInstance method therefore we use the internal _instance property directly.
if we need a readable event, then we need to do some reading.
if we opened more than we closed, find the one we closed
if we want the data now, just emit it.
if we're already writing something, then just put this in the queue, and wait our turn.
if we're in either LOADING or ERROR states, don't show the webView
if we're not in unsafe-perm mode, then figure out who to run stuff as.
if we're not piping anywhere, then do nothing.
if we're really exiting, then let it exit on its own, so that in-process stuff can finish or clean up first.
if we've ended and we have some data left, then emit 'readable' now to make sure it gets picked up.
if we've ended, and we're now clear, then finish it up.
ignore ATTRIBUTE, ENTITY_REFERENCE, ENTITY, DOCUMENT, DOCUMENT_TYPE, DOCUMENT_FRAGMENT, NOTATION
ignore EACCES because that just means we aren't allowed to run it
ignore any potential response body.
ignore duplicates
ignore empty TEXT
ignore empty strings
ignore error.
ignore errors.
ignore event listeners generated by monitorEvent
ignore everything again
ignore everything except what's in the files array.
ignore patterns are always in dot:true mode.
ignore query ids
ignore queued records because not all range fields may be present there
ignore these
ignore-scripts/package.json has scripts that always exit with non-zero error codes.
ignores non-trivial expressions
ignores non-workspace commands
ignoring if Reload JS button can't be located
imagesPerRow: Number of images to be shown in each row.
implementation from standard node.js 'util' module
implicit help
important for assert.deepEqual checks
important for shrinkwrap
important to make sure devDependencies don't get stripped
important when wrapping filters and duplexes.
in a node_modules folder, resolve symbolic links to bundled dependencies when creating the package.
in a node_modules folder, we only include bundled dependencies also, prevent packages in node_modules from being affected by rules set in the containing package, so that bundles don't get busted.
in loose mode, throw out any that are not valid comparators
in strict mode, this may be null / undefined
include all the ".gypi" files that were found
include relative path in filename
include this transform and it's dependencies on the bundle on dev mode
include version
includeCommandLineAPI
includeNewline
included because a child was included
included explicitly
including the comma
incremented each time a cookie is created
indentation
inherit from ArrayIndex
inherit from `ArrayIndex`
inheritCoverGrammar function runs the given parse function with a new cover grammar context, and it propagates the flags outside of the parser.
initial population of the store
initial render
initializations
initialize the remotes cache with the correct perms
inject alias
inline comments
inline-process-browser and unreachable-branch-transform make sure this is removed in browserify builds
inner child should be running
inner modes
innerHTML behaves as it should.
input_encoding
insecure protocols
insert new key, that's tricky
install CLI
install can complete to a folder with a package.json, or any package.
install specific libraries
instruments always fail with 255 because it expects more arguments, but we want it to only launch the simulator
int duration: The duration of the toast.
intermediate phone object has no changes
interpolate string "shapes"
interpolates color strings
intervalSeconds
into the data so that the next time we load from this cached data, we have all the same info.
invalid dir: no matching
invalid glob pattern.
invalid handles are ignored
invalidate cache
invalidate caches
invariant: No messages for closed files, no destroyed markers.
invert the fields between outer/inner fragments
invoke the ArrayIndex internal `set` operator to ensure that there's getters/setters defined for the determined length so far...
invoke the listener
invoked after the tarball has finished being extracted
io.js v3.x.x shipped with "ia32" but should have been "x86" Captures all the logic required to determine download URLs, local directory and  file names.
ipc is used by webviews to communicate with the parent view.
irl, you should never have several hundred contenders for a single lock, so this situation is somewhat pathological.
is-my-json-valid does not provide meaningful error messages for external schemas this is a workaround
isContainer
isMergeArrays defaults to true
isOptimistic
isShorthand
isVisible is false, so oldDisplay is non-null
isexe will check to make sure it's found in the pathExt set.
isolate perspective
isolateCoverGrammar function runs the given parser function with a new cover grammar context, and it does not effect the current flags.
istanbul ignore else
istanbul ignore if
istanbul ignore next
it cannot possibly be useful to us at this point.
it'd be nice to asyncMap these, but actually, doing them in parallel generally munges up the output from node-waf
it's a public suffix
it's hard to force `read-package-json` to break w/o ENOENT, but this will do it
it's not a suffix
it's probably a thing that isn't published.
it's the first thing after all the configs.
itemID and itemRef are for Microdata support as well but only specified in the the WHATWG spec document.
itemProp, itemScope, itemType are for Microdata support.
iterate through the noProxyList until it finds a match.
iteration-based reduce implementation
jasmine-node does this same trick, but neglects to respect the exit code, so we beat it the to the punch.
jasmine-node test runner with Atom test globals and babel transpiling support.
java keyword
javascript mode does bad things with jsx indents
jest for some bad reasons runs the polyfill code multiple times.
join arguments after '--' and pass them to script, handle special characters such as ', ", ' '.
jscs:ignore requireDotNotation
jsdifflib API
jshint asi: true
jshint bitwise: false
jshint bitwise:false
jshint eqeqeq:false
jshint onevar: false, indent:4
jshint unused:false
jsl:fallthru
jslint bitwise:true
jslint evil: true
jslint node: true
jslint node:true
jslint nomen:true
jslint sloppy:true node:true rhino:true
jslint sloppy:true plusplus:true node:true rhino:true
jslint unparam:true
jslint: ignore
jslint: skip
junctions on windows must be absolute
just ONE of the pattern sets in this.set needs to match in order for it to be valid.
just a line break
just a normal string, do the split/map thing
just a response for some request
just check the file itself, and that's it.
just checking it.
just emit a fake exit event.
just get the partial words, minus the last path part
just get the path and basic details.
just give the write the old college try.
just ignore missing files.
just list all users who aren't me.
just missing
just one destination.
just pretend it's a normal old file, not magic at all.
just reading
just return defaults
just return the abs value in that case.
just set and move along
just set the global for non-node platforms.
just take a part of the first list item.
just take the first js file we find there, or nada
keep args in sync with with defineModuleCode in packager/react-packager/src/Resolver/index.js
keep client.groupName.operation from stomping client.operation
keep independent versioning PECL-specific for now
keep refreshing the lock, so we keep it forever
keep track of the number of "newlines" that get encountered
keep using i
key for https connection.
key-value pair argument is global extended header props.
kinda weird if a pkg depends on itself, but after the first iteration of this loop, it indicates a dep cycle.
kludge for server adminery.
lacks that functionality.
last item in the list is the current one
lastIndexOf helper.
later on, we have to set the mode and owner for these
lazily computed properties
lchmod, broken prior to 0.6.2 back-port the fix here.
least recently used
leave as prototype default
leave first char untouched, even if it is a '_' - convert all other to '-'
leave only releases and blog folder
legacy android transform properties
legacy support for decimal strings
legacy: obj, showHidden, depth, colors
length of items in the list
let parent function deal with newline
let the original error be the failure reason.
let's assume it's a baseUrl then
let's see what versions are already published.
level one of log, info, warn, error, mustfix
lib/install needs to have some way of sharing _limited_ state with the things it calls.
lib/jsprim.js: utilities for primitive JavaScript types
libclang doesn't seem to be able to return multiple ranges to define the location of a symbol, which is necessary for Obj-C selectors.
libuuid - string form
license files should never be ignored.
license is NOT optional
like 0 posix headers
like 5, but with data, which should be skipped
like unix, but funny
line continuation
lineIsHidden depends on the presence of the spans, so needs a second pass
lines are stored 0-based in SourceMap spec version 3
link our test module into the global folder
link with package arg: symlink the global to the local
linked from the above in diskCache only
linked nodes use a minimal path from the nearest refetchable node
linkify commitids
linking the modules into the npm.root, resolving dependencies, etc.
list of items in order of use recency
list with all the dependencies' filenames the bundle entry has
listed below.
listen for the queryPosition report on stdin
listen until offscreen
literal args after --
load this before clubbing the platform name.
local-address must be listed as an IP for a local network interface must be IPv4 due to node bug
localStorage compatible interface
location clash
log is just a thin wrapper to console.log that prepends a timestamp
logging won't work unless we pretend that it's ready
longer than 255
look in the include path
look up configs
look up the most recent version.
looking up envs is a bit costly.
looks like an option
lookup failed
loop through the rest of the opts and add the unknown ones as variables.
lotta situps...
low surrogate
loweCase header keys
lower duration first
lowercase keys must be valid, otherwise prefix with "NODETAR."
lru storage.
lruList is a yallist where the head is the youngest item, and the tail is the oldest.
ls current package
ls named package
lstat failed, doesn't exist
lstat wouldn't return an error on these, so we don't either.
lutimes implementation, or no-op
mIxeD CaSe nAMEs
made it to the end of the loop, maybe
magic bitshift guarantees we return an unsigned int
mainScriptFile is null when running in the REPL mode
maintain gesture velocity
maintain two arrays for circular references, where corresponding parents and children have the same index
make a clone from the mirrored cache so we have a temporary directory in which we can check out the resolved treeish
make a complete bare mirror of the remote repo NOTE: npm uses a blank template directory to prevent weird inconsistencies https://github.com/npm/npm/issues/5867
make a new segment if there is a gap
make bundle deps predictable
make css-case commands callable via camelCase as well
make it a Stream
make it an array, if it's a list of words
make it so that the folder in the tarball is named "package"
make me a reusable prototype that I can `new`, or implicitly `new` with a constructor call
make sure it installs locally
make sure it's valid.
make sure python uses files that came with this particular node package
make sure that no data gets corrupted, and basic sanity
make sure that one of the atomic streams won.
make sure that the _header and such is emitted, and clear out the _currentEntry link on the parent.
make sure that the input is valid.
make sure that the mans are unique.
make sure that the requests come back from the server out of order.
make sure the default rejection handler is installed
make sure the file was modified is part of the bundle
make the set of regexps etc.
making the same file again should have no effect.
manually setting default prop here to keep support for the deprecated 'animated' prop
map from module name to path
map from module name to the modules' dependencies the bundle entry has
map gesture to leader
map that indicates the shallow dependency each file included on the bundle has
mapToRegistry will complain if package is undefined, but it's not needed for ls-packages
maps node IDs to the IDs of the connections that contain them
mark and cache dir-ness
mark that we need a transform, so that any data that comes in will get processed, now that we've asked for it.
markupList is either a list of markup or just a list of elements
match on either path separator
match the value.
matching `GitRepositoryAsync` implementation.
max_depth sets the depth that the debugger engine respects when returning hierarchical data.
may be null if no value was defined for this route.
maybe emit 'load'
maybe not readable, or something.
means that the current buffer couldn't be completely output update this._offset to reflect how much WAS written
memoize the directories created by this step
merge all whitespace chars
merge lines into rows conceive output
merge non-newline whitespace chars
merges offset into value and resets
message "already built" should not be error
metadata only, skip
metadata should be compressed
might have slightly different bytes, since the standard isn't very strict, but should have the same semantics checkSum will be different, but cksumValid will be true
mildly evil, but it's for a test.
mimic as if alwaysAuth had been set
minimal distance between grid lines.
minimist api
missing `lastName`
missing `ranges`
mock server reference
modified from https://github.com/es-shims/es5-shim
modulus and exponent
modulus then public exponent
most common case.
most of the time we don't want to auth
most recently used
move the builtin into the conf stack now.
moves the temp file into its final destination b.
multi-inheritance-ish
multi-line strings
multi-part ranges
multiGet invokes callback with an array of key-value pair arrays that matches the input format of multiSet.
multiSet and multiMerge take arrays of key-value array pairs that match the output of multiGet, e.g. Returns a `Promise` object.
multiline comments
multiple pipe destinations.
must be a Directory type
must be either an integer or an octal string.
must convert file: uri's to just a path for atom.
must not start with a dot, as that won't go into the apk
must not throw
mustHaveLeaf
my kingdom for a filtered catch
naked js file
name and fullname are omitted when we get data back from the `eval` command.
name of calling method/function/symbol
name of the subcommand, link `pm-install`
nativeVirtualKeyCode
nb: prefix field may in fact be 130 bytes of prefix, a null char, 12 bytes for atime, 12 bytes for ctime.
necessary for round-tripping gists
need 2 ending null blocks.
need an extended header if negative or too big.
need to also dive through kids, always.
need to do this so fstream doesn't explode when files are removed from under it
need to download node.lib
need to find a slash somewhere in the middle so that path and prefix both fit in their respective fields
need to have inverseDependencies to bubble up accept
need to invoke the `length` getter to ensure that the indexed getters/setters are set up at this point
need to require WebSocket inside of `enable` function because this module is defined as a `polyfillGlobal`.
need to simulate a missing package.json
negation means inclusion
negation nestled within a pattern
nested deferred part
nested event mapping
never create things that are user-unreadable, or dirs that are user-un-listable.
never include the .bin.
never match anything that doesn't start with ., even when options.dot is set.
never propagate `nodeID` past the first linked field
never rm the root, prefix, or bin dirs
new edge field
new modules don't need to be accepted
new style, based on process.release so we have a lot of the data we need
newline, comment or other unrecognized codestyle
newly selected should track the selector
next 5 opens will fail.
next, the global header for this file.
nfcall may return multiple callback arguments as an array
no DOM node should be considered an array-like a 'select' element has 'length' and 'item' properties on IE8
no `id` value is present, so the root ID is autogenerated
no arguments
no async tasks required
no browser support
no exception then we're good
no harm if there's no bundle
no match was found.
no more data can be written.
no need for mans or contributors if they're in the files
no need for the readme now.
no need to bother with the length
no need to expand pre, since it is guaranteed to be free of brace-sets
no need to expand.
no need to reiterate its edges
no nested deferred part
no nested deferreds
no nested nested deferreds
no nulls allowed in path or linkpath
no outer variable, default is used
no perspective
no point saving empty chunks
no progress bars unless asked
no proprietary
no range behavior specified for this combination of filter calls
no realpath resolved
no remainder to process.
no runBeforeMainModule for hmr bundles `require` calls in the require polyfill itself are not extracted and replaced with numeric module IDs, but the require polyfill needs Systrace.
no spring jumping
no underscore equal since it has no concept of Buffers
no version installed
no viable version found
no-op: The default connection profile can't be deleted.
node are automatically associated with the range
node deleted
node is deleted
node is null for DataGrid root nodes.
node v0.11.14 bug see https://github.com/facebook/react-native/issues/218
node-uuid - string form
node-uuid - v1 string form
node/connection link is cleared when the node is deleted
nodes referenced by the fragment should not be evicted
non-Chrome browsers, to check whether a string is in a set, a predicate containing a big ugly `switch` statement is faster than a regular expression, and on Chrome the two are about on par.
non-ascii fields need extended headers long fields get truncated
non-default export
non-npm registries can and will return unnormalized data, plus even the npm registry may have package data normalized with older normalization rules.
non-ref query:
non-standard
nonceFunc:             optional nonce validation function.
noop nav backwards
noop nav forwards
nopt configuration definitions
nopt shorthands
nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
normal text
normalize hosted-git-info clone URLs back into regular URLs this will only work on URLs that hosted-git-info recognizes https://github.com/npm/npm/issues/7961
normalize modulus
normalize registry URL
normalize registry URL so resolution doesn't drop a piece of registry URL
normalize spaces
normalizes slashes.
not a direct alias for IE10 compatibility
not a relay child
not a user provided composite type.
not a valid semver string, nothing we can do
not an actual buffer we keep track of, but a measurement of how much we're waiting to get pushed to some underlying socket or file.
not blocked by task 1
not collected while hold is active
not doing anything special.
not fetched
not in store yet
not included
not listening for removeListener, no need to emit
not name match
not null/false
not quite an LRU, but still space-limited.
not really a tarball, but doesn't matter
not recorded
not some old 0.x style bundle
not supported in IE 10
not supported in Open Source yet
not supported in android
not sure at this point what kind of writer this is.
not sure what happened, but we'll let the caller deal with it
not terribly unusual
not that fast snoopy
not when debugging in chrome
not yet implemented.
note that raising N higher will mean that the overhead increases, because we're creating more and more watchers.
note that this will only do the normal ustar header, not any kind of extended posix header file.
note the missing 'v' on the arg, it should normalise when checking whether we're on the default or not
note: this test simulates an `id`-less root call
nothing changed
nothing changed, so cancel
nothing here
nothing in the list, definitely empty.
nothing is allowed
nothing is forbidden
nothing to do
nothing to do.
nothing yet
now actually fire up npm and run the command.
now all the children.
now attach the suffixes.
now check if it is a core module
now check if we can move from running to break...
now corrupt it, to find leaks.
now data is full
now data is the list of data that we want to show.
now download the node tarball
now figure out what it would be if the cksum was "        "
now get a minimatch object for each one of these.
now get down to business.
now get what we should have, based on the dep.
now go through and verify that everything in there is a dir.
now go through the list of typeDefs, validate against each one.
now make it start, just in case it hadn't already.
now obj has all the installed things, where they're installed figure out the inheritance links, now that the object is built.
now remove anything that was declared
now remove the max restriction, and try again.
now run the next command in the queue
now see how many args were found at all.
now squish any string of nulls into a single null
now test all matched entries as stand-ins for that part of the pattern.
now try to calculate any deltas
now un-hook, and re-emit the chunk
now update the doc on the registry
now we are left with modules that have dependencies on other modules
now we need the extension name out of this thing
now write out the config.gypi file to the build/ dir
now write something to each stream.
now, make the key
npa threw an exception then it ain't git so whatev
npat asks for tap output
npm config set key value npm config get key npm config list
npm help foo bar baz: search topics
npm install-test Runs `npm install` and then runs `npm test`
npm internal utils
npm will log a "verbose" message about this when it happens, but it is a rare enough edge case that we don't have to be super concerned about it.
npm-shrinkwrap.json:
npm: means 1.
null allowed
null means "all paths"
null means known to not be present.
null means the proxy has been disposed.
null or undefined
null parent for roots
number of items in the list
number of pending user-supplied write callbacks this must be 0 before 'finish' can be emitted
number should be a color processed by `normalizeColor` alpha should be number between 0 and 1
numberify any prerelease numeric ids
numbers 12345
numeric values, etc, will have already been parsed.
object stream flag to indicate whether or not this stream contains buffers or objects.
object stream flag.
object, number, boolean null
object-like things
objects shorter than 30 characters are always inlined objects longer than 60 characters are always splitted to multiple lines anything in the middle depends on indentation level
objects that copy over the new stuffs
occasionally there are duplicates that's an acceptable edge-case.
octal strings supported
of the DirWriter will pause until a "drain" event occurs.
of visible cells per row
offscreen, so stop listening
offset 1 for the first removed line.
offset 1 for the new added line.
offset 2 for the 2 lines added.
offset 2 for the 2 lines removed.
offset for the last added line.
oh well, we tried
ok, add this entry
ok, handle this one, then.
ok, here is the part when JSON is wrong section 7.3, table 3
ok, let's see if we can swallow whatever we can.
ok, try to find out which package it was, then
old api surface
old bug where we used the wrong regex
old data is an array XOR new data is an array, replace as well
old school shim for old browsers
on Windows, A/V software can lock the directory, causing this to fail with an EACCES or EPERM if the directory contains newly created files.
on a different drive
on some parent dirs that were created previously.
on/off also work on DOM nodes, registering native DOM handlers.
onClick comes after dragStart and dragEnd events.
onCompleted
onCompleted: Only called if the build completes successfully.
onCompleted: Only called if the install completes successfully.
onDidStopChanging would be another option - any cost is deferred, but with far less fidelity.
onError: If the build fails, calls the Observer with the string output from stderr.
onError: If the install fails, calls the Observer with the string output from stderr.
onExit will only be called if the process completes successfully, i.e. with exit code 0.
onSessionEnd is optional, and is called when all the managed observables complete.
once each for x, y
once we have a user account, then don't complete anything.
one code unit per symbol
one line and multiline comments
one line comments
one of three cases.
one-shot build optimizes build by asking compiler to build several objects at once, reducing overhead of starting new compiler processes.
only --production
only .h header files and the gyp files get extracted
only 0b or 0B
only 0o or 0O
only allow new collections to be scheduled once the current one is complete
only available for token-based auth for now
only bump the index if remaining in current directory
only call onreadystatechange if there is something to abort, below logic is per spec
only decrease the index if remaining in current directory
only do a few of these.
only do the magic bundling stuff for the node_modules folder that lives right next to a package.json file.
only exposed for test
only fail if non-interactive.
only flow one buffer at a time
only follow symbolic links directly in the node_modules folder.
only handle real files for now
only handle real files for now.
only include it at this point if it's a bundleDependency
only make non-readable dirs if explicitly requested.
only need to apply the nodot start if the re starts with something that could conceivably capture a dot
only process the first entry
only proxy data events of normal files.
only show defaults if --long
only skip creation if it's exactly the same link
only the output of `hg status --ignored`
only the output of `hg status`
only until we can't do better
open 10 write streams to the same file.
open a subshell to the package folder.
openEditor/closeEditor converts entries to/from editor/uri locations.
opening quotation mark
operators and such
opinionatedly base64
optimist default API requires you to write the command name three time This is a small wrapper to accept an object instead
optimistic updates need to record the generated client ID for a to-be-created node
optimistically try to PUT all in one single atomic thing.
option is defined
option val if it takes an arg
optional arg
optional checks
optional deps are folded in.
optional trailling comma
optional user-supplied columns to include
optionalArrayOf checks
options-argument form
options: options to pass to fs.writeFile
options: options to pass to fs.writeFile  TODO: move to nuclide-commons and rename to writeFileAtomic
or guess it from the filename
or http response
or if it's http-reponse
or just emit the charStr
or request stream http://github.com/mikeal/request
or throws exception with message.
or try `path` from fs-, request- streams
or try http response
or we're told to ignore it.
organize params for patch, post, put, head, del
original unignore
originally written by Charlie Robbins, https://github.com/indexzero
otherwise compare fake data
otherwise flow complains
otherwise go to next directory...
otherwise pick last -rc tag alphabetically 0.33.0-rc2
otherwise, do nothing
otherwise, go to the previous directory...
otherwise, if there are dupes, it'll fail with EEXIST
otherwise, infer local prefix from cwd.
otherwise, just handle in the app-specific way this creates a fs.WriteStream, or mkdir's, or whatever
outer variable overrides inner default
output no more than 70 characters before the wrong ones
output no more than 78 characters on the string
output should be missing the id fields
output the entire current chunk.
output values
output_encoding
overridden in Extract class, since it needs to wait for its DirWriter part to finish before emitting "end"
overrides the .editing margin rule
oversized objects fall out of cache automatically.
overwrite only the `get` operator of the ".length" property
p always starts with a 1 bit, so count the zeros to get its real size.
package config is picked up from env
package java.lang
package scala
package.json files can never be ignored.
package.json main file should never be ignored.
package.json:
packager can't handle absolute paths
packager is running from node_modules of another project
packages to be loaded have been passed in from the command line or shell.
pad with "0" chars
pad x so am has enough room later
pagesize is always the debuggee pagesize which currently defaults to 32.
pan is in pixels
panX is linked to the gesture
param1, param2, ...
params also has properties: ownProperties generatePreview
parse a component of the expanded set.
parse as a standard JSON mode
parse error
parse options
parse out any deps from the file
parse provided url if it's string or treat it as options object
parseQueryString
parsing just a piece of a larger pattern.
part does not ignore bad value
pass along options.knownLength
pass along which branch contains latest version so that gh-pages root could mark it as latest
pass cli arguments after -- to script.
pass in any extended headers These ones consumers are typically most interested in.
pass the rename timeout.
pass, will use default getters.
passed in one, but it's not the right one.
path: the path to the file to read options: options to pass to fs.readFile.
pathFromSubscriptionRootToSubscriptionPath
pathPrefixToSkip
paths between 100 and 255 should use the prefix field.
paths less than 100 chars don't need a prefix and paths longer than 255 need an extended header and will fail on old implementations no matter what we do here.
pattern has some string bits in the front.
payload:               optional payload for validation.
peer dev deps should both be not extraneous.
performance testing id, unique for each component mount cycle
persist this event because we need to store it
physical touch during bounce ...
physical touch starts ...
pipedArgs array of strings as arguments.
pipedCommand string a command to pipe the output of command through.
piping to a multi-compatible, and we've got directory entries.
pluck off the close-brace
plural fields must be refetched through the parent get linked records to verify the client id
plural items must be refetched through the parent plural field get field to verify the client id is correct
point compression not supported yet
poll for some ms for the lock to clear
polymorphism.
populate the store and record the original tracked queries
port to connect to.
prePredicate
preassign only if we have a default
precomputation
prefer current node interpreter in child scripts
prefer explicit URLs to pushing everything through shortcuts
prefer to return the chmod error, if one occurs, but still try to close, and report closing errors if they occur.
prefix is special, since it might signal the xstar header
premajor and prepatch work the same way.
preminor will bump the version up to the next minor release, and immediately down to pre-release.
prepare cache to reduce chances of possible red screen "Can't fibd variable __fbBatchedBridge..."
prepend 10 items
prepend shouldn't affect 'last' call
preprocessor
presence of .git file implies folder was not overwritten
preserve output symmetry by adding a whitespace-only line at the end if there's one at the beginning
preserve tie-breaker
pretending to be another platform is too hacky, since it breaks how the underlying system looks up module paths and runs child processes, and all that stuff is cached.
prettify and print it, and then provide the raw data to the cb.
prevent a newline from being immediately inserted
prevent dead-locks
prevent final callback from calling itself if it errors
prevent from getting extra .
prevent highlight of division
prevent maybe-sync zalgo release
prevent repeated calls to `global.nativeRequire` to overwrite modules that are already loaded
previous cafile no longer exists, so just continue on gracefully
previous token isn't a separator, so need to insert one
prime-field
print `id` but filter from output
print directly to stdout to not unnecessarily add blank lines
printf-style message
prints 'boo'
prior to -headers.tar.gz
private key
private utility functions
prng4.js - uses Arcfour as a PRNG
probably don't have subsecond resolution.
probably useless
process argv
process each pattern in the minimatch set
process the queue regardless of a transition
processInput
project conf not found, probably working with packed npm
project config file
promote the case of making the whole match in the filename
propagate carry
properly set maxSockets on new agents
property is also supported for OpenGraph in meta tags.
property_value returns the outer property, we want the children ...
props is the desired state.
props is the props of the thing we need to write an extended header for.
props is what we want to set.
protocol missing last slash
provider to id to messages.
proxy all the other methods.
proxy certain important events.
proxy up some events.
ps returns KB
pseudo-private values.
publish can complete to a folder with a package.json or a tarball, or a tarball url.
pull off the device/UNC bit from a windows path.
purposely blank
push content below nav bar
push on the followers
put it on the stack.
put more stuff on here to customize.
put that good code in getHeaders to some use
put the random bytes there
q or r may be null.
quacks like an array
queries and mutations
query with children
queued records are updated: edge/node added
quick and dirty detection for cyclical structures
quoted string have a maximal length of 2k under vc.
race condition.
ran out of file
ran out of file, but still had pattern left.
ran out of pattern and filename at the same time.
ran out of pattern, still have file left.
range updated
range updated because an edge had a change
rawAsap provides everything we need except exception management.
re-export built-in assertions
re-export standard assert
re-ignore everything
re-read and increment/decrement GC ref counts
re-renders are obvious
react-native-cli is installed globally on people's computers.
react-packager logs debug messages using the 'debug' npm package, and uses the following prefix throughout.
read data and increment GC ref counts
read data and set up subscriptions
read it all, truncate the array.
read it as a missing dep
read just some of it.
read the file, and then call addIgnoreRules if there's an error, then tell the cb about it.
readJson filters out empty descriptions, but init-package-json traditionally leaves them alone
readdir, then do the file stuff on ENOTDIR
reading a tar is a lot like reading a directory However, we're actually not going to run the ctor, since it does a stat and various other stuff.
readme files should never be ignored.
ready for next exit
really don't want to have this lying around in the file
really-long-package-names-------------------------------such--length-----many---wow the thisisareallyreallylongpackagenameitshouldpublishdowenowhavealimittothelengthofpackagenames-poch.
reassign to preserve type information in below closure
rebuild everything
rebuild if: not a .folder, like .bin or .hooks
recalculate column widths from truncated output/lines
recognize in local context.
recognize in other context.
record the create/update only if something changed
recurse this function so we don't reset allParents and allChildren
recursively find a file...
redboxes early, e.g. for 'arraybuffer' on ios 7
reduce only has a series version, as doing reduce in parallel won't work in many situations.
reflink, nolink
refuse to run actions for failed packages
register the option
registry-frontdoor cares about the access level, which is only configurable for scoped packages
regression, see https://github.com/substack/node-optimist/issues/71
relative path
relativePath is undefined if watchRoot is the same as directoryPath.
release, package will be installed by default
remote resolver tests
remove a package.
remove all if no version specified
remove all.
remove any bins/etc, and then delete the folder.
remove bytes belonging to the current character from the buffer
remove color swatch and the like
remove config so doesn't appear on every column.
remove from the cache first
remove optional dependencies from dependencies during --save.
remove query string if any
remove readme unless we asked for it
remove shebang
remove the '.' for directory naming purposes
remove the `g` flag
remove the autogenerated `id` field
remove the banner, we just care about the last line
remove the callbacks, maintaining the invariant that there should be no empty maps or sets in this._callbacks
remove the root `id` field
remove the single quotes before calling JSON.parse
remove this package from the global space, if it's installed there
remove time
remove trailing comma in multiline if asked to
removing comma in arrays and objects
removing something, so going backward
replace X with 0
replace and initialize factory
replace tabs
replace the pipe method with a new version that will unlock the buffered stuff.
replacement for python's dict.get function -- need easy default values
report the unpublish error if this was a retry and unpublish failed
request times out in 2 seconds
request to take 5 seconds to load
request will not pay attention to the NOPROXY environment variable if a config value named proxy is passed in, even if it's set to null.
require BackAndroid so it sets the default handler that exits the app if no listeners respond
require calls are extracted with a regular expression.
require time
require.resolve it so we fail fast if it ever goes missing.
required for devtools to be able to edit react native styles
required part
required to pass through certain key events
requires arg
reset async asyncQueue
reset because shorthand default was used correctly
reset the cache
reset to beginning
reset values
resize the cache when the lengthCalculator changes.
resize the cache when the max changes.
resolve deps by returning the dep in the nearest "deps" directory
resolve stack traces to a plain string.
resolved data did not change
resolves chains of symlinks of unlimited depth, returning a list of paths it's seen in the process when it hits either a symlink cycle or a non-symlink
response.resume should be defined, but check anyway before calling.
restore ending comma
restoring the record calls onNext
restricted name of A-Z / a-z
result ignored
results are written to `queuedRecords`
results are written to `records`
results show looking glass icon and recent searches on input search fields in WebKit/Blink
retry forever, only keep last error
return an array of property AST nodes
return bigint initialized to value
return mine that they're not already on.
return new, unset BigInteger
return null, unless we've ended.
return number of 1 bits in x
return previously selected bobble to rest position
return the intersection
return to start
return true if it's a proper object throw otherwise
return whatever was printed
returnByValue
returns - a promise fulfilled when the expand operation is finished
returns bit length of the integer x
reuse a cached remote when possible, but nuke it if it's in an inconsistent state
reverse so lead on top
reverse so leader is on top
rewind because we don't know first char
rgba requires that the r,g,b are integers....
rightHandSide is a vector, or point in 3d space relative to the origin.
rightHandSide is the right hand side of the equation.
rimraf.sync chokes here for some reason
rm tmp/random Adding a url: 1.
roll-back the install if anything went wrong
root children fetcher
root was expanded, selection shouldn't change
round up the staleness indicator.
round up to the nearest block size
route `b` and `c` are no longer in the stack.
rowData is an array of images
rs_signFunc-based RequestSigners have to build up their entire signing string within the rs_lines array and give it to rs_signFunc as a single concat'd blob.
run package lifecycle scripts in the package root, or the nearest parent.
run promise callbacks
runAllTimers doesn't actually run all timers with nested timer functions inside Promises, so we have to call it extra times.
running from within assets, no offline path to use
safeguard against resetting a previously defined array by accidentally forgetting the brackets
same as dependencies but for dev deps
same commit hash on purpose
same data as previous test, just using nested constructors
same function
same id, route, variables, and data
sanitize column settings
sanitize data
sanity check
save creating a proxy, by stat'ing the thing now.
save existing configs, but yank off for this PUT
save the number of maintainers before mutation so that we can figure out if maintainers were added or removed
scala keyword
scalar values are converted to strings
scope modifiers
scope.object.description shows on RHS
scoped packages get special treatment
scriptURL is falsy, we have nothing to go on here
scripts is not an object, so it should be deleted
scrollTop is in Pixels
search for the latest package
searchInContent should call back later.
section 7.2, table 2
see also react-native.js
see if any new things have been added.
see if it's a shorthand if so, splice and back up to re-parse it.
see if it's in the doc.
see if it's valid.
see if the parent section is also an object.
see if there's already a package specified.
see if there's anything else
see if this one itself matches
select alias
self and source are DEV only properties.
semi-private api, used by sshpk-agent
send SIGTERM to npm
send authorization 3.
send errors to the client instead of killing packager server
send the query position request code to stdout
sendServerMessageToChromeUi takes a string and sends it to the chrome debugger UI.
separate modules we need to preload from the ones we don't
serialize body and append serialized refs to response
server/client version mismatch -- this kills the server
set `diff` timestamp
set by the CookieJar:
set date fields to be a proper date
set default
set default options
set dirname and process if not passed in this facilitates regression tests
set gid on extraction
set new value, return old value
set order of some sections explicitly
set restricted deletion flag on dirs on extraction
set returns old value
set same version
set some convenience properties as well.
set the cookie if it's domain in the href's domain.
set the default_configuration prop
set the env variables, then run scripts as a child process.
set the globalconfig in the userconfig
set the ignores just for this test
set the node development directory
set the target_arch variable
set the type so that we know what kind of file to create
set the userconfig in the env unset anything else that npm might be trying to foist on us
set uid on extraction
set up data events if they are asked for Ensure readable listeners eventually get something
set up the build dir and DLL name
setup Barrett
setup in componentDidMount
setup primitive classes to be JSON Schema types
setup web socket
setup web socket TODO: Assign random port rather than using fixed port.
shared with ssh format
shebangs and directives are optional
shell-escape does not wrap ancestorExpression in quotes without this toString conversion.
shell-quote returns objects for things like pipes.
shift arguments to left by one
shift generates too much garbage.
shim for using process in browser
short names for common things
short-circuit in the case of busted things.
shortcut -- cur is exactly long enough, and no offset.
shortcut key for hyperclick:confirm-cursor
shortcut: comments match nothing.
shorthands never take args.
should already be established as a Directory type
should already be established as a File type
should already be established as a Link type
should be a multiple of the no.
should be array-like.
should be impossible.
should be the same reference
should be the same.
should be unreachable.
should fall out immediately
should get no more entries after end
should never get here
should not have ended nicely, since we returned an error
should not inherit default object properties
should not switch to this
should not throw
should only contain argv
should return false for max exceeded
should return the first dir created.
should stop transform from looking at fields/fragments
should trigger an immediate resize
shouldDispose
shouldResolve
show the sample datatip for every type of file
show this datatip for every type of file
show user that no viable version can be found
showIfHidden
showSearchPanel gets called when changing providers even if it's already shown.
show_hidden allows the client to request data from private class members.
shutdown mock npm server.
shutdown mock registry.
shutdownIfLast
sign or digit
signalLater looks whether there are any handlers, and schedules them to be executed when the last operation ends, or, if no operation is active, when a timeout fires.
silently ignore it
similar to --strip or --strip-components
similar to chmodr except it add permissions rather than overwriting them adapted from https://github.com/isaacs/chmodr/blob/master/chmodr.js
similarly to `source`, this property represents the resource used to render the loading indicator for the image, displayed until image is ready to be displayed, typically after when it got downloaded from network.
simple conversion
simple message
simple multiplier
simulate 2s old
simulate a Flow crash
simulate a server response with different data
simulate a slow write operation
since the value of the parameters are  unknown during parsing time we set the value to `undefined`.
since this isn't an install these won't get auto-built unless they're not dependencies.
single quoted strings
singleline comments
size ignored because no variables are passed into the fragment
size is special, since it signals when the file needs to end.
skip HMR requests
skip _not_ specified properties
skip blank lines
skip flattening to check fragment structure
skip if already deleted
skip if method doesn't match.
skip if no har property defined
skip if no matches at all
skip if the builder already exists
skip if there is nothing to wrap
skip next character inside string
skip over any that are escaped.
skip over sockets.
skip over symbolic links
skip over the next line
skip over the next line, and the line after it.
skip the boolean and the target
skip the global header if we're not doing that.
skip the regexp for non-magical patterns unescape anything in it, though, so that it'll be an exact match against a file etc.
skip the remapping
skip this cookie
skip those.
skipZeros: Don't use empty key latency values in aggregates.
slice is based on length no wcwidth
slice is the same for buffers and strings.
slice off each field.
slice out the piece of cur that we need.
slice, just return a full concat
slight hack: change the presented index for a moment in order to transitionTo correctly
small range is extended by default
sn2 not created since the value is unknown in the cache
so it doesn't try to install into npm's own node_modules
so let's not break that.
so the "fail" one would still pass.
so we have to lstat here and make sure it's not a dir.
so we only need to check the difference between alias types and non-return types.
sockets not supported
soft spring
solution is to crack them and let the compiler concat them implicitly
some invalid regexp stuff in the set.
some kind of semver range.
some marker objects
some methods have options object arguments.
some people escape those, so I'd copy this to be safe
some really cheesy monkeypatching
some time elapses ...
some unusual error.
someone's got this one.
something else
something other than "currently locked" maybe eperm or something.
something with the data.
sort results by number of results found, then by number of hits then by number of matching lines
sort the array numerically ascending
sort them lexicographically, so that they're next to their nearest kin
sorting of S5.4 part 2
sourceMap: 'inline',
special case for leading zero: 0.123456
special case when inside a connection traversal
special for hardlinks from tarballs
special format
special handling for ProxyReaders
special little thing for handling hardlinks.
special rules.
special, done below, after all the others
special, this is an extension of the "path" field.
spit out variable definitions
split author on whitespace or ,
split diff nodes into root queries
split keywords on whitespace or ,
split long words so they can break onto multiple lines
split string
spring each bobble to its spot
spring to start after decay finishes
spy_fileA experiences no change.
spy_fileA, spy_project, and spy_allMessages are called with data from the initial state and updateA2.
spy_fileB is called from updateB.
spy_fileB is called with data from the initial state.
spy_project and spy_allMessages are called from data from the initial state and from updateB.
srsly wtf right here
ssh port of host nuclide server is running on
stack is too small.
stale: boolean When `forceFetch` is enabled, a request is always made to fetch updated data.
standard checks
star rule matches
start a file.
start from the root object and mark as non-extraneous all modules that haven't been previously flagged as extraneous then propagate to all their dependencies
start git server
start of format
start out asking for a readable event once data is transformed.
start the ball rolling.
start the flow if it hasn't been started already.
start unzipping and untaring
start walking the dir, and emit an "entry" event for each one.
start where sticker animated to
start with HAR, then override with additional options
start/end are column indices.
startIndex represents the index of the first element in the range.
starting from a root object, call findUnmet on each layer of children
startup, ok to do this synchronously
stat the thing to see what the proxy should be.
state.overlay.combineTokens always takes precedence over combine, unless set to null
static example apps
static positions
static property
stderr string The contents of the process's error stream.
stderr-data
stdin string The contents to write to stdin.
stdio: 'inherit',
stdout and stderr are emitted when DBGP sends the corresponding message packets.
stdout and stderr are split by newlines.
stdout should be empty, because we only have one, optional, dep and if it fails we shouldn't try installing anything
stdout should hopefully be set to line-buffering, in which case the string would come on one line.
stdout-data
steal them back, don't break the lists
step 1: figure out negation, etc.
step 2: expand braces
step 3: now we have a set, so turn each one into a series of path-portion matching patterns.
step before reporting initial status to get to the first instruction.
still have to emit end so that dir-walking can move on.
still need to fetch file size from fs
still valid subscriptions
stop climbing as soon as we hit
stop existing session.
stop here and allow anything the bundled pkg allows
stop subsequent errors hitting callback multiple times
stopKeyClock is fast so attaching it to onDidChange here is OK.
stopping momentum.
store is optional
store raw args
store the `process.env` object as a non-enumerable `_env`
stored in `length`
stores highlight worker timeout
stores maps added by addKeyMap
storing the index from the file_list
stretch - The image will be stretched to fill the entire frame of the view without clipping.
string or integer basically
string rather than NuclideUri because this module will always execute at the location of the file, so it will always be a real path and cannot be prefixed with nuclide://
strip keyname
style block
style values shouldn't contain a semicolon
styles moved to the top of the file so getDefaultProps can refer to it
sublte zoom
subscriptionCount
subscriptionName
subscriptionOptions
subscriptionPath
subscriptionRoot
subsequent reconnections can still succeed.
suffix exists, make sure someone didn't purposely put the suffix there by checking against the actual text associated with the node
sunos lets the root user unlink directories, which is...
support for inheriting config env variables from npm
support legacy functions
support legacy syntax
support nested comments
support varags, but simply cast to string in case there's only one arg
suppress 'create' output generated by yeoman
suppress error printing
suppress log printing A process that lasts ten seconds.
suppress warnings about using a prerelease version of node
suppressBlacklist
swallow any state char that wasn't consumed
switch into hardlink mode.
swizzle in our custom cache invalidation logic
symbolic links are not allowed in packages.
synchronous callback, no zalgo
syntactic elements, and recursively calling those, each function advancing the input stream and returning an AST node.
system packages
t15 left as is first car
t6913624 tracks cleanup of this.
t7114196: Given the current implementation of HgRepositoryClient, each root directory will always correspond to a unique instance of HgRepositoryClient.
t7542202: fix this test and re-enable it
table view.
take a header chunk, start the right kind of entry.
take a little shortcut and use npm's arg parsing logic.
taken from https://github.com/cemerick/jsdifflib
taken from https://github.com/isaacs/chmodr/blob/master/chmodr.js
takes precedence over expires for TTL
tar archives have 7573746172 at position
tar into tmp/random/package.tgz 2.
tar tmp/random/contents/package to cache/n/v/package.tgz 4.
target is a window object
target name
tell gyp to write the Makefile/Solution files into output_dir
tell make to write its output into the same dir
tell request let body be Buffer instance
tell the dest that it's being piped to
temporarily unused
terminate fields.
test "length"
test changing the max, verify that the LRU items get dropped.
test for 8-bit control characters
test for singularity of upper 3x3 part of the perspective matrix
test getters without being "set"
test module
test partial parsing in the presence of comment/negation chars
test setters, followed by getters
test that log objects proxy through.
test these manually.
test various flag settings.
test without the globstar, and with every child both below and replacing the globstar.
the /path/to/node_modules/..
the URL comes in exactly as it was passed on the command line, or as normalized by normalize-package-data / read-package-json / read-installed, so figure out what to do with it using hosted-git-info
the `id` here is a non-requisite id field
the address record has no id but should reuse the previously generated client id
the amount that is being written when _write is called.
the asset to resolve
the bad thing will happen
the bearer token is enough, don't confuse things
the better to repl you with
the builder function to wrap with builders.ExpressionStatement
the builtin config is "sticky".
the column number in the original source.
the connection or an intermediary fragment
the current word has a dash.
the default anyway
the desired order isn't necessarily a correct dependency specific order so we ensure that below
the devtools closed
the directory where the dev files will be installed
the extended header from omega tar.
the false_name-test-package has the name property 'test-package' set in the package.json and a dependency named 'test-package' is also a defined dependency of 'test-package-with-one-dep'.
the files that we expect to not see
the first block of text before the first heading that isn't the first line heading
the first directory entry is ok
the first line was removed.
the following have npm defaults, and need to be explicitly overridden
the fragment may be null when `if` or `unless` conditions are not met.
the function passed is called after the animation is complete
the global header and root fixtures/ dir are going to get a different date each time, so omit that bit.
the handler that waits for readable events after all the data gets sucked out in flow.
the iOS simulator.
the item was created without expiration in a non aged cache
the list contains the Hit objects as the entries.
the lru should drop it after 100 entries
the module exists as a dependent, but the version doesn't match, so a new copy will have to be installed above here
the name is definitely scoped, so escape now
the name itself takes precedence
the native environment provides this global directly with its script embedded.
the no-half-open enforcer
the noGlobStar pattern exits the inGlobStar state
the only files we expect to see
the order in which the RFC has them:
the output of `hg status --all`
the package before this one.
the package root.
the parent connection
the parent connection or an intermediary fragment
the parser may not call write if _abort is true.
the range no longer returns this edge
the range still contains this edge
the raw data can be circular
the reconnection fails on startup 3.
the reference is expanded with overridden query variables
the rest are args.
the root is dir2's parent
the root is the topmost node
the second line is newly added.
the simulator.
the stream to use
the symlink file is excluded from git, because it makes windows freak the hell out.
the thing is.
the top level is a bit special.
the various stateChar values for the "extglob" stuff.
the year-value is less than 1601
then add to the end any remaining packages that werent in bower.json
then remove the nulls.
then should be retrieved only once
then write to each of them, and to the target and verify at the end that each of them does their thing
then, blame someone else
then, filter the list based on our ignoreRules
then, slam the door in their face
then, we'll expand the suffix.
there are more fields to deal with.
there are plenty of other tests to verify that publish itself functions normally.
there are some very rare and pathological edge-cases where a cycle can cause npm to try to install a never-ending tree of stuff.
there is a next code unit
there is no safe way to do a one-step clone to a treeish that isn't guaranteed to be a branch, so explicitly check out the treeish once it's cloned
there was some kind of error, reinstate previous auth/token/etc.
there's a lot of state associated with an "install" operation, including packages that are already installed, parent packages, current shrinkwrap, and so on.
there's always a chance the permissions could have been frobbed, so fix
there's no readme data in this particular object
these are actually numbers
these are contained in menus
these are filenames in .
these are mostly the same in regexp and glob
these are optional, and will be nulled out if not present.
these contain full paths so we can't do an exact match with them
these fragments have different types and cannot be flattened
these have served their purpose, and are now just noisy clutter
these should not throw
these things aren't particularly big, but walking down the string and turning it into a regexp can get pretty costly.
these throw because there's no __get__ and __set__ function defined
these two cases enter the inGlobStar state
they can't be piped around properly, so there's really no sense even acknowledging them.
they should still be ordered properly in the resulting config object set.
they're a bit rare to find in the wild
thing when the cwd is where package.json is, and when the package.json is one level up.
things defined as both dev dependencies and regular dependencies are treated as the former
third node is not deleted
this allows for module-specific configure flags like:
this call should always throw
this can be used to pause execution asynchronously.
this candidate was not found or not readable, do nothing
this catch is used to skip all those internal calls
this causes some errors to get logged, but I don't think it's a big deal and I don't know how to mock a module
this data should never trigger a render pass, so don't put in state
this exclusion is at the point where we know the list of entries in the dir, but don't know what they are.
this file is used by lib/cache.js
this function is an express/connect middleware that accepts uploads in application/json5 format
this function monkey-patches JSON.parse, so it will return an exact position of error in case of parse failure
this gets filled from getAllCookies:
this hackery is required for IE8/9, where the `console.log` function doesn't have 'apply'
this happens for overswiping when there is no scene at toIndex
this is a 2d rotation on the z-axis
this is a generator function in the python lib, which of course is not supported in javascript the reimplementation builds up the grouped opcodes into a list in their entirety and returns that.
this is accessed by the eval'd backend code
this is an example of using npm.commands.search programmatically to fetch data that has been filtered by a set of arguments.
this is hot code.
this is how to use npm programmatically:
this is just to encourage consistency
this is necessary because if we set it on props, even when empty, it'll trigger the default pull-to-refresh behavior on native.
this is not an octal literal
this is not directive
this is ok if we're doing the match as part of a glob fs traversal.
this is only acceptable if we're on the very last empty segment of a file with a trailing slash.
this is success if it's a negative pattern, failure otherwise.
this is to avoid replacing the top of the stack
this leads to a conflict during installation and the fix is covered by this test
this log is meanto to be overridden
this logic ported from the old `gyp_addon` python file
this one has to use the /g flag
this one is too noisy, only assert if it'll be relevant
this one won't happen if graceful-fs is used.
this passes command line arguments down to the composed generators
this should be fairly rare.
this should be replaced with the npm conf object
this time, going to defer something inside the ref
this user needs help
this would read 1055790163 from cache if not aborted
this writer will only write directories
this._id value is injected at construction time.
this._lastSuggestionAtMouse will only be set if hyperclick returned a promise that resolved to a non-null value.
this._totalSizeDIP is available below since we successfully applied constraints.
this.props is actually a ReactElement
this.props.onScrollResponderKeyboardDismissed  Standard Keyboard Hide Sequence:  this.props.onKeyboardWillHide this.props.onKeyboardDidHide
three-digit octal
throw on invalid json
throw out any that are not relevant for whatever reason
throw some gets in there, too.
timerIndex of -1 means that no timer with that ID exists.
timestampSkewSec:      optional number of seconds of permitted clock skew for incoming timestamps.
to a fraction.
to an AST representing an object literal:
to appease flow
to be overridden in specific implementation classes.
to be, or not to be, that is the question.
to do something with all expressions.
to get at patterns
to include directly in the repo for various reasons.
to make sure blur and focus event listeners are only attached once
to validate the data object at the end as a worthwhile package and assign default values for things.
toString everything
todo: complete with valid values, if possible.
todo: update with test-package-with-one-dep once the new npm-registry-mock is published
tokExprAllowed stays unchanged
tokenizer releases input.
tokenizer takes over input.
tokenizer when in html mode
tokenizer when in scripting mode
top-level classes
top-level paragraph
toss it away
total character offset
totally normal.
track edges.node
track new node
track nodes
track pan gesture
transform data cells
translation is simple
treat the test path as a set of pathparts.
treated as immutable
tricky escapes to get stderr redirection to work
trigger the load event if nothing was already going to do so.
truncate once it's been written.
truncated text storage
try again, with the same exact callback as this one.
try to engage the lock.
try to find the npm command.
try to find the right one.
try to get another lock.
try to get the platform from the url
try to guess at a good node_modules location.
try with the leading / trimmed off the test eg: foo/bar instead of /foo/bar
try/catch here because in case of any error, Atom stops dispatching events to the rest of the listeners, which can stop the remote editing from being functional.
tst.inherit.js: test that inheriting from VError and WError work as expected.
tst.verror.js: tests basic functionality of the VError class.
tst.werror.js: tests basic functionality of the WError class.
turn the objects into somewhat more humane strings.
turns out nearly every character is allowed in fs paths
two code units per symbol
two-digit octal
type can be an array or single thing.
typeof regex is object
types typically used in legacy docblock
unassigned or bool
undefined means unknown.
underscore is already in the package.json, but --save will trigger a rewrite with sort
undo uncommenting javadoc setting
unicode char or a unicode sequence
unicode/character escape sequence
unignore everything
unless the prefix was simply a non existent directory.
unless we give it those.
unlink it, then do the dir stuff on EPERM or EISDIR 2.
unlinked only
unlocking an already-unlocked lock is a noop
unnecessary
unset value from styles.circle
unspy is a ported utility from Atom's `spec-helper.coffee` that restores the jasmine spied function on an object to its original value.
unsupported
untar cache/n/v/package.tgz into cache/n/v/package 5.
untar into tmp/random/contents/package, stripping one dir piece 3.
until break
unwrap argument into individual BufferLists
update config takes affect global to all existing and future loggers.
update final size based on the range options
update first and last call values to be numbers
update subscriptions whenever results change
update the buffer info.
update the last read from original cache
updateClock defaults to true
updateComponent will update this property on subsequent renders
updateDisplay_W2 will use these properties to do the actual resizing
updated locally, not on repo
updated locally, scoped, not on repo
updated locally, updated and greater version on repo
updated locally, updated but lesser version on repo
updating this._data and check for errors
uri is either a file: uri, or a nuclide: uri.
urlmon.lib ole32.lib oleaut32.lib uuid.lib gdi32.lib winspool.lib comdlg32.lib
usage: Like asyncMap, but only can take a single cb, and guarantees the order of the results.
use ForeverAgent in node 0.10- only
use a req/res pair, since it's crazy deep and cyclical sparseFE10 and sigmund are usually pretty close, which is to be expected, since they are essentially the same algorithm, except that sigmund handles regular expression objects properly.
use a warning instead of an invariant so components don't show up in prod but not in __DEV__
use am to combine the multiply-shift-add into one call
use bright blue on Windows as the normal blue color is illegible
use custom content-type above all
use custom params
use it by default
use symbols if possible, otherwise just _props
use that for the dev files
use the cache and update in the background if it's not too old
use the class method CookieJar.deserialize instead of calling this directly
use the default subcommand
use the entire line
useShortName
used as "import typeof"
used for animated nodes
used for started animations
used to disable editing during key handlers when in readOnly mode
used to override scope matching for tokens as well as legacy auth
useful for skipping data from some files quickly.
user config file
user set 'fromBase: true' indicating tar root should be directory itself
username to authenticate as
usually these are package objects.
utility methods for all parts of the schema
uuid-js - string form
uuid-js - v1 string form
v3 onward, has process.release
v8 has an optimization for storing 31-bit signed numbers.
v8 likes predictible objects
validate a value against a property definition
validate a value against a type definition
validate an object against a schema
validate response data
validate that the url we just downloaded matches the expected shasum.
validator config
value has changed, update it.
value in ms to print out screen contents, set this value in CI to debug if tests are failing
values determined by configure.js
values for the mode field
variables return their values
verify permissions on git hooks
verify that files changed, we just do a git diff and check how many times version is added across files
verify that the optimistic update takes precedence over the server update
verify that they're not null-padded
verify that this is a Git URL before continuing
verifyConsistency
verror.js: richer JavaScript errors
versions where -headers.tar.gz started shipping
versions.html is located in root of website and updated with every release
very restrictive condition for now
view to show if there's an error
viewer has a client id and must be refetched by the original root call
viewer.actor
viewer.newsFeed
wait a bit to allow packager to startup
wait a sec for those writes to go out.
wait for all the timeout checks to finish, then end the test
wait for the rename event to emit.
wait for the watchman to settle on the created directory and file.
wait till response come back
waitForServer
walk through each, seeing how much it has in common with the next and previous
walked up too high or something.
warn about invalid bits.
warn about invalid configs at every level.
watchman fails, and then 2.
we already have the package info, so just move into place
we already showed the warning
we also unshift the bundled node-gyp-bin folder so that the bundled one will be used for installing things.
we always consider deps provided by a shrinkwrap as "correct" or else we'll subvert them if they're intentionally "invalid"
we are seeing a request in a state that should not generate that request.
we assume here that runWith is called in every spec -- otherwise these will not be spies
we didn't reach the full extent of the pattern
we don't care about invariant's own frame
we don't replace empty ranges
we don't want empty directories to show up in package tarballs.
we don't want to define LIB, as that will override the default library path that is set in that env var
we expect this to throw with a more informative message
we filter entries before we know what they are.
we fork here depending on the platform: while android is pretty good at loading individual assets, ios has a large overhead when reading hundreds pf assets from disk
we got cached data, so let's see if we have a tarball.
we had some state-tracking character that wasn't consumed by this pass.
we have char in the buffer, so count for it
we have enough to cover it, but it spans past the first buffer.
we have implemented the _read method, and done the other things that Readable wants before the first _read call, so unset the sync guard flag.
we have our reasons
we have to create another flow service here since we've mocked modules we depend on since the outer beforeEach ran.
we ignore errors here, because they can legitimately happen, for instance, bundled modules will be in both node_modules folders
we just do this repeatedly until there are no more orphaned packages which isn't as effecient as it could be on a REALLY big tree but we'll face that if it proves to be an issue
we just want the base registry URL in this case
we like the cars
we matched the implicit, or default arg
we matched the non-default arg
we may still need to set the mode/etc.
we must ensure that previous needDrain will not be reset to false.
we need to pass globals for the components to be configurable metadata is generated in this process which has access to process.env but the web pages are generated in a sandbox context and have only access to CommonJS module files
we replace children with a new array object instead of mutating it because mutating it results in weird failure states.
we require this at runtime due to load-order issues, because recursive requires fail if you replace the exports object, and we do, not in deps, but in a dep of it.
we should find the directory based on the directory the script is running in and it should match the layout in a build tree where npm is installed in ....
we should find the directory based on the directory the script is running in and it should match the layout in an installed tree where npm is installed in ....
we should find the directory based on the execPath for node and match because it was in the Debug directory
we should find the directory based on the execPath for node and match because it was in the Release directory
we should find the directory based on the execPath for node and match because it was in the bin directory
we should not find it as it will not match based on the execPath nor the directory from which the script is running
we should recurse and do more matches
we try to at least catch the key combo
we wait to actually hide in order to avoid flicker
we want asyncExecute to throw the first time, to mimic Flow not runinng.
we want msvcrt in the PHP DLL
we want the ONE thing that was installed into the global dir
we want to skip warning if this is a child of another module that we're removing
we were waiting for this.
we're just mocking to avoid having to call `npm.load`
we're using a stored agent.
webpackBootstrap
well-known name that JSON.stringify calls
whatever it starts with, whether that's 'absolute' like /foo/bar, or 'relative' like '../baz'
when 'finish' is emitted
when end specified no need to calculate range inclusive, starts with 0
when it's passed assign the value and conditionally invoke the callback
when running scripts explicitly, assume that they're trusted.
when setting this immediately, Atom will unset the focus...
when symbolink is relative path
when the dest drains, it reduces the awaitDrain counter on the source.
when the search field is manually selected
when the username was not changed, empty response means "use the old value"
when the writable side finishes, then flush out anything remaining.
when we try to consume some more bytes, simply unpause the underlying stream.
whenever we return null, then we set a flag to say that we're awaiting a 'readable' event emission.
where the bundle is being run from
whether bin file is a js script with explicit `.js` extension
while for Promises we track the length of time it takes to resolve or reject.
while this implementation does not require async calling, doing so gives this a consistent interface with loadDeps et al
wildcards in the pattern will not match a / in the pathname.
will be set later
will be unpaused when config is loaded.
will play animation.
will retry 3 times
windows calls it's path 'Path' usually, but this is not guaranteed.
windows does not use lifecycle signals, abort
windows fix for locked files
windows: running 'npm blah' in this folder will invoke WSH, not node.
windowsVirtualKeyCode
with a pathExt of '', any filename is fine.
with a single exception that CoverInitializedName when used directly in an Expression, generates an early error.
with addEdgesAfterCursor
with concatSegment
workaround for the problem with front-end's setVariableValue implementation not preserving null type
wrap all declared CAN_BE_SYNC methods in the sync wrapper
wrap an old-style stream as the async data source.
wrap in a div to fully contain CodeMirror
wrap long lines.
wrapper in case we're in module_context mode windows: running "npm blah" in this folder will invoke WSH, not node.
write an additional node and verify only the new edge and node are tracked
write an optimistic update with the same values as the store
write decodes the given buffer and returns it as JS string that is guaranteed to not contain any partial multi-byte characters.
write some more stuff.
write some stuff to start with
write something else to the target.
write starting values for a query
write the "installVersion" file
write the results for only the current field, for every instance of that field in any subfield/fragment in the query.
write the string, and null-pad
write to base store
write to queued store
write to the base store
write to the queued store
x is shorthand but its value is an assignment expression.
x-platform log/assert shims
xdebugAttachPort is the port to listen for dbgp connections on.
xml2js has a rather ...
yeoman-generator/node_modules/ download/node_modules/ caw/node_modules/ get-proxy/node_modules/ rc/index.js
yes, this was a bug
yes, twice on purpose
you can keep writing these things forever.
you can put blocks of nulls between entries anywhere, so appending one tarball to another is technically valid.
zero length strings have no dbgpProperty._ property
zero prepad
zero-width non-breaking space These characters contribute nothing to indentation.
